© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we report on detailed temperature and magnetic field dependence of magnetization of IV-VI semiconductor PbTe doped with mixed valence transition metal Cr2+/3+. The material is studied solely by a SQUID magnetometer in order to quantitatively determine the contribution of single substitutional Cr2+/3+ as well as of various Cr-Te magnetic nanocrystals, including their identification. The applied experimental procedure reveals the presence of about 1019 cm−3 paramagnetic Cr ions, of which 2/3 are the Cr3+ ions formed via self-ionization of Cr2+ resonant donors. These are known to improve the thermoelectric figure of merit parameter zT of this semiconductor. The magnetic finding agrees with previous Hall effect studies thus providing a new experimental support for the proposed electronic structure model of PbTe:Cr system with resonant Cr2+/3+ state located (at low temperatures) about 100 meV above the bottom of the conduction band. Below room temperature a ferromagnetic-like signal points to the presence of Cr-rich nanocrystalline precipitates. Two most likely candidates, namely: Cr2Te3 and Cr5Te8 are identified upon dedicated temperature cycling of the sample at the remnant state. As an ensemble, the nanocrystals exhibit (blocked) superparamagnetic properties. The magnetic susceptibility of both n- and p-type PbTe in the temperature range 100<T<400 K has been established. These magnitudes are essential to properly account for the high temperature magnetic susceptibility of PbTe:Cr.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we have investigated the material properties of PECVD (Plasma Enhanced Chemical Vapor Deposition) amorphous Silicon nitride (SiN) films and the influence of deposition conditions on gate-leakage increase of AlGaN/GaN HEMT's (High Electron Mobility Transistor) after passivation. We have studied the effect of gas flow ratio (SiH4/NH3) on the structural and compositional properties of SiNx deposited on crystalline Silicon (Si). Based on the inference, electrical properties of the SiNx films were examined by depositing on AlGaN/GaN HEMT as a passivation layer. The optimized SiNx which is N-rich with a refractive index of 1.83, tensile stress of 681 MPa and NH3/SiH4 ratio of 18 shows only a 1.2x variation in gate leakage, 1.4x increase in gm, minimum left shift of 0.03 V in Vth and 1.26x increase Ion/Ioff ratio after passivation. We believe that the 3x reduction in Si-H bonds resulting in reduced interface traps at SiN/AlGaN interface is the reason for the minimal increase in gate leakage after passivation.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe paper presents an analytical theory for a disk-shaped Hall plate having three peripheral contacts and a point contact at the center. The central contact is modeled as a Corbino source. Its potential function contains a multivalued function. On the boundary, besides the exit contact, the positions of the other two (sensing) contacts were determined in such a way as to maximize the Hall voltage. The numerical results show that, in the case of this type of sensing element (referred to as the Hall-Corbino element), the Hall voltage is more than six times larger than that corresponding to a Hall disk having only peripheral contacts.© 2021 Elsevier LtdFully vacuum-free and solution-processed large-area organic solar cells (OSCs) were fabricated using a poly(3,4-ethylenedioxythiophene)-poly(styrenesulfonate) (PEDOT:PSS) polymer top electrode. In addition, to evaluate the scalability of this polymer electrode toward large-scale modules, OSCs with various sized areas were fabricated, and their performance was compared with that of a metal top electrode. As a result, when we increased the area of the OSC from 0.4 to 1.6 cm2, the fill factor (FF) decreased from 40.5 % to 30.3 % and the corresponding photoconversion efficiency (PCE) decreased from 2.0 % to 1.4 % for an OSC with a polymer electrode. The FF decreased from 54.8 % to 44.1 % and essentially had no PCE degradation for the OSC with a metal electrode. Numerical calculations were also conducted to account for the FF and PCE degradation for both electrodes and to match the experimental data. Therefore, the lower FF and PCE of the OSC with a polymer electrode directly resulted from the higher sheet resistance of the polymer electrode and the corresponding higher series resistance.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe impact of negative capacitance (NC) of the ferroelectric materials in controlling the direct source to drain tunneling (DSDT) in ultra-short channel FETs is presented in this paper. Besides, an analytical model is developed by solving 2-D Poisson's equation incorporating the degeneracy of source/drain (S/D) regions. We demonstrate that in NC gate stack based Si channel FETs (NC-FETs), the scaling limit can be pushed down to 7 nm gate length, without using effective mass engineering and alternate channel materials. However, under severe subthreshold tunneling circumstances, we find that as the % content of tunneling current rises above the value of 50% in the net current, the subthreshold slope (SS) ceases to improve with the higher ferroelectric thickness. The rigorous analysis of DSDT-Negative drain induced barrier lowering (NDIBL) and impact of the S/D doping over DSDT is also incorporated in the paper. It is found that DSDT decreases drastically in the NCFET compared to baseline FETs due to the NC effect. Hence, using NC effect, transistor can be scaled down to 7 nm physical gate length with SS < 80 mV/dec and IOFF < 70 nA/μm compared to 173 mV/dec and 1.5×106 nA/μm, respectively for the baseline FET at the same gate length.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThis study developed an ammonia (NH3) sensor based on an electrode-width-controlled/single-phase unidirectional transducer surface acoustic wave (SAW) resonator coated with poly(diketopyrrolopyrrolethiophene-thieno[3,2-b]thiophene-thiophene) (DPP2T-TT) film. This sensor can be operated at room temperature and can detect NH3 at concentrations of the order of parts per billion (ppb). DPP2T-TT films were deposited on the surface of SAW devices using the drop-casting method and were characterized using X-ray diffraction, field-emission scanning electron microscopy, and energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy. Our developed sensor could linearly detect NH3 at concentrations of 50–1000 ppb in a dry air environment. This sensor exhibited a sensitivity of 48 Hz for 400 ppb NH3 in dry air, and the average response and recovery times were typically <45 s. The sensor also exhibited repeatability, reversibility, and long-term stability. Its sensitivity toward NH3 was 13 times higher than that toward other interfering gases, indicating its excellent selectivity.© 2021 Elsevier LtdGe2Sb2Te5 (GST) as phase-change material has the advantage of good thermal stability and long cycle life, however large power consumption and lower phase change speed partly limit large-scale application for phase-change materials (PCM). In this paper, a comprehensive research is investigated on Ru doped GST phase-change material, from properties to performances for PCM application. Ru doping can efficiently improve the thermal stability of GST alloy and the thickness change of Ru0.05(GST)0.95 film is 3.3%. In addition, high 10-year data retention temperature (∼151 °C) and small crystal grain reflect the advantages of data retention and low power consumption for Ru0.05(GST)0.95 film. Furthermore, the structure characteristics show the stable face-centred cubic structure at crystalline state after annealing. As for electrical properties, Ru0.05(GST)0.95-based PCM cell shows excellent reversible SET-RESET properties with a suitable operation window and good endurance up to 106 electrical cycles with a resistance ratio of about 10. And also, it has a dramatically lower power consumption of 1.46 × 10-11 J compared with GST-based cell (4.76 × 10-10 J), making it a promising material for the Internet of Things (IOT) field applications.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe investigate the effects of NH3 and NF3 post plasma-treatment on the performance of spray-coated ZnO thin film transistors (TFTs). Both NH3 and NF3 plasma treatment are varied from 10 to 40 s. The properties of plasma treated ZnO were studied by Hall Effect measurements, UV–visible spectroscopy, photoluminescence, atomic force microscopy, X-ray diffraction, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy, and time-of-flight secondary ion mass spectrometry. NF3 plasma treatment causes n-type doping and generates carriers by F incorporation. While, NH3 plasma can cause not only n-type doping by Hydrogen incorporation but also creates acceptor-like states by the formation of Vo–H complex and inducing Nitrogen in ZnO. Owing to the N incorporation, the threshold voltage can be controlled by NH3 plasma treatment. The appropriate NH3 and NF3 plasma treatments for 10 s each greatly enhance the performance of ZnO TFTs, exhibiting the saturation mobility and subthreshold swing of 20.65 cm2 V−1 s−1 and 0.18 V dec–1, respectively. Therefore, it is concluded that NH3 and NF3 plasma-treatment can be a useful technique to enhance the device performance and to improve the stability of solution-processed metal-oxide TFTs.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe channel doping effects in negative capacitance field-effect transistors (NCFETs) of the metal-ferroelectric-insulator-semiconductor (MFIS) structure are analysed in this work, and an analytical model is developed. The NCFET threshold voltage with channel doping is defined, and a nonmonotonic dependence on the doping concentrations is predicted. A unified charge formulation is developed for the current–voltage characteristics of double gate MFIS structures. Statistical modelling for NCFETs is further developed. Standard deviations of four parameters are extracted, reproducing the distributions of NCFET current–voltage characteristics. Experimental calibrated TCAD simulations validate the analytical model for wide ranges of device parameters, allowing its application to devices and circuits.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this work, an ITO/boehmite layer/ITO-stacked structure was fabricated at low temperature for transparent flexible memristor. Typical and reproducible bipolar switching behavior was easily obtained under applied bias. The resistive switching behaviors with satisfied electrical reliability such as retention, endurance and mechanical characteristics were all exhibited at different bending angles. The switching mechanism was considered to be related to the movement of H+ in boehmite layer. This low temperature processed, all inorganic and transparent flexible device provides a feasible way to develop new type of information devices and wearable electronics.© 2021 Elsevier LtdToday, barium titanate nanowires as a piezoelectric material can transmit more energy and generate energy during energy harvesting. The silicon substrate is of great importance in some respects, especially the issue of integration and a hybrid nanogenerator based on BaTiO3 NRs/PDMS composite film on silicon substrate is introduced. Here, FTO layer is used both as seed layer for the TiO2 NRs and as bottom electrode by pyrolysis spray method. The growth of BaTiO3 NRs consists of two hydrothermal stages: the first is growing the TiO2 nanorods and the second is the conversion of TiO2 to BaTiO3 (BTO). To increase the output voltage of the nanogenerator (NG), the surface roughness of silicon substrate is investigated. The results show that the peak-to-peak voltage of the NG output, which is made on a micro-machined substrate with the pattern of micro-digits at a height of 20 μm, compared to the smooth substrate is 1.92–1.48 V in frequency of 20 Hz. which is a 30% increase and the piezoelectric coefficient of the grown BTO is around 200 pC/N.© 2021 Elsevier LtdFor the hardware implementation of artificial intelligence, neuromorphic systems have major advantages in terms of their energy consumption and massively parallel operation compared to conventional computing systems. For general-purpose neuromorphic systems, the on-chip learning of large-scale deep neural networks (DNN) is an essential function. However, compared to a backpropagation algorithm of DNN, an on-chip learning technology, which can be efficiently implemented in hardware without accuracy degradation, has not yet been developed. Consequently, off-chip learning-based neuromorphic systems that perform only inference operations are a promising approach to the first step in the commercialization of neuromorphic systems. To address the limitation of off-chip learning that cannot cope with real-time errors, we proposed on-chip adaptive matching learning (AML). By adding a spare single-layer neural network where an on-chip AML was carried out in parallel to the main neural network, it was possible to implement an adaptive neuromorphic system that can correct errors during real-time applications. For hardware implementation, we proposed a synapse device, synapse array, and neuron circuit. Finally, we conducted a system-level simulation of the adaptive neuromorphic system to verify the feasibility of the proposed on-chip AML.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe applicability of the Lambert-W function-based parameter extraction methodology is demonstrated for 28 nm FDSOI MOSFETs down to deep cryogenic temperatures (4.2 K). The Lambert-W function enables to accurately model the inversion charge and drain current MOSFET characteristics from weak to strong inversion, while using the classical mobility law down to liquid helium temperature. The main MOSFET parameters were extracted versus temperature and gate length, showing the temperature independence of short channel effects and the strong mobility degradation at short channel length due to increased neutral defect scattering.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We perform computer simulations to probe the magnetic hysteresis in a two-dimensional (Lx×Ly) assembly of magnetic nanoparticles as a function of dipolar interaction strength hd, temperature T, aspect ratio Ar=Ly/Lx, and the applied alternating magnetic field's direction. In the absence of magnetic interaction (hd≈0) and thermal fluctuations (T=0 K), the hysteresis follows the Stoner and Wohlfarth model, as expected. For weak dipolar interaction and substantial temperature, the hysteresis has the dominance of superparamagnetic behaviour, irrespective of the applied magnetic field's direction and Ar. Interestingly, the hysteresis curve has all the characteristics of antiferromagnetic interaction dominance for Ar≤6 and considerable dipolar interaction strength (hd>0.2), independent of applied magnetic direction. When the magnetic field is applied along the system's shorter axis (x-direction), a non-hysteresis straight line is observed with large hd. In the case of the magnetic field applied along the long axis of the sample (y-direction), ferromagnetic interaction dominates the hysteresis for large hd and Ar>6. Irrespective of hd and applied magnetic field's direction, the coercive field μoHc and remanence Mr are minimal for Ar≤6 and significant temperature. They are found to increase with hd when Ar is enormous. There is a strong dependence of μoHc and Mr on temperature for weakly interacting MNPs. While for large hd, they depend weakly on temperature. Remarkably, the variation of hysteresis loop area EH as a function of these parameters is the same as that of the coercive field variation. We believe that the concepts presented in this work are relevant in various technological applications such as spintronics and magnetic hyperthermia, in which such self-assembled nanoparticle arrays are ubiquitous.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Spherical nanoparticles (NPs) of size 14 ± 7 nm, made of intermetallic Fe2CoAl (FCA) Heusler alloy, are synthesized via the co-precipitation and thermal deoxidization method. X-ray diffraction (XRD) and selected area electron diffraction (SAED) patterns confirm that the present nanoalloy is crystallized in A2-disordered cubic Heusler structure. Magnetic field (H) and temperature (T) dependent magnetization (M) results reveal that the NPs are soft ferromagnetic (FM) with high saturation magnetization (Ms) and Curie temperature (Tc). Fe2CoAl nanoalloy does not follow the Slater Pauling (SP) rule, possibly because of the disorder present in the system. We also investigate its magnetic phase transition (MPT) and magnetocaloric (MC) properties. The peak value of -ΔSM (entropy change) vs T curve at a magnetic field change of 20 kOe corresponds to about 2.65 J/kg-K, and the observed value of refrigeration capacity (RCP) is as large as 44 J/kg, suggesting a large heat conversion in magnetic refrigeration cycle. The Arrott plot and the nature of the universal curve accomplish that the FM to paramagnetic (PM) phase transition in Fe2CoAl nanoalloy is of second-order. The present study suggests that the Fe2CoAl nanoscale system is proficient, useful and a good candidate for the spintronics application and opens up a window for further research on full-Heusler based magnetic refrigerants.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This paper proposed a portable non-resonant rotational electromagnetic vibration energy harvester using magnetic spring to scavenge kinetic energy from low-frequency human motion. Lagrange equations were established to study the dynamic characteristics of the harvester. MATLAB/Simulink was adopted to analyze the output performance at different excitation frequencies. A prototype has been fabricated for experiment, and the measured results are compared with the theoretical analysis. The energy harvester could respond to diverse vibration excitation. When external excitation frequency is 6 Hz, the output voltage and power density of the electromagnetic energy harvester are 2.2 V and 0.024 W·mm−3 respectively. Four LEDs are alight when external excitation frequency is 5 Hz. It is indicated that the electromagnetic energy harvester based on the magnet spring can efficiently harvest low frequency vibration energy at low frequencies. This work made a significant step toward energy harvesting from human motions. It has potential applications in self-powered portable electronics.© 2021Harvesting and directly converting the largely untapped and omnipresent low-grade heat into electricity has huge technological potential for supplying internet of things (IoT) devices, and wireless sensors in smart buildings applications. To this end, we present a self-actuating, autonomous, thermomagnetic generator (TMG) showing state-of-the-art net power output 4.2μW (240μW cm−3), working over a 35.1 °C temperature difference. The core of our design is made of cheap and easily available piezoelectric buzzers and of commercial LaFeSi magnetocaloric materials from Vacumschmelze. The device self oscillating cycle is studied as a dynamical system with particular attention to the interplay between mechanical and thermal dynamics.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Cr adlayers on magnetic and non-magnetic substrates have attracted attention in the recent years due to the interesting magnetic properties of these systems. In this work, we explore the magnetic properties of Cr adlayers on the (001) surface of a ferromagnetic Heusler alloy, namely Ni2MnGa, using density functional theory based electronic structure calculations. The magnitudes and orientation of the magnetic moments of the Cr adlayers on both the Mn-Ga and Ni terminated Ni2MnGa (001) surfaces have been investigated and we find that the magnetic ordering is sensitive to the substrate atoms and the adlayer thickness as well. For one monolayer of Cr adlayer on Mn-Ga (Ni) surface, the Cr atoms are ferromagnetically (anti-ferromagnetically) coupled within the layer. However, for two monolayers of Cr, the Cr adatoms are ferromagnetically coupled, irrespective of the surface termination. The ferromagnetic ordering of the Cr atoms has been explained from the Stoner criterion. The origin of different magnetic orderings of the Cr adatoms with the substrate has been understood by analyzing the Heisenberg exchange coupling parameters between the adatoms and the substrate atoms beneath the adlayer. Further, to obtain a chemical understanding of the observed magnetic behavior, we have employed the crystal orbital hamilton population bonding analyses. The results corroborate well with the results of Heisenberg exchange coupling parameters as well as spin-polarized atom-derived density of states.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.NaFeO2 magnetic nanoparticles which are biocompatible and have a relatively high saturation magnetization are considered as promising heat mediators for magnetic hyperthermia applications. In this work, we study aging effects in NaFeO2 nanoparticles and show that they change their structural and magnetic characteristics over time. As-produced NaFeO2 nanoparticles synthesized by sol–gel technique have been aged in the ambient atmosphere for 10,000 h. Magnetic properties and aging effect were studied by X-ray diffraction and vibrating sample magnetometry at a temperature ranging from 300 to 500 K. Crystal structure of nanoparticles undergoes essential changes, including an increase of lattice parameter and average coherent block size, and decrease of the microdeformation of crystal lattice. These structural changes affect magnetic parameters of the aged sample. It is shown that saturation magnetization becomes higher and Curie temperature tends to increase as the samples undergo the aging processes.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Spin-phonon coupling originated from spin-lattice correlation depends upon different exchange interactions in transition metal oxides containing 3d magnetic ions. Spin-lattice coupling can influence the coupling mechanism in magnetoelectric material. To understand the spin–lattice correlation in inverse trirutile Fe2TeO6 (FTO), magnetic properties and phonon spectra are studied. Signature of short-range magnetic correlation induced by 5/2–5/2 dimeric interaction and magnetic anomaly at 150 K is observed apart from the familiar sharp transition (TN ∼ 210 K) corresponding to long-range order by magnetization and heat capacity measurements. The magnetic transitions and the spin dynamics are further locally probed by muon spin resonance (μSR) measurement in both zero fields (ZF) and longitudinal field (LF) mode. Three dynamically distinct temperature regimes; (i) T > TN, (ii) TN > T > 150 K, and (iii) T < 150 K, are observed. A change in the spin dynamics is realized at 150 K by μSR, though previous studies suggest long-range antiferromagnetic order. The renormalization of phonon frequencies observed in Raman spectra below 210 K suggests the existence of spin-phonon coupling in the material. The coupling strength is quantified as in the range 0.1–1.2 cm−1 following the mean-field and two-spin cluster approximations. We propose that the spin-phonon coupling mediated by the Fe-O2-Fe interbilayer exchange play a significant role in magnetoelectric ME coupling observed in the material.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This study presents two micromechanics formulations to investigate the nonlinear piezomagnetism for magnetostrictive Terfenol-D composites subjected to large magnetic driving fields. A simplified unit-cell micromechanics method that hypothesizes the composite microstructure forming a periodic array is developed, and the well-known Mori-Tanaka micromechanics model is reformulated for nonlinear composite problems. This work elucidates the nature of the approximation in applying the unit-cell and Mori-Tanaka micromechanics models to magnetostrictive composites insofar as the concentration tensors are concerned. A first moment secant linearization but conventional tangent linearization is employed for nonlinear magneto-elastic constitutive laws in order to obtain a unified and linearized constitutive equation. Later, a homogenization process on the nonlinear responses of magnetostrictive composites is performed via numerical iterations in order to minimize errors from the linearization process. Different composites comprising of unidirectional Terfenol-D fiber, particle, and lamina reinforcements are studied, respectively. For nonlinear piezomagnetic strain responses simulated in this work, the predictions given by the unit-cell and Mori–Tanaka schemes are in good agreement with the experimental data available in the literature. Numerical results are also presented to illustrate the performance of each micromechanics model for common composite connectivity, i.e., 1–3, 0–3, and 2–2 types. Depending on Terfenol-D geometry, volume fraction, and applied magnetic field, the magnetostrictive composites could exhibit various degrees of nonlinear piezomagnetism. The presented micromechanics models can further be served as composite constitutive equations to analyze smart composite structures such as beams commonly utilized in sensor and actuator applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.CoSi single crystal is a known realization of a chiral topological semimetal with simultaneously broken mirror and inversion symmetries. In addition to the symmetry-induced spin–orbit coupling, surface ferromagnetism is known in nominally diamagnetic CoSi structures, which appears due to the distorted bonds and ordered vacancies near the surface. We experimentally investigate electron transport through a thin CoSi flake at high current density. Surprisingly, we demonstrate dV/dI(I) curves which are qualitatively similar to ones for ferromagnetic multilayers with characteristic dV/dI magnon peaks and unconventional magnetic field evolution of the peaks’ positions. We understand these observations as a result of current-induced spin polarization due to the significant spin–orbit coupling in CoSi. Scattering of non-equilibrium spin-polarized carriers within the surface ferromagnetic layer is responsible for the precessing spin-wave excitations, so the observed magnon modes are the joint effect of surface ferromagnetism and spin–orbit coupling in a CoSi chiral topological semimetal. Thus, thin CoSi flakes behave as magnetic conductors with broken inversion symmetry, which is important for different spintronic phenomena.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this work, the metal–insulator–metal (MIM) capacitor with Al2O3 dielectric layer above 1 μm and TiN electrodes has been fabricated by magnetron sputtering for power integrated circuits application. The characteristics of the TiN and Al2O3 films were inspected by scanning electron microscopy (SEM), transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDS) technologies. According to the experimental results, the fabricated MIM capacitor exhibits a very low leakage current density of 4.2×10-5 A/cm2 at 500 V, although the capacitance density is relatively small (0.08 fF/μm2at 100 kHz) due to its high voltage withstanding capability. In addition, the quadratic and linear voltage coefficients of the capacitor are 0.08 ppm/V2and −2.39 ppm/V, respectively (at 100 kHz), indicating its excellent voltage linearity. Leakage mechanisms of the capacitor have been investigated as well. As a result, the fabricated Al2O3 MIM capacitor is a very promising candidate for power integrated circuits application.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Artificial multiferroics magnetoelectric (ME) polymer composite films exhibiting collective ferroelectric and magnetic orderings are gaining attractive for the use of flexible ME devices. Herein an anisotropic polymer-based ME composites films is developed, composed of magnetically oriented polycrystalline iron fiber (Fef) and poly(vinylidene fluoride-co-trifluoroethylene) P(VDF–TrFE). The structure, ferroelectric, piezoelectric, magnetic, and ME properties was systematically investigated. Both Fef fillers content and magnetic field direction determined the ME voltage coefficient, magnetical polarization and dielectric response in anisotropic P(VDF-TrFE)–Fef composites. Specifically, the composite with 16% filler loading delivers a peak ME value of 44.5 mV·cm−1·Oe−1 with magnetic field exerted along the fiber axial alignment direction. Such extracted results may encourage a way to optimize flexible composite in anisotropic contactless sensing and detecting applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Reports on the influence of the stress on giant magnetoimpedance (GMI) effect of CoFeSiB films are rarely seen. Therefore, the influence of stress on the GMI effect of CoFeSiB thin-film was studied in this investigation. Firstly, to select suitable substrates for applying stress, CoFeSiB films were fabricated on different flexible substrates with magnetron sputtering, and the hysteresis loops of the films were measured. The results show that the magnetic properties of the films on polyester (PET) substrates and silicate flexible glass are similar and better than polyimide (PI). So they are candidate materials for flexible substrates. And then, the GMI curves of the films under different stresses were measured. The results show that applying longitudinal tensile stress would reduce the longitudinal anisotropy and weaken the GMI effect of the CoFeSiB film. The research on the influence of stress on GMI thin-film would be helpful to fabricate flexible GMI sensors of stable performance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.For spintronic applications, it is highly desirable to realize 100%-spin-polarized two-dimensional (2D) electron systems in field-controllable epitaxial ultrathin films or 2D materials on semiconductor substrates. Through systematic first-principles investigation, we find that one epitaxial TcO2 bilayer on rutile TiO2 (001) substrate is an antiferromagnet-like narrow-gap semiconductor, and its electronic and magnetic properties can be manipulated through electric field. When electric field reaches 0.03 V/Å, it transits to a half-metallic ferrimagnet with 100% spin polarization. Our analysis indicates that in both phases the magnetization density and the electronic states near the Fermi level originate mainly from the TcO2 bilayer, and across the interface the bond lengths and angles quickly converge to the corresponding values of the bulk TiO2. Therefore, the heterostructure actually hosts a 2D electron system determined by the TcO2 bilayer and the TiO2 substrate. Because the half-metallic phase can be achieved from a nonmetallic phase, such epitaxial 2D electron systems should be usable in spintronic devices.© 2021Theoretical studies of electronic and magnetic properties of selected graphene-like nanoribbons are presented. The method is based on a tight-binding type Hamiltonian with Hubbard correlations. The main attention is focused on the zigzag nanoribbons and their magnetic configurations. It is shown that the latter determine energy band structures and may lead to a half-metallic behaviour of some graphene-like systems. Interestingly, apart from the well-known parallel and antiparallel arrangements of the ferromagnetic edges, it is also possible that only one edge is ferromagnetic and the other is paramagnetic. Such a one-edge magnetic configuration may appear in graphene, stanene and phosphorene for properly chosen gating and edge-doping.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The analysis and optimization of devices with soft magnetic cores, such as inductive sensors and electric machines, rely on a simple and precise modelling of their nonlinear anhysteretic magnetization. The Langevin-Weiss equation of state has the advantages of being physically-based and capable of accurately describing isotropic materials. In fact, it has even been adopted as the backbone of the popular Jiles-Atherton model to describe magnetic hysteresis. However, many studies show the difficulty of retrieving the modelling parameters given an experimental anhysteretic curve, for which stochastic optimization methods are generally used. In this work, we present a simple and deterministic method for finding the parameters of the Langevin-Weiss model: the saturation magnetization, the temperature dependent a parameter, and the molecular field constants. To this end, we optimize a problem with a nonlinear solver where the fitting variables are instrinsically bounded. We validated the approach by analyzing three widely used soft magnets; a grain-oriented silicon steel, a Mn-Zn soft ferrite, and a Fe-based nanocrystalline alloy with induced anisotropy. We demonstrate that, contrary to what has previously been assumed, the Langevin-Weiss function can provide a good description of the anhysteretic magnetization of any homogeneous material, even materials with strong transverse uniaxial anisotropy. The key, which seems to have been overlooked, is to allow the Weiss molecular field to be negative.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Structural characteristics and magnetic properties with respect to magnetocaloric effect was studied in the nanocomposite systems consisting of Gd2O3 nanoparticles embedded in the regular pores of amorphous silica matrix. The particles of size 2–16 nm were prepared by nanocasting method within the pores of periodic silica matrices of hexagonal (SBA15 type) and cubic (SBA16 type) symmetries. Magnetocaloric response of the systems was examined in the applied fields up to 9 T in the low temperature region ranging from 0.4 K to 55 K. The data obtained from the measurements of the heat capacity Cp(H,T) revealed a peak at temperature below 10 K. Taking into account the superposition principle, the contributions corresponding to the lattice and the magnetic subsystem heat capacities were analyzed separately. The high value of magnetic entropy change |ΔSM| = ~27 JK−1kg−1 and |ΔSM| = 37 JK−1kg−1 for the systems with hexagonal and cubic matrices, respectively were observed at the temperature close to 2 K under field change from 0 to 9 T. The evidence on considerable high |ΔSM| values along with the large surface area of mesoporous silica, easy and reproducible preparation manifest some extra advantages over the conventional refrigeration technology.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A systematic study of structure and magnetic properties of the gallium doped M-type barium hexaferrite BaFe10Ga2O19 using dc magnetization and ac susceptibility, magnetic relaxation, heat capacity, neutron diffraction and Raman spectroscopy is presented. dc magnetization, ac susceptibility and magnetic relaxation measurements show the presence of cluster glass-like behaviour below spin reorientation transition temperature, TSRT ~ 120 K. Temperature dependent neutron diffraction studies indicate the presence of longitudinal conical magnetic structure below TSRT, where the cones make an angle α = 24.53° with the c-axis. Below TSRT, due to coexistence of the two magnetic states (cluster glass-like and longitudinal conical magnetic structure), a small exchange bias field, HEB = 48.47 Oe is also observed in this system. Changes in the lattice parameters (a and c), deviation from the Debye-Grüneisen equation in the volume versus temperature plot and changes in the Raman phonon modes around TSRT confirm the presence of spin lattice coupling in this system.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Considering the improvement of electronics regarding high frequency and miniaturization, SrM hexaferrites need to exhibit high anisotropy field Ha, high remanence ratio Mr/Ms, and low ferromagnetic resonance linewidth ΔH to create microwave devices and equipment with planarisation, miniaturisation, and high frequencies. The key to achieving self-biased microwave devices with high-frequency is to simultaneously achieve high Ha, high Mr/Ms, and low ΔH. However, it is hard to meet these requirements. In this study, Sr0.4La0.3Ca0.3Fe11.85Al1.0Co0.15O19 was used to study the effect of different doping amounts of Bi2O3 on its magnetic characteristics, micromorphology and FMR linewidth. With the increase of Bi2O3 doping, the grain size of the sample gradually increased, and the uniformity of the grain size gradually decreased. When the Bi2O3 doping amount x increased from 0 to 1.2 wt%, the 4πMs and 4πMr values increased and the coercivity displayed the opposite tendency. The samples showed great uniaxial anisotropy. The magnetocrystalline anisotropy field Ha shows a trend of initially decreased and then increased. When x = 1.0 wt%, Ha reaches the maximum value of 28.9 kOe. At this time, the ferromagnetic resonance linewidth ΔH of the sample is 1578 Oe. The theory of IGA was adopted to divide the FMR linewidth into two parts ΔHa and ΔHp. Accroding to the results, ΔHa takes the bigger proportion of linewidth. However, the change in ΔHp is not negligible. When x = 1.0 wt%, the sample showed its best performance (4πMs = 3412 Gs, 4πMr = 2905 Gs, Hc = 2649 Oe, Mr/Ms = 85.1%, large Ha = 28.864 kOe, and ΔH = 1578 Oe). The SrM ferrite materials provided in this study can potentially be used in the microwave engineering, high-frequency, and self-biased devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Working with spin pumping and spin-torque ferromagnetic resonance measurements, we investigate the spin-charge conversion in epitaxial Bi(3×3) R30°/Ag(111) structure grown by molecular beam epitaxy. The results show that the sign of the spin-charge conversion in our Bi/Ag structure is opposite to that in Sánchez et al. (2013), indicating the spin-charge conversion in our Bi/Ag structure is dominated by the (inverse) spin Hall effect rather than the (inverse) Rashba–Edelstein effect.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The controlled synthesis of water-dispersible iron oxide nanoparticles is essential for biomedical application. For the continuous growth of iron oxide nanoparticles in polyols, it is still unclear how the temperature will affect the controlled synthesis of water-dispersible iron oxide nanoparticles. This work studies the role of reaction temperature on the continuous growth of water-dispersible iron oxide nanoparticles in diethylene glycol (DEG). At the temperature of 235 °C and below, the nanoparticle size increases with the increase of temperature. These nanoparticles are highly water dispersible. Interestingly, with the further increase of temperature to the boiling point of DEG (245 °C), precipitations are produced during the reaction. The resulted nanoparticles are not stable in an aqueous solution anymore. X-ray Photoelectron Spectroscopy (XPS) analysis is employed to study the surface changes of nanoparticles prepared at different temperatures. The size, crystal structure, and magnetic properties of these nanoparticles are characterized by TEM, DLS, XRD, XPS, FTIR, and SQUID magnetometry. The crystallite sizes from XRD match very well with those by TEM. The nanoparticles consist of a single-grain domain. The crystal structure of the nanoparticles exhibits a magnetite phase. The magnetization properties are studied for the nanoparticle synthesized at different reaction temperatures. The water-dispersible nanoparticles can be used for potential magnetic resonance imaging which is indicated by their transverse (r2) and longitudinal relaxivities (r1). The relaxivity properties are consistent with the size of nanoparticles prepared at various temperatures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic, thermal and ferroelectric properties of MOFs (metal organic frameworks), in particular, the compounds CH3NH2NH2M(HCOO)3 (MHyM) with M = Fe and Mn, are studied close to phase transitions. For the magnetic properties, the molecular field theory at low temperatures and the power-law formula within the framework of an Ising pseudospin-phonon coupled model close to TC are performed by using the observed magnetization data for MHyFe and MHyMn from the literature. For the thermal properties, particularly, the heat capacity CP, Ising compressible model with the power-law formula is introduced to analyze the experimental data by considering the two anomalies in CP at the critical temperatures (TC1and TC2) for MHyFe and MHyMn. Within these two anomalies, the ferroelectric properties of MHyMn are also studied by analyzing the observed data for the spontaneous polarization PS using the power-law formula. Our calculations show that the molecular field theory is satisfactory for the temperature dependence of the magnetization at low temperatures well below TC at constant fields, with the M(T) at 0.1 kOe close to TC in MHyFe. Values of the critical exponent β for the magnetization from our analysis using the power-law formula close to TC(= Tm), are acceptable for both compounds (MHyFe and MHyMn). Regarding the thermal properties, an Ising compressible model is adequate to describe the observed behaviour of the heat capacity CP with the two anomalies (TC1and TC2) for MHyFe and MHyMn. Also, for the ferroelectric properties of those compounds the temperature dependence of the spontaneous polarization PS at TC1and TC2 (MHyMn) is studied by the power-law formula from an Ising compressible model which describes the observed behaviour of PS in this compound.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Effects of magnetic-elastic anisotropy on ferrite/lead zirconate titanate (PZT)/ferrite magnetoelectric (ME) gyrators were investigated for power conversion efficiency further improvement, and a methodology was introduced by changing the direction of applied magnetic field (HDC). Simulation by using finite element method provides a clear evolution of magnetic flux density distribution in ferrite as HDC rotates. Consequently, enhanced ME coupling as well as power conversion efficiency (PE) was achieved under a certain angle with maximum effective magnetic field applied especially at intensive magnetic fields. Experimental results show that current (I)-voltage (V) versus directional angle (θ) between HDC direction and longitudinal direction of ME sample and PE vs θ data can essentially track the dynamic piezomagnetic coefficient (DPMC) vs θ profile, indicating that the HDC rotation induced anisotropic magneto-elastic variations are responsible for the eventual PE improvement. For higher HDC = 98Oe, PE reaches its maximum of 76.5% at θ = 75˚ relative to its counterpart of 47.6% at θ = 0˚, exhibiting an approximately 1.69 times higher enhancement. Therefore, the feasibility of an efficient approach was verified by the obtained results, providing possibilities for PE further improvement and enhanced flexibilities for ME gyrator design.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Structural and magnetic properties of the isotopically substituted 160Gd metal (97.5 % enrichment) were studied by means of neutron powder diffraction at pressures up to 9 GPa in the temperature range 7 – 290 K. At ambient conditions, a coexistence of hexagonal close packed (hcp) and Sm-type rhombohedral phases was observed. Under high pressure, the hcp phase was suppressed gradually and above 6 GPa only the Sm-type phase is observed. The long range ferromagnetic order formed in the hcp phase is also suppressed rapidly with a pressure coefficient of the Curie temperature dTC/dP = -6.3(1) K/GPa. In the Sm-type phase below the Néel temperature of about 100 K (evaluated for 9 GPa), the long range antiferromagnetic order with a propagation vector kAF = (0 0 1/2) is formed. The lattice parameters and unit cell volume as functions of pressure in the hcp and Sm-type phases were determined. A partial phase transformation of the Sm-type phase to the double hexagonal close packed (dhcp) phase was observed at 9 GPa.© 2021In order to study the influence of pulsed magnetic field on the fatigue properties of 20Cr2Ni4A steel, pulsed magnetic treatment and rolling contact fatigue experiments are carried out on 20Cr2Ni4A steel samples. The mechanical properties and microstructure of the materials are investigated by X-ray diffraction and transmission electron microscopy (TEM). Combined with COMSOL simulation, the influence mechanism of pulsed magnetic treatment is explored. The experimental results show that the contact fatigue property of 20Cr2Ni4A steel is improved by pulsed magnetic treatment, which is related to the effect of pulsed magnetic treatment on the residual stress. The mechanism of magnetic field action includes promoting the increase of dislocation movement, and the accumulated dislocation starts to disperse, reducing stress concentration. Magnetostriction caused by magnetic domain rotation increases the residual compressive stress near the surface. The increased residual stress can offset a certain external load and reduce the actual force of the parts, thus prolongs the contact fatigue life.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We fabricated compensated ferrimagnet Heusler alloy Mn2Co1-xVxAl films and investigated composition dependence of macroscopic magnetic properties with detailed microscopic magnetism probed by X-ray magnetic circular dichroism. The compensation of magnetization at x = 0.5 was observed even in the thin film case. With increasing V concentration, the exchange coupling becomes antiferromagnetic among the V-Mn-Co sites. We found that the origin of magnetization compensation mainly comes from the anti-parallel coupling within the each Mn and Co site for our films.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Single phase nanocrystalline samples of double perovskite (Ho1-xSmx)2CoMnO6 (x = 0 – 0.5) (HSCMO) were prepared by gel combustion method and their crystal structure and magnetic properties are studied. These samples crystallize into monoclinic structure with P21/n space group and their lattice parameters increase with Sm concentration. Temperature variation of magnetization measurements show that all the prepared samples exhibit ferromagnetic (FM) transition with transition temperature (TC) increasing from 83 K for x = 0.0 to 115 K for x = 0.5. A secondary rise in magnetization is observed for T < 50 K and is attributed to FM interaction between rare-earth (RE) and transition metal (TM) ions. The FM transition at higher temperature is attributed to strong super-exchange interaction in Co2+-O - Mn4+ networks. The M−H loops recorded at 5 K show a saturation magnetization (MS) in the range of 11.64 µB/f.u. for x = 0.0 to 7.86 µB/f.u. for x = 0.5 and it clearly indicates the contribution of RE ions to the net ferromagnetic moment. All the prepared samples show exchange bias behaviour with exchange bias field up to 237 Oe at 5 K and is attributed to competition between FM moment of TM ions and the spin canted magnetic moment of RE ions.© 2021The doubly-ordered perovskite NaLnNiWO6 (Ln = Lanthanide) have been prepared at high-pressure and high-temperature conditions. Analysis of powder X-ray diffraction data reveals that these compounds crystallize in a polar monoclinic (P21) structure. In addition to the commonly observed rock salt ordering of B-site cations, an unusual layered order of A-site cations occurs in these compounds. Highly charged second-order Jahn–Teller (SOJT) active cation (W6+) at the B-site stabilizes the layered ordering and the overall crystal structure. Magnetization and heat capacity measurements confirm the antiferromagnetic order of these compounds in the temperature (TN) range 18–21 K. Dielectric anomaly, and dc-bias signal at the magnetic ordering temperature (TN) reveal the multiferroic properties of these compounds.© 2021 The AuthorsTo address the importance of nanoscale defects in complex magnetic oxides, we present an effective tool, variable energy positron annihilation spectroscopy, for probing the relatively small changes in anti-site disorder and oxygen vacancies of the in situ annealed double perovskite Sr2FeMoO6 thin films. By controlling the annealing conditions in wide pressure and temperature ranges and thus affecting the amount of nanoscale defects, we show that the magnetic properties of Sr2FeMoO6 thin films can be modified, particularly with the oxygen nonstoichiometry, and hence their spintronic functionality can be improved. On the basis of our findings together with proposed mechanism, we suggest that the annealing treatments can also be scaled to other complex magnetic perovskites to engineer nanoscale defects and thus improve their usability in future spintronic applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present a comprehensive experimental study on the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of a charge-ordered single-crystalline Sm0.5Ca0.25Sr0.25MnO3 compound. The studies on x-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) reveals the presence of an equal distribution of Mn3+ and Mn4+ ions in the studied system. The Oxygen, O1s-core level spectra have been simulated with three binding energies curves, which correspond to the O2− ions, O1− ions, and chemically adsorbed oxygens, Ochem. The XPS analysis of the O1s-core-level spectra and magnetic characterizations indicate the proper stoichiometry of the present sample. Considering the change of volume phase fraction in the isofield magnetization measurements during the first-order magnetic phase transition from paramagnetic state to ferromagnetic state, the isothermal magnetic entropy change (ΔS) has been estimated based on the modified Clausius–Clapeyron equation. An inverse magnetocaloric effect has also been noticed in the -ΔS vs. T plot calculated by Maxwell's thermodynamic relation, suggesting the dominant antiferromagnetic ground state supported by a charge-ordered phase of the studied system. The high-temperature zero-field heat capacity (CP) data can be well-interpreted quantitatively using the Debye model of heat capacity. With the extracted magnetic heat capacity (Cmag) data, the temperature variation of the magnetic entropy (S(0)), as well as the adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad), have been estimated. In addition to that, the low-temperature CP data displays a Schottky-like anomaly in the temperature region between 2 K and 20 K. The experimental data points are successfully fitted by considering the various contributing factors of the low-temperature heat capacity such as the lattice-phonon vibration (Clat), antiferromagnetic spin-wave (Cmag), and the two-level Schottky function (Csch) due to the energy splitting of the Sm3+ cations.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We reveal the multiple-path microwave interference induced microwave transmission in a cavity-magnonic system composed of a yttrium-iron-garnet (YIG) film and a microstrip cavity circuit. By changing the position of the YIG in the circuit, we identify that the magnon in YIG is driven by the standing microwave from the cavity or by the traveling wave through the microstrip. We observe that the microwave transmission spectra show an anti-crossing dispersion named mode repulsion and an anomalous dispersion named mode attraction, respectively. The characteristic of anti-cross dispersion spectra is theoretically predicted using the coupling between the magnon and the cavity. Without coupling, the anomalous dispersion in our experiment is well interpreted by the multiple-path microwave interference between the indirect paths through the cavity and the magnon and the direct path through the traveling wave. And the anomalous dispersion is caused by the redistribution of the microwave transmission intensity. We also find the phases of the magnon in two cases changes π, which can be the key physical factor to understand the change of microwave transmission characteristics. Our work highlights the role played by the multiple-path microwave interference in magnonic microwave devices, which will be an important issue in designing microwave circuits based on the magnon.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A series of carbonized pure cotton fabrics and Ni@C nanocapsules decorated fabrics with plain-weaved structure were obtained by simple thermal treatment at different temperatures. The carbonized fabrics possess flexibility and stable hydrophobic characteristics. The carbonization temperature significantly affects the defects configuration and the migration and combination of atoms. The graphitization degree of the fabrics increases with the increase of carbonization temperature, which means an increase in electrical conductivity. The introduction of Ni@C nanocapsules results in the reaction of sulfur-philic nickel with the sulfur in the fabrics, thereby generating nickel-based sulfides with good electrical conductivity on the surface of the fabric fibers. The pure cotton fabrics carbonized at 800 °C and the Ni@C nanocapsules decorated fabrics carbonized at 700 °C and 800 °C have achieved nearly complete shielding of electromagnetic waves. The present work not only proposes an efficient process for electromagnetic interference shielding materials but also has great significance in understanding the structural origin of electromagnetic phenomena.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Despite the great advantages of the rapid developments in communication technology, it induces several serious intractable problem related to the electromagnetic interference with the environment and human civilization itself. To curb such issues, there is an urgent surge for the research on developing innovative microwave absorbing materials with improved corrosion and oxidation resistance, mechanical properties and microwave absorbing capabilities. In this context, this work is devoted to the facile synthesis of silicon carbide absorbing agents in powder (SiCp) and fiber (SiCf) structure using high-temperature carbothermic reduction process followed by catalyst induction method. Then the two materials were added into epoxy resin (ER, type E51) with different mass concentrations resulting in ER/SiCp/SiCf ternary composites as consequence of hot press molding process. The mechanical properties and microwave absorption performance in the X-band were studied. It is found that the introduction of SiCp/SiCf with excellent mechanical strength can significantly increase the tensile strength and bending strength of the ER subtract, which has a good toughening effect. The reasonable relative ratio of SiCp to SiCf brings favorable absorptipon performance to the composite material having a minimum reflection loss of the optimal sample in the X-band (RLmin = −63.91 dB), and the effective bandwidth is fE = 1.6 GHz. It is proved that integrating silicon carbide wave absorbing agent with high-performance resin is an effective strategy for designing microwave absorbing composite materials with improved performance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties and phase diagrams of the mixed spin-1 and spin-1/2 Ising model on a checkerboard square structure have been studied using the Monte Carlo simulations based on the Metropolis update protocol. The system consists of four quartets of alternative spin configurations. We found that the compensation temperature evolves for J1 <0.6 of the spin-1 assembly and J2 >1.6 of spin-1/2. Regarding the crystal field strength, a threshold value of D>-0.8 has been observed. We obtain the N-, Q- and P-type compensation behaviors in the system. The phase diagrams exhibit a second-order phase transition to a paramagnetic phase for small values ofD; hence, the system does not show the tricritical point. However, for large negative values of Da first-order phase transition occurs at the threshold value ofJ1. The magnetic hysteresis cycles have been obtained for different values of the exchange interaction, temperature, and crystal field. Finally, the system exhibits the superparamagnetic behavior for a fixed value of the temperature and crystal field.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of Fe are exploited in variety of different nanotechnological applications. The electrodeposition conditions have strong influence on resulting properties of Fe films. In this study different methods were used to identify and characterise the morphology and the magnetic properties of Fe films of various thickness electrodeposited at different temperatures. The studied electrodeposited Fe films had elongated structural components orientated mostly perpendicularly to the surface, which caused the magnetisation tilt from the surface of the film. The electrodeposition at 20°C led to more fine and disordered structure compared to the structure obtained at higher electrodeposition temperature, i.e. 65°C. By applying magnetic field perpendicular to the surface, the minor hysteresis loops of the sample electrodeposited at 20°C changed significantly with repeated measurements. The loop shape depended on initial conditions, probably on the variable magnetic state left after previous magnetisation or on the changes in sample position caused by small angle differences. The analysis of first order reversal curves showed that the magnetisation switching field (pseudo-coercivity) depended on magnetisation at reversal magnetic field, considerably only for 20°C thin film. The magnetic peculiarities of thin film grown at 20°C can be explained by the competing influence of the dipolar interactions and shape anisotropy of vertically elongated grains, and the presence of intergranular soft magnetic material.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magneto-ionic control of magnetic properties through ionic migration has shown promise in enabling new functionalities in energy-efficient spintronic devices. In this work, we demonstrate the effect of helium ion irradiation and oxygen implantation on magneto-ionically induced exchange bias effect in Gd/Ni0.33Co0.67O heterostructures. Irradiation using He+ leads to an expansion of the Ni0.33Co0.67O lattice due to strain relaxation. At low He+ fluence (≤2 × 1014 ions cm−2), the redox-induced interfacial magnetic moment initially increases, owing to enhanced oxygen migration. At higher fluence, the exchange bias is suppressed due to reduction of pinned uncompensated interfacial Ni0.33Co0.67O spins. For oxygen implanted samples, an initial lattice expansion below a dose of 5 × 1015 cm−2 is subsequently dominated at higher dose by a lattice contraction and phase segregation into NiO and CoO-rich phases, which in turn alters the exchange bias. These results highlight the possibility of ion irradiation and implantation as an effective means to tailor magneto-ionic effects.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The nano-ferrites with chemical formula Ni0.7Mn0.3-xCuxFe2O4 having × between 0.0 and 0.2 were prepared by sol-gel auto-combustion process. The XRD pattern presents quite a good evidence for the formation of ferrite spinel phase in all the prepared samples. The broad lines indicate that the particles are of nano-size. The SEM studies reveal about the uniformity and crystallinity of the materials and also the spherical shape of the grains. Rise in copper density leads to fall in dielectric constant (εr) due to the relocation of Fe3+ from B-position to A-position. The dielectric loss (tan δ) maxima location swings towards the lower frequency as composition of dopant rises. The saturation magnetization and net magnetic moment decline with rise in Cu composition. The ESR technique ropes the subsistence of non collinear magnetic structure as predicted by VSM measurements.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic fluid seals (MFSs) have been widely used as a gas seal because of its advantages such as low wear, zero leakage, and long service life. However, the MFS is generally unstable due to structural- and material-related challenges in a liquid environment. To improve the pressure resistance and durability of the sealing liquid, we proposed an improved structure, where the annular pole component is designed as a radially magnetized annular permanent magnet. Furthermore, the structural parameters are optimized to maximize the magnetic induction intensity in the sealing gap. An MFS test device was simultaneously designed, according to the optimized results, to test the pressure resistance and durability under static and dynamic conditions. The results show that the pressure resistance and durability of the improved MFS structure is better than those of the traditional structures, specifically for a large gap structure. Furthermore, in a static seal, the sealing performance depends on the magnetic fluid magnetic saturation rather than other physical parameters, while in dynamic sealing, although magnetic saturation is a primary factor, the viscosity of the magnetic fluid also affects the sealing performance. Furthermore, the high-viscosity magnetic fluid had a higher critical pressure, while the low-viscosity magnetic fluid improved the durability of the seal. This result provides a reference for designing a magnetic fluid sealing device in a liquid environment.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically study the mechanical induction of the spin density via the Rashba spin–orbit interaction (SOI). The spin density in the linear response to lattice distortion dynamics is calculated based on the microscopic theory. We reveal that there are two mechanisms of spin induction: one is the acoustic Edelstein effect (AEE) from the acceleration of the lattice dynamics and the other is caused by the Rashba spin–vorticity coupling (RSVC). We find that the AEE induces a more efficient spin-to-charge conversion in comparison with the conventional electric Edelstein effect. The induced spin density due to the RSVC can be attributed to the spatial symmetry breaking due to the Rashba SOI. Our work demonstrates high-efficiency spin generation in Rashba systems.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Monte Carlo algorithms are frequently used in atomistic simulations, including for computation of magnetic parameter temperature dependences in multiscale simulations. Even though parallelization strategies for Monte Carlo simulations of lattice spin models are known, its application to computation of magnetic parameter temperature dependences is lacking in the literature. Here we show how, not only the unconstrained algorithm, but also the constrained atomistic Monte Carlo algorithm, can be parallelized for any spin–lattice crystal structure. Compared to the serial algorithms, the parallel Monte Carlo algorithms are typically over 200 times faster, allowing computations in systems with over 10 million atomistic spins on a single graphical processing unit with relative ease. Implementation and testing of the algorithms was carried out in large-scale systems, where finite-size effects are reduced, by accurately computing temperature dependences of magnetization, uniaxial and cubic anisotropies, exchange stiffness, and susceptibilities. In particular for the exchange stiffness the Bloch domain wall method was used with a large cross-sectional area, which allows accurate computation of the domain wall width up to the Curie temperature. The exchange stiffness for a simple cubic lattice closely follows an mk scaling at low temperatures, with k < 2 dependent on the anisotropy strength. However, close to the Curie temperature the scaling exponent tends to k = 2. Furthermore, the implemented algorithms are applied to the computation of magnetization temperature dependence in granular thin films with over 15 million spins, as a function of average grain size and film thickness. We show the average Curie temperature in such systems may be obtained from a weighted Bloch series fit, which is useful for analysis of experimental results in granular thin films.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The tensile rheology behavior of grease-based magnetorheological (MR) suspensions at the presence of magnetic field was investigated by a magnetic-responsive tensile rheology model and the experiment in this research. The prediction for magnetic-responsive tension model corrected by the magnetic field-dependent attenuation coefficients is in accord with the experimental data under different magnetic field activation. Comparing with the thicker initial thickness of suspensions, the thinner initial thickness of suspensions at the application of same magnetic field induced larger tensile strength due to the stronger magnetic interaction between dipoles and the higher anti-deformation ability for the magnetic structures. Furthermore, the higher pull velocity promoted the formation of robust magnetic structures and activated the larger tensile rheological capacity for the grease-based MR suspensions along the direction of the magnetic field. Besides, the magnetic-structure tensile strength of MR suspensions inducing by the tensile traction of aluminum-created substrate material with the weak magnetic conductivity was much less than the tensile traction of steel-created substrate material with the strong magnetic conductivity. This study proposed a hypothesis where the difference between the magnetic-field attenuation rate and the magnetic-structure destruction rate leaded to the disagreement between the mechanical rheology model and experimental data at traction of the high tensile speed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Amorphous FeSiBNb films with various Nb content were prepared via DC magnetron sputtering, and the effect of the annealing temperature on the magnetic properties of the films was investigated. The as-deposited samples exhibited an in-plane magnetic anisotropy and a large coercivity. Annealing at a certain temperature resulted in the decrease of the coercivity to the minimum value indicating the homogenization of the internal stress distribution. Also, the in-plane magnetic anisotropy almost disappeared due to the isotropic-tensile stress induced by the difference in the linear expansion coefficient between the substrate and the film. The in-plane anisotropy also disappeared after annealing. It is inferred that the addition of Nb raises the crystallization temperature and lowers the minimum coercivity of the film.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The Rashba-Edelstein effect typically originates from inversion symmetry breaking at an interface that allows charge to spin conversion efficiency comparable to or larger than the SHE. Its potential value is in converting charge current into spin current. Here, we demonstrate experimentally an efficient charge to spin conversion at a Cu/Ta Rashba interface. We exploit spin-torque ferromagnetic resonance to detect a spin current from Cu/Ta interface into adjacent FeNi magnetic layer. The Ta thickness dependence of charge to spin conversion efficiency unambiguously ascribed that interface effect caused FeNi magnetization to precess by generating nonzero spin current that exerts torques rather than bulk effect. The possibility of controllable charge-spin conversion efficiency at room temperature opens another route for modulating the charge to spin conversion by interface engineering.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Barium ferrite (BaFe12O19) is a multiferroic material with many excellent properties and is easily available. It has good magnetic performance and microwave absorption performance, but it only has the maximum transmission loss in the high-frequency range. To improve its performance, the method of doping is used to improve. The Ba1-xNdxFe12O19 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.15) was prepared by the sol–gel method. Through the XRD, SEM, VSM, and VNA to characterized the structure and performance of the samples. The results show that Nd ions replace Ba in barium ferrite, and no second phase appears. Along with the doping content increases, the particle size gradually decreases. There is the maximum saturation magnetization and coercive force when x = 0.10. It is attributed to the magnetic Nd ion replacing Ba2+, the magnetic moment increases cause the saturation magnetization increases, the change of Fe3+ and Fe2+ led to the magnetocrystalline anisotropy and the coercive force are increases. When x = 0.10, the complex permittivity increases, the microwave absorption characteristics become well which the maximum reflection loss reaches −34.4 dB, and the bandwidth increases to 4.69 GHz. It can be used in a wider range of fields.© 2021 Elsevier LtdSpin injection from ferromagnet into nonmagnetic semiconductor is theoretically investigated for the case when the electric current in ferromagnet/semiconductor structure depends on time. The study of switching on/off dc current showed that the time dependence of the magnetization at any point inside semiconductor does not obey the exponential law with spin relaxation time τs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Self-biased nanomagnetic structures with reconfigurable microwave properties are going to play a key role in the miniaturization of microwave devices. However, examples of such nanomagnets are very few. Here, we present a new nanostructure based on trapezoid shape which possesses two different remanent states through a simple sub-ns field initialization process. Different remanent states are associated with distinct microwave properties with a remarkably large shift between their microwave spectra. Other possible sample schemes based on networks, multilayers and arrays of trapezoid nanomagnets have also been discussed for a comprehensive report on this novel design architecture. The underlying physics of tunable microwave properties has been explained analytically using dipolar field driven variation of total effective field landscapes for different remanent states. The results offer a new route for the realization of the on-chip integration of microwave devices without any requirement of a bias magnetic field.© 2021 The Author(s)In this work, the electrical performance and reliability of as-synthesized CVD-grown MoS2 transistors directly grown on SiO2/Si substrate without any transfer process have been evaluated. Transfer and output characteristics, current hysteresis, capacitance-voltage and low-frequency noise signatures have been characterized revealing the huge influence of surface and oxide defects and the disturbance due to the fluctuations of the carrier number on the back-gated transistor response.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present an analytical solution of the relativistic Dirac equation defined in the framework of quantum field theory in curved space and apply it to study the electronic properties of deformed monolayer graphene. We obtain as solution the Dirac oscillator equation where an effective vector potential term naturally appears. Such a term describes a pseudo-magnetic field which emerges due to the initially defined curvature, and influences the dynamics of the charge carriers as if these were under the influence of an applied external magnetic field.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents a low-pass filter based on microelectromechanical system using periodic self-similar coplanar waveguide. The device is fabricated on 525-μm high-resistivity silicon substrate using surface micromachining process which partial compatible process with IC. The tunable resonant frequency is achieved using micro-electromechanical contact capacitive switches. The total area of the filter is about 6 mm2 including bias lines and pads. The parameters of the filter has been analyzed by applying the Ansoft-HFSS. When switch is on original state, the measured results of the filter show that the 3-dB cutoff frequency is 16.15 GHz with the average insertion loss of 0.95 dB. The 3 dB cut-off frequency of the reconfigurable filters is 22.85 GHz with the average insertion loss of 2.33 dB. A relatively lower driven voltage is around 26 V.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of intermetallic MnFe0.25Sb through magnetization and heat capacity measurements with the support of powder XRD patterns and electronic structure calculations are presented in this paper. Fe atoms occupy the vacant 2d sites in MnSb and as a result, the a-parameter increases and the c-parameter decreases. Both the magnetic ordering temperature and the saturation magnetization are smaller than those of MnSb. An A-type antiferromagnetic behaviour, where the Mn moments order ferromagnetically in the ab-plane (intra-layer) and the interlayer (along the c-direction) exchange is antiferromagnetic, was observed below 25 K. Specific heat data too revealed a small change in entropy at 28 K, consistent with the observations from the magnetization data. Furthermore, at 241 K a ferrimagnetic to paramagnetic transition was observed. Electronic structure calculations showed that MnFe0.25Sb stabilized in an A-type antiferromagnetic (AFM) like ground state. In this state, the exchange interactions between the moments of (i) Mn atoms along the c direction and (ii) Mn and Fe atoms are antiferromagnetic and is ferromagnetic between the moments of Mn atoms in the ab-plane. The competition between these interactions leads to magnetic frustration, which also emphasizes the near-degeneracy of different magnetic states.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report on temperature-dependent soft X-ray absorption spectroscopy (XAS) measurements utilizing linearly polarized synchrotron radiation to probe magnetic phase transitions in iron-rich Fe1+yTe (y ≈ 0.12). X-ray magnetic linear dichroism (XMLD) signals, which sense magnetic ordering processes at surfaces, start to increase monotonically below the Néel temperature TN = 57 K. This increase is due to a progressive bicollinear antiferromagnetic (AFM) alignment of Fe spins of the monoclinic Fe1+yTe parent phase. This AFM alignment was achieved by a [1 0 0]-oriented biasing field favoring a single-domain state during cooling across TN. Our specific heat and magnetization measurements confirm the bulk character of this AFM phase transition. On longer time scales, however, we observe that the field-biased AFM state is highly unstable even at the lowest temperature of T = 3 K. After switching off the biasing field, the XMLD signal decays exponentially with a time constant τ = 1506 s. The initial XMLD signal is restored only upon repeating a cycle consisting of heating and field-cooling through TN. We explain the time effect by a gradual formation of a multi-domain state with 90° rotated AFM domains, promoted by structural disorder, facilitating the motion of twin-domains. Significant disorder in our Fe1+yTe sample is evident from our X-ray diffraction and specific heat data. The stability of magnetic phases in Fe-chalcogenides is an important material property, since the Fe(Te1-xSex) phase diagram shows magnetism intimately connected with superconductivity.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.High-purity RAl3C3 phases (R = Nd, Gd, Tb, Dy, Ho, Er and Tm) have been synthesized and all crystallized in hexagonal structure with the space group (#194) P63/mmc. Lattice parameters are decreased from R = Nd to R = Tm due to lanthanide contraction. Two nonlinear antiferromagnetic states are found in NdAl3C3 phase. While simple ferromagnetic state is observed for R = Gd, Tb, Ho and Er cases. A high coercivity of 0.45 T has been achieved in TbAl3C3 phase at 4 K indicating the uniaxial magnetocrystalline anisotropy. Before entering into paramagnetic state, DyAl3C3 phase undergoes the complex magnetic phase transition with increasing temperature. All these phase transitions are of second-order due to nonhysteresis.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.High abundant La and Ce elements have been supposed be a potential developing direction as the partial alternative to crucially relied Nd/Pr in the 2:14:1-type permanent magnets. In this work, we reported that adjusting the substitution ratio of La to Ce for inducing Ce valence is an effective strategy to prepare perpendicular magnetic anisotropic (LaxCe1-x)9Nd9Fe72B10 films (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) with good magnetic properties. Both X-ray diffraction and transmission electron microscopy results illustrate the lattice expansion of RE2Fe14B tetragonal phase after lanthanum partially replaces cerium element. The increase of La content in the composition range of x ≤ 0.7 benefits Ce valence shifting towards the favorable Ce3+ state as verified by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy results, leading to the enhancement of coercivity. Combining with characterization of domain morphology and micromagnetic theory analysis, the coercivity mechanism of domain reversal has been confirmed that with the increasing La content, it gradually tends to a dominant domain-wall-pinning mechanism from a mixed mechanism of domain-wall-pinning and nucleation behaving together. Our results provide a feasible method to enhance magnetic properties of high abundant rare-earth permanent magnetic films by manipulating doping element contents and are helpful to understand magnetization reversal behaviors in the films.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetoelectric materials have received astonishing attention due to their great potential for nanotechnology and magnetoelectric applications. Herein, the ferroelectric, magnetic and magnetoelectric properties of multiferroic BiFeO3 (BFO) thin films have been carried out using Monte Carlo simulation investigations in the framework of the Heisenberg model. Exchange coupling interactions in magnetic and ferroelectric sublattices that correspond to the experimental critical temperature were estimated. Temperature dependence of the internal energy, specific heat, magnetization, electric polarization and their susceptibilities in BFO thin films have been systematically analyzed. Moreover, the effect of magnetoelectric coupling interaction Jme on M−H and P-H hysteresis loops and magnetoelectric voltage coefficient were studied. A large magnetoelectric voltage coefficient of 104 mV/(cm.Oe) was predicted in BFO thin films with 25% defects. Furthermore, the defect mechanism can be used to control the polarization switching by the magnetic field in BFO system. The obtained results highlight the large magnetoelectric effect in BFO multiferroic thin films for multifunctional magnetoelectric devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic field enhanced the decomposition of a Cu2MnAl Heusler alloy. An aging treatment at 573 K under 10 T promoted decomposition of a L21 phase and hard magnetic properties were exhibited. The crystallite size of the L21 phase decreased on annealing over 12 h and approached 22 nm at zero field. However, the crystallite size of the L21 phase of the 5 T-annealed sample was almost half that of the 0-T-annealed sample and decreased rapidly, indicating enhanced grain refinement by in-field annealing. Decomposition of the L21 phase was more pronounced in the 10-T-aged sample. The hysteresis loop for 10-T-aged sample had a large coercive force of 232 mT and a magnetization of 13 Am2/kg. These properties were markedly different from those of the 0-T-annealed sample. An increase of nucleation owing to a decrease of critical radius caused grain refinement associated with decomposition and magnetic hardening of Cu2MnAl.© 2021 Elsevier LtdA detailed express procedure of basic electro-physical parameters determination for power Schottky diodes has been presented. The procedure was approved using commercial diodes based on 4H-SiC by CREE, Inc. It relies on the device physical model only and almost excludes the usage of experimental data as the initial calculation parameters. During the calculation procedure the information available in the device datasheet is mainly used. If necessary, it may be supplemented by simple C-V and I-V characterization data of the device. The calculation technique is remarkable for its ability to extract electro-physical parameters of Schottky diodes with high accuracy and reliability. This is due to both: the usage of analytical equations instead of mathematical processing of the device characterization data presented graphically as well as the implementation of reliability control of obtained electro-physical parameters by calculating on their basis already known characteristics and parameters given in the datasheet or in the literature. The results of this work could promote the development of power Schottky and p-i-n diode operation theory at high temperatures.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe exciton blocking layer (EBL) as an interfacial layer is extremely critical in determining the organic photovoltaic cell (OPV) performances. Here, we studied inverted planar heterojunction solar cells PHJ-OPVs with the following configuration ITO/EBL/C60/CuPc/MoO3/Al. Upon the EBL functionality which can act as an exciton blocking layer and allows the electron collection at the cathode, we proposed the insertion of hybrid EBL consisted of KI/Alq3 thin layer. The Alq3 is known as an EBL due to its broad bandgap, whereas we found that when a thin layer of 1 nm of KI is introduced in ITO/Alq3 interface, the KI decomposed during the thermal deposition, and only potassium interacts and diffuses in the Alq3 layer, which effectively enhances the electrons collection at the ITO/C60 interfaces leading to the improvement of open-circuit voltage (Voc), and device power conversion efficiency by 36% than the device using Alq3 alone as EBL.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.When forming magnetic nanoparticles, the decomposition of organo-metallic precursors causes a reduction of Fe(III) to Fe(II) which leads to the formation of an antiferromagnetic rock salt phase of FeO. The antiferromagnetic phase reduces the nanoparticle magnetization, so a new method of oxidation was developed that can convert FeO rich particles to Fe3O4 particles. Iron oxide nanoparticles with different sizes were synthesized to validate the oxidation method. We demonstrate that iron oxide nanoparticles can be oxidized by post synthesis annealing without addition of oxidizing agents. The oxidized particles were measured with XRD, VSM and AC calorimetry to show the effective oxidation by comparing to the as prepared sample. The resulting 20 nm oxidized particles have a saturation magnetization of 72 Am2/kg at 300 K and a specific absorption rate of 181 W/g under a 212 kHz, 33 mT AC field.© 2021Bismuth layered structure materials with Aurivillius phase usually show amazing structure and physical properties. The influence of La and Ni doping on the structure, ferroelectricity and photocatalytic performance of Bi7Ti3Fe3O21 (BTF), Bi5.6La1.4Ti3Fe3O21 (La: BTF), Bi7Ti3Fe2.4Ni0.6O21 (Ni: BTF) and Bi5.6La1.4Ti3Fe2.4Ni0.6O21 (La, Ni: BTF) ceramics are explored. The enhancement of La: BTF ferroelectricity is due to the reduction of leakage current and oxygen vacancies. Co-doped La, Ni: BTF has the highest degree of ferroelectric polarization due to the large distortion of the lattice structure. La: BTF has the highest photocatalytic degradation efficiency for methylene blue (MB) dye. The reduction of grain radius, band gap and enhancement of ferroelectric polarization play a vital role in improving photocatalytic efficiency. Ni doping suppresses photocatalysis of BTF to some extent.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report on the bulk properties of the Heusler alloy system Co2Fe1-xVxGe with 0⩽x⩽1 in steps of 0.125. We find single-phase alloys only for x=0.25 and x=0.375, both of which exhibit an L21 crystal structure. The alloys are found to be soft ferromagnets with high Curie temperatures (∼800K). Magnetization measurement shows the saturation magnetization to be 5.21 μB/f.u. and 4.78 μB/f.u. for Co2Fe0.75V0.25Ge and Co2Fe0.625V0.375Ge respectively, in good agreement with the values expected from a Slater-Pauling rule for half metals. In zero applied magnetic field, the resistivity versus temperature of these alloys does not display the usual T2 dependence at low temperatures indicative of electron-magnon scattering, another indirect suggestion of half metallicity. Our ab initio calculations also predict half-metallic character in the alloys after V substitution. The large exchange splitting between the occupied majority- and unoccupied minority-spin states leads to the Fermi level almost intersecting a peak in the V majority density of states. This leads to a markedly higher spin polarization upon V doping, making V an ideal dopant for achieving half-metallic behavior in Co2FeGe. Relatively high mechanical hardness values are also observed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a successfully synthesized TMCeFeO4 (TM = Mn, Co) by the sol–gel technique has been studied in detail. The structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties are performed using an X-ray powder diffractometer and a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis shows that both samples belong to the Fd-3m space group of the cubic spinel crystal system. Moreover, the calculated lattice parameters of MnCeFeO4 and CoCeFeO4 samples are found to be 8.409Å and 8.397Å, respectively. On the other hand, temperature and field dependent magnetization curves demonstrate that both samples exhibit a second-order ferromagnetic (FM)-paramagnetic (PM) phase transition at TC=640K and 630K for MnCeFeO4 and CoCeFeO4, respectively. The maximum of magnetic entropy change -ΔSMmax, calculated from Maxwell relation at an applied magnetic field change of μ0ΔH=5T, are found to be 0.404 and 0.463JKg-1K-1 corresponding to relative cooling powers (RCPs) about 41.62 and 41.53JKg-1 for MnCeFeO4 and CoCeFeO4, respectively.© 2021 The AuthorsThe stacking of ferrimagnetic and ferromagnetic films leads to a competition between magnetic interactions that can stabilize Bloch points and other singularities at the interfaces. In this work, GdxCo1-x/NdCo5/GdyCo1-y trilayers, with different thicknesses, have been prepared. By tuning the stoichiometry of the Gd-Co outer layers, the Co magnetic sublattice dominates in one layer, whereas the opposite side is Gd dominated. In this way, in-depth magnetization domain walls can be created due to the balance between exchange and magnetostatic interactions. In addition, the weak perpendicular magnetic anisotropy of the Nd-Co central layer induces a stripe domain pattern, supporting the formation of Bloch points, meron-like textures, and vortex-antivortex pairs. The interaction between both types of structures, in-depth domain walls and magnetic singularities, has been studied by a combination of macroscopic Magneto-Optical Kerr Effect and Vibrating Sample Magnetometry measurements with microscopic Magnetic Force Microscopy and element selective magnetic Transmission soft X-ray Microscopy imaging. The results confirm marked changes in the magnetic properties of the trilayers, as compared with those single NdCo5 films, and the formation of complex magnetic textures, associated with partial magnetization reversal, where magnetic singularities are formed.© 2021 Elsevier LtdGraphene grown by chemical vapor deposition (CVD) is intrinsically polycrystalline. Since the electrical properties of graphene are degraded at grain boundaries, the performance of CVD graphene is significantly dependent upon its grain size. Thus, the evaluation of average grain size is of particular importance for the device applications of CVD graphene. However, conventional evaluation methods based on microscopic or spectroscopic measurements have limitations in accuracy due to limited inspection area and complicated processes. Here, we suggest an electrical characterization technique for precisely evaluating the average grain size of polycrystalline graphene. We found out that the sheet resistance of polycrystalline graphene is significantly dependent on device dimensions and this dependence is related to average grain size. For the evaluation of the average grain size, we synthesized CVD graphene layers with different growth conditions, fabricated transmission line model (TLM) patterns on the graphene layers, and measured the sheet resistance (RS) as a function of channel length (Lch). The average grain sizes of the CVD-graphene layers were extracted from a logistic function fitted to the measured RS–Lch curves. The results show that the average grain sizes of CVD graphene evaluated by the proposed electrical method are consistent with those evaluated from a large amount of microscopy images.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.It is extremely rare for the coexistence of two spin glass transitions in single phase materials. In the present paper, the structure and magnetic properties of Tb2Ni0.8Mn0.2Si3 were investigated. For comparison, the corresponding experimental results of Tb2NiSi3 compound were also provided. In the temperature dependence of dc susceptibility measurements, there are two anomaly transitions for both Tb2Ni0.8Mn0.2Si3 and Tb2NiSi3. Further studies on the frequency dependence of ac susceptibility show a new spin-glass transition at 14 K in Tb2Ni0.8Mn0.2Si3, except for the spin-glass transition at 8 K inheriting from Tb2NiSi3. This new spin-glass transition in Tb2Ni0.8Mn0.2Si3 is absent in Tb2NiSi3. It takes place below the long-range magnetic ordered phase transition and shows cluster spin glass behaviors, and it is attributed to the introduction of Mn ions into the intermetallic compound.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report ab initio electronic structure calculations to study the effect of Ta cap on the magnetic properties and the magnetoelectric response of Ta/FeRh/MgO nanojunctions. The calculations reveal that the Ta cap reverses the magnetic phase stability in ultrathin FeRh films leading to the stabilization of the ferromagnetic phase and interfacial reconstructed ferromagnetism. We demonstrate that the Ta cap induces a large charge transfer which in turn reduces dramatically the magnetic moments of the interfacial Fe atoms regardless the magnetic configuration and enhances the in-plane (out-of-plane) magnetization orientation of the antiferromagnetic (AFM) (ferromagnetic (FM)) phase compared to the uncapped bilayer. The Ta cap modifies substantially and enhances the magnetoelectric response under an external electric field, where the voltage controlled magnetic anisotropy (VCMA) changes from ∨-shape in the AFM to linear behavior in the FM phase with large VCMA efficiency. These findings demonstrate the manipulation of magnetic ordering of FeRh films with heavy metal capping and electric field which can promote the application of FeRh alloy in MeRAM.© 2021We report on magnetization measurements of LuCo3 and YCo3 single crystals. These compounds show an instability of the 3d-subsystem, whereby the Co atoms go from a low-spin to a high-spin state in applied magnetic field. In the low-spin state, we find a pronounced anisotropy of the saturation magnetization for LuCo3 and YCo3, which can potentially lead to a large error in the determination of the anisotropy constant, K2, whereas the constant, K1, is much less affected. We also show that Belov-Arrott plots yield different values of the Curie temperature than obtained by magnetization curves along different crystallographic directions.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The investigation of the fundamental excitations of magnetically ordered systems has been at the core of the scientific career of Sergio Rezende. Here, I briefly summarize some of our own recent work that often took inspiration from his research work. In particular, I discuss how heat transported by magnons can give rise to measurable spin currents and how magnons may hybridize with other dynamic excitations. Both of these topics are currently at the core of larger research efforts within the field of magnetism.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The Mn0.98CoGe compound can be as alternative refrigerants due to its low cost and large magentocaloric effect near room temperature. However, the narrow work temperature range and the large thermal hysteresis restrict its application. In this work, we investigate the influence of ball milling (BM) time on the thermal hysteresis and magnetocaloric properties of Mn0.98CoGe compound. Results show that the thermal hysteresis of Mn0.98CoGe reduced markedly after BM 5 h, and disappeared completely after BM 12 h. Furthermore, the magnetic entropy change (ΔSM) over a wider temperature span are observed, which leads to the relative cooling power (RCP) of BM-12 h sample as high as those typical refrigerants.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The topological textures of a two-dimensional (2D) magnetic monolayer, where ferromagnetic (FM) Heisenberg exchange (HE) and anisotropic Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya (DM) interactions coexist, are investigated with a quantum computational method. We find from our calculated results that when the external magnetic field, exerted perpendicularly to the 2D magnetic monolayer, is gradually increased, FM helical, antiskyrmionic and antivortical lattices (abbreviated as HL, ASL and AVL respectively), spin textures consisting of skyrmions and bimerons, and those of pure bimerons, are induced on the magnetic monolayer successively. The antiskyrmionic lattice states prevail over a broad area in the T-H phase diagram, and the wavelengths of the ASLs and AVLs change discontinuously with the increasing external magnetic field. For comparison, two sets of formulas are used to calculate the topological charge Qav per particle-like spin texture, and the topological charge density, ρi, over the monolayer. Consequently, the calculated ρi contour of every ASL and AVL also forms periodical and symmetric crystals that coincides well with the corresponding spin texture, and divides the ASL or AVL into serval areas with distinct spin structures. For the ASL and spin textures consisting of skyrmions and bimerons, if the formulas of Berg and M. Lüscher (1981) are applied and every bimeron is treated as a skyrmion, the averaged Qav per antiskyrmion and per bimeron are all equal to 1. We also explain why the quantum method is able to work beyond the classical ones.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The structural stability, electronic structure, and magnetic and optical properties of CoMnZnSi quaternary Heusler alloy (QHA) in the bulk and (1 1 1)-slab forms have been investigated by performing density functional theory (DFT) calculations. Formation and cohesive energies, and elastic constants confirm that the bulk CoMnZnSi is chemically and mechanically stable at an equilibrium lattice parameter of 5.81 Å. The calculated elastic constants also indicate that this QHA has ductile and anisotropic features. We investigate and discuss the bonding behavior from charge density distribution and density of states. These calculations in the bulk phase show a perfect half-metallic behavior with an integer value of magnetic moment (4 µB) and a large spin-flip gap of 0.39 eV. On the other hand, the Co (1 1 1) and Si (1 1 1)-slabs exhibit semi-metallic nature at the Fermi level. These results indicate that CoMnZnSi qualifies for spintronic applications. In the bulk and Co (1 1 1), Zn (1 1 1), and Si (1 1 1)-surfaces, the magnetic moment of Co and Mn atoms are ferromagnetically aligned, while the ferrimagnetic alignment of Co with Mn has been found in Mn (1 1 1)-surface. We also investigate the optimal conductivity, dielectric functions, reflectivity, absorption coefficient, refractive index, and loss function to understand the underlying optical properties of this alloy.© 2021The microscopic mechanism behind the yielding behaviors of ferrofluids is still blurred, lacking a research method to monitor the structural evolution under a varying steady shear stress. In the present work, parallel superposition rheometry was first used to evaluate the viscoelastic behaviors of ferrofluids during the yielding process. The existence of a linear viscoelastic region in storage moduli curve under very low steady shear stresses demonstrates that gap-spanning structures dominate the rheological behaviors of ferrofluids under weak hydrodynamic interaction. The disappearance of the peak in loss moduli of ferrofluids with relative low particle volume concentration was spotted, indicating that the decomposition of gap-spanning structures can be completed through different paths in ferrofluid system. A sudden drop in the storage moduli was observed under the sweep of steady stress, magnetic field strength or temperature respectively, which is regarded as the sign of transition from thick columnar structures to single chains. By examining the combined effect of magnetic field strength and temperature, a fixed yield stress of ferrofluids was thought to reflect a critical contrast between the thermal and magnetic interaction level.© 2021This paper presents results of a research work aimed at designing, building and carrying out performance tests with a cooling device model utilizing linear motion of the magnetic field source and cyclic flow of a coolant through regenerator. The device incorporates two identical regenerators from 34 gadolinium plates each and a magnetic field source of 1 T. The working liquid was mixture of water and glycol with the specific heat of about 4000 J/kgK. The magnetic field source was introduced with maximum flux density of 1 T. The maximum temperature span measured on the heat exchangers was 10.3 K. Original solutions of the mechanical drives have been applied so as to achieve suitable synchronization and operating frequency of the model.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ba1-xBixFe12O19 nanoparticles (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.1) were prepared by the chemical co-precipitation method. The structure and morphology of the samples were revealed using powder X-ray diffraction (XRD) and transmission electron microscope (TEM). Both XRD and TEM confirm the synthesis of hexagonal Hexaferrites in the nanoscale, with average crystallite size in the range of 16.5–41.2 nm. Moreover, the octahedral ion-oxygen and tetrahedral ion-oxygen vibration bands were detected by FTIR analysis. Furthermore, the hard magnetic properties of the ferrimagnetic nanoparticles were investigated by analyzing room temperature magnetic hysteresis (M –H). Bi3+ substitution has caused an enhancement in the saturation magnetization by 20% and a reduction in the coercivity field by 50% relative to the pure sample. The maximum energy product (BH)max was enhanced by 37%. The effective crystalline isotropy constant and the anisotropy field showed an increase with Bi3+ substitution. The changes in the magnetic parameters are correlated to the changes in the structural parameters induced by Bi3+ substitution.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn the age of information, Internet of Things (IoT) has emerged as a technological revolution due to its potential of integrating with artificial intelligence. However, the data processing speed under the von Neumann architecture has gradually shown its difficulties to meet the application requirements of the IoT. The memristor, as a promising candidate for breaking through the bottleneck of the von Neumann architecture, has attracted considerable interest. Furthermore, optical signals are also an indispensable channel of information in IoT applications. To integrate the perception of light information and rapid data processing, high-performance optoelectronic memristors are highly desired. With fascinating optoelectronic characteristics, the emerging perovskite memristors show potential to realize such integrated applications. In this report, alternatively reproducible resistance state transition under either electrical or optical stimulus had been observed in Cs0.15FA0.85PbI3-XBrX-based memristors. Unlike light-assisted resistance transition, the switching process can be completely triggered by external light. Hybrid logical operations are also observed in such devices due to the unique photoelectric response. The results demonstrate that the Cs0.15FA0.85PbI3-XBrX-based optoelectronic memristor has great potential to be used in optoelectronic information integration and provides possibilities for smart sensors in IoT applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Early structural damage and resulting failures can be caused by vibration in AC electrical machines. Since the stator is under a magnetic field that varies with time, the stator magnetic material contracts and expands due to the magnetostriction, producing noise and vibration. Therefore, a low magnetostriction value is desirable to minimize the effect of vibration and avoid earlier motor breakdowns. However, not only a low magnetostriction value is enough. Low values of magnetic losses avoid the material heating, consequently preventing magnetic properties degradation. To minimize these magnetic losses, a suitable material might have high resistivity and magnetic permeability, and also low coercive field. Fe-Ti alloys have low magnetostriction values and are soft magnetic material, making them good candidates for using in motors’ stators. In the present work, two Fe-Ti alloys with composition 6.9 wt% Ti (8 at.%) were studied. One of the alloys was studied after the as cast ingot annealing at 1200 °C. The other alloy was hot rolled from 7 mm down to 0.5 mm of thickness. The maximum magnetic induction of the rolled alloy was 1.74 T, about 12% higher than the not rolled one. In addition, the rolled Fe-Ti alloy magnetostriction is lower than 1 ppm up to 1.25 T, while in the not rolled condition is also 1 ppm, but only up to 0.75 T.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The properties of the spin-s frustrated antiferromagnetic Heisenberg chain with side spins are studied by means of the coupled cluster method and the numerical exact diagonalization method. The results of the two methods both manifest that the ground state quantum phase diagram of the model consists of the Néel phase and the canted phase characterized by two pitch angles, irrespective of the value of the spin quantum number s. Although the phenomenon of quantum melting of magnetic long-range order is absent in the model, quantum fluctuation exerts an important influence on the property of the model. In addition to the reduction of magnetization, the nature of the phase transition from the Néel state to the canted state transforms from a classical second-order transition to a quantum first-order transition at any finite value of s. It is observed that the ways one of the two pitch angles evolves with frustration in quantum and classical cases, are qualitatively different in the large frustration parameter region. The location of the critical point and the physical quantities, including the ground state energy per spin and the magnetic order parameter, move toward their classical values in the form of power series in s.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magneto-active elastomers (MAEs) are a subclass of smart materials that have the ability to actuate and alter their mechanical and magnetic response when subjected to an external magnetic field. Past research has shown that higher net magnetic remanence of an MAE is desirable to increase actuation and produce the most magnetic work. To create a magnetically aligned MAE, a hard magnetic material is mixed in an elastomer solution, then cured in a strong external magnetic field causing particle alignment. A high degree of alignment of magnetic particles is expected to result in improved remanence. However, in MAEs with soft magnetic particles cured in a field, past research has shown that the degree of alignment, vs. less ordered clustering, varies with particulate volume content. Consequently, it is important to study the degree to which volume content of magnetic material affects physical particle alignment, bulk magnetic properties, and the coupling between the two in MAEs with hard magnetic filler particles. In this study MAEs with a hard magnetic filer (barium ferrite) are investigated with varying volume content of magnetic material ranging from 5 to 30% by volume. Batches of MAEs were tested using X-ray diffraction and vibrating sample magnetometry to gain information on crystal structure and bulk magnetic properties. The results of the collected data suggested all poled samples had both higher physical particle orientation as well as a larger remanence than the unpoled counterparts. As volume fraction of magnetic filler was increased the net magnetic properties per volume of magnetic material remained fairly constant. However, the degree of physical particle orientation varied with a local minimum at medium volume fractions. Collected data was used to calculate two orientation parameters, the degree of preferred alignment parameter, η, and the orientation of distributions of magnetic domains parameter, σ. The two parameters were compared to show a relationship between physical particle alignment and net magnetic properties as volume of magnetic material increases. Based on the collected results, a hypothesis is presented on how particle interaction is speculated to evolve as volume fraction of magnetic material is increased.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A correlation between the crystal structure and magnetic properties of system (1-x)BiFeO3 – (x)BaTiO3 with compounds across the morphotropic phase boundary was studied using X-ray and neutron diffraction, magnetometry, and Mössbauer spectroscopy measurements. Increase in the dopants content leads to the structural transition from the rhombohedral phase to the cubic phase via a formation of the two-phase region (0.2 < x < 0.33), wherein the magnetic structure changes from the modulated G-type antiferromagnetic to the collinear antiferromagnetic via a stabilization of the non-collinear antiferromagnetic phase with non-zero remanent magnetization. The value of magnetic moment calculated per iron ion based on the Mössbauer and neutron diffraction data decreases from m ≈ 4.4 μB for the compound with x = 0.25 to m = 3.2 μB for the compound with x = 0.35 testifying a dominance of 3 + oxidation state of the iron ions. Increase in the amount of the cubic phase leads to a reduction in the remanent magnetization from 0.02 emu/g for the compounds with the dominant rhombohedral phase (x < 0.27) down to about 0.001 emu/g for the compounds with dominant cubic structure (x ≥ 0.27). Rapid decrease in the remanent magnetization observed in the compounds across the phase coexistence region points at no direct correlation between the type of structural distortion and non-zero remanent magnetization, while the oxygen octahedra tilting is the key factor determining the presence of non-zero remanent magnetization.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic anomalies in antiphase boundaries (APBs), which are a type of planar defect produced in ordered crystals, have been studied using electron holography. For many ordered crystals, including a Ni50Mn25Al12.5Ga12.5 alloy with a Heusler-type structure, atomic disordering in the APB region (showing a finite thickness) deteriorates the ferromagnetic spin order. This relationship has several functions, such as the pinning of magnetic domain walls by APBs. However, in an Fe70A130 alloy with a B2-type (CsCl-type) ordered structure, ferromagnetism can be developed by APBs. The unusual relationship observed in the Fe70A130 alloy can provide useful information for engineering APB-induced phenomena. This paper reviews recent electron holography observations from these two types of alloys, and technical advancements in the APB studies.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The microstructure of a neodymium (Nd)- iron (Fe)- boron (B) sintered magnet must be appropriately controlled in the sintering and annealing processes to improve the performance of the Nd magnet. In this study, the surface tension of molten Nd alloys containing copper (Cu), gallium (Ga), or indium (In) as a simulated substance of the Nd-rich phase was measured to investigate the formation mechanism of the microstructure from the perspective of physicochemical properties of the Nd-rich phase. The surface tension of the molten Nd–Fe alloy at the liquidus gradually decreased with an increase in Nd concentration, accompanied by a decrease in temperature. This indicates that lower temperatures are advantageous for the wetting-infiltration of the liquid Nd-rich phase into the interspace between the Nd2Fe14B grains in the magnet. While considering the dependence of the surface tension of the Nd–Fe–B ternary eutectic on the oxygen (O) concentration, no significant difference in the surface tension was determined in the investigated range of O concentrations (600–3000 mass ppm O). The surface tension of the ternary eutectic alloy did not significantly change with the substitution by Cu, which implies that the change in surface characteristics due to the addition of Cu is not the primary reason for the improvement in wetting of the Nd-rich phase. The surface tension of the ternary eutectic alloy increased with the substitution by Ga, but decreased with the substitution by In.© 2021Skin cancer is one of the most common types of cancers. Although majority of skin cancers can be treated effectively if they are diagnosed at an early stage, delayed treatment for some types, such as melanoma, are life threatening. This current study evaluated the therapeutic effects of a recently developed targeted drug delivery system (DDS) to treat an experimental skin squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) in a mouse model. This DDS can release drugs into the body at a designated rate and location. The system consists of biodegradable polymer microspheres of encapsulated magnetic nanoparticles, human albumin, and 5-fluorouracil (5-FU). While the magnetic forces keep the nanocomposite spheres in the targeted cancer area, the protein promotes increased absorption of the DDS near cancer cells to release the therapeutic agent. While tumor sizes were significantly decreased and cancer tissue underwent dramatic necrosis, no remote organ and lymph node metastasis were observed. The tissue specimens collected from vital organs (lungs, liver, kidneys, and lymph nodes adjcent to the cancer sites) were histologically examined and did not showobvious damages and adverse tissue responses after the DDS injections. Overall, this study confirmed that this DDS is successful in treating cancer without toxic effects and may be a possible alternative to traditional therapies.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the effect of Joule heating on the magnetoimpedance characteristics of Co-based amorphous thin films. The simple Joule heating with application of a current directly to the element with a low intensity in a short time did not contribute to modifications of the impedance profile. Joule heating under a magnetic field in a short time changed the impedance profile. The magnetic field at which the impedance had a peak was shifted to a lower field. This shows the potential of controlling the magnetic characteristics of an element by Joule heating. A high heating current degraded the magnetoimpedance, which was attributed to the crystallisation of the material. We confirmed the crystallisation of the element by a thermal conduction analysis based on a finite-element simulation and by observing the magnetic domain structure using a Kerr-effect microscope.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This study proposes the application of low-field magnetic analysis (LFMA) as an alternative non-destructive testing method based on magnetic flux density for the detection of mechanical ductile damage in sheet metal under uniaxial stress. Ductile damage is related to the development of micro-voids and pores due to large plastic strains. The samples were strained to different levels of strains up to 21% and studied with LFMA after unloading. Our approach is based on the assumption that as the plastic strain in steel increases, more damage is accumulated in the microstructure and therefore the magnetic properties are modified. Numerical simulation using finite element method, as well as experimental measurements such as tensile test, hardness, X-ray diffraction and electrical resistivity, were also applied to validate the proposed method in the detection of damage in tensile sample. It was found that the magnetic flux density indeed varies proportionally to the strain (72.3–63.4 mT (0–12.4% damage) for H = 243.2 Oe). These results demonstrate that the LFMA can be used to evaluate mechanical damages caused by plastic strain changes induced on steel. Furthermore, the LFMA presents accurate results for low magnetic fields with high sensitivity and reliability.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The unidirectional anisotropy and uniaxial anisotropy in exchange bias systems determine the effective field that governs magnetization precession, which is critical to magnetic applications. Research has found that a misalignment between unidirectional and uniaxial anisotropies may exist, i.e., non-collinear anisotropy, where the intrinsic mechanism and contributing factors are poorly reported. In this work, exchange-biased NiFe/NiO bilayers were fabricated by using magnetron sputtering. We investigated the effects of different annealing temperatures on the non-collinear anisotropy of the NiFe/NiO bilayers by measuring the in-plane angular dependence of the magnetic hysteresis loops and the ferromagnetic resonance. We found that the non-collinear angle β varied gradually from 0° to 45° with the variation in annealing temperature, which showed an asymmetric magnetization phenomenon. The competition between unidirectional and uniaxial anisotropy and the interfacial magnetic frustration play a major role in the asymmetric reversal phenomena in an antiferromagnet/ferromagnet system. Our results provide insight into the exchange-biased field and promote its application in spintronic devices.© 2021 The Author(s)The t-J-U model of high-Tc copper-oxide superconductors incorporates both the on-site Coulomb repulsion and kinetic exchange interaction and yields a semi-quantitative description of the static properties of those materials. We extend this analysis to dynamic quantities and address collective spin- and charge excitations in the correlated metallic state of the t-J-U model. We employ VWF+1/Nf approach that combines the variational wave function (VWF) approach with the expansion in the inverse number of fermionic flavors (1/Nf). It is shown that the resonant (paramagnon) contribution to the dynamic magnetic susceptibility remains robust as one interpolates between the Hubbard- and t-J-model limits, whereas the incoherent continuum undergoes substantial renormalization. Energy of the collective charge mode diminishes as the strong-coupling limit is approached. We also introduce the concept of effective kinetic exchange interaction that allows for a unified interpretation of magnetic dynamics in the Hubbard, t-J, and t-J-U models. The results are discussed in the context of recent resonant inelastic x-ray scattering experiments for the high-Tc cuprates.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In a power transformer, the leakage flux enters the laminations of the iron core in different directions. Depending on the orientation of the leakage flux, it can add eddy current and hysteresis losses to the well-documented losses caused by the main flux. To study the principles of the influence of the leakage flux on the losses in transformer cores, the problem was isolated to an experiment on a stack of laminations in an Epstein-like frame. The frame carried the main flux, while artificial leakage flux is created and forced to enter the laminations in the two directions perpendicular to the main flux. Additionally, the system was modelled using finite elements to interpret the physical phenomena. The results revealed that the loading conditions have a significant impact on the local eddy current loss and on the overall power loss. The identified additional magnetic losses show that under inductive loading, conventional no-load tests can underestimate the core losses considerably.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric effect in the R-3c rhombohedral La1-xBaxCoO3 samples (x = 0.2–0.4) prepared by the mechanical milling and ceramic methods has been studied through the dc magnetization measurements. The results have revealed the magnetic phase-transition temperature (TC) changing from 185 to about 200 K when × changes from 0.2 to 0.4. Around TC, the samples show a large change in the magnetic entropy (ΔSm). The value of ΔSm depends on both x and the applied-field magnitude. Under an applied field H = 30 kOe, the maximum magnetic-entropy changes are about 1.1, 1.7 and 1.6 J/Kg⋅K for x = 0.2, 0.3 and 0.4, respectively, corresponding to the relative cooling power ranging between 63 and 73 J/kg. Our studies have also found La1-xBaxCoO3 exhibiting a second-order phase transition and short-range magnetic order. We suggest that short-range order is related to the interaction competition between two ferromagnetic and anti-ferromagnetic phases due to the coexistence of Co3+ and Co4+ ions.© 2021The paper presents the state of the art and the problems already open in modelling the hysteresis phenomenon in 2-D for laminated soft ferromagnetic materials. Firstly, a thorough experimental investigation has been carried out at a very low frequency by a single disk tester (SDT) for a specimen of innovative NGO electrical steel sheet. Scalar, rotational and elliptic magnetization processes have been experimentally measured under controlled waveforms of the magnetic induction vector thanks to an effective digital feedback algorithm. Two numerical model of hysteresis have been taken into account to reproduce the measured magnetization processes: the vector Preisach model (VPM) and the Energy Based Model (EBM). The main advantages and limitations in the use of the two hysteresis models are comprehensively analysed and discussed, taking into consideration both the problem of identification and the simulation results. In particular, the effective capability of the models to reproduce the vector field trajectories and to predict the hysteresis power losses has been shown. Conclusive considerations involve the memory usage and the computational time for the low level of abstraction implementation of the two hysteresis models.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this Erratum, we correct two mistakes in deriving the chiral order parameter and quantum correlations. First, the equation for chiral should correctly read as [Formula Presented] Using the correct formula, we have calculated the chiral order parameter in whole range of the ground state phase diagram and results are presented in Fig. 1. As it is seen in the absence of the transverse field, [Formula Presented], the chiral ordering is created as soon as the DM interaction exceeds from the critical point [Formula Presented]. Second, the formula for the function [Formula Presented] presented in the appendix of the original paper [1] is corrected as [Formula Presented] In principle, the imaginary part is added to the original paper. Using the correct formula, the quantum correlations as the concurrence (C) and the quantum discord (QD) between nearest- and next-nearest neighbours (NN and NNN) are calculated and results are presented in Fig. 2. In comparison to the original paper, the behavior of quantum correlations are changed in the region [Formula Presented] and [Formula Presented] where Fermi points are appeared.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Herein, the effects of external loading and heat treatment on magnetic memory field parameters were studied for Q345R steel samples with defects of different width and depth, and a quantitative relationship between the magnetic memory signal and defect size was established. On this basis, we characterized the changes in defect magnetic memory signals at different loading stages and studied the variation in defect magnetic field parameters before and after heat treatment. The obtained results showed that load application increased the magnetic memory field parameters within a certain range, while these parameters significantly decreased upon heat treatment. Therefore, in addition to determining magnetic field parameters, other important factors such as the quantitative relationships between magnetic field parameters and defect size, applied load, and heat treatment state must be considered for accurate defect characterization.© 2021The strong influence of the orientation of an external magnetic field of a system of permanent magnets on the crystal structure of cobalt films grown on an amorphous carbon sublayer was revealed by the methods of transmission electron microscopy and selected area diffraction. While the horizontal component of the magnetic field strength impedes the process of cobalt grains growth, the vertical one, on the contrary, contributes to this process. The vertical component of the magnetic field promotes strong growth of crystalline cobalt grains with an axis [0001] perpendicular to the film surface at the expense of grains with different orientations. As the strength of the vertical component of the magnetic field increases to H ≈ 1.2 × 104 Oe, the size of some crystalline grains with orientation [0001] reaches about 1 μm in the cobalt film with a nominal thickness of 8 nm. In a horizontal magnetic field of the order of 1.2 × 104 Oe, the average grain size is only 16 nm, which is only twice the nominal film thickness. The paper discusses issues related to the influence of magnetic crystallographic anisotropy and external magnetic field on the processes of nucleation during structure rearrangement.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A new type of direct on-chip electromagnetic interference (EMI) shielding layer for the 10 MHz to 1 GHz frequency range is investigated. A multilayer system consisting of non-magnetic metal layers and magnetic layers is found to exhibit a larger shielding effect than a conventional Cu layer owing to multiple reflections of electromagnetic waves. A multilayer stack of Cu (400 nm)/[Ta (5 nm)/Ni-Fe-Cu-Mo (50 nm)]4/Cu (400 nm) is found to exhibit a larger shielding effect than Cu (3 µm) in the frequency range of 200–400 MHz. A Ta break layer is found to reduce the coercivity of Ni-Fe-Cu-Mo layer and contribute to enhancing the peak in this frequency range. Another type of multilayer stack of [Cu (100 nm)/Ni-Fe-Cu-Mo (100 nm)]10 is found to exhibit a larger shielding effect than Cu (3 μm) over the wide frequency range of 20 MHz to 1 GHz. One remarkable feature of this sample was a peak in the shielding effect at around 60 MHz. The combination of this peak with the ferromagnetic resonance peak creates a wide-band shielding effect. Weak magneto-static coupling between magnetic layers may contribute to the peak at 60 MHz via domain wall resonance. By using these multilayer structures, a thin direct-on-chip shielding layer that covers a wide frequency range can be obtained. This technology is suitable for application in mobile devices and electric vehicles, where EMI in the MHz range, which is due to switching power modules is an issue.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The modulational instability (MI) of localized modes in a discrete quantum ferromagnetic spin chain with the effect of impurity is studied in this paper. The model of Heisenberg ferromagnetic spin chain is considered and dynamical equation is derived by the use of Glauber's coherent state method along with Holstein-Primakoff (H-P) bosonic representation of spin operators. The dynamical equation is in the form of discrete nonlinear Schro¨dinger (DNLS) equation which describes the complete dynamics of ferromagnetic spin chain. The MI technique is applied to the DNLS equation and obtains the dispersion relation which relates the frequency and wavenumber of the modulating perturbations. Using dispersion relation, we establish the stability criteria of the spin waves in ferromagnetic spin chain and explore how the presence of impurity supports the formation of localized modes as shown in the stability/instability profile. With the use of graphical illustrations of MI, the strength of impurity on the stability/instability of localized modes in ferromagnetic spin chain is discussed. Through numerical simulation, we explore how the role of impurity supports the excitation of localized modes in ferromagnetic chain and also analyze the short time and long time evolution of localized wave in ferromagnetic spin chain.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The annealing behavior of cold-rolled 317L austenitic stainless steel was investigated. The material was rolled to a true strain (ε) of 2.04 and subjected to both stepwise and continuous annealing up to 1000 °C, the latter conducted in the presence of an external magnetic field. Electron backscatter diffraction, dilatometry, thermodynamic calculations, Vickers microhardness testing, and electron channeling contrast imaging were used to follow the microstructure evolution upon annealing. The microstructure of the cold-rolled steel has about 2.3% of strain-induced α′-martensite, 4% of delta ferrite, and austenite as the predominant phase. Eye-shaped deformation heterogeneities are also noticeable and contrast with the predominant lamellar structure typical of cold-rolled materials. Microstructure changes were followed by means of magnetic measurements, with emphasis on both Ms (saturation magnetization) and Hc (coercive field) parameters. Our findings confirm the occurrence of austenite reversion, decrease of delta ferrite, and massive sigma phase precipitation for the annealing temperature and time intervals herein investigated. At 800 °C the steel is almost fully recrystallized, except for the eye-shaped structures, in whose interior precipitation is much less intense. Precipitation of sigma phase occurs preferentially at the delta ferrite lamellae. Magnetization was able to capture the fragmentation of the ferromagnetic delta ferrite lamellae due to sigma phase precipitation and the changes associated with the decrease of delta ferrite and austenite reversion upon annealing.© 2021-The analysis of the M(H) magnetization curves of antiferromagnetic nanoparticles yields information about magnetic subsystems formed in these objects, which are characterized by a large fraction of surface atoms. However, in the conventionally investigated experimental magnetic field range of up to 60–90 kOe, this analysis often faces the ambiguity of distinguishing the Langevin function-simulated contribution of uncompensated magnetic moments μun of particles against the background of a linear-in-field dependence (the antiferromagnetic susceptibility and other contributions). Here, this problem has been solved using a pulsed technique, which makes it possible to significantly broaden the range of external fields in which the μun contribution approaches the saturation. Nanoparticles of a typical NiO antiferromagnet with an average size of <d> ~ 4.5 nm have been investigated. Based on the thorough examination of the M(H) magnetization curves measured in pulsed fields of up to 250 kOe, a model of the magnetic state of NiO nanoparticles of such a small size has been proposed. The average moment is ~130 μB (μB is the Bohr magneton) per particle, which corresponds to 60–70 decompensated spins of nickel atoms localized, according to the Néel hypothesis (μun ~ <d>3/2), both on the surface and in the bulk of a particle. A part of the surface spins unrelated to the antiferromagnetic core form another subsystem, which behaves as free paramagnetic atoms. Along with the antiferromagnetic core, an additional linear-in-field contribution has been detected, which is apparently related to superantiferromagnetism, i.e., the size effect inherent to small antiferromagnetic particles.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Bi4Ti3O12-La0.5Sr0.5MnO3 (BIT-LSMO) is a promising naturally superlattice-structured compound due to its ferroelectric semiconducting nature besides other abundant tunable physical properties. Among those, we find its magnetism varies with the valence of Mn in samples treated under different post-annealing conditions. The ferrimagnetic Curie temperatures (Tc) are determined to be around 43 K for the hydrothermal sample and the pulverized powders of ceramic processed under vacuum at 700 ℃, 800 ℃, while two Tcs around 43 K and 76 K are found for that processed under vacuum at 900 ℃. According to the small saturation magnetic moment revealed by the M−H curve, we conclude that the 43 K Tc originates from the antiferromagnetically coupled exchange of Mn4+–O2-–Mn3+, while the 76 K Tc originates from the antiferromagnetically coupled exchange of Mn3+–O2-–Mn2+. This provides a feasible route to manipulate the magnetism in bismuth layer-structured oxides.© 2021 Elsevier LtdAlN/GaN heterostructure field-effect transistors (HFETs) was fabricated. Based on the polarization Coulomb field (PCF) scattering theory model, the additional polarization charges and mobility are obtained by iterative calculation method. By analyzing the results, it is found that (i) the electric field strength in the AlN barrier layer is large because it is ultrathin, and the piezoelectric tensor coefficient of AlN material is large; thus, the inverse piezoelectric effect is very strong. A large number of additional polarization charges are generated under the gate, which can generate a strong PCF scattering potential and enhance PCF scattering. What's more, the AlN barrier layer cannot be infinitely strained by the gate bias with the converse piezoelectric effect, and the additional polarization charges will become saturated with the decrease in gate bias. (ii) The AlN barrier layer of AlN/GaN HFETs is ultrathin, the two-dimensional electron gas (2DEG) density under the gate is quickly decreased by the gate bias, and, with the decrease in 2DEG density, PCF scattering is enhanced.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic droplets are self-localized spin wave solitons that can be excited in spin valves with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy by using spin-transfer torque generated by a dc current through a nano-contact. Using micromagnetic simulations, we demonstrate that the droplet soliton mode could be switched to a localized spiral precession mode due to the resistance effect of current-induced Oersted fields whose rotation direction is opposite to the precession direction of droplet. This spiral mode can switch back to the droplet mode by increasing current. With an assistance of electric field, both the localized droplet and spiral modes can develop to the radially propagating spin waves. The frequencies of all these localized spiral and droplet as well as the propagating spin wave modes show linear increase relationship with a magnetic field applied in out-of-plane direction. These results are of fundamental interest in understanding the rich dynamics of magnetic excitation properties, which will be helpful for the droplet-based spintronic devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In a nanostrip, two kinds of spin waves (SWs) were produced by two possible collisions of transverse domain walls (DWs) under the driving magnetic fields. By micromagnetic simulations, we illustrated the difference between these two SWs. Interestingly, the SW induced by the collision of two DWs with same chirality shows a narrow frequency bandwidth in nanostrips with width ranging from 20 to 40 nm. Furthermore, its bandwidth is not only strongly dependent on the width of nanostrip, but also can be remarkably manipulated by the bias magnetic fields. We argue that this provides a valid method to excite SWs with a controllable bandwidth in nanostrips.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this study, a novel idea was utilized for designing high performance bilayer absorber for X-band frequency. The microwave dissipation features of the bilayer structure absorbers with one-layer bare resin epoxy and the other epoxy resin filled with [CaTiO3/ZnFe2O4]@C nanocomposite as lossy filler were simulated with CST studio suite within 2–18 GHz. The lossy filler was successfully developed via chemical method. In the first step two distinct single layer absorbers of bare resin epoxy and resin epoxy filled with [CaTiO3/ZnFe2O4]@C nanocomposite ([CT/ZF]@C) were prepared and in the second step the measured electromagnetic parameters were considered as input data of CST studio suite for simulating absorption performance of double layers with different design structure. The minimum reflection loss value for single layer resin epoxy filled with 20 wt% [CT/ZF]@C nanocomposite reached to −22 dB at 7.2 GHz matching frequency with 2 mm thickness while in contrast for bilayer absorber in which bare resin epoxy layer placed as matching layer with 0.5 mm thickness and filled resin epoxy placed as absorbing layer with 1.5 mm thickness, the reflection loss value reached to −24 dB at 9.2 matching frequency and achieved full band absorption in X-band frequency region. According to the results, introduction of bare resin epoxy as matching layer is necessary to enhance the microwave dissipation performance and a rational way for tuning the wave-absorption region.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Quasi-one dimensional spin chain compound, Ca3Co2O6, undergoes field and temperature induced dimensionality crossover at about 25 K from one-dimension to three-dimensionally correlated state. It is shown that interplay of intrachain and interchain couplings with thermal energy in this infinite spin chain system is responsible for this phenomenon. It is established from the measurement of temperature dependent magnetic susceptibility and field dependence of magnetization along different crystallographic axes of the single crystal. Further, the effect of chain truncation on dimensionality crossover has been studied to substantiate the role of these interactions in this phenomenon. Reduction of chain length causes decrease of the effective intrachain coupling strength without affecting the interaction of neighbouring chains significantly. As a result, the propensity of dimensional crossover is found to be weaker in the broken chain compared to the longer chain.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We synthesized CoxFe3-xO4 (x = 0, 0.5 and 1.0) nanoparticles (NPs) for aqueous As(III) adsorption trough pH 5–9. The ferrite NPs were characterized by XRD and SEM, determining that ~ 20 nm mean size was predominant in Fe3O4, Co0.5Fe2.5O4, and CoFe2O4. XPS was used to find what the Co0.5Fe2.5O4 NPs are enriched for Fe3+ ions in the octahedral sites in comparison to CoFe2O4 and Fe3O4 NPs. Magnetometry revealed that the Co0.5Fe2.5O4 NPs were magnetically harder. Adsorption of arsenite on ferrite NPs freshly synthesized was formerly examined for linear intraparticle diffusion model (IPD). Then the nonlinear Pseudo First Order (PFO), Pseudo Second Order (PSO), and Elovich models were applied for As(III) adsorption kinetics. Once the system reached equilibrium, adsorption results were fitted through the nonlinear isotherm models of Freundlich and Langmuir. IPD model revealed that mass transfer from the bulk As(III) solutions (0.5–12 mg/L) toward ferrite NPs occurred immeasurably rapid so that IPD determined the main course of the adsorption process. Unlike PFO and PSO, the Elovich model did not fit adsorption data; PSO was the model that described better adsorption kinetics. Freundlich and Langmuir isotherm models fitted in good agreement equilibrium adsorption data. Arsenic adsorption and removal were affected by the type of NPs, whereas no effect was recorded for pH from 5 to 9, with arsenic removal rates as high as 95%–92% through increasing As(III) nominal concentrations. Co0.5Fe2.5O4 NPs exerted the highest arsenic removal and adsorption capacity, which was strongly related to NPs properties.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Vertically coupled magnetic vortices with potential applications in data storage and processing have attracted great interests in the past two decades. A nonlinear device with short-term memory and controllable activation states is also demanded for neuromorphic computing. In this paper, we investigate the dynamics of vertically coupled vortices with different magnetic configuration excited by a charge current with tilted spin polarization through micromagnetic simulations. It is found that the critical current for the gyration of coupled vortices with parallel polarity is one order larger than that with antiparallel polarity. The eigen-frequency of coupled vortices with parallel polarity is much lower than that with antiparallel polarity. With increasing the inter-disk spacer thickness, the gyration amplitude of vortex with antiparallel polarity becomes smaller. Furthermore, a switching phase diagram study shows that the relative polarity of coupled disks can be manipulated by passing sequential pulse currents. Those results indicate that in a coupled vortex system, the excitation states can be manipulated by controlling the relative polarity (through the applying of currents) and the spacer thickness between them. Our findings provide a device which is more similar to the neurons in human's brain and being potentially used in spintronic neuromorphic computing.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Spherical, mono-disperse, non-interacting iron oxide (Fe3O4) nanoparticles, synthesized by high-temperature hydrolysis of chelated iron alkoxide complexes, have been studied by Mössbauer spectroscopy. The critical diameter for room temperature superparamagnetism, an important parameter for high frequency biomedical (MRI) and IT applications, was about 11 nm. Particles of diameter 11.9 nm and greater are ferrimagetic and showed magnetic splitting. Particles of diameter 10.6 nm and smaller are superparamagnetic and gave a non-magnetic spectrum at room temperature. The lines narrow as the particle size decreases and the spin relaxation rate increases. For the smallest particles (8.6 nm or less) the room temperature spectra could be resolved into two partially overlapping lines, one from the A-sites and one from the B-sites, the latter being broadened by the nuclear quadrupole interaction. Similar spectra have been previously reported for bulk Fe3O4 above the Curie point. The isomer shifts showed anomalies possibly arising from magnetostrictive atomic displacements. On applying a magnetic field of 20 kG, hyperfine splitting was observed, confirming that the particles are single-domain with large magnetic moments of the order of 104 μB. The in-field spectrum was similar to that of bulk crystals above the Verwey temperature with Fe3+on the A-sites and Fe2.5+ on the B-sites, characteristic of the inverse cubic spinel structure. The lines narrowed as the temperature was decreased until magnetic splitting was observed at temperatures below the blocking temperature TB, where the magnetic fluctuations are blocked. The transition to the magnetic state is smooth, confirming that the particles are mono-disperse. At the lowest temperature (6 K) the spectra resemble those of bulk Fe3O4 with Fe3+on the A-sites and both Fe2+ and Fe3+ on the B-sites corresponding to the local monoclinic distortion, indicating that the nanoparticles have undergone a Verwey transition. The values of TB found are lower than those reported by most other researchers, suggesting that magnetic interactions between our particles are small. The non-stoichiometry parameter, x, defined by the formula Fe3-xO4, was estimated from the relative amounts of Fe3+/ Fe2+ and from isomer shifts to be less than 0.1 in the different samples.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Nanometer-scale vortex-like topological spin textures, such as magnetic skyrmion and antiskyrmion, have recently attracted enormous attention owing to their topological nature and emergent electromagnetic properties. To confirm such minute twisted spin textures and their dynamics under external stimuli, real-space imaging techniques with high spatial resolution and high recording speed are required. To realize the Bloch-type magnetic skyrmion with a topological number of − 1 (where spins swirl from the north-pole in the core to the south-pole in the peripheral, and wrap a sphere), we have developed a technique allowing not only to create skyrmions via precise control of the magnetic field in a standard transmission electron microscope (TEM), but also to directly demonstrate their twisted textures and dynamics. We employed a phase imaging technique, called differential-phase contrast, in the scanning TEM mode to quantitatively characterize Néel-type magnetic twists, such as Bloch lines, that constitute the antiskyrmion with a topological number + 1. Furthermore, we took advantage of cryogenic high-resolution Lorentz TEM to probe atomic-scale skyrmions in a centrosymmetric magnet with a Ruderman–Kittel–Kasuya–Yosida coupling. To manipulate and track individual skyrmions and their lattice using a relatively low electric current, combined with field-quenching of skyrmions, we designed a thin FeGe microdevice having a notch, in which the spin current was localized in the specific area near a corner of the notch. Using this device, we tracked drift, Hall, and torque motions of single 80-nm-sized skyrmions and their bunches using electric current densities three orders of magnitude lower than those required to manipulate magnetic domain walls.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Itinerant ferromagnetic materials, composed by nonmagnetic elements, are rare and intriguing, representing a challenge in condensed matter physics. In this work, Density Functional Theory (DFT) calculations have been performed to study the electronic structure of the weak itinerant ferromagnet Sc3In. The obtained results agree with a previous study, pointing to the relevance of the Sc-d orbitals in the magnetic properties of this compound. DFT calculations were also used to simulate the effects of applied pressures on the electronic structure, as well as on the magnetic properties of Sc3In. It is verified that the magnetic moment of the scandium is reduced with pressure, meanwhile the total density of states, corresponding to the Sc-d orbitals is slightly reduced. Our theoretical results indicate that the increase of TC with pressure, as observed in experiments, can be associated with an increase of the exchange interaction parameter between the conducting electrons, occupying Sc-d orbitals. In summary, this work provides new insights within a theoretical frame on the possible effects of hydrostatic applied pressure on the magnetic response of the itinerant ferromagnet Sc3In.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic thiospinel CuCr2S4 nanocrystals (NCs) have been synthesized via hot-injection (HI) method using metal-complexes of diethyl dithiocarbamate (DDTC) and 1-dodecanethiol (1-DDT) as the precursors. The single-source precursor's effect on the composition, crystallinity, and structure of the products is studied. Moreover, the influence of various process parameters, such as reaction time and temperature, capping ligand, and precursor on the crystalline phase, shape, and size of the NCs is systematically investigated. The morphological changes and magnetic properties of the NCs are also examined. The synthesized materials have been analyzed and characterized using X-ray diffraction, TEM, HRTEM, HAADF-STEM, and EDS-STEM. The results reveal the formation of uniform NCs of CuCr2S4 along with appearance of a trace amount of sulfur. The presence of sulfur in the structure of the organic ligand DDTC likely facilitates formation of the sulfur impurity. Our results indicate that controlling the formation of pure-phase nanoparticles using metal-DDTC precursors is more challenging than using simple metal salts reported earlier. Nevertheless, this work is the first successful effort in preparing NCs of CuCr2S4 employing single-source precursors.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The vorticity of the magnetic vortex in a polygonal nanomagnet is controlled by the exchange bias and the shape anisotropy using micromagnetic simulations. The vortex vorticities for the triangular, pentagonal and heptagonal nanomagnets are analyzed by applying saturated magnetization and demagnetization along different in-plane directions with various vortex exchange bias field. The vorticity appears to be CW or CCW in turn at different in-plane directions. The proportion of the CW or CCW vorticity changes according to the bias field. The vorticity is always CW or CCW regardless of the in-plane magnetization direction when the bias field reaches a threshold. The bias field threshold decreases with increasing the side number, from triangular, pentagonal to heptagonal, meaning that the contribution of the shape anisotropy weakens when the nanodisk resembles a circle. Furthermore, the simulations are performed with different nanodisk size. The exchange bias field reaches a maximum when the nanodisk size is 0.5 μm, where the contribution of the shape anisotropy compared to the exchange bias is the largest.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, a small-signal model of Negative Capacitance FETs (NCFETs) is developed and the analog performance of NCFETs is studied using the developed model. A new ferroelectric factor K is introduced to capture the ferroelectric gain in NCFETs as compared to traditional small signal MOSFET/FinFET models. Using our new NCFET small-signal model, we show analog design trade-offs between various analog benchmarks such as gain, bandwidth, cut-off frequency, and linearity. Additionally, the developed model is used to demonstrate trade-offs in NCFET analog performance as ferroelectric parameters are changed. Results show that if pushed for a higher intrinsic gain via thicker Fe layers in NCFETs, the linearity of the device suffers. This reveals inherent device level trade-off in NCFETs for analog circuit performance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The statistical moment method hitherto formulated for single-macrospin relaxation problems is extended to the Fokker–Planck equation for two coupled macrospins describing the time evolution of the joint distribution function of magnetization orientations of an ensemble of such nanoparticles. The method is based on the reduction of that equation via expansion of the joint distribution function in an appropriate orthogonal basis to the solution of a hierarchy of multi-term differential-recurrence equations for the statistical moments (averaged products of spherical harmonics alias the Fourier coefficients), which may then be solved via standard matrix methods. Two particular examples of circularly symmetric potentials are mentioned, which simplify the hierarchy of statistical moment equations. The simplified equations, almost wholly expressed in terms of Clebsch-Gordan coefficients, which may be automatically calculated, agree with those previously derived via direct averaging of the governing Langevin equations with change of the random variables to products of spherical harmonics however leading to cumbersome expressions as originally formulated.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We have designed and fabricated a dual-band circularly polarized antenna using a normally magnetized ferrite disk. The disk is metallized on top and is mounted on a grounded dielectric substrate. A hole is then punched at the center of the top metallization. The dual band operation of the antenna is due to two separate unidirectional resonances. The field intensity at the lower resonance is largest close to the outer periphery of the disk whereas at the higher resonance the electromagnetic field is concentrates near the punched hole. A two-section feeding network is used to feed the antenna. Central frequencies of the upper and lower bands are 4.62 GHz and 5.97 GHz, respectively. Experimental impedance bandwidths are 1.5% for the upper band and 3.5% for the lower band with respective axial ratio bandwidths of 17% and 3.3%. Axial ratio beam-width of the antenna is 90–125 degrees in the lower band and 80–130 degrees for the upper band with respect to the bore-sight. Antenna gain at upper and lower frequencies are 5.5 dB and 7.1 dB. Cross polarization of the antenna is 25 dB at both frequency bands.© 2021 The AuthorsThe electrical characteristics of diamond Schottky p-i-n diodes grown by plasma enhanced chemical vapor deposition have been measured from DC to 25 GHz and used to extract the small-signal parameters for a lumped-element compact model. The model accurately reproduces the forward and reverse bias DC characteristics, the capacitance-voltage behavior, as well as the insertion and reflection loss. The high thermal conductivity of diamond makes the diodes ideally suited for high power radar receiver protector applications. We demonstrate that under forward bias a single diode can provide 14 dB of input power attenuation. For self-biased limiter applications, a two-stage circuit with back-to-back diodes has been simulated using the diode model to show > 20 dB of attenuation at an input power of 50 dBm.© 2021 The Author(s)Over the past decades researchers have described what happens to the water when a polarizing external field is applied to it and changes the bonding forces existing in it. Water evaporation, an essential process in nature, has been targeted in a great number of studies. In this paper, static magnetic fields ranging from 30-to-200 mT were applied to circulating purified water to study their effect on how the evaporation rate changed under different ambient conditions. A statistical approach was employed to verify the significance of the magnetically induced effect. Our results showed that by applying a static magnetic field to the water, the evaporation rate increased at lower temperatures, yielding an evaporation increase for magnetized water of up to 20% at 6 °C. We found too that the circulation of the water did not contribute significantly to the evaporation rate. We used an empirical triadic model to correlate the applied magnetic field with the ambient parameters of temperature and humidity.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report on the low temperature (T = 10 K) magnetoelastic resonance in ribbons of magnetic amorphous alloys, with the goal of assessing their potential for cryogenic temperature sensors. The resonance frequency was found to be nearly temperature independent below T≈150 K, while the amplitude continues to increase upon cooling over the entire temperature range. Furthermore, the magnetic field dependence of the resonant frequency at low (10 K) and high temperatures (300 K) are very similar, suggesting great potential for developing sensors with high stability level over a broad temperature range, especially in the cryogenic regime.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We establish a model for a stripe domain pattern width change under hard-axis magnetic fields in a perpendicularly magnetized system with Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya interaction. With the presence of hard-axis magnetic fields, tilted magnetizations in domains modulate an exchange interaction, a perpendicular magnetic anisotropy and a dipole–dipole interaction into specific forms, which are the main competing interactions to determine the specific form of the stripe domain. In addition, we found that the stripe domain pattern change under a hard-axis perturbation can be analyzed by only considering the amount of magnetization tilting from the initial easy-axis. The proposed model was used to draw a single universal curve for stripe width change as a function of the hard-axis magnetic fields.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, temperature dependent magnetic, structural and electronic properties of FeTa films with increasing Ta concentration are investigated. X-ray reflectivity (XRR) studies reveal densification of the film with increasing Ta concentration. Thermal annealing also results in an increased electron density relative to as-deposited film, concurrent with increase in grain size as observed from X-ray diffraction (XRD) and results of Soft-X-ray absorption spectroscopy (SXAS). However, grain growth is inhibited with increasing Ta concentration by presence of Ta in grain boundary (GB) region. This also results in increase in magnetic coercivity (greater than150 %) as observed from magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE). The structural properties were further correlated with magnetic properties as observed from Polarized neutron reflectivity (PNR) and Ferromagnetic resonance (FMR). Effective magnetic moment of the samples, as observed from PNR decreases with increasing Ta concentration and increases with increasing annealing temperature, which is in agreement with FMR results. Scattering length density profiles, observed from simultaneous fitting of XRR and PNR show presence of an oxide layer at surface, as also confirmed from SXAS measurements.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Physical rotation of the easy axes of magnetic nanoparticles significantly affects their magnetization properties in fluid, which are important for biomedical applications. The rotation and alignment of the easy axis toward a specific direction in an alternating magnetic field are affected by fluid conditions such as viscosity, the condition of the applied magnetic field, and the magnetic properties of the nanoparticles, including anisotropy. In this study, we experimentally evaluated the physical rotation and alignment of the easy axes of nanoparticles in a viscous medium by preparing samples in which the orientation of the easy axis was fixed in an alternating field at each frequency across a wide frequency range. The numerical simulation with respect to the transitional and steady-state easy-axis dynamics determined by Néel and Brownian relaxation sufficiently supported the empirically observed phenomena. The factors dominating the easy-axis dynamics with rotation and static orientation in an alternating magnetic field, such as the Brownian relaxation time, magnetic torque, and applied field frequency, were clarified. The alignment degree, including its direction and rotation amplitude, was found to depend on the viscosity of the medium associated with the Brownian regime and the magnetic torque derived from the Néel regime. Nonlinear magnetization appeared as the harmonic components of the magnetization in a viscous medium were strongly influenced by the static alignment of the easy axis.© 2021FeCo (60%-70% Fe, 30%-40% Co at.%) alloys have been used as write transducer materials due to their large saturation magnetization at room temperature (μ0M = 2.45 T). In this research, we investigate the influence of oxidation on the magnetic moment of a Fe70Co30 material at elevated temperatures in the application of heat assisted magnetic recording. We find that the moment of Fe70Co30 decreases after oxidation for all temperatures explored and that Co does not take part in the oxidation process. The moment loss is mainly due to the formation of ferrimagnetic Fe3O4 or γ-Fe2O3 as well as the change of the Fe/Co ratio in the FeCo alloy. A 2 nm Cr underlayer has been employed to change the FeCo texture from (1 1 0) to (0 0 2). This also increases the grain size of the FeCo thin film. In the case of the (0 0 2) textured sample, voids form between the FeCo film and the oxide layer, which could be the direct result of Fe cations diffusion.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Heusler type one-dimensional nanogeometries Ni2FeGa have been fabricated in the nanopores of 150 nm AAO (Anodic Aluminium Oxide) templates using simple and low-cost electrodeposition technique at room temperature. The structure of prepared nanoarchitectures is face centered cubic (fcc) with a secondary γ phase. Magnetic properties have been studied at room temperature as well as at low temperatures. It has been found that saturation magnetization MS decreases as temperature rise up. The nanowires have maintained ferromagnetic behavior from 5 K to 350 K. The Ni2FeGa nanowires (NWs) and nanotubes (NTs) have the same saturation magnetization, the difference of the resonance field Hr is mainly attributed to the difference of the anisotropy field Hk under the fixed microwave frequency. Hr for the NT sample is smaller than that for the NW sample.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Spin-orbit torques (SOTs) and perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) are of great technical relevance for new generation spintronics applications. Here, we present a prominent tuning effect of annealing on SOT and PMA in IrMn/CoFeB/MgO/SiO2 heterostructures. By systematically changing the thicknesses of Co40Fe40B20 and IrMn, and annealing temperature, the phase diagrams of PMA are obtained. The SOTs are quantified by harmonic Hall voltage measurements. Both the damping-like and field-like SOT efficiencies show a nonmonotonic variation with annealing temperature, which can be further correlated with the device resistivity. Our work contributes a reference for fabricating perpendicularly magnetized CoFeB on seed layer-free IrMn and for tuning SOTs by annealing.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The results of magnetoresistance (MR) and resistance relaxation of nanostructured La1-xSrx(Mn1-yCoy)zO3 (LCMCO) films doped with different Co amount (Co/(La + Sr) = 0.06; 0.12; 0.14) while keeping constant Sr (x = 0.2) deposited by Pulsed Injection MOCVD technique, are presented and compared with the reference manganite La0.8Sr0.2MnzO3 (LSMO) film. The MR was investigated in pulsed magnetic fields up to 25 T in the temperature range 4–200 K while the relaxation processes were studied in pulsed fields up to 10 T and temperatures in the range of 100–300 K. It was demonstrated that at low temperatures the MR(%) and sensitivity S(mV/T) of Co-doped films have significantly higher values in comparison with the LSMO ones, and increases with increase of Co/(La + Sr) ratio. The observed temperature-insensitive MR in the range of 4–200 K suggests possibility to use these films for sensors applications. The magnetic memory effects were investigated as resistance relaxation processes after the switch-off of the magnetic field pulse. The observed ‘fast’ (~300 μs) resistance relaxation was analyzed by using the Kolmogorov–Avrami–Fatuzzo model, taking into account the reorientation of magnetic domains into their equilibrium state, while the ‘slow’ process (>ms) was explained by using the Kohlrausch–Williams–Watts model considering the interaction of the magnetic moments in disordered grain boundaries. It was concluded that Co-doped nanostructured manganite LSMCO films having a higher sensitivity and lower memory effects in comparison with the LSMO films could be used for the development of pulsed magnetic field sensors operating at low temperatures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnonic crystals are magnetic metamaterials, that provide a promising way to manipulate magnetodynamic properties by controlling the geometry of the patterned structures. Here, we study the magnetodynamic properties of 1D magnonic crystals consisting of parallel NiFe strips with different strip widths and separations. The strips couple via dipole–dipole interactions. As an alternative to experiments and/or micromagnetic simulations, we investigate the accuracy of a simple macrospin model. For the case of simple strips, a model with a single free parameter to account for an overestimation of the out of plane demagnetization of the magnonic lattice is described. By adjusting this parameter, a good fit with experimental as well as micromagnetic results is obtained. Moreover, the Gilbert damping is found independent of lattice constant however the inhomogeneous linewidth broadening found to increase with decreasing stripe separation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The eddy current magnetic signature (EC-MS) method is a relatively new method used to evaluate the residual stresses of ferromagnetic steels with higher sensitivity than other magnetic techniques. In this study, the effects of mechanical polishing and the ferrite–pearlite structure on the shape of the EC-MS signal were investigated in two experiments to clarify the effect of compressive residual stress on the EC-MS signal shape. In the first experiment, the work-hardened layers of the specimens were removed by electrolytic polishing and the EC-MS signals of the specimens were investigated. The second experiment involved the EC-MS measurements of materials with different pearlite contents, i.e., low-carbon steel with 0.17% and 0.27% carbon and pure iron. Specimens with different residual strains were prepared using a tensile test apparatus and their EC-MS signals were compared. In both experiments, the residual stresses acting on the specimens were measured adopting X-ray diffraction. The results reveal that the non-anisotropic compressive residual stress acting on the specimen surface changed the EC-MS signal in an anti-clockwise manner while the unidirectional compressive residual stress inside the specimen changed the EC-MS signal in a clockwise manner.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The article describes the impact of complexing agent on the phase changing property of Ni(OH)2 nanostructures (NSs). Ni(OH)2 was prepared by facile hydrothermal method and polymorphism have been obtained by employing two different complexing agent while keeping other parameters constant during synthesis. The α-and β-Ni(OH)2 NSs phase was formed confirmed by XRD and FTIR. FESEM and TEM images reveals that the 3D-flower like α-Ni(OH)2 nanostructure and formation randomly oriented nanopetals of β-Ni(OH)2 NSs. Magnetic features of both α-and β-Ni(OH)2 phases were studied using SQUID magnetometer. α-and β-Ni(OH)2 exhibit blocking temperature at 6 K and 25 K, correspondingly and irreversible hysteresis behavior below blocking temperature. α-Ni(OH)2 shows paramagnetic to superparamagnetic transition whereas β-Ni(OH)2 shows paramagnetic to antiferromagnetic transition as temperature varies from 2 to 50 K.© 2021 The AuthorsDespite bulk magnetic materials possess multidomain structure, single domain magnetic crystals can be obtained at the nanoscale, which display superparamagnetic behavior with strong magnetization under the influence of external magnetic field and zero magnetic remanence and coercivity after the field is removed. Physical, chemical, and biological properties of superparamagnetic nanoparticles (SPMNPs) can be manipulated by applying a remote magnetic field together with the construction of nanoarchitecture through attaching a variety of chemical/biological molecules on the nanoparticles’ surface. Such manipulations provide versatile nanoplatforms with exciting tunable characteristics and multimodal functionalities for numerous applications in diverse fields. In the literature, there have been excellent review articles focusing on various aspects of SPMNPs. However, a review compiling and analyzing the multimodal functionalities and broad spectrum of applications of SPMNPs together in one literature has been missing. The present article reviews the exciting capabilities of SPMNPs and their applications in a systematic and comprehensive manner. It provides valuable insights into the tunable characteristics and multimodal functionalities of SPMNPs for a broad spectrum of applications in biomedical, environment, energy, and mechanical fields.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The ferromagnetic Pr0.6Sr0.4MnO3 sample has been subjected to time bound high energy planetary ball milling with an aim to reduce the particle size. When the particle size is analyzed as a function of milling time, it is found that particle size decreases with increasing milling time and then saturates at a certain value. The implications of the decrease in particle size on magnetic properties have been carefully studied by analyzing the magnetization data in detail. With a decrease in particle size, the Curie temperature, TC and the magnitude of magnetization drops. A deviation in inverse magnetic susceptibility from the Curie-Weiss behaviour has been noticed for nanoparticles which suggest the presence of quenched disorder due to particle size reduction. The strength of magnetic interactions switches from long range to short range with a systematic decrease in particle size. The observed properties can be explained considering the core–shell structure of the nanoparticle where the surface defects strongly influence the degree of disorder in the system.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Double-layered soft magnetic composite (SMC) based on pure iron powder coated by a first layer of zinc oxide nanoparticles (nano-ZnO) and a second layer of boron oxide (B2O3) has demonstrated superior magnetic performance when compared to SMCs prepared with only one of these insulating compounds. The investigation reported in this manuscript focused on improving the properties of such double-layered SMC even further by finding optimal processing conditions through a Response Surface Model evaluation using a central composite design of experiments. Mixing time of iron powder with nano-ZnO suspension, mass fraction of boron oxide precursor (boric acid - H3BO3), and heat treatment maximum temperature were investigated to achieve the condition of minimum total losses in frequencies up to 1 kHz. The discussion on the total losses is accompanied by the study of static and dynamic losses coefficients, relative magnetic permeability, electrical resistivity, and electronic microscopy of the samples. While the optimal mixing time was observed to be that of 1 h regardless of the intended operation condition, the heat treatment temperature and H3BO3 mass fraction proved to be sensible factors in order to optimize the losses for distinct levels of frequency and magnetic induction.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In the framework of the spin-fluctuation theory, a magnetic (p-T)-diagram of strongly correlated band ferromagnets with the Dzyaloshinsky-Moriya interaction is considered. The resulting expression for the free energy functional contains pressure-dependent magnetic, electronic, and spin-fluctuation terms, which are self-consistent with each other. The conditions for the minimum of free energy and electroneutrality are considered at various pressures in the model of the electronic structure obtained for MnSi in result of GGA + U + SO calculations. A crossover of a first-order phase transition and a quantum transition is obtained, which leads to the appearance of a chiral spin liquid. The boundary point (T0, p0) at which the chiral fluid disappears is determined. The quantum transition of a ferromagnetic spin spiral into the phase of vortex spin microstructures coexistence with fixed spin chirality, which arises below the temperature of the boundary point, is considered. At higher pressures, chiral paramagnetism occurs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A theoretical study is reported for the effects of an external magnetic field on the spin-wave dynamics of finite-length nanotubes, where the end effects are important as well as radial variations. By using a microscopic (or Hamiltonian-based) formalism, the frequencies and spatial amplitudes of the dipole-exchange spin waves are calculated for two orientations of the applied magnetic field. When the magnitude of this field is varied there is a switching between different magnetic ordering states and a modification to the spin-wave modes. For a longitudinal field (along the nanotube axis) there is competition between the bottleneck (or bamboo) state and a twisted bottleneck state with vortex components at the ends, having either the same or opposite chirality. For a transverse field the equilibrium spin orientations are tilted relative to the nanotube axis and vary with respect to their position in the finite-length nanotube. The resulting effect on the spin waves is studied as the transverse field is increased from a low value: initially the field inhibits the vortex states and eventually it produces an overall spin reorientation. Numerical calculations are presented for permalloy and nickel nanotubes with realistic dimensions and magnetic field values.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic tunnel junctions (MTJs) have attracted tremendous interests recently because of their potential application in magnetoresistive random access high-density memory and magnetic sensor. However, the performance of them is far from satisfying due to the various problems exist in tunnel barrier materials. Here, we propose to use two-dimensional (2D) Bi2O2Se material, which is advantageous in reducing the MTJ size, as the tunnel barrier, and demonstrate that it is able to generate very large tunnel magnetoresistance (TMR) when integrated with CoFe electrodes. The underlying mechanism is elaborated by analyzing the band structures, electron transmission and interface properties. These results provide important guidance for designing high-density and high-performance MTJs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A new algorithm for the identification of the permanent magnetization of ferromagnetic sheets is proposed. From magnetic measurements close to the ferromagnetic material, the magnetization distribution is reconstructed. The forward problem involves an integral formulation based on the interpolation of the flux density in the sheet, leading to a linear matrix system linking the magnetization to the measurements. The inverse problem is solved with a balanced singular value decomposition in order to stabilize the solution. The effectiveness of the method is demonstrated using both a numerical test case and an experimental validation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this study, FeSiCr soft magnetic composites with magnesium oxide insulating layer were successfully prepared by the evaporation and thermal decomposition of magnesium acetate tetrahydrate. The microstructure and thermal analysis show that magnesium acetate coated on the surface of the magnetic powder can be decomposed into the magnesia insulating layer basically by heating above 400°C. With the increasing concentration of magnesium acetate tetrahydrate, the thickness of the insulating layer increases gradually. The effect of layer thickness on the microstructure, density and magnetic properties of the core was also investigated. The results show that with the magnesium acetate tetrahydrate content ranging from 0 to 8 wt%, the demagnetization field and inter-particle eddy current in SMCs are affected by the thickness of the insulating layer, which leads to the permeability and total loss of the core decreasing, and the frequency stability and DC bias performance improving. Moreover, the process of thermal decomposition plays the role of annealing the composite powder and releasing the stress in the magnetic powder, which reduces the coercivity of magnetic core. This method provides a new insulating strategy for obtaining high quality soft magnetic composites applied to high frequency.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we demonstrate tuning the optical properties of magnetic fluids through pH and magnetic field control. The role of reconfigurable nanostructures in the temporal and switching behavior of transmitted light is also studied. An oil-in-water magnetic nanoemulsion with an average diameter of 200 nm, containing Fe3O4 superparamagnetic nanoparticles of 10 nm average diameter, is used in this study. To make the emulsion pH reconfigurable, the droplets are covered with a weak polyelectrolyte, poly (acrylic acid). The swelling of the PAA molecules, due to ionization of the carboxylic acid groups, resulted in an increase in adlayer thickness at increase in pH. The change in transmitted intensity is found to scale linearly with the applied magnetic field strength, and at higher fields, the formed structures took more time to reconfigure themselves after the removal of magnetic field. At a pH 5, the increase in transmitted light intensity is seen even at a very low magnetic field strength due to the lower interdroplet spacing. On the contrary, at pH 9, the interdroplet spacing between the emulsion drops were large, due to the extension of PAA molecules, which led to a weaker magnetic interaction between the droplets and formation of shorter chains, where a lower transmission is seen due to multiple scattering. A straight-line pattern was observed in the transmitted intensity, due to the scattering of light from linear chains that are aligned perpendicular to the light propagation direction. Bridging of polymer covered surfaces was seen at pH 3, due to hydrogen bonding between PAA molecules. Our results show that tuning optical properties of magnetic emulsion (switching between transparent and opaque states) is possible through pH control. Our findings open up new opportunities to develop optical devices and accessing of diverse structures by tuning pH and magnetic field.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this study, X-band bilayer absorber was designed based on integration of magneto/dielectric phases particles with hierarchical 3D morphology. Pure CoFe2O4, SrFe12O19 and NiO as magnetic and dielectric components with unique 3D morphology were developed via facile chemical method. Morphological evaluations confirmed the formation of hierarchical structure of CoFe2O4 (Co), SrFe12O19 (Sr) and NiO (NiO) with crochet ball, brain-coral and rose-flower-like particles morphology, respectively. In the first step, the synthesized Co and Sr particles were physically blended with 1:1 wt ratio (SC). In a second step, the as-prepared SC composite mixed with NiO powder with 1:1 wt ratio (SCN). The reflection loss simulations of bilayer absorbers with total thickness of 2 mm were performed via CST Studio software based on the electromagnetic characteristics of as-prepared resin base SC and SCN composite monolayer absorbers. The optimized bilayer absorber in which SCN composite placed as matching layer with 1.5 mm thickness and SC composite placed as absorbing layer with 0.5 mm thickness exhibited a minimum reflection loss value of −21.43 dB at 10.8 GHz matching frequency, with 3.2 effective absorption bandwidth and a loading percentage as low as 20 w%. The aforementioned results indicated that tailoring the configuration of particle morphology along with tuning optimal layers thickness could be a rational way to reach considerable absorption bandwidth in double layer absorber. The improvement in microwave dissipation performance is linked to various parameters such as defect induced dipole polarization, multiple scatterings and reflections between particles and pores, coupling interactions between layers, promotion of interfacial polarization, etc.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present the results of a systematic micromagnetic study of the effect of the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) on the spin wave band structure of two one-dimensional magnonic crystals (MCs), both with the same periodicity p = 300 nm, but different implementation of the DMI modulation. In the first system the artificial periodicity was achieved by modulating the interfacial DMI constant D, while in the second system also the sample morphology was modulated. Due to the folding property of the band structure in the dispersion relations of the magnonic crystals it is possible to extend the sensitivity of Brillouin light scattering towards weak DMI strength (D in the range from 0 to 0.5 mJ/m2), by measuring the frequency splitting of folded modes in high-order artificial Brillouin zones, since the splitting increases almost linearly with the band index. For relatively large values of the DMI (D in the range from 1.0 to 2.0 mJ/m2) the spin waves dispersion relations present flat modes for positive wavevectors, separated by forbidden frequency gaps whose amplitude depend on the value of D. These frequency gaps are more pronounced for the sample with morphology modulation. The non-reciprocal, localised, spatial profiles of these modes in both MCs are discussed with reference to spin waves in plain films and in isolated stripes of the same thickness.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Using the first principle study within the density functional theory, the electronic and magnetic properties of the bulk on (1 1 1), (1 1 0) and (0 0 1) surfaces of the full-Heusler alloy and the Sc2CrSi/HgTe (1 1 1) interfaces were verified. In this article, our calculations showed that the compound exhibits half-metallic ferromagnetism with an energy gap of 0.544 eV and a spin-flip gap of 0.1 eV in the majority spin channel at an equilibrium lattice constant of 6.39 Å. The total magnetic moment of the studied compound was calculated according to the Slater rule to be 2 μB. The results confirm that the half-metallicity of bulk is completely conserved at the Sc(2)Si-terminated (0 0 1) surface, Sc(1)-, and Si-terminated (1 1 1) surfaces, but destroyed at Cr- and Sc(2)-terminated (1 1 1) surface, the Sc(1)Cr- terminated (0 0 1) surface, and Sc(1)Sc(2)CrSi-terminated (1 1 0) Surface. From the above-mentioned characteristics of Sc2CrSi exhibit that this alloy is an adequate promising candidate for spin electronics implementations. Moreover, during the calculation of the interfacial adhesion energies, it is found it that Sc(1)-Te and Si-Te configurations are more stable among the others. Regrettably, interfacial configurations show that the half-metallicity of bulk Sc2CrSi is destroyed for all four possible configurations.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe current model of FOI (Fin-On-Insulator) FinFETs was developed, in which the back-channel current was modeled as a parasitic transistor. Both the experimental and TCAD simulation results validated the accuracy of the proposed model under different back-gate biases. This current model exhibits a wide valid range for various geometry parameters including fin width, fin height, sidewall inclination angle, fin bottom angle and channel doping density. It was demonstrated that the fin bottom angle had a great influence on the channel current when a positive back-gate bias applied, which may be useful to boost the drive capability of FOI FinFETs. Besides, the mobility influence on our model is also discussed. The proposed model can help to build BSIM model and instruct devices designer to optimize the performance of the devices.© 2021Magnetorheological (MR) fluids are one of the most valuable smart soft materials for vibration damper and shock absorber in a wide range of engineering applications because they change their viscoelastic properties when subjected to external magnetic fields. These fluids are prepared by dispersing the soft magnetic micro size particles in the nonmagnetic carrier oils, i.e., mineral oil (MO) and synthetic oil with stabilizing additives. The prominent feature of these fluids is their propensity to the reversible transformation from fluid to semi-solid-state and vice versa within milliseconds under the external magnetic field. The long-time stability and low magnetorheological effect are still considered as one of the most critical problems that need to be solved. There are many methods to resolve this problem, and many researchers are working to improve their stabilization and MR effect. This study reviews the prevalent stabilization techniques, different preparation methods and tribological behaviour of these fluids under an external magnetic field. Additionally, applications of magnetorheological fluid (MRF), rheological models, temperature dependency, current scenarios and future directions are also discussed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) of the Pd/Co2MnSi(CMS)/Co3O4 and Pd/CMS/Pd/CMS/Co3O4/Pd multilayers has been studied in this paper. The Pd/CMS/ Co3O4 is a “heavy metal (HM)/ferromagnetic (FM) /antiferromagnetic (AFM) oxide” structure that has triple interfacial effects, which is HM/FM, FM/OX and FM/AFM. For Pd (6 nm)/CMS (t nm)/Co3O4 (0.6 nm) /Pd (6 nm) structure, the maximum magnetic anisotropy energy density (Keff) is 0.583 Merg/cm3 at t = 6 nm and the PMA can be maintained with the thickness of the CMS layer in a range of 3.5–8 nm. When the thickness of the Co3O4 layer varied from 0 to 1.3 nm, the multilayer structure also has PMA with 6 nm CMS layer. Inserting a Pd layer in the CMS to form Pd/CMS/Pd/CMS/Co3O4/Pd structure can enhance the PMA and the saturated magnetization. The maximum Keff of the Pd/CMS/Pd/CMS/Co3O4/Pd structure is 0.680 Merg/cm3 by inserting a 0.8 nm Pd layer, which is 15% larger than samples without inserting Pd layer in the CMS. The crystallization quality of Co3O4 relates to the power of sputtering deposition and furthermore affects the flatness of the interface and PMA of the multilayer film.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The interesting characteristics of spintronics exhibit lower energy consumption, higher density, push up us to find new materials that can be functional for spintronics such as half metallic ferromagnets. Based on density functional theory (DFT) and using full potential linearized augmented plane waves and local orbitals (FP-LAPW + lo) method implemented in Wien2k package, we carried out a study of structural, electronic and magnetic properties of CaTe doped with V, Cr, and Mn for various concentrations namely x = 0.25, 0.125, and 0.0625. Tran-Blaha-modified Beck-Johnson potential (TB-MBJ) was used to investigate the electronic and magnetic properties. We found that: only Cr-doped compounds are half metallic ferromagnetic materials with 100% spin-polarisation at Fermi level (Ef) and their ferromagnetism stabilization maybe explained by Zener's double exchange mechanism. An integer integrated total magnetic moment per TM atom marked to be 3,4, and 5 in Bohr magneton(μB) for V, Cr, and Mn-doped compounds respectively. We found large half metallic gaps for Cr dopant compounds resulting from the strong p-d hybridization of 5p (Te) and 3d (Cr), which make them promising candidates for spintronic devices and applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this manuscript, we have investigated the temperature evolution of magnetic and electronic properties in doped YCr1−xNixO3 (x = 0.0, 0.05, 0.10, and 0.15). While both Cr3+ and Ni2+ are magnetic, the substitution of Ni2+ for Cr3+ changes the Cr ionic state which alters the magnetic correlation as well as the electrical resistivity. The system retains its original orthorhombic-Pnma structural symmetry, but unit cell volume shows an evolution with the Ni content. While the magnetic moment below TN initially decreases then re-increases with the Ni content, the magnetic transition temperature continuously decreases with Ni doping throughout the series. The electrical resistivity data exhibit an insulating behaviour throughout the temperature range, however, the resistivity decreases with Ni doping. The nature of charge conduction is found to follow Arrhenius-type conduction behaviour in the whole series.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Mn5Ge3 thin films were grown on GaAs(1 1 1) and GaAs(0 0 1) by Molecular Beam Epitaxy (MBE). The influence of stoichiometry and alloying of the samples was investigated using different Mn diffusion cell temperatures for each sample. X-ray diffraction (XRD) measurements reveal the following epitaxial relations: (0 0 1) Mn5Ge3//(1 1 1) GaAs and [1 1 0] Mn5Ge3//[2–1–1] GaAs for the sample grown on GaAs(1 1 1), and (1 1 1) Mn5Ge3//(0 0 1) GaAs and [ −1 1 0] Mn5Ge3//[1 1 0] GaAs for the samples grown on GaAs(0 0 1). High-resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM) results for a sample grown on GaAs(0 0 1) indicate that samples are around 70 nm thick and are composed of several grains with 2 different orientations corresponding to a 90° rotation around the [1 1 1] axis. Analyzing the Mn map with energy-filtered transmission electron microscopy (EFTEM) we observed that all the grains look very similar, indicating that they contain roughly the same amount of manganese. The magnetocaloric effect found in both family of samples is spread in a wider temperature range when compared with bulk Mn5.1Ge2.9 and the magnetic entropy change peak is higher than Si- or Sb- modified Mn5Ge3. This result makes the Mn5Ge3 a possible candidate for magnetic refrigeration while being a rare earth-free material.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Pressure study of the Heusler Ni2MnSn-based alloys revealed divergent values of the pressure effects on magnetic properties within a group of the off-stoichiometric alloys. An increase in temperature of the structural martensitic transition in the Mn-rich alloys under pressure is adequate for volume changes that accompanied the structural transition. An anomalous decrease of electric resistivity of the alloys in vicinity of the structural transition verifies a transfer into ferromagnetic order of the alloys above the transition temperatures. Almost no changes of exchange-spring and exchange-bias effects were detected under pressure in all the studied alloys. All the observed pressure effects are discussed with help of recent quantum-mechanical calculations of effects of multiple point-defects on magnetism of stoichiometric Ni2MnSn alloy.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The ground state energy and the low-energy excitation of the frustrated ferromagnetic chain model in its incommensurate singlet phase are investigated by linear spin wave theory (LSWT). Differing from the previous works also using LSWT, we diagonalize the bosonic Hamiltonian and obtain the spin wave spectrum (ωk=Ak1-Γk2) analytically by Bogoliubov transformation. Through numerical calculation, we find that the pitch angle φ and the frustration parameter α must have the relation cosφ=1/(4α) if we require that 1-Γk2 is non-zero for all wave vector k, that gives a new way to determine the critical point (α=1/4) between the ferromagnetic phase and the incommensurate singlet phase. The quantum correction to the classical ground state energy as a function of α is also calculated and we find it will be zero as α→(1/4)+, that means the spin fluctuations near the critical point are very small.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe focus of this work is to perform a first-time analysis of the thermal cross-coupling of a device on a neighbor one in advanced UTBB transistors through 3D numerical simulations, validated with experimental data from the literature. In this work, it could be observed that the temperature rise due to a self-heated device can affect the performance of a neighbor one according to the distance between them and to the bias conditions. By varying the distance of the devices from 1 µm to 50 nm, it is shown an influence of the temperature rise due to a self-heated device in threshold voltage, subthreshold swing and in the maximum transconductance as well an increase in the thermal resistance of a neighbor device.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We develop a low-cost, mass-production process for creating rod-shaped glass-coated magnetic particles consisting of a magnetic metal core and glass shell structure. We investigate their magnetic properties by analyzing their optical absorbance in suspension as a function of the orientation of a 1 mT magnetic field. From the response we derive that the magnetization of the particles is 0.1 MA/m. We demonstrate an automated system that quantifies and dispenses a large amount of RGMPs by magnetic self-assembly on a high-volume plate patterned with an array of holes. This automatic dispenser can provide packaging forms with the smallest unit of RGMPs for in-vitro diagnostics and is expected to reduce the time and effort required for the assembly and packaging process.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Single crystals of Fe2(TeO3)2(SO4)·3H2O with an alternating spin-chain structure are successfully grown by a hydrothermal method. Magnetic and heat capacity measurements show that this compound possesses a short-range antiferromagetic order at ~55 K and a long-range antiferromagetic order at 32.5 K. A large magnetic anisotropy with magnetization easy c-axis is observed, in which a weak ferromagnetic component is observed along the a- and b-axes, while a spin flop transition is observed at applied field along the c-axis. Also, the magnetic anisotropy energy at 2 K is estimated to be 4.78(3) × 108 ergs/cm3. Such magnetic anisotropy may be due to a strong nonsymmetric distortion in the FeO6 octahedra.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Iron nitrides composed of abundant and inexpensive Fe and N compounds such as α′′-Fe16N2 and γ’-Fe4N are in the spotlight as potential magnetic materials for the next generation of electric vehicles. Extensive applications of iron nitrides, however, have not been reported since their mass production is yet to be established. Due to the low solubility of nitrogen in liquid iron, the production of iron nitrides through conventional steelmaking processes is difficult. Moreover, α′′-Fe16N2 with a high saturation magnetization is known to be metastable and can form below 200 °C where diffusional phase transformations are slow. In this study, we propose a nonequilibrium process that can enhance the kinetics for iron nitride formation at low temperatures. Thermodynamically metastable Fe-based glassy alloy with a relatively open atomic packing structure was used as the starting material. Synthesis of iron nitrides during the mechanical alloying of Fe-based amorphous powders and solid nitrogen compounds was systematically studied to understand the mechanism of solid state nitriding reactions. In addition, thermal and magnetic properties were studied to provide a basis for practical applications of iron nitrides as rare-earth free magnetic materials.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.MnZn power ferrites for MHz and wide temperature applications were prepared by ceramic process and effects of Co2O3 and MoO3 co-doping on the microstructure and magnetic properties have been investigated, and MnZn power ferrite with ultra-high cut-off frequency of 14.2 MHz has been prepared. It has been revealed that the grain size of the MnZn ferrite can be homogenize via the co-doping of Co2O3 and MoO3, giving rise to enhanced electrical resistivity, compensated magnetocrystalline anisotropy and reduced domain wall displacement. Effective reduction of the power loss with improved temperature stability and cut-off frequency have been achieved by synergistic function of Co2O3 and MoO3 via liquid-phase sintering increasing the possibility of Co2+ cation entering into the spinel lattice.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate preparation and characterization of permalloy Ni80Fe20 at.% (Py) multilayers in which the Py layers were deposited by two different sputter deposition methods. Namely, dc magnetron sputtering (dcMS) and high power impulse magnetron sputtering (HiPIMS), that represent low and moderate ionized flux fraction of the film forming material, respectively. We deposited ultrathin bilayers, i.e. 15 Å thick Py and 5 Å thick Pt, with 20 repetitions. Various effects such as substrate roughness, working gas pressure and sputter power are considered. The microstructure, texture and strain were characterized by X-ray diffraction, individual thicknesses and alloying were analysed by X-ray reflectivity, and uniaxial in-plane anisotropy probed by the magneto-optical Kerr effect. It is shown that HiPIMS deposition produces multilayers with reduced surface roughness regardless of the substrate surface roughness. Both dcMS and HiPIMS deposition present multilayers with strong (111) texture normal to the substrate. Using HiPIMS for deposition of the Py layer minimizes the alloying between individual layers compared to dcMS deposition performed at same average sputter power. However, this improvement in interface sharpness leads to a higher magnetic coercivity and a poor hard axis in the film plane. On the other hand, multilayers with alloying present a linear hard axis. Furthermore, we studied Py/Cu and Py/CuPt multilayers, prepared under identical conditions using HiPIMS. The results indicate that in the Py/Pt case, deterioration of the in-plane uniaxial anisotropy, is caused by inverse magnetostriction originating from the large lattice mismatch between Py and Pt. The Py/Pt multilayers that exhibit alloying have a less strained interface and have a well defined uniaxial anisotropy.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A three-dimensional disordered spin system consisting of 3d transition metal ion Mn4+ with strong electronic correlations and heavy 5d transition metal ion Ir4+ has been investigated in form of a perovskite thin film. The studied compound of the composition SrMn0.5Ir0.5O3 does not exist as bulk or single crystal, but can be stabilized by epitaxy onto SrTiO3 single crystals as fully disordered double perovskite by pulsed laser deposition. As measured by X-ray circular dichroism, the ground state of this material is ferromagnetic with both, Mn and Ir, spins aligned in parallel. This unusual ground state can be qualitatively explained by charge-transfer driven magnetic exchange involving Mn eg-state and Ir t2g-state, with no evidence of spin–orbit coupling in Ir. Due to the coexistence of competing magnetic interactions and randomness in the system, spin-glass features are observed at low temperatures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, soft magnetic CoFeB films were successfully deposited onto silicon substrates using radio frequency (RF) magnetron sputtering technique and their morphology, roughness (Rq) and magnetic properties were focused. Before annealing, CoFeB films prepared with different sputtering powers (60 W, 90 W, 120 W and 150 W) exhibit amorphous structure. The out-of-plane coercivity (Hc) gradually enhances from 40.2 to 66.4 Oe as the sputtering power increases, and the saturation magnetization (Ms) reaches the maximum of 1117 emu/cm3 at 90 W sputtering power. Then, the CoFeB film samples with 90 W were annealed by 200 °C, 300 °C, 400 °C and 500 °C, respectively. Annealing treatments at 300 °C and 400 °C transfers amorphous state into crystalline state, which is demonstrated by the appearance of the observable diffraction peak of CoFe (1 1 0). The out-of-plane Hc decreases from 40.2 to 30.5 Oe at annealing temperature range of RT to 300 °C. The annealed film has a greatest Ms of 1280 emu/cm3 at 300 °C. However, the Hc gradually increases from 30.5 to 68.9 Oe annealed from 400 °C to 500 °C due to the deterioration of the thin film. Collectively, the process conditions of sputtering at 90 W and annealing at 300 °C or 400 °C are favorable for crystallization and excellent magnetic properties in CoFeB films.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Absorber thickness is a crucial factor in microwave absorption performance. Therefore, the researches about the influence of thickness on microwave absorption performance have been intensively investigated. In this work, we prepared La-doped BaFe12O19 with a concentration of 0, 0.1, 0.3, and 0.5 by using co-precipitation then mixed with polyaniline by 10% wt. Morphological, structural, magnetic, and electromagnetic properties were evaluated using SEM, XRD, VSM, and VNA analysis. The doping modified all the properties of the samples and consequently enhanced their microwave absorption properties. The La-doping and polyaniline compositing possessed significance for maintaining reflection loss values for all composites when the absorber thicknesses varied in the range of 1.75–3.50 mm. The best microwave absorption performance could be found in the Ba0.9La0.1Fe12O19/polyaniline (named La-P1) composite, with more than 90% of the incident wave being absorbed for all measured thicknesses. Effective bandwidths of the La-P1 increased when thickness decreased and reached a maximum of 2.52 GHz for the thickness of 1.75 and 2.00 mm.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Iron oxide (Fe3O4) magnetic nanoparticles (MNs) delivered to the tumor under the influence of magnetic fields can generate reactive oxygen species (ROS) that affect the activity of mitochondrial enzymes, DNA damage and abnormal cell growth. Previous investigations used rotating magnetic fields to inhibit tumor growth. Herein, we question whether the magneto-mechanical effects of MNs under an inhomogeneous stationary magnetic field (ISMF) can modulate tumor heterogeneity, ROS and growth. Animals with Walker-256 carcinosarcoma in group 1 underwent no treatment (control), group 2 received MNs, while group 3 was treated with MNs + ISMF. MNs were injected with tumor cells. ISMF treatment was given every other day starting 2 days after implantation. MNs + ISMF showed a 51% increase in the tumor growth factor compared with MNs alone. Elevated levels of free iron and superoxide radical as well as decreased lactoferrin and NO-FeS-proteins were measured after MNs + ISMF treatment. The present study provides experimental evidence that the magnetic force exerted by ISMF upon MNs initiates morphological heterogeneity, modulates ROS generation and promotes tumor growth. Therefore, these findings propose to circumvent the negative effects of MNs by a shortened duration of targeted delivery, application of slowly changing ISMFs, and combination of ISMFs with alternating magnetic fields to modulate iron-dependent redox reactions.© 2021Soft magnetic compacted powders exhibit excellent magnetic properties as low core losses, high permeability and 3-D isotropic magnetic behaviour, but they are also characterised by porous structure. In those materials, the inner demagnetizing fields arise primarily from ferromagnetic particles surfaces and negatively affect magnetic permeability. In presented work four Ni80Fe15Mo5 (supermalloy) compacted powder samples were studied. Two of the samples, differing in heat treatment, were compacted from powder particles obtained by mechanical milling (with irregular shapes) as the references, and for two others, the particles with mechanically smoothed surfaces (with spherical-like shapes and the morphological inhomogeneities removed) were used. DC magnetic permeabilities of the samples were investigated by the approach, which excludes the presence of porous structure and the inner demagnetizing fields. It allows to evaluate the exact impact of particles surface smoothing on the character of magnetization processes. It was found that particle surface smoothing improved the movability of domain walls, therethrough the increase of magnetic interaction between individual particles. After the heat treatment, it leads to enormous rise of differential, reversible and irreversible permeabilities of NiFeMo compacts at the lower levels of magnetic fields.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.To study the MCE at the microscale with infrared thermography, a bulk Ni44Co6Mn30Ga20 sample was investigated. Direct measurements of the MCE were performed for temperatures around the reverse and direct martensitic transformation, by applying and removing a ~1.2 T magnetic field to the sample and recording the changes in its surface temperature with an IR camera. This was done for different sample temperatures on heating (from 273 K to 327 K) and cooling (from 327 K to 267 K). For sample temperatures around the reverse martensitic transformation, the inverse MCE is observed, with ΔT between −0.04 K and −0.54 K. The effect displays strong spatial inhomogeneity at the microscopic scale, which varies considerably with the progress of phase transformation. This behavior is not observed for the direct martensitic transformation (on cooling). The study reveals substantial novelty in the manifestation of the MCE at the microscopic scale, associated with phase dynamics, showing a different and inhomogeneous behavior on heating and cooling of a FSMA around the martensitic transition.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Immersion tests and magnetic property measurements were used to study the long-term effects of electrochemical corrosion on the magnetic properties of sintered NdFeB magnets. The results revealed that, during electrochemical corrosion, uneven distribution of the Nd-rich phase caused local lattice expansion in the magnets, in which the priority nucleation of reversal domains occurred. By analyzing the measurement results, about 90% of the remanence (Br) loss was ascribed to the matrix phase loss, while the remaining 10% was attributed to the deterioration of the surface structure of the magnets during electrochemical corrosion.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThis work studies the effect of heat sink in the back-end of line (BEOL) on the self-heating (SH) parameters of transistors in a Fully Depleted Silicon-on-Insulator (FDSOI) technology. The RF characterization technique, which involves S-parameter measurements over a wide frequency range, is used to evaluate SH parameters. Two types of sink configurations in the BEOL are considered; one connected to the gate and the other left floating. We experimentally demonstrate that gate-connected heat sink allows for a reduced self-heating in 22 nm FDSOI devices. Around 15% to 30% reduction in thermal resistance is observed for the gate-connected heat sink in comparison to the floating sink.© 2021The ground state electronic, magnetic and elastic properties of Co2NbGa are studied using first-principles calculations. The investigated system is mechanically and dynamically stable which is confirmed through Born mechanical stability criteria and positive phonon modes. Two kinds of disorders B2 and D03-types are studied to ensure the experimental magnetic moment in Co2NbGa within coherent potential approximation(CPA). The intrinsic anomalous Hall effect and anomalous Nernst effect are analysed from the Berry curvature point of view. The values of anomalous Hall conductivity and anomalous Nernst conductivity are 214.2 S/cm and −2.53 Am-1K-1 within the range of ±300meV around Fermi level respectively, and the same are comparable with the values of other Heusler alloys. The Curie temperature (TC) is estimated up to 548.7 K through the Heisenberg magnetic exchange interactions within mean-field approximation. Half-metal to a metal transition under pressure is evidenced through band structure and Fermi surface topology. Also the magnetic, Heisenberg exchange, elastic properties are probed under pressure.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A series of indium-doped hexaferrite ceremics with composition of SrInxFe12-xO19 (x = 0, 1.8, 2.4 and 3.0) were synthesized by a solid-state reaction method. The samples have a single-phase magneto-plumbite structure, and their lattice parameters a and c gradually decrease with the doping indium amount. The indium doping can reduce the ceramic pores. The dielectric constant, dielectric loss, saturation magentization and coercivity also decrease with the indium concentration. The dielectric change with temperature under different frequencies and magnetic fields reveals that the magnetic field has a certain manipulation on the dielectric parameter. Indium doping induces the non-collinear magnetic structure, causing a magnetodielectric effect. The influence of the magnetic field on the magnetodielectric coefficient shows that the magnetodielectric coefficient changes from positive to negative for SrInxFe12-xO19 with x = 0.0, 2.4 and 3.0, while keeps negative in the whole temperature range for SrIn1.8Fe10.2O19. At the same time, the positive and negative magnetodielectric transition temperature is different for the samples with different doping amounts. The transition temperature of SrFe12O19 is between 50 K and 75 K, while that of SrInxFe12-xO19 (x = 2.4–3.0) is between 25 and 50 K. In addition, SrIn2.4Fe9.6O19 enjoys the magnetodielectric effect with remarkable twisted-butterfly loop at room temperature, which is an intrinsic effect confirmed by the fact that the magnetodielectric coefficient is invariable with frequency. Our results provide a helpful research basis for the magnetodielectric materials.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we investigated the effect of Y3+ inclusion in ZnO nanoparticles doped with Fe3+ synthesized by the sol gel method. Transmission Electron Microscopy (TEM) images showed agglomerated nanostructures with different shapes and average particle size distributions ranging from 6 nm to 44 nm in diameter. Electron Paramagnetic Resonance (EPR) studies of the Zn0.98−yY0.02FeyO (y=0.00, 0.02, 0.03 and 0.04) were carried out using X band (9.7 GHz) at room temperature. For undoped ZnO and doped with Y3+, complex line shapes were observed as a result of oxygen vacancies (VO+1). In addition, the Y3+ inclusion provokes an enhancement of the linewidth and the resonance field due to intrinsic defects in the hexagonal structure. This observation is compatible with a shortest relaxation time by reason of the particle size reduction and an extra antiferromagnetic local field as a result of the Y3+ presence. For co-doped ZnO samples, the EPR spectra confirms the presence of Fe3+ and Y3+ at the core Zn sites, altering the lattice strain of the ZnO structure. This result was monitored by the zero-field splitting (ZFS) parameters of the spin Hamiltonian, corroborating a reduction in the Fe - Fe interaction. The presence of Y ions was also confirmed in interstitial sites, resulting in a small g-shift from 4.2 to 4.0 associated with modifications of the rhombic component, E, of the Spin–Hamiltonian. This study contributes to the understanding of structural defects caused by the Y and Fe inclusion in the Wurtzite crystal structure of ZnO, a material with potential applications in spintronic devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Giant magnetoresistance (GMR) devices known for their widespread application as magnetic field sensors face challenges owing to their nonlinear resistance response with the magnetic field. Here, we have developed CoFe(3 nm)/Rh(tRh nm)/CoFe(tmidCoFe nm)/bcc Cu(1.6 nm)/CoFe(ttopCoFe nm)/MgO(2 nm) based current in plane (CIP)-GMR devices and demonstrated linear MR curves with tunable characteristics. The MR ratio and saturating magnetic field were tunable between 3.9% and 23.5%, and 0.013 T and 1.5 T. The numerical simulation modeling confirmed biquadratic coupling between the bottom and middle CoFe layers through Rh and antiferromagnetic coupling between the middle and top CoFe layers through a Cu spacer, providing the linear MR. The fine-tuning of thicknesses of the middle and top CoFe layers provides supplementary routes for optimizing the sensitivity and operation field range of the CIP-GMR devices to specific magnetic sensor applications in the low and medium magnetic field range. The above results demonstrate that CIP-GMR devices with the asymmetric structure demonstrated in this study are promising for the next generation linear magnetic sensors.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Evaluation of fatigue damage is critical for ensuring the safety and durability of steel structures. A newly developed non-destructive testing (NDT) method named magnetic memory method (MMM) is a valid approach to evaluate the ferromagnetic material stress and damage utilizing changes in the self-magnetic leakage (SMFL) field. However, because of the lack of accurate description of the SMFL changing mechanism under elastic and plastic cyclic loads, the application of MMM in the assessment of cumulative plastic damage D for structural steel under low cycle fatigue (LCF) is greatly limited. Hence, in this paper, based on J-A magneto-mechanical theory and J-A magnetic hysteresis theory, an improved theoretical model that described the variation of irreversible magnetization with plastic strain after cyclic loading was proposed and verified. Combining with magnetic charge theory and cumulative damage mechanics model further, the theoretical relationship between the gradient K of SMFL curves and cumulative plastic damage D was established, which indicated preliminarily K had a potential possibility to assess the D. Then, the tension–compression LCF tests on Q345B and Q345qC dog-bone steel sheet specimens were conducted and the surface SMFL of the specimens under cyclic load was measured. The experimental correlation between K and D was further given by the analysis of experimental data and clarified from the perspective of energy conversion for the first time. By the comparison between experimental and theoretical results, and the in-depth analysis of the microcosmic mechanism about the activity and multiplication of dislocation, the semi-quantitative correlation that K was related to D exponentially was presented. The accuracy of the established theoretical relationship was further verified. Thus, the established K-D theoretical relationship can be used for the theoretical analysis of the quantitative characterization of cumulative plastic damage. This work demonstrates that the cumulative plastic damage can be estimated semi-quantitatively via the variations of SMFL curve, which is beneficial for the fatigue damage assessment for structural steel under LCF.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Pressure effect on the magnetic, mechanical and lattice dynamical properties of the ferromagnetic L12-Fe3Pd crystalline alloy was investigated by first-principles calculations. The calculated properties under ambient pressure are in good agreement with available theoretical results. A two-step pressure-induced collapse of magnetic moment was observed, accompanied by the collapse of the volume. The first one is at about 34.2 GPa, and the other is at about 67 GPa. While the magnetic moment disappears around 84 GPa. The lattice dynamics calculations under high pressure revealed that the dynamically stable and unstable cases appear alternately. The system is dynamically unstable at low pressures due to the spontaneous magnetization of the system, and then the system is dynamically stable in the pressure range of 33.5 to 66.9 GPa, and this pressure range is between the first collapse pressure and second collapse pressure. The system becomes dynamically unstable again at pressure ranging from 67 to 83.7 GPa, and afterwards becomes stable. Elastic constants and their dependence on pressure and related mechanical properties were investigated. Stability criteria show that ferromagnetic L12-Fe3Pd crystalline alloy is mechanically stable over the entire studied pressure range. The bulk modulus exhibits pronounced softening with pressure, and present minimum values at magnetic collapse pressures. The mechanism of elastic softening was analyzed with the magnetoelastic force. From Pugh's ratio and Poisson's ratio, the system exhibits brittleness at the vicinity of magnetic collapse pressures. The linear thermal expansion coefficient was calculated based on the quasi-harmonic approximation. The results reveal that the alloy does not exhibit thermal Invar behavior under zero pressure and high pressure. Finally, a high-anisotropy tetragonal structure with space group symmetry P4/mbm was obtained by soft-mode phase transition theory, and this structure is dynamically and mechanically stable at zero pressure. Theoretical prediction suggested that the P4/mbm structure is energetically favorable than the previously reported structures at the pressure below 32 GPa and also showed that above 32 GPa the hexagonal D019 structure becomes the energetically most stable structure.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline nickel manganite was prepared by a simple sol–gel method from an aqueous solution of metal chlorides containing sorbitol as a chelating agent. X-ray diffraction and Rietveld refinement show a spinel-type crystalline structure, space group Fd3¯m, and a minor (~3%) phase of rock salt structure assigned to NiO. XPS measurement shows a typical manganite electronic structure with Mn in the oxidation states Mn2+, Mn3+, and Mn4+. The zero-field-cooled and field-cooled magnetization curves measured under low magnetic fields display irreversibility and an asymmetric hysteresis evidencing some exchange bias. Field dependent DC susceptibility above Curie temperature put into evidence a competition of short ranged ferro and antiferromagnetic interactions. AC in-phase susceptibility shows a frequency independent sharp peak at the ferromagnetic phase transition (97 K) and a broad maximum at lower temperature. These maxima show a weak frequency dependence in the out-phase component. Cole–Cole plot reveals at least two magnetic relaxation processes.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Bilayer and trilayer films with ferromagnetic CoPt and antiferromagnetic MnN constituent layers have been prepared by facing-target magnetron sputtering with a 6 Oe magnetic field applied to an in-plane direction of the growing film. Primitive exchange coupling, which signifies the exchange coupling occurred without conventional field cooling, has been investigated systematically by varying the component layer thickness. It has been shown that the interfacial spin configuration that initiates exchange coupling can be established at the interface when the MnN layer grows on the surface of the CoPt layer under a small field. The primitive exchange coupling shows an increasing tendency with increasing the MnN layer thickness, and a decreasing tendency with increasing the coupled CoPt layer thickness. And the coercivity of the coupled CoPt layer remain almost unchanged within the whole thickness range of both MnN and CoPt, which suggests the coercivity of the coupled CoPt layer is not only affected by exchange coupling.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Nanosized hematite (α-Fe2O3) is a widely investigated material due to its favourable properties (chemically stable, environmentally safe, inexpensive) and very good performance in several advanced applications. Properties and performance of hematite nanoparticles can be adjusted and improved by modification of particle size and shape, as well as by substitution of Fe3+ ions in the crystal structure of hematite with other metal ions. Ru3+ ions are potentially suitable metal ions for the substitution of Fe3+ ions in hematite because of the same charge and similar ionic radii. In the present work, the effects of Ru3+ ions on the formation and properties of hematite nanorods prepared by combination of hydrothermal precipitation and calcination were investigated. The influence of the molar fraction of Ru3+ ions in the hydrothermal precipitation system on the formation and properties of iron oxide phases was studied. Single-phase goethite (α-FeOOH) nanorods containing incorporated Ru3+ ions were formed in the presence of low levels of Ru3+ ions (<3 mol%), while at higher levels (4 and 5 mol% Ru) hematite nanocylinders, consisting of self-assembled and fused nanoparticles, were obtained. The mechanism of the formation of these iron oxide nanostructures in the presence of Ru3+ ions was explained and compared with the effect of other metal cations reported in the literature. Ru-doped hematite nanorods were formed after calcination of Ru-doped goethite nanorods at 500 °C. A gradual elongation of hematite nanorods with increased Ru doping to highly elongated Ru-doped hematite nanoneedles at 2 mol% Ru was observed and explained. The influence of the Ru doping level on the magnetic properties of hematite nanorods was investigated using Mössbauer spectroscopy and magnetic measurements. Temperature of the transition between antiferromagnetic (AFM) and weakly ferromagnetic (WFM) spin ordering state (Morin transition) gradually rose with increasing Ru3+-for-Fe3+ substitution in hematite. Besides, magnetization of the WFM hematite gradually decreased with Ru doping which was attributed to the reduced canting of two almost antiparallel spin sublattices in this phase. The optical band gap in hematite nanorods was found to get gradually narrower with increased Ru doping due to the modified electronic structure.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Permanent Magnet Assisted Five-Phase Synchronous Machine is analytically modeled in the rotating (dq1dq3) reference frames. The cross saturation and space harmonics are captured in the magnetic flux maps obtained from static 2D finite element (FE) analysis. In this paper, a method to incorporate the skewing effect in the flux map distribution for the first and third harmonic is presented. The original flux for one motor segment is used to calculate fluxes of the first and third planes in the consecutive skewing segments. Respective rotator operators allow to sum the contribution from axial slice and shift the resulting map to the desired zero reference position. Eventually, a dynamic model is established on the new corrected flux maps. FE and experimental validations have been performed to confirm the authenticity of the proposed technique.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThis brief proposes an analytical approach to model the DC electrical behavior of extremely narrow cylindrical junctionless nanowire field-effect transistors (JL-NW-FETs). The model includes explicit expressions, taking into account the first-order perturbation theory for calculating eigenstates and corresponding wave-functions obtained by the Schrödinger equation in the cylindrical-coordinate. Assessment of the proposed model with technology computer-aided design (TCAD) simulations and measurement results confirms its validity for all regions of operation. This represents an essential step toward the analysis of circuits, mainly biosensors based on junctionless nanowire transistors.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Based on the relaxation time approximation, the mean collision time for magnon scattering τc(T) is computed from the experimental spin Seebeck coefficient of a bulk YIG/ Pt bilayer. The scattering results to be composed by two processes: the low temperature one, with a T-1/2 dependence, is attributed to the scattering by defects and provides a mean free path around 10 μm; the high temperature one, depending on T-4, is associated to the scattering by other magnons. The results are employed to predict the thickness dependence of the spin Seebeck coefficient for thin films.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Local hyperthermia using magnetic nanoparticles has attracted attention as a less invasive cancer therapy. Accurate estimation of heat dissipation of magnetic nanoparticles is important for hyperthermia treatment. In this study, the magnetization properties and heat dissipation of Feraheme®, Resovist®, and Synomag®-D commercial magnetic nanoparticles was measured. The effective core diameter and anisotropy constant were estimated by the Langevin function taking into consideration the effect of anisotropy. The required frequency and intensity of an applied magnetic field with respect to the weight and concentration of magnetic nanoparticles in an assumed spherical tumor were estimated based on measurement and theory of magnetic relaxation. A method to quantitate realistic heat dissipation of magnetic nanoparticles in tumor tissue by measurement of their magnetization properties is introduced. Because the physical rotation of magnetic nanoparticles is inhibited in tumor tissue, the realistic heat dissipation is estimated by solidifying a mass of nanoparticles in an experimental sample. The specific loss power and intrinsic loss power as the heat dissipations of magnetic nanoparticles were estimated from the area of the magnetization curves. The results indicated that only the linear component of magnetization was associated with the loss powers. Our method to quantitate loss powers and the index for applied magnetic field will facilitate the clinical application of hyperthermia treatment using magnetic nanoparticles.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Lanthanide-based nanostructures have the potential to meet the current miniaturization demands of advanced devices such as magnetic memories with ultrahigh-storage densities. However, many questions about their fundamental properties remain unaddressed even for bulk and small nanostructures. From the application and scientific point of view, it is crucial to determine their structural stability, magnetic coupling, and magnetic anisotropy, as well as to identify the best structure that can simultaneously consider these properties. With the help of experimental measurements on Pr bulk and clusters, we quantitatively calculated the spin and orbital magnetic moments by using the density functional theory (DFT) method, where spin-orbit coupling (SOC) and non-collinearity are included self-consistently. We found that Pr bulk is in a singlet state with the atomic magnetic moments anti-ferromagnetically coupled along the in-plane direction, and it shows strong in-plane magnetic anisotropy. Obeying Hunds rule of negative values, the orbital magnetic moment remarkably contributes to total moments in the bulk and cluster phases. However, they cannot determine the experimental oscillation of cluster magnetism. The oscillation behavior, as a function of cluster size, as well as the enhanced magnetic moment with increasing temperature, can be interpreted as the anti-ferromagnetic coupling between atomic magnetic moments. Giant magnetic anisotropy energy of several hundreds of meV has been derived in both Pr bulk and clusters, which is an order of magnitude larger than the transition metal counterparts.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Retain of phase pure ferroelectric tetragonal phase (P4mm) achieved from the coexistence of paraelectric hexagonal phase (P63/mmc) + ferroelectric phase without the loss of polarisation and magnetization under the Dy3+-Fe3+ co-substitution on BaTiO3, Ba1-yDyyTi1-xFexO3 (x = 0.05; y = 0; 0.005; 0.010 and 0.015) ceramics. A small amount of Dy substitution enhances the inhibition of vacancy formation and suppresses the defect concentration through the decrease of the hexagonal phase. The unexpected ferromagnetic nature in the non-magnetic tetragonal phase in y = 0.015 ceramics unambiguously depends on the formation of the paramagnetic defect, Ti3+ for the charge compensation process that induces magnetic moment. The observed ferromagnetic nature in y = 0.01 ceramics originated from the Fe3+-O2−-Fe3+ super-exchange and Dy3+-O2−-Dy3+ interactions which are stronger than the magneto-crystalline anisotropy (y = 0.015). For the first time, multiferroic properties (magnetodielectric and magnetoelectric) were reported in this work. The magnetoelectric coupling effect originated from the co-contribution of magnetocrystalline anisotropy due to spin–orbit interaction through symmetry breaking and microstrain.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we have investigated the modification in structural, magnetic, transport, and magneto-transport properties of La0.95X0.05MnO3 polycrystalline samples prepared by the citrate combustion route with doping of different valence ions (X = Ce, Dy, Er, Sr, Na and La) as well as erbium-doped La1-xErxMnO3 samples (x = 0.0, 0.05, 0.1, and 0.3). X-ray diffraction patterns measured at room temperature confirmed the single-phase perovskite hexagonal structure with R-3c space group in all of these samples, excluding the 30% Er substituted sample. The grain sizes estimated from the SEM images were found to be in a range of 1.8–3 µm for all of the sintered samples (at 1300 °C/3h), and below 100 nm for the calcined powders (at 600 °C/3h). Curie temperatures of undoped and doped LaMnO3 powder samples were observed in the range of 230–255 K, significantly higher than the reported value (~140 K) for undoped samples. The maximum saturation magnetization (at 10 K) was obtained for the undoped sample (92 emu/g) and the largest coercivity (60 Oe) was found for the 5% Er-doped LaMnO3 sample. Temperature dependence of resistivity was measured in the absence and presence of the magnetic field (5 T), and the curves suggest a metal–insulator transition. The 5% Er-doped sample exhibited insulating behaviour while the higher Er concentration (10%) doping caused the metal–insulator transition. The rich and tuneable magnetic, transport and magneto-transport properties make these samples promising candidates for biosensors, memory devices, and other technological applications.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, enhancement-mode AlGaN/GaN p-type GaN cap layer high electron mobility transistors (p-GaN HEMTs) with Ti/Au gate metal are fabricated and electrically characterized. The post gate annealing (PGA) treatment at 300 °C for 10 min is utilized to improve the devices’ characteristics. As a result, the p-GaN HEMTs achieve a high drain current (IDS) of 490 mA/mm at VGS = 7 V with a high threshold voltage (VTH) of 1.9 V. Meanwhile, the pulse measurements show good dynamic characteristics, and the temperature-dependent characteristics indicate that the VTH has excellent high-temperature stability from 25 °C to 175 °C. Besides, it can be found that the temperature will affect the capacitance–voltage (C-V) and transconductance curves, which is related to the hole energy and electron mobility at different temperatures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we investigated the effect of adsorption of transition metal on electronic properties of metallic and semiconducting (CNTs). It was found that magnetization can be induced in metallic and semiconducting CNTs by adsorbing transition metals on them. Density of states (DOS) and bandstructure results suggest ferromagnetic (FM) and half metal ferromagnetic (HMF) characteristics in transition metal adsorbed metallic and semiconducting CNTs. Metallic (6, 0) CNT shows induced ferromagnetism on adsorbing Ag, Co, Cr, Ti, Mo, and shows HMF characteristic on adsorbing Zr. Semiconducting (8, 0) CNT shows induced HMF characteristic on adsorbing Ag, Co, Cr, Ti, Mo, and shows ferromagnetic characteristic on adsorbing Zr. Induced magnetism in CNTs can find application in magnetic sensors, magnetic forced microscopy, biomedical cell transportation and 1-D magnetoresistive spintronic devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We consider a system of single-domain magnetic nanoparticles placed along a linear chain and address the effect of the distance between them on the magnetic and thermal relaxation properties of the system. The nanoparticles interact with each other through the dipolar interaction and we introduce disorder into the system by allowing random sizes of the nanoparticles and random directions of their uniaxial anisotropy axes. In particular, the radius of the spherical nanoparticles are drawn from a log-normal distribution. The dynamical behavior of the magnetic moments of the system is studied through numerical simulations of the stochastic Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation, taking into account explicit temperature dependence of the saturation magnetization and uniaxial anisotropy energy density to describe the magnetic properties of perovskite manganite oxide nanoparticles. Hysteresis, zero-field-cooled and field-cooled curves are measured, from which we can find the coercive field and the blocking temperature as a function of the magnitude of the dipolar coupling, controlled by the distance between the particles. We show that both the coercive field and blocking temperature decrease as a function of the separation between the nanoparticles. The magnetic relaxation is measured as a function of both temperature and time, from which we estimate the effective energy barrier distribution of the system. We show that the peak of the energy barrier distribution moves to lower energies as the separation between neighboring particles increases, or equivalently, as the dipolar interaction is reduced.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Here we investigate the temperature dependence of anomalous Hall effect in Hf/GdFeCo/MgO sheet film and Hall bar device. The magnetic compensation temperature (Tcomp) for the sheet film and device is found to be ~240 K and ~118 K, respectively. In sheet film, spin-flopping is witnessed at a considerably lower field, 0.6 T, close to Tcomp. The AHE hysteresis loops in the sheet film have a single loop whereas in the Hall bar device, hystereses consist of triple loops are observed just above the Tcomp. Moreover, the temperature-dependent anomalous Hall resistance (RAHE) responds unusually when a perpendicular magnetic field is applied while recording the RAHE. The zero-field RAHE scan suggests the Hall signal generates solely from the FeCo moment. However, the behavior of 3T-field RAHE scan in which the RAHE drops close to zero near the Tcomp seems to be following the net magnetization response of the device, is explained by considering the low field spin-flopping around the compensation temperature. The results presented here give important insight to understand the complex AHE behavior of ferrimagnets for their spintronic applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The spin-1/2 Ashkin-Teller model is studied via a Glauber type of stochastic process within the mean field theory. The thermal variation and the time evolution of the magnetizations under a time dependent external field are presented. The dynamic phase transitions caused by thermal variation and by the action of the time dependent external field are investigated, obtaining continuous phase transitions and first order phase transitions between metastable and stable states. In the phase diagram of the system, an arrow scheme is presented in order to illustrate the direction in which the dynamic phase transitions occur.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Two defective conjugated magneto active photonic crystals are proposed in this paper for fabrication of Faraday rotators. Optical features of the suggested structures are studied using 4 × 4 transfer matrix method and taking into consideration of the couplings of polarization states. Band structure of the crystals including generation of stop bands and resonant modes localizations are studied by exploring the dependence of the crystals' transmittance on the period number of the layers. It is shown that desirable responses are obtained by just very low number of periods. Furthermore, optical anisotropy of the crystals is considered to be purely magnetic field-induced. Then in addition to studying the dependencies on structural parameters, connection between wave incident angle and magneto-optical effects (Faraday rotations and changes of the ellipticity angle) are discussed in detail. Results clearly show the ease of tunability of the structures' responses in this way which is of prime importance from experimental point of view. Furthermore, the proposed structures offer remarkable Faraday rotation angles when transmittance amounts remain high enough simultaneously. Thus it seems that these crystals might be useful for fabrication of polarization dependent sensor/transducers based on Faraday rotators which are vital elements in development of integrated circuits as well as imaging systems.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Bulk Mn2-xFe1+xGe (0.0 ≤ x ≤ 1.0) alloys have been synthesized by arc-melting followed by a low temperature homogenization thermal annealing, whereas for comparison purposes the Mn2FeGe alloy was also produced in ribbon form by rapid solidification. A study of the structural and magnetic properties is presented. Contrary to theoretical predictions, Mn2FeGe crystallizes in a hexagonal DO19 crystal structure (space group P63/mmc) and orders ferromagnetically with a saturation magnetization (MS) value of ~1.7 µB/f.u. in the ground state. With the substitution of Fe for Mn in bulk Mn2-xFe1+xGe, we observed an increase in the FM interactions with a maximum MS value of 5.1 µB/f.u. for x = 1.0, and a significant progressive increase in the Curie temperature (TC) in a wide range spanning ~200 K to over 400 K.© 2021Phase-change materials (PCMs) provide an alternative avenue for modulating the adjacent layer property through interfacial effect, which sometimes is more effective than the traditional methods. Here, a systematic study of the phase-change induced control of FMR resonance field in Si/GeSbTe/FeCoB heterostructures is presented. We show that different crystalline phases induced by thermal anneal in GeSbTe/FeCoB films contribute to large shifts in resonance field of FeCoB up to 15 mT. The correlation between GeSbTe phase change and anisotropic field of FeCoB is confirmed from the GeSbTe film morphology dependent of stress. These results propose a method of phase-change induced control of FMR resonant field and ferromagnetism in PCM/ferromagnetic alloy film heterostructures by controlling interface roughness, which can be introduced in the optimization of ferromagnetic alloy film parameters and development of high functioning magnetic devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Herein, In-doped Y3Fe5-xInxO12 (x = 0.00–0.75 with a step of 0.15) material was fabricated via solid state route. Mixed powders were sintered at 1450 °C for 6 h in the air. The microstructure and magnetic properties were examined by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Scanning electron microscope (SEM), Raman spectra, Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM), and ferromagnetic resonance (FMR). Results show that In3+ ion substitution did not change crystal type of YIG ferrite and increased bulk density. SEM observations indicate that doped In3+ ion not only entered the crystal but also affected the grain size. According to VSM results, by increasing In3+ ion content from x = 0.00 up to x = 0.75, saturation magnetization (Ms) enhanced from 25.8 emu/g to 28.21 emu/g (x = 0.45). Then, Ms declined to 19.33 emu/g. Furthermore, narrowest FMR line width (ΔH) was obtained (ΔH = 36.7 Oe at x = 0.45) based on In-doping. The proposed material has potential for use in antenna or high-frequency applications in phase shifter, circulator, and microwave high-frequency components.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Single-phase Co2Z hexaferrite with excellent middle to higher frequency performance was synthesized via the sol–gel method, and then were mechanically mixed with Fe powders and compacted to form toroidal Co2Z hexaferrites/Fe soft magnetic composites (Co2Z/Fe SMCs). After characterization with XRD, SEM, EDS, VSM and B-H Analyzer, the influence of Co2Z hexaferrites on the microstructures, AC and DC magnetic performance were investigated in detail. Air gaps between Fe powders are filled with Co2Z hexaferrites at the optimized content and the density of Co2Z/Fe SMCs increases. Co2Z hexaferrites effectively improve the soft magnetic performance of Co2Z/Fe SMCs at middle to higher frequency. The permeability and DC bias performance of Co2Z/Fe SMCs increased with the Co2Z hexaferrites content up to the maximum for 1 wt% Co2Z/Fe SMCs, and then decreased. While the changing trend of the core loss is opposite to the permeability and reaches the minimum for 1 wt% Co2Z/Fe SMCs. Co2Z hexaferrites not only increase the resistance of Co2Z/Fe SMCs and reduce the eddy-current loss, but also improve the interface microstructures and optimize the magnetic circuit of Co2Z/Fe SMCs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Three different samples of soft magnetic material Proto-pasta, a composite of iron and polylactic acid (PLA), were printed in the presence of a magnetic field and then measured using a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) to inspect the effects printing in a magnetic field has on the samples’ magnetic properties. Multiple hysteresis measurements were taken with respect to the field angle for each sample printed in various fields to observe the changes in hysteresis loss and susceptibility. The Fe/PLA composites printed using Magnetic Field Assisted Additive Manufacturing (MFAAM) displayed a susceptibility approximately twice as large as the composites printed in zero field. Through varying field angle VSM measurements, the inspected susceptibility also displayed anisotropy, having a magnitude 2.7 times larger when measured along the print field.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of pyrochlore iridate Dy2Ir2O7 prepared by CsCl flux method were investigated by means of heat capacity and magnetization measurements. The low temperature behaviour was confirmed to be consistent with previously published results, whereas the high temperature data and their analysis are presented for the first time. The bifurcation of zero field-cooled and field-cooled magnetization curves coincides well with the onset of the anomaly in specific heat pointing to an ordering of the iridium sublattice. We confront the previously determined Dy3+ CF scheme with our high-temperature magnetization and specific heat data. The difference between calculations and experimental data, represented by 20 K specific heat anomaly, suggests the behaviour beyond the mean field approximation. The Dy2Ir2O7 differs from the rest of the heavy rare-earth pyrochlore iridates, where the mean field approximation constitutes an adequate description. The deeper understanding of the Dy2Ir2O7 magnetic behaviour requires, among others, also the phonon spectra studies.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Fe-based amorphous soft magnetic materials play an attractive role in energy saving and emission reduction due to low core losses. One of the problems is the acoustic noise resulting from magnetostriction during AC magnetization process. In this work, amorphous ribbons with a nominal composition of Fe81.5Si4B14C0.5 (at. %) were produced by planar flow casting and subjected to various postprocessing treatments. The influences of annealing conditions on the longitudinal magnetostriction, acoustic noise and core losses of the ribbons measured at low-field were studied. The effects of bending stress and epoxy impregnation and curing on medium frequency core losses of the alloy cores with different shapes were also investigated. It is shown that larger longitudinal magnetostriction of amorphous ribbons leads to higher acoustic noise emission from amorphous cores. Although the longitudinal magnetostriction was found to be reduced by applying a longitudinal magnetic field during annealing, the core loss was increased. The minimum longitudinal magnetostriction value at 1000 A/m is 7 ppm for ribbon annealed at 350 °C for 90 min. under an applied longitudinal magnetic field, while the lowest core losses at 1.4 T and 50 Hz is 0.213 W/kg for toroidal core annealed at 350 °C for 90 min. under an applied transverse magnetic field. The coupling between longitudinal magnetostriction and bending stress of amorphous ribbon results in an increase in core losses. Furthermore, extra stress was introduced after epoxy impregnation and curing, which also results in an increase in core losses. Thus, low longitudinal magnetostriction is important for stress insensitivity and soft magnetic properties.© 2021 The Author(s)Among hard/soft nanocomposites (NCs), ferrite-based materials are potentially promising for developing exchange-coupled systems, thus leading to enhanced magnetic properties. In this regard, we investigate the role of the synthesis approach in the development of SrFe12O19/CoFe2O4 (SFO/CFO) NCs, with special focus on tuning the magnetic features of the softer phase (CFO) by introducing Zn2+ in the spinel structure. X-ray powder diffraction (XRPD), transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and squid magnetometry were employed to clarify the relationship between morphology, size, and magnetic properties of the NCs, pointing out the feasibility of this method in obtaining successfully exchange-coupled systems. This work shows how optimizing the intrinsic magnetic properties of the CFO may be used to tune the extrinsic ones of the NCs. Despite the promising results in magnetic coupling, our study clearly confirms/strengthens that an enhancement of remanent magnetization is the most important factor for improving the magnetic performance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report the results of magnetic, heat-capacity, electrical and magnetoresistance measurements on Ho4RhAl and Er4RhAl, characterized by 3 sites for rare-earths (R). The main conclusions are: (i) Antiferromagnetic ordering sets in at (TN = ) ~ 8.8 and ~ 4.0 K respectively. While Ho compound appears to enter into a complex spin-glass phase at T < TN (at nearly 5 K), spin-glass component appears to set in essentially almost at TN for the Er case. (ii) The loss of the spin-disorder contribution in the magnetically ordered state is not pronounced, mimicking that in Gd2PdSi3, a compound which now attracts interest in the area of topological Hall effect and magnetic skyrmions, indicating complex Fermi surface. (iii) There is a minimum in the temperature dependence of electrical resistivity in the case of only Ho above TN, but significant negative magnetoresistance is observed over a wide temperature range in the paramagnetic state increasing with decreasing temperature for both the cases. This finding establishes that these compounds belong to a select group of intermetallics in which spin-disorder contribution apparently increases gradually as one approaches respective TN with decreasing temperature. This could be an experimental signature for the effect due to classical spin-liquid above TN. In view of these properties analogous to those of Gd2PdSi3, it is of interest to investigate these 4:1:1 compounds further to understand possible unconventional roles of itinerant electrons, not only in the magnetically ordered state but also in the paramagnetic state, predicted by some theories in recent years for which this Gd compound is considered to be a classic example. Besides, magnetoresistance and isothermal entropy change (magnetocaloric effect) track each other. Isothermal entropy change at the peak in its plot versus temperature is large in comparison with that of the Gd analogue, possible implication of which is pointed out.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A novel dynamic model of magnetic microbubble subjected to acoustic-magnetic field is developed by Lagrange method. Numerical works are effectively replaced by a non-magnetic microbubble immersed in highly magnetic fluid. Simulation shows that bubble's pulsation and translation can be controlled by an applied uniform magnetic field. Depending on the coupled time scales between relaxation parameters, the oscillation of bubble can be improved or reduced by magnetic field. Besides, magnetic field significantly reduces bubble natural frequency due to the enhanced viscosity. Also, the properties of the magnetic fluid may affect bubble's responses, such as viscosity and magnetic susceptibility. In the case of strong magnetic susceptibility and low viscosity, magnetic field has a remarkable effect on bubble manipulation. Finally, the larger bubble may have a better response to magnetic field. These results may be beneficial to the manipulation of magnetic microbubbles by a suitable magneto-acoustic field.© 2021 Elsevier LtdAl/TE (top electrode)/AlOx/Pt RRAM (resistive random access memory) devices with solution-processed spin-coated AlOx layers annealed at various temperatures (225/250/275 °C) exhibited typical bipolar resistive switching performance with low SET/RESET voltage (<4 V), larger ON/OFF ratio (>103) and excellent stability (retention time over 104 s and endurance cycles more than 100). Ni and TiN were chosen as the TE, respectively. Better RS characteristics were obtained on Ni/AlOx/Pt RRAM devices with lower operating voltage and better stability. In addition, the voltage variation between Ni/AlOx/Pt and TiN/AlOx/Pt RRAM devices was investigated. Compared with Ni/AlOx/Pt RRAM devices, TiN/AlOx/Pt devices operated with higher operation voltage at various annealing temperatures, which indicated the influence of work function difference (△ΦM) between TE and BE (bottom electrode). The greater the △ΦM, the more energy consumption and the higher operation voltage were demanded.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Artificial Intelligence (AI) has been gaining traction recently. However, they are executed on devices with the von Neumann architecture, requiring high power input. Consequently, brain-inspired neuromorphic computing (NC) has been gaining attention because it is expected to be more power efficient and more suitable for AI. Designing of NC circuits involves development of artificial neurons and synapses. More studies have hitherto been focused on artificial synapses instead of neurons because the latter should demonstrate leaky integrate-and-fire (LIF) properties, which is a challenge to replicate artificially. In this work, we propose a domain wall (DW) based device made from perpendicularly magnetized (Co/Ni)n nanowire (NW) with graded magnetic anisotropy and saturation magnetization. The DW is current-driven via spin-transfer-torque. Micromagnetic simulations demonstrated that the DWs in NWs with anisotropy field gradients can automatically return towards the initial position when electrical current is absent, indicative of the leakage process. The underlying physics of DW motion in such structure was studied in detail. To replicate the crystallinity of (Co/Ni)n structures, granular NWs were also defined. Depending on the grain structure of the NW, it was found that LIF properties were achieved under the conditions of steep anisotropy field gradients. Therefore, the proposed design has potential applications in neuron devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.By hetero-structural alloying ferromagnetic hexagonal Ho2In with antiferromagnetic orthorhombic Ho2Al, the magnetic and structural changes have been observed in Ho2In1-xAlx (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.4) alloys. At the critical composition x = 0.1, the highest maxima of magnetic entropy change of 16.3 Jkg-1K−1 and the adiabatic temperature change of 6.5 K have been obtained via an unconventional hysteresis-free metamagnetic phase transitionm, which is higher than 9 Jkg-1K−1 and 5.4 K in Ho2In benchmark alloy undergoing second-order phase transition. Such increment is associated with the intensified magnetoelastic coupling. The deeper origin is proposed to be from the delocalized 5d electrons of rare-earth atoms by external field since the magnetoresistence is also maximized at the critical composition. The hetero-structural alloying strategy is demonstrated to be effective to intensify the MCE effect without causing the undesirable hysteresis.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The demagnetization process of a variety of Nd-Fe-B-based magnets produced using different manufacturing techniques are studied by soft X-ray magnetic circular dichroism microscopy. The four magnets studied include a hot deformed magnet, sintered magnets produced from either a N2 jet-milled or a He jet-milled fine powder, and a magnet produced by hydrogenation-disproportionation-desorption-recombination (HDDR) followed by He jet-milling. The coercivity of the HDDR processed magnet is lower than the magnets produced with N2 jet-milled powder even though the size of the grains is smaller. By following the magnetic domain reversal behavior during the demagnetization process, it was found that, while the magnets produced with N2 jet-milled powder and the hot deformed magnet presents a predominance of the reversed magnetic domain propagation, in the HDDR processed magnet the nucleation of individual grains occurs before the reversed magnetic domains propagate. This behavior is associated with a decreased nucleation field of each grain.© 2021Previous experiments have proven that a high magnetic field can make alloy carbide M7C3 (M = Fe, Cr) precipitate ahead of time at intermediate temperatures. First-principles calculations are employed to search the source of magnetic-field-induced alloy carbides precipitation behaviors of orthorhombic M7C3. The basic building units for M7C3 crystals are polyhedrons formed by metal atoms and C atoms. The framework structure of o-M7C3 consists of metal tetrahedrons, metal octahedrons and triangular metal prisms. Magnetic calculations show that the substitution of Cr atoms causes the magnetic moments of the Fe atoms to decrease to different extents. Moreover, Cr atoms also have a magnetic moment antiparallel to the Fe atoms. Electronic structure calculations indicate that the bonds in M7C3 are a mixture of ionic, covalent and metal bonds. The substitution of Cr atoms weakens the ionic and covalent bonds between the Fe and C atoms; however, strengthen the metal bonds between the Fe and Cr atoms. The magnetic free energy change of M7C3 is larger than that of M2C and M3C at 823 K with a 12 Tesla field, which agrees well with the experimental results for a magnetic field promoting the precipitation of M7C3. This study provides a theoretical basis for the precipitation behaviors induced by magnetic fields in steels.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The dependence of the grain boundary diffusion process (GBDP) on the orientation and pressure of a sintered Nd-Fe-B magnet was studied. At 750 °C the GBDP under an uniaxial pressure of 40 MPa parallel to the alignment direction (c-axis) is much more effective to enhance the coercivity than that performed perpendicular to the c-axis. Obvious macroscopic cracks appeared on the surface of the magnet after GBDP under an uniaxial pressure of 50 MPa along the c-axis at 750 °C, and the corresponding coercivity and the squareness factor of demagnetization curve decreased greatly. The Nd-Fe-B magnet was crushed totally when loaded under an uniaxial pressure of 50 MPa perpendicular to the c-axis at 750 °C. The mechanism was discussed based on the anisotropy of the elastic strain energy of the Nd2Fe14B main phase and the anisotropy distribution of the grain boundary Nd-rich phases.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we studied different proportions of Mo-C alloy Schottky contacts. Compare the electrical characteristics and SiC interface with the Mo/4H-SiC based diodes. The Schottky interface obtained was studied at different annealing temperatures and its electrical properties were analyzed. Analyze electrical performance through temperature-related current–voltage (I-V) and capacitance–voltage (C-V) measurements. The experimental results showed that the metallic Mo-C alloy (9:1) Schottky contact had good stability and interface characteristics at high annealing temperatures. When annealing at 900 °C, its ideality factor approached 1 and the barrier height reached 1.04 eV. The TEM images also indicated that the Mo-C alloy reduced the solid-state reaction, which improved the inhomogeneity of the Schottky interface.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Through the detailed studies utilizing x-ray and neutron powder diffraction and magnetometry measurements, we report the magnetic phase transitions in the B-site disorder perovskite oxide PrFe0.5Cr0.5O3. The Fe3+/Cr3+ sublattice was observed to form a long-range magnetic order with the GxFz configuration below TN = 270 K from neutron powder diffraction. It then undergoes the second-order phase transition to FxGz spin configuration below 210 K and the transition ends at ~170 K. On the other hand, long range magnetic ordering with FxCy configuration at Pr3+ sublattice can be identified at base temperature. The magnetic phase diagram is derived with spontaneous spin ordering and reorientation at A- and B-sublattices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The spinodal decomposed Cu-Ni-Fe alloy can possess both hard magnetic properties and excellent plastic toughness, corrosion resistance, and cold workability. Cu60Ni20Fe10Co10 ribbons are prepared by melt-spinning and annealing methods, and their phase composition, microstructure, and magnetic properties are studied. The results show that the as-spun ribbons are composed of equiaxed grains. Through the decomposition of γ → γ1 + γ2 inside the grains, the spinodal structure is formed, which endows the ribbons with the hard-magnetic properties. Also, the maximum coercivity of 679.3 ± 149.1 Oe and saturation magnetization of 72.0 ± 2.7 emu/g are obtained in the ribbons annealed at 435 °C for 30 min and 835 °C for 30 min, respectively. The shape anisotropy of γ1 and γ2, the concentration of Fe, Co, Ni in the γ2 phase, and the content of the α phase are the main factors to determine the magnetic properties. At the same time, the corresponding microstructure evolution models are proposed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This work deals with the effect that a porous structure causes on the magnetocaloric properties of substituted lanthanum manganite with the formula La0.67Ca0.28Sr0.05MnO3. A composite with a foam structure was fabricated using a polyurethane matrix and embedded manganite particles at three different amounts. The magnetocaloric effect was determined indirectly by mathematical adjustment of the experimental magnetization curves as a function of temperature, according to the phenomenological model proposed by Hamad. Based on the phenomenological parameters, the magnetic entropy change, ΔSm (H, T), was calculated at 1.5 T and 3.0 T. Also, the Curie temperature, the relative cooling power, RCP, the heat capacity, ΔCp, and the order of the ferromagnetic-paramagnetic transition of all the samples were determined. Results show a highlighting increase of the relative cooling power when the manganite particles are dispersed in the polymeric matrix. In addition, the magnetocaloric properties turned out to be a function of the amount of manganite embedded in the matrix. Better results were obtained at a lower manganite content. In all the studied cases, the magnetocaloric properties of the foam composite are better than that of the powder. This behavior is attributable to a change in the interaction state of the manganite particles due to the confinement that they undergo in the polymeric matrix.© 2021 Elsevier LtdHalo implanted MOSFETs exhibit anomalous behavior in drain current power spectral density (SID) of flicker noise (1/f) with the variation in drain voltage, but this behavior cannot be captured by existing 1/f models. To identify the reasons for this abnormal behavior of 1/f noise, we have performed experimentally calibrated technology computer-aided design (TCAD) simulations. We find that this anomalous behavior comes from the drain-side halo region, and it has complex dependence on the bias and geometry. We propose a sub-circuit model for 1/f noise that successfully captures the anomalous behavior of SID with the drain bias. This model calculates the individual contributions and the impact of different device regions, such as the source side halo, channel, and drain side halo, on the overall noise of the device. The proposed model is in good agreement with the experimentally calibrated TCAD simulations for different geometries, biases, and temperatures. The proposed model is also validated with the measurement data.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A series of Indium doped Calcium-Barium M−type hexaferrite with nominal compositions Ca0.5Ba0.5Fe12-xO19Inx (x = 0.00, 0.05, 0.10, 0.15, 0.20, 0.25) was prepared by sol–gel method. The x-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis of the synthesized compositions revealed two phases; M−type hexaferrite phase as a main phase and α-Fe2O3 hematite phase. The gradual increasing trend in lattice parameters was observed on increasing Indium concentration showing incorporation of Indium in M−type hexagonal crystal structure. The grain size of M−type hexagonal phase was calculated using Debye–Scherer formula from non-overlapping peaks and it varied from 20 to 500 nm (0.5 μm). The scanning electron microscopy (SEM) micrographs showed hexagonal platelet-shaped, randomly distributed and agglomerated grains. The high resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM) patterns further confirmed the observations of phases from x-ray diffraction (XRD). The remnant magnetization Mr and saturation magnetization Ms showed humped behaviour with maximum value for x = 0.25. The decrease in coercivity Hc was observed for x = 0.05 but it increased and remained nearly constant on further Indium addition. The effective dielectric constant showed resonance peaks at 4.3 and 8 GHz for all compositions and the effective loss decreases with frequency with maximum loss for x = 0.05, indicating the slight effect of In doping. The effective magnetic permeability showed small values and a resonance peak around 9 GHz, similarly magnetic losses also showed low values and a decreasing trend with frequency, not much noticeable influence of Indium doping was observed. These materials can be used in microwave frequency devices such as phase shifters and permanent magnets.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The chirality of non-coplanar magnetic configurations, in magnetic materials with interfacial Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya interaction, gives rise to a local magnetic field generating an extra contribution to the anomalous Hall effect. This contribution, termed topological Hall effect (THE), is studied in three Pt/Co/W multi-layered samples with different effective anisotropy. A particularity of this system, compared to similar systems which show THE, is the existence of magnetically inactive layers at the Co/W interfaces. This implies that the coupling between the layers in this series of samples is mainly magnetostatic. The samples with positive or almost zero effective anisotropy show the same characteristics. These are reproduced by micromagnetic simulations. The sample with negative effective anisotropy shows a qualitatively different behaviour that can be assigned to its radically different domain structure. The values of THE are in the range 0.1–0.25 μΩ cm.© 2021We have theoretically studied the magneto-optical and thermo-optical modulations of Goos-Hänchen (GH) effect in a one-dimensional photonic crystal with graphene-vanadium dioxide (VO2) periodic structure. Due to the characteristics of graphene and VO2 in the terahertz region, this structure can be used for magnetic field and temperature modulation. Magneto-Optical effect of graphene in the terahertz region and the first-order metal–insulator transition (MIT) of VO2 near 68 degreesC will have a significant effect on the GH shift modulation. We obtain their relationship between the amplified GH shift with the VO2 temperature under the magnetic field environment, and the relationship between the magnetic field and VO2 is in the insulation (298 K) and the metallic state (358 K), respectively. In the case of a constant magnetic field, the increase of temperature will decrease the GH shift before and after amplification, and the increase of magnetic field will significantly enhance the GH shift, including VO2 in a fully insulated state and a metallic state, respectively. This provides a new idea and method for the design of terahertz equipment which modulates by temperature and magnetic.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Aiming at the shortcomings of the existing pulsed field magnetometer (PFM), e.g., the complex structure and high cost, a new PFM with flexible structure is proposed. The pulsed magnet is designed as a dual-coil structure. By adjusting the combined state of the switchgears in the power supply, the maximum magnetic fields of 10 T with pulse durations of 6.52 ms, 12.78 ms and 46.56 ms can be produced. The energy used for the magnetic field generation is stored on the 2.56 mF capacitor bank with the charging voltage being selectable between 0 and 3 kV. The magnetization is recorded by a 16 bit 250 kS/s data acquisition (DAQ) device. For the system control and data process, a LabVIEW program is developed. The effect of the eddy current on the conductive sample is corrected by using the finite difference method (FDM). The hysteresis of NdFeB sample is measured, and the results show that the PFM has excellent measurement performance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Quantum anomalous Hall effect with intrinsic magnetism in atomically thin 2D material has huge applications in nano-electronics and spintronics. A comprehensive comparative analysis of structural, electronic, and magnetic properties of transition metal ternary chalcogenide CoAsS has been carried out employing first principle calculations with density functional theory (DFT) and DFT+U methods. DFT+U calculation also shows intrinsic magnetization in both the bulk and monolayer of CoAsS, thus revealing rare phenomenon in van der Waals (vdW) layered material. It is observed that the most stable magnetic ordering is either antiferromagnetic (AFM) or ferromagnetic (FM) depending on the U value. At higher U, direct d-d exchange interactions dominate, leading to FM stability over the indirect superexchange interactions mediated by p orbitals of As and S responsible for AFM stability (for U<8.2 eV). A topological state is also found by computing a non-trivial Chern number in the FM phase of CoAsS monolayer. This highlights the significance of this material for realizing topological state for its potential applications in spintronics and nano-electronics.© 2021 Elsevier LtdAn Operational Transconductance Amplifier (OTA) designed with SiGe-source nanowire Tunnel-FETs is presented and compared with OTAs designed with Si nanowire (NW) TFETs and Si NW MOSFETs with and without the effect of gate current (IG). The devices were modeled using Verilog-A language through lookup tables obtained by experimental data and they were used to simulate the OTA circuits. It was observed that, when the IG is negligible, there is a trade-off between the DC open loop gain (AV0) and the gain-bandwidth product (GBW) of these circuits. The Si NW MOSFET OTA presented the lowest AV0 (52 dB) but the largest GBW (9.5 MHz). The largest gain was obtained by the Si NW TFET (97 dB) but it also presents the lowest GBW (30 kHz). The SiGe-source TFET stands in the middle, with an AV0 of 88 dB and a GBW of 715 kHz. However, when IG is not negligible and included in the model, the gain of the TFET OTAs decreases considerably, down to 38.3 dB in the case of the Si TFET and down to 52.6 dB in the case of the SiGe-source TFET. This decrease in gain is mostly caused by an alteration in the desired bias point in the second stage of the OTA due to the change of the output voltage and bias currents. This issue possibly can be mitigated by using circuit design strategies. Nevertheless, the SiGe-source TFET OTA is less impacted by the gate current than the Si TFET OTA and still presents a larger gain than the Si NW MOS OTA (52.6 dB against 50 dB) when the IG is considered.© 2021Mg0.1Sr0.1Mn0.8Fe2O4 nanocrystals have been formerly synthesized by the one-pot and energy efficient co-precipitation strategy. In the present work Nano-spinels were divided into six portions, each portion has been annealed at 550 °C for assorted time spans; t = 4, 8, 12, 16, 20 and 25 h. The XRD investigation reveals that the structural phases of these nanocrystals have been changed from cubic spinel to Z-type hexagonal phase at t ≥ 20 h. Indeed the evolution of this transformation has begun at t = 8 h but the transition process has completely achieved at t ≥ 20 h. This transition has been imputed to Jahn-Teller deformation of Mn3+ (d4) ions, as well as to an atomic rearrangement reinforced by the existence of the comparatively large Sr2+ cations in the crystal lattice. The HRTEM images have shown that the average particle size is ranging from 35.2 to 45.62 nm in fair consistency with the crystallite size deduced from the XRD data; where the particles have exhibited agglomeration at longer time spans of annealing. It is observed that the calculated XRD and VSM parameters have been influenced by the structural conversion phenomenon related in turn to the time of annealing.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The underlying study investigates the artificial metamaterial designing of non-symmetric dual layer combination on the same substrate for the negative characteristics of refractive index, permittivity and permeability. The design is instigated with the investigation of single and dual layers metamaterial design for single or double negative behavior. Apart from the parametric study, the dispersion diagrams of the layers are also evaluated for gap and gapless transactions from left hand to right hand behavior. The combination of symmetric and non-symmetric layers is also analyzed for behavior change in material properties. The permittivity and permeability of the designed non-symmetric dual layer metamaterial are negative up to 10 GHz and are positive above 10 GHz. Moreover, the left and right hand impedance also remains unchanged and matched with that of free space impedance (377 Ω) with a fractional bandwidth of 50%. Hence, the designed material acts as a double positive material for high frequencies above 10 GHz and double negative material for low frequencies below 10 GHz. The design is verified using circuit modeling and full wave electromagnetic simulations. The results obtained are authenticated using the free space measurement method.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic insulating materials with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy bring an innovation to the existing spin-related technologies and magnonic applications. Yttrium iron garnet (YIG) stands out among other ferrimagnetic insulators due to its remarkable and unique properties. In this work, we represent perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) in relatively thick YIG films between 40 nm and 120 nm grown on Si (1 0 0) substrates. The strain at the interface of the Si substrate / YIG film promoted by the lattice mismatch resulted in a magnetic easy axis along the film normal. Excitation of standing spin wave modes within the films through ferromagnetic resonance was studied. Based on the ferromagnetic spectra, multiple spin wave modes were obtained in all films up to 120 nm. Spin wave modes along the lateral of the film originate from inhomogeneous confined magnetic regions on the film surface. Exchange stiffness constant of YIG films was estimated between 1.02×10−9 and 5.12 ×10−9 Oe.cm2. We anticipate that these findings will bring up investment in advanced magnonics, insulator spintronics, and quantum information processing applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.As a ferromagnetic material, the magnetization of ribbed steel bars will change with the development of fatigue damage under cyclic loading, which can be used to evaluate the fatigue damage state of steel bars. However, the quantitative relationship between fatigue damage and the variation in magnetization is still unclear, and the existing magneto-mechanical model cannot be applied to ribbed steel bars directly. To accurately predict the magnetization and the fatigue damage state during fatigue, it is also necessary to consider the influence of stress concentration caused by ribs on stress and fatigue life. This paper proposes a magneto-mechanical model suitable for ribbed steel bars, which use the Neuber law and Coffin-Manson relationship to determine the stress range and fatigue life under stress concentration. Additionally, the magnetic induction intensity of the HRB400 ribbed steel bar in the tensile fatigue test was measured to verify the proposed model, and the mechanism of the magnetization change trend during fatigue was analyzed in detail. Through the fatigue damage formula based on the magnetic indicator, the simulation and experimental comparison results show that the proposed model can effectively describe the fatigue damage state of ribbed steel bars in the fatigue.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, spin polarized total energy calculations were carried out to investigate the structural, energetic, magnetic and thermoelectric properties of Fe50Rh50-xPdx (x = 1.9, 3.7, 5.6, 6.3, 7.4, 9.3, 12.5, 18.8 and 25.0) and to compare with previous results of two-component undoped alloy. Some electronic characteristics were evaluated computing the local density of orbital states (LDOS). The corresponding magnetic moments per atom as well as thermal and electrical conductivity were obtained to complete the analysis. We have found that in the range of Pd concentrations studied, the cell parameter for the FM phase increases slightly as × increases with increasing cell volume (0.2–1.9%). The structures are B2 type. As × increases the AFM phase is more stable than the FM. Concerning the AFM phase, the tetragonal distortion along the z-axis is accompanied by a slight stabilization of the total energy with respect to the cubic phase. The cell volume of the AFM phase is less than that corresponding to the FM phase (varying ~ 0.4 considering the cubic and ~ 0.9 considering the tetragonal). The transition temperature was estimated and the trend agrees with the experimental evidence that the increase of Pd content shifts the transition temperature at lower temperatures. From the DOS (EF) we have also estimated the entropy change (ΔSe) obtaining values ranging from 1 to 9 J/molK depending on the Pd content. Another consequence of the magnetic transition is the drop of the resistivity (ρ) in the FM phase compared to the AFM state in the studied range from 100 K to 300 K. These results agree with literature experimental data.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Obtaining a large electrical-field-induced magnetic change based on the resistance switching mechanism is greatly desirable due to the properties of low-energy and nonvolatile. Fe3O4 is an ideal material for electric control magnetization owing to its large saturation magnetic moment. However, it is not suitable for resistance switching devices because of its high conductivity at room temperature. In this work, we construct an Au/Fe3O4/CeO2/Pt structure to investigate the effect of electric field on the magnetization of Fe3O4. By adjusting the oxygen vacancies concentration caused by the resistance switching of CeO2, our device obtains a remarkable magnetic variation of 60 emu/cm3 in Fe3O4 under a voltage of 2 V. Non-volatile control of magnetism by electric field and the compatibility with standard CMOS process make our device a promising candidate for the low-energy-consuming memory devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, the effect of residual oxygen during reactive sputtering of Al target in a dilute nitrogen environment has been investigated. We have deposited a thin film by reactive sputtering of high purity Al target (99.999%) using a mixture of ultra-high pure Ar & N2 gas in a percentage ratio of 95% and 5%, respectively. The characterization of as-deposited film using Grazing Incidence X-ray Diffraction (GIXRD), X-ray Photoelectron Spectroscopy (XPS), and Energy-Dispersive X-ray (EDX) spectroscopy reveals that in dilute nitrogen environment Al preferred to react with residual oxygen to form amorphous Al2O3 (a-Al2O3) along with aluminum vacancies (AlV). The dilute nitrogen incorporated in the film occupies the AlV sites in Al2O3 and bonded with nearby oxygen to form Al(NOy)x phase. The bulk of the film mainly consists of Al(NOy)x phase, which decreases as we move towards the film surface. At close to the film surface the oxygen vacancies are significantly present. Magnetic and electrical transport properties measurement of the film shows room temperature (RT) magnetism along with n-type semiconducting behaviour. The origin of RT magnetism and observed transport properties have been investigated using a first-principle calculation based on density functional theory (DFT). The residual oxygen driven defects present in the film are found to play a critical role and discussed in detail. The current study is significant in the sense that it provides a new insight to explore the potentials of Al-N-O alloy-based materials as an n-type magnetic semiconductor at room temperature by manipulating defects and optimizing nitrogen concentration.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Present work describes the manufacturing of Ni and Hf doped 60-xFe-27Cr-10Co-2Mo-1Ti-xM (M = Ni, Hf and 0.3 ≤ x ≤ 1.8 wt%) magnets produced through casting, magnetic aging and multistage tempering. Structural, magnetic and thermal properties of materials were systematically evaluated and discussed. Experimental results deduced that micro addition of nickel and hafnium elements tend to modify the morphology of magnetic phases in 60Fe-27Cr-10Co-2Mo-1Ti alloy leading to increase both magnetic and structural properties. Nickel improved intrinsic coercivity (Hcj) and magnetic induction (Br) for 60Fe-27Cr-10Co-2Mo-1Ti alloy. Hafnium addition to 58.8Fe-27Cr-10Co-2Mo-1Ti-1.2Ni alloy refines the microstructure and substantially improves coercivity (76.5kA/m) without insignificant change in magnetic induction. Optimal magnetic microstructure comprised nanostructured and 〈0 0 1〉 textured Fe-Co-Hf phase embedded in Cr-Mo-Ni-Ti as a matrix phase. Henkel plot evidenced existence of strong interphase magnetization interactions between Fe-Co-Hf and Cr-Mo-Ni-Ti phases. Magnetic measurements showed optimum magnetic properties such as Hcj = 51.8 kA/m Br = 1.18 T, Bs = 1.28 T and (BH)max = 38.8 kJ/m3 for 58.8Fe-27Cr-10Co-2Mo-1Ti-1.2Ni alloy which were remarkably enhanced to Hcj = 76.5 kA/m, Br = 1.2 T, Bs = 1.34 T, and (BH)max = 46 kJ/m3 for 57.9Fe-27Cr-10Co-2Mo-1Ti-1.2Ni-0.9Hf alloy.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The homogeneous conglomerate of ferrite oxide samples with increasing concentration of Neodymium and Lanthanum in the steps 0.02 with the chemical formula Ni0.6Cu0.2Zn0.2Fe2-x(Nd0.5La0.5)xO4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.10) were achieved by novel citric acid-metal nitrate sol–gel auto-ignition method. The nano-regime crystallites products were achieved by using Ni, Cu, Zn, La, Nd and Fe nitrates and keeping the metal nitrate to citrate ratio 1:1. The products of ensured recipe in the form of chemical formula resulted in precursor powders were calcined for removal of desiccated impurities. The ready blends were subjected to an exhaustive examination with distinctive characterizations. The completion of the reaction and phase formation temperature was confirmed by thermal analysis and structural confirmations were received by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Scanning electron microscopy (SEM), and Fourier transform infrared (FTIR) spectra. The analytics regarding the local symmetry in crystalline solids and understandings about the ordering phenomenon were discussed with the support of FTIR spectra. The diffractograms contributed to the corroboration that the powders obtained were bearing single phase and spinel structure. Evaluation of TEM and DLS confirms fine particle nature of the particles. SEM analysis and EDAX indicated that the samples were having dense, homogeneous and expected stoichiometric cation ratios. The neodymium and lanthanum content influenced the measured saturation magnetization negatively and coercivity positively. The heightened values in electrical conductivity, high ε′ and low dielectric losses in combination with high saturation magnetization, low coercivity, observed in the present samples make them prospect candidate for microwave and electromagnetic shielding applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The device considered in our study is the T-shaped double quantum dots system embedded between two ferromagnetic (C-terminated ScC (1 1 1) surface) leads. The theoretical treatment is achieved using the time-evolution operator approach. The role of the time-dependent external field, spin-dependent coupling interaction and energy spacing on the dots in spin transport through the device considered in our study has studied. The spin accumulation on the quantum dots, the spin and total currents and the spin polarization rate of the device have calculated. The imprint of the leads density of states is very obvious in the time window calculation which increases with the energy spacing and the frequency of the time-dependent external field. Our results indicate that time-dependent external field and spin-dependent coupling interaction play important role in manufacturing full spin polarization and controlling the spin polarization rate in the device. Controlling the spin transport features have many potential applications in spin-based quantum devices such as quantum computing and spin filter devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Single-phase polycrystalline samples of Ni1-xCoxFe2O4 (x = 0 – 0.50) were prepared by sol gel method and their structural and magnetic properties were studied. Room temperature X-ray diffraction patterns and Rietveld refinement confirm cubic crystal structure (Fd3-m). The lattice constant, saturation magnetization, magnetic anisotropy constant and coercivity of the samples are found to increase with Co concentration. An analytical quantum mechanical method was used to estimate the cation distributions in the prepared samples with the help of measured magnetic moment at T = 5 K. Even though, most of the doped Co ions occupy the octahedral site, considerable distribution of Co2+ ions at tetrahedral site is noticed. The observed magnetization is explained based on cation distribution worked out from quantum mechanical method. The red shifting of Raman active mode A1g and ESR results further confirm the presence of divalent cations in the tetrahedral sites.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThermal resistance (Rth) is an important design parameter for high power integrated circuits (ICs). Evaluation of Rth is particularly complicated for FETs in CMOS silicon-on-insulator (SOI) technology. Although the buried oxide underneath FETs in CMOS ICs presents a barrier to heat flow, the interconnect metals and surrounding oxide provide additional paths for heat-sinking. This paper describes simulations of the layout-dependent Rth of FETs in a CMOS-SOI IC including the interconnect effects, and experimental measurements that support the simulated results. The simulation technique used is an adaptation of a commercial electromagnetic solver, EMX, to heat flow. Simulation results show that in representative layouts with power FETs the heat flow via interconnects accounts for 50 to 70% of the overall heat flow in typical microwave and millimeter-wave ICs. Analytical results are presented to allow estimation of various Rth contributions. Experimental measurements are reported using I-V characteristics of a p-n diode to monitor the temperature of an FET, in good agreement with the analysis. Guidelines for the reduction of Rth are discussed. A layout technique for reducing Rth of an FET is described, and demonstrated experimentally by I-V measurements. The benefit of vias through the buried oxide is highlighted.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present a phenomenological theory of spin-orbit torques in a metallic ferromagnet with spin-relaxing boundaries. The model is rooted in the coupled diffusion of charge and spin in the bulk of the ferromagnet, where we account for the anomalous Hall effects as well as the anisotropic magnetoresistance in the corresponding constitutive relations for both charge and spin sectors. The diffusion equations are supplemented with suitable boundary conditions reflecting the spin-sink capacity of the environment. In inversion-asymmetric heterostructures, the uncompensated spin accumulation exerts a dissipative torque on the order parameter, giving rise to a current-dependent linewidth in the ferromagnetic resonance with a characteristic angular dependence. We compare our model to recent spin-torque ferromagnetic resonance measurements, illustrating how rich self-induced spin-torque phenomenology can arise even in simple magnetic structures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic domain wall with transverse configuration is a source of local magnetic fields that strongly interacts with external fields. In this paper, we show that domain wall dynamics can be effectively tailored by the application of a transverse magnetic field of a certain direction. Depending on the direction of the transverse field, the domain wall velocity is either higher or lower. Our measurements carried out by the Sixtus-Tonks experiment show that a certain direction of the transverse magnetic field could completely block the domain wall propagation. The effect is explained by a distribution of transverse magnetic anisotropy induced into the cylindrical wire during its production.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The frequency dependence of ferromagnetic hysteresis and the related core losses is still an open question. From scaling relations up to space discretized and simultaneous contributions resolutions, different levels of accuracy in the estimation of these losses can be reached. Below a given frequency known as the quasi-static threshold, it is well admitted that the hysteresis cycle remains unchanged. A precise evaluation of this threshold is fundamental to simulate and evaluate precisely the magnetization behaviors under higher frequencies. But this estimation is complex, especially through the unique observation of the hysteresis cycles and because of instrumentation limitations. In this manuscript, we propose an alternative and simple method to precisely refine this threshold's estimation. By using an alternative magnetic signature known as the magnetic incremental permeability butterfly loop (μIP_(H)), improvements are proposed in observing the very low-frequency magnetization behaviors and assessing the quasi-static threshold. This work constitutes a leap forward in understanding the magnetic low-frequency behaviors of laminated electric steel sheets.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This article reports that pulse magnetic treatment affects the hardness of 20Cr2Ni4A steel and combs the structure to make it more uniform. According to the experimental requirements, the pulsed magnetic processing system is designed and built, and 1 T, 4 T, 9 T pulsed magnetic processing is applied to the material. The mechanical properties of 20Cr2Ni4A steel before and after magnetic field treatment were quantitatively studied by measuring microhardness and residual stress. XRD and EBSD data are used to analyze the interstitial carbon content and the change of Fe-C comparison. Calculate the dislocation density, and further observe the dislocation structure by TEM. The magnetic domain is characterized by MFM and illustrates the effect of pulsed magnetic treatment on the magnetic domain and dislocations. The results show that the alloy steel has better mechanical properties after pulse magnetic treatment. As the magnetic field intensity increases, the average microhardness increases, and the hardness range is reduced. Different magnetic field treatments reduce the average residual stress of the material, especially after 1 T magnetic field treatment, the average residual stress is reduced by 34.4%, and residual stress distribution is more uniform. The magnetic treatment increases the solute carbon content in the gap of 20Cr2Ni4A steel by about 0.01% and the proportion of α-Fe phase increases. In addition, the magnetic field treatment reduces the dislocation density in the dislocation accumulation area, the proliferation and diffusion of dislocations increase the overall dislocation density. The magnetic domain changes from labyrinth with higher stress to lamellar with lower stress, so stress concentration is weakened and the distribution of residual stress is uniform. This study shows that pulsed magnetic treatment regulates the hardness and residual stress of 20Cr2Ni4A steel, homogenizes the structure of the material and improves the overall performance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Rocksalt-structure high entropy oxides (HEOs) usually exhibit antiferromagnetic ordering characteristics. Here, we report for the first time the ferromagnetic order of a rocksalt-structure (AlCrFeNiMn)O high entropy oxide (RA-HEO), whose saturation magnetization reaches 164 emu/cm3 at room temperature, despite substantial chemical disorders. The rocksalt-structure HEOs exhibit ferromagnetic order only when their magnetic cations contain both the unoccupied eg orbitals and half-filled eg orbitals. Our works give fundamental insight into the role of the orbital state of magnetic cations and associated superexchange mechanism in rocksalt-structure HEOs.© 2021 Elsevier LtdHere, we report comprehensive investigations of aluminum oxide (Al2O3) high-κ gate oxides deposited via remote plasma enhanced atomic layer deposition (Re-PEALD) with mesh configuration in a commercial 100 mm ALD reactor. Trimethylaluminum (Al(CH3)3), dioxygen (O2) plasma, and Argon (Ar) are used as the metal precursor, oxidant, and carrier/purge, respectively. The growth rate per cycle and non-uniformity of Al2O3 thin films is analyzed with the variation in duration of (Al(CH3)3) pulse, O2 plasma, post-precursor purge, post-oxidant purge, RF power, and substrate temperature. High-quality monolayer type Al2O3 thin films with a growth rate of ~ 1.1 Å/cycle are achieved for a wide temperature range from ~ 100 °C to ~ 300 °C suitable for various nanoelectronics applications ranging from flexible substrates to low thermal budget and high mobility alternate semiconductor substrates. Further, the Al/Re-PEALD-Al2O3/p-Si, metal-oxide-semiconductor (MOS) structures are investigated for capacitance-voltage, capacitance-frequency, and leakage current-voltage characteristics to demonstrate the quality of Re-PEALD-Al2O3 thin films. The Al/Re-PEALD-Al2O3/p-Si, MOS structures revealed excellent electrical characteristics with ultralow minimum interface trap density (Dit) ~ 9.9 × 109 eV−1cm−2, negative effective oxide charges (Neff) ~ 5.52 × 1012 cm−2, low leakage current density of ~ 4.1 nA/cm2 at −1 V, hysteresis-free, insignificant Vth shift, and trivial frequency dispersion. Moreover, the chemical analysis using XPS depth profiling disclosed that Re-PEALD deposited Al2O3 thin films results in a high-quality gradient Al2O3/SiOx/Si interface rather than an abrupt Al2O3/Si interface, and the oxygen rich thin films due to the oxygen (O2−) interstitials close to the interface are the sources of negative fixed oxide charges in Re-PEALD-Al2O3/Si, system. These results intend to boost the investigations of Re-PEALD Al2O3 ultrathin films for low thermal budget high mobility alternate semiconductor substrates for nanoelectronics applications.© 2021 Elsevier LtdVgmax Hot-Carrier-Injection (HCI) degradation in Multi-finger p-Laterally-Diffused Metal-Oxide-Semiconductor Field-Effect-Transistors (LDMOSFET) had been investigated by Multi-Region Direct-Current-Current-Voltage (MR-DCIV) characterization method-probing the interface state distribution along the channel, accumulation and (Shallow Trench Isolation) STI-drift region. The method feasibility was verified by device simulation and stress experiment. The enhanced interface state generation in the channel and accumulation region was clearly revealed in multi-finger layout device. This layout dependent degradation was associated with self-heating effect and temperature accelerated Vgmax HCI stress.© 2021 Elsevier LtdContinuous miniaturization has brought the feature size of silicon technology down into the nanometer scale, where performance enhancement cannot easily be achieved by further size reduction. The use of new materials with advanced properties has become mandatory to meet the needs for higher performance at reduced power. Topological insulators possess highly conductive topologically protected edge states which are insensitive to scattering and thus suitable for energy efficient high-speed devices. Here, we evaluate the subband structure in a narrow nanoribbon of 1T′ molybdenum disulfide by employing an effective k·p Hamiltonian. Highly conductive topologically protected edge modes whose energies lie within the bulk band gap are investigated on equal footing with traditional electron and hole subbands. Due to the interaction between the edge modes at opposite sides, a small gap in their linear spectrum opens up in a narrow nanoribbon. This gap is shown to sharply increase with the perpendicular out-of-plane electric field, in contrast to the behavior in a wide nanoribbon with negligible edge modes interaction. The gap between the traditional electron and hole subbands also increases with the perpendicular electric field. The increase of both gaps leads to a rapid decrease of the ballistic nanoribbon conductance and current with the electric field, which can be used for designing molybdenum disulfide nanoribbon-based current switches.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the structural and magnetic properties of (Fe0.5Ni0.5)xRh1−x alloy thin films grown on MgO (100) substrate. The crystal lattice parameters of the alloy are tailored via the tetragonal distortion from the substrate by varying the composition. The change in the lattice parameters and compositions allowed us to control the magnetic properties as well. For thin films with a higher concentration of ferromagnetic content exhibit strong in-plane magnetic anisotropy. Perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) was observed around 40% of FeNi. We show that the main contribution to the PMA around 40% FeNi is originated from the tetragonal distortion in the crystal, via first-principles calculations.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present a derivation of Landau-Lifshitz-Bloch dynamical equation describing laser-induced longitudinal magnetization relaxation in two-sublattice ferrimagnetic metal. A distinctive feature of this equation is that it takes into account the interaction of localized spins with nonequilibrium itinerant electrons. Due to this feature the derived equation describes the all-optical heat-induced magnetization switching in the pure longitudinal process. It is shown that occurrence of a nonequilibrium spin polarization of itinerant electrons is a necessary condition for the switching.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic domain wall in bistable glass-coated microwires is subject of the study in this paper. The domain wall between axial domains in these microwires is not a standard 180° domain wall. It is the source of a stray field, so the shape of the induced signal due to the domain wall passing through the pick-up coil is influenced by the domain wall geometry as well as by the presence of the stray field accompanying the moving wall. The present work considers the possibility of the moving domain wall having a stable conical-like shape with the apex pointing ahead. Based on this configuration, the signal induced in the pick-up coil is modelled. It is shown that the shape of the obtained model signal can explain the typical signals observed in experiments.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We have succeeded in synthesizing BaAlxFe10−xTi2O19 samples from intermediate trivalent-iron compounds and Fe3O4. Applying high magnetic fields of μ0H≃57 T to these samples caused their magnetization to approach the net magnetic moment of the ferrimagnetic arrangement of spins. This fact meant that the magnetic field restored the ferrimagnetic collinearity as in the starting material of the M-type hexaferrite (BaFe12O19) rather than inducing a spin-flip or spin-flop transition. This collinear spin arrangement model reasonably explains that the distribution of Ti cations in BaFe10Ti2O19 is similar to that in BaFe8Ti2Zn2O19 on the assumption that Fe2+ ions are at up-spin sites.© 2021 Elsevier LtdA theoretical model is proposed to characterize the transient operation of Pseudo-MOSFET under gate pulses by considering the substrate effect. The analysis provides Zerbst-like expression of drain current with substrate biased in deep-depletion state. The model can be used for the extraction of carrier lifetime with process parameter variations. The dependence of temperature on carrier lifetime was also modeled by including the temperature-dependent parameters (carrier concentration and effective mobility). TCAD simulations and experiments validate our model with the temperature ranging from 300 K to 370 K.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Here in this article synthesis of lead-free magnetoelectric composites (1-x) Ba0.85Ca0.15 Ti0.9Zr0.1)O3 - xCoFe2O3 (BCTZ-CFO, x = 0.4, 0.5, and 0.6) is reported. Structural, magnetic, dielectric, magnetodielectric and magnetoelectric properties of lead-free BCTZ-CFO composites sintered at higher sintering temperature have been systematically investigated. The piezoelectric (ferroelectric) phase has been synthesized using the sol–gel route, while Metallo-organic decomposition (MOD) route was employed to prepare piezomagnetic (ferrite) phase. The structural and microstructural properties were studied using X-Ray diffraction and Scanning electron Microscope respectively acknowledged the presence of two distinct phases as ferrite and ferroelectric in composite samples. The dense microstructure and larger average grain size were observed for samples with higher ferrite phase content. Long-range magnetic order was observed under magnetic study for all-composites. The magnetic properties enhanced for composites prepared with higher ferrite phase content. Dielectric properties were studied at room temperature and enhanced dielectric constant has been observed for samples with higher ferroelectric phase content, while minimum dielectric loss was observed for sample with 50/50 ferrite/ferroelectric phase composition. The magnetodielectric response has been also investigated for all ME composites. Leakage current characterization has been also discussed at and above the room temperature. The magneto-electric coupling response was measured of all composites. The higher value of magneto-electric coupling coefficient has been observed for 0.5BCTZ-0.5CFO composite due to maximum possible ferrite-ferroelectric hetero-structure phase contact area.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Here we report the synthesis, structure and magnetic properties of La2MnCoO6 and the high entropy stabilized (La0.4Y0.4Ca0.4Sr0.4Ba0.4)MnCoO6. The samples were characterized using powder X-ray diffraction (PXRD), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), electron diffraction (ED), energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDX) elemental mapping analysis together with high-angle annular dark field scanning transmission electron microscopy (HAADF-STEM) and magnetization studies. PXRD and ED studies confirm the orthorhombic and cubic symmetry of La2MnCoO6 and (La0.4Y0.4Ca0.4Sr0.4Ba0.4)MnCoO6, respectively. The elemental mapping confirms the chemical homogeneity of the samples. The high temperature magnetic ordering at TC ~ 225 K expected for an atomically ordered La2MnCoO6 is suppressed in the corresponding quenched sample. The atomic disordering in quenched La2MnCoO6 results in coexistence of the phases where vibronic ferromagnetism and antiferromagnetic states appeared at TC ~ 135 K and TN ~ 150 K, respectively. Whereas the high entropy stabilized (La0.4Y0.4Ca0.4Sr0.4Ba0.4)MnCoO6 exhibits antiferromagnetic transition at TN ~ 150 K and low temperature magnetic frustration at 45 K and 15 K due to localized competing interactions. The drastic suppression of ferromagnetic state in (La0.4Y0.4Ca0.4Sr0.4Ba0.4)MnCoO6 suggests that the essential interaction is of antiferromagnetic nature in cationically disordered La2MnCoO6 perovskite. We have suggested that the size disorder parameter, σ2=∑ixiri2-<rA>2 plays a significant role in determining the magnetic ground state of the high entropy stabilized perovskite.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.CuFe2O4 magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) of two different morphologies and high magnetic heating efficiency are prepared using hydrothermal (CF) and solvothermal (CFPG) methods. Temperature dependent magnetization measurements indicate the presence of superparamagnetic phase at room temperature. The saturation magnetization for CFPG MNPs (~32.7 emu/g) is found to be ~ 31% higher than the CF MNPs, which is due to nearly collinear Neel type alignment of the magnetic moments in the tetrahedral and octahedral sites with a low Yafet-Kittel angle of ~ 5.980 and lower thickness of the magnetically disordered shell, which are confirmed from the cation distributions, non-zero spin canting angles and sub-spectral area analyses using low temperature (~5 K) in-field (~5 T) Mössbauer spectroscopy. The maximum specific absorption rate for CFPG MNPs is found to be ~ 192 ± 7 W/g, which is significantly higher than the previously reported values for copper ferrite MNPs. The high heating efficiency of CFPG MNPs is attributed to the near-resonant relaxation dynamics (ωτ ~ 1, where ω and τ indicate the angular frequency of the applied field and effective relaxation time, respectively). Heating efficiency is found to decrease with increasing sample concentration due to an enhancement in dipolar interactions, which is found to be in agreement with the quasi-static calculations. In vitro cytotoxicity studies indicate good bio-compatibility of the CFPG MNPs against human colon epithelial cells (HT-29) due to the presence of polyethylene glycol coating. The observed high heating efficiency along with negligible room temperature coercivity and superior bio-compatibility indicate the suitability of the solvothermally synthesized CuFe2O4 MNPs for magnetic fluid hyperthermia.© 2021This study experimentally investigated the hot-carrier-induced device degradations in Schottky barrier (SB) ambipolar polysilicon transistors and validated the degradation mechanism. The behavior of hot-carrier-induced device degradation in SB ambipolar transistors was different from that of a unipolar MOSFET. The phenomenon of hot-carrier generation at the source electrode, attributed to the existence of a high electric field across the reverse-biased source electrode in SB transistors and the competing degradation mechanism between the trapped charges at the gate oxide near the source edge and drain electrode, explained the experimental results. The degradation mechanism was justified by measuring the gate current and transfer characteristics in the forward and reverse modes before and after hot-carrier stress, respectively. The results can contribute to the non-volatile memory applications and aid in investigating the aging effects of multi-functional integrated circuits using reconfigurable field-effect transistors.© 2021For the first time, we analyse SRAM cells made of ferroelectric based negative capacitance (NC) FinFETs considering both global and local variability via Monte-Carlo circuit simulations. First we compare and explain the impact of variability on the device characteristics and the extracted figures of merit of conventional and NC transistors. Then we show that suppressed relative variability in NCFETs leads to lowering of the static Vmin (minimum supply voltage needed for SRAM operation) compared to conventional FinFET based SRAM. We use a physics based compact model for negative capacitance FinFETs realized by a self-consistent coupling of the standard BSIM-CMG compact model for FinFETs with the Landau-Khalatnikov (L-K) model of ferroelectrics. We demonstrate that on including the variability in the ferroelectric thickness and material parameters as well, the advantage of NCFETs diminishes. For the baseline FinFET, we have used model cards from a freely available predictive process design kit (PDK) for the 7 nm technology node where the parameters are optimized for SRAM applications.© 2021 The Author(s)In this work, we investigated how to include uncorrelated cycle-to-cycle (C2C) variability in the LTSpice quasi-static memdiode model for RRAM devices. Variability in the I-V curves is first addressed through an in-depth study of the experimental data using the fitdistrplus package for the R language. This provides a first approximation to the identification of the most suitable model parameter distributions. Next, the selected candidate distributions are incorporated into the model script and used for carrying out Monte Carlo simulations. Finally, the experimental and simulated observables (set and reset currents, transition voltages, etc.) are statistically compared and the model estimands recalculated if it is necessary. Here, we put special emphasis on describing the main difficulties behind this seemingly simple procedure.© 2021 Elsevier LtdRadio-frequency (RF) high-power high electron mobility transistors (HEMTs) are fabricated with multiple fingers and larger widths to increase the output delivered power. The increased power handling capability is a consequence of the increased capability of handling a larger drain-to-source current. The current is distributed over multiple fingers to keep the current and power density low to avoid heating effects. The width of the devices is also kept preferably long to avoid an excessively large number of fingers and fabrication challenges. However, despite the necessity of maintaining the linear scaling of output power with an effective total width, nonlinearity and non-scalability are intrinsically present. This non-ideality happens due to the aperiodic nature of the multiple-finger device structures and their response to RF signals. This work investigates the effect of varying widths and the variable number of fingers on the DC and RF performance of AlGaN/GaN HEMTs. HEMTs with appropriate sizes are fabricated and characterized. The DC characteristics mostly scale linearly with width (W) and the number of fingers (n). Contrary to the DC performance, the RF characteristics do not linearly scale with W and n but degrade after some threshold value for W for a given n and input power.© 2021In this work, an improved gas sensing response of nickel doped cobalt ferrite, Co0.87Ni0.13Fe2O4, nanoparticles synthesized from metallurgical wastes are demonstrated without any deliberate doping. The morphology and magnetic properties of the nanoparticles were characterized and correlated directly with their superior sensing behavior. The nanoparticles compacted into pellets were used to sense liquefied petroleum gas (LPG), and the results are compared with undoped CoFe2O4 to critically discuss and establish the mechanisms leading to improvement in sensing. The sensing properties were evaluated as a function of operating temperature and the response-recovery time at predetermined LPG concentrations of 500 and 5000 ppm in air. The activated Co0.87Ni0.13Fe2O4 sensor demonstrates high sensing response, speedy response-recovery time, good reproducibility, and long-term stability compared to undoped CoFe2O4. The mechanism for the superior gas sensing properties of Co0.87Ni0.13Fe2O4 ferrite is correlated with the resistance change of Co0.87Ni0.13Fe2O4 nanoparticles assisted by the oxygen adsorption on the nanoparticles. This study demonstrates the possibility of developing a potential inexpensive Co0.87Ni0.13Fe2O4 nanoparticle-based sensor directly from metallurgical wastes to be more efficient for sensing LPG.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, for the first time, we apply the ultra-low-power (ULP) diode concept with Schottky Barrier (SB) transistors and analyze their performance in comparison to standard CMOS, using calibrated TCAD mixed-mode simulations. The negative impedance characteristics obtained in reverse mode with SB devices are shown to offer more stable current characteristics compared to CMOS, especially as a function of temperature. The origin of this behavior manifests itself in the fact that carriers tunneling through the barrier by field emission and carriers overcoming the barrier by thermionic emission both contribute to the total device current. This enables superior current performance over temperature. This enables ultra-low-power memory application over a larger temperature range, or with a denser cell area.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) with special (thermal and magnetic) properties are essential in Magnetic Hyperthermia. As heating sources of tissues when an external alternating magnetic field is applied, these magnetic nanosystems have the capability to destroy the malignant tissues. In this paper, a comparative temperature analysis was done for three types of the magnetic materials (magnetite, maghemite and FePt) with the same magnetic field parameters. A complex model of the ferrofluid transport and mass transfer in an intravascular tumoral tissue was also developed. The thermal damage of the malignant tissues generated by these materials was investigated when the ferrofluid injection within tumoral region was done successively in 2 injection sites (IS) and 4 injection sites (IS), respectively, symmetrically positioned within tumor volume. This study optimizes the position of IS which gives a maximum thermal damage of the tumoral tissue volume for each of these magnetic materials. The hyperthermic temperature field obtained by the heating of the MNP, when the ferrofluid injection was done in 4(IS) leads to a uniform thermal damage of the tumoral tissue volume, compared by 2(IS) arrangement. Maghemite particles have a larger size range to induce the thermal damage of the tumoral tissue in the same magnetic field parameters while FePt nanoparticles have smaller size range compared by the maghemite and magnetite nanosystems.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The negative curvature hollow-core (NC-HC) fibers got the potential to be extensively used, especially, in sensing applications as it facilitates the liquid infiltration into the wide hollow region compared to the narrow air holes of the conventional photonic crystal fibers (PCFs). In this work, an NC-HC fiber which consists of five nested rings is proposed to be used as the magnetic field sensor. The fiber material is pure silica and it is proposed to be filled with magnetic fluid, whose refractive index (RI) varies with the surrounding magnetic field strength change. The guiding properties of the sensor are examined by COMSOL multiphysics software and sensing performance is carried out theoretically in terms of confinement loss and transmittance spectrum. The proposed fiber exhibits very low confinement loss as well as high sensitivity response of 2 nm/Oe to 6.8 nm/Oe for the magnetic field strength variation from 100 Oe to 400 Oe. Moreover, it is highly expected that the proposed sensor can be effectively used in generic parameters, such as displacement, strain, liquid level, temperature and magnetic sensor due to its liquid infiltration feasibility, low loss, and high sensitivity.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Convolutional neural networks (CNNs) pretrained by transfer learning were applied to the analysis of transmission electron microscopy (TEM) images of nanoparticles. Specifically, TEM images of non-magnetic Pt nanoparticles dispersed on a thin TiO2 crystal foil were classified using CNNs. Although the number of learning data (50≤ N≤350) was several orders of magnitude smaller than the quantities normally employed in conventional CNN analyses, the present CNN model was able to carry out image classification with 94% accuracy (average of 25 results) after the convolutional layers were pretrained by transfer learning and fine tuning. This method represents a promising tool for TEM studies of both non-magnetic and magnetic nanoparticles which make emergence of rich material functions.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The structural, magnetic and magneto-electric (ME) properties of polycrystalline BiFeO3 and Bi0.9–xGdxLa0.1FeO3 (x = 0.00 and 0.05) samples have been investigated. X-ray diffraction patterns confirm the formation of single phases in all the samples with ‘R3c’ space group. Magnetic anisotropy and ferroelectric hysteresis behaviour are observed in Bi0.85Gd0.05La0.1FeO3 through magnetization and polarization measurements respectively. In addition, the same compound shows weak ferromagnetism at room temperature with a significantly enhanced remnant magnetization of ~ 23.6 emu.mol−1, concomitant with an exchange bias. ME measurements on the compound show a non-linear dependence of magnetic and electric vectors.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The increased use of superparamagnetic nanoparticles in medical applications motivates the development of new nanostructured materials and nanocomposites with tailored properties. In magnetic fluid hyperthermia, iron oxide nanoparticles destroy or weaken malignant tumor cells by increasing their temperature above a critical value. Therefore, magnetic nanoparticles with high heating efficiency are required. In this work, Ag-Fe3O4 composite nanoparticles and their corresponding ferrofluids are explored for hyperthermia applications. The iron oxide nanoparticles were first synthesized in an egg-white medium via coprecipitation and hydrothermal methods and then decorated with Ag, using honey as a reducing agent. The obtained nanoparticles were fully characterized and used to prepare water-based ferrofluids. The ferrofluid specific loss power was evaluated in an alternating magnetic field with frequency of 274 kHz and amplitude of 13.9 kA/m, confirming that Ag-Fe3O4 composite magnetic nanoparticles have a high potential for heat generation when compared with Fe3O4 nanoparticles. The observed physical properties and heating power values are discussed based on the synthesis route, particle size distribution, and physical properties.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We propose a method that manipulates the magnetic anisotropy of CoFe/MgO thin films by doping nitrogen (N) into CoFe. First-principle simulations are performed to investigate the magnetic anisotropy energy (MAE) and electronic structures of CoFe/MgO thin films. It indicates that appropriate N doping to CoFe thin film can greatly enhance the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA), while excess N doping turns the easy axis of magnetization to in-plane. Layer-resolved MAE reveals that N doping can modulate the MAE of the layers of thin film, and the projected density of states near the Fermi level becomes larger contributing to the PMA. Furthermore, the charges transfer between N atoms and Co/Fe atoms leads to charge re-distribution of Co/Fe layers, which is also helpful to improve the PMA. Our findings demonstrate the feasibility of significant enhancements in the magnetic anisotropy of CoFe/MgO thin films through the interstitial doping with nitrogen.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn nowadays deeply scaled CMOS technologies, time-dependent variability effects have become important concerns for analog and digital circuit design. Transistor parameter shifts caused by Bias Temperature Instability and Random Telegraph Noise phenomena can lead to deviations of the circuit performance or even to its fatal failure. In this scenario extensive and accurate device characterization under several test conditions has become an unavoidable step towards trustworthy implementing the stochastic reliability models. In this paper, the statistical distributions of threshold voltage shifts in nanometric CMOS transistors will be studied at near threshold, nominal and accelerated aging conditions. Statistical modelling of RTN and BTI combined effects covering the full voltage range is presented. The results of this work suppose a complete modelling approach of BTI and RTN that can be applied in a wide range of voltages for reliability predictions.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.For double manganites PrBaMn2O6 with different degree of A-site ordering, magnetic and optical properties in near-IR range were studied. Full ordered manganite is characterized by antiferromagnetic state at low temperatures; magnetic phase transition from antiferromagnetic to ferromagnetic state occurs near TN = 262 K and to paramagnetic state near TC = 305 K. Partially disordered manganite consists of few fractions with different state of A-site ordering and shows the transition from ferromagnetic state to paramagnetic one at 190 K. For disordered manganite weak ferromagnetic contribution is observed below 130 K. The optical density spectra and the temperature dependences of light transmission indicate a change in behavior of the charge carrier system (metal–insulator transition) near the magnetic phase transitions. The magnetotransmission effect was measured for the first time in double manganites PrBaMn2O6. Spectral dependence of magnetotransmission lets associate this effect with an increase in the fraction of delocalized charge carriers when a magnetic field is applied.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The emergence of augmented reality, robotics and point-of-care biosensors has pushed forward the frontiers of compliant sensors with mechanical resilience and capability of being arbitrarily shaped upon demand. Here, we report exchange-biased spin valve structures directly fabricated on 25 μm thick commercial polymeric substrates. Linear electrical response with low coercivity was demonstrated for sensors grown on polymers. Despite the higher roughness of polymers ≃0.75 nm, a Néel coupling field comparable to that of samples grown on conventional SiO2 substrates was shown. Nevertheless, significant changes in the linear range of polymeric samples were observed, together with changes in the shift of the transfer curve. The measurements also indicate deviations from fully orthogonal magnetization orientation achieved in patterned linear sensors. Such results were ascribed to the presence of a non-negligible magnetostrictive component, most likely due to residual mechanical stress in the sensor's free- and pinned-layers. To support the study, a macrospin model was developed, considering the magnetoelastic anisotropy, to address in particular the impact of mechanical stress on final sensor output.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetocrystalline anisotropy (MA) and electric-field-induced modification of the MA energy (E-field-induced MA modification) of Co-Fe multilayer thin films at MgO(001) interface with respect to atomic-layer stacking were investigated using first-principles calculations combined with the cluster expansion method. Although the magnetic quantities have very complicated dependence on atomic-layer stacking, we find that there are key short-range atomic-layer stackings. At the MgO interface, a double atomic-layer stacking of Fe on the MgO enhances an interfacial perpendicular MA while there is no role of the short-range stacking in the E-field-induced MA modification where a single Fe atomic-layer at the interface plays a role. The physical origins underlying these trends were subsequently elucidated by band structure calculations.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.By suggesting that the relationship between magnetization and magnetostriction meet an even-degree polynomial relationship, an ideal magnetization model to analyze the effects of stress on the magnetostriction and magnetization of ferromagnetic materials is established by Jiles in 1995. Based on this classic model and its modification, researchers have conducted extensive research on the characterization, design, optimization and application of ferromagnetic materials. By proposing a new fitting expression for a quadratic piecewise function with a clearer physical meaning, a generalized magneto-mechanical model based on the effective field theory is established in this paper. By comparing with the existing experimental results and theoretical results of the existing models, it is confirmed that the proposed model in this paper can more accurately describe the nonlinear response of the magnetostriction and magnetization of the material under stress and applied ambient magnetic field. A detailed analysis of the magneto-mechanical effects of three types of ferromagnetic materials, such as ferrous materials, magnetostrictive materials and inverse magnetostrictive materials, demonstrates the widespread effectiveness of the newly established model in this paper.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Round magnetic nano-dots belong to the frequently investigated magnetic nanostructures since they can often reverse magnetization via a vortex state which is characterized by low stray fields, making them useful for data storage applications. Nano-rings, with an open aperture in the middle, regularly show flux-closed vortex states without a vortex core, again reducing stray fields. Here we theoretically investigate “Pac-Man” shaped iron nanostructures with varying aperture, i.e. structures ranging from a thin ring to a solid cylinder with a triangular cut. Our results show that in most cases, a vortex-like state without vortex core along the whole nanostructure occurs during magnetization reversal. Depending on the angle of the external magnetic field and the nanostructure thickness, different magnetization reversal processes have been found, including domain wall nucleation and propagation as well as small vortex states with cores. The occurrence of such special magnetic states can be attributed to the interaction of the shape anisotropy with the relatively high magneto-crystalline anisotropy of iron. Our simulations reveal the possibilities to use such structures for data storage applications as well as their importance in basic research, enabling formation of asymmetric magnetic structures beyond common onion and symmetric vortex states.© 2021 Elsevier LtdCharge trapping is studied in the context of random telegraph noise (RTN) and low-frequency noise (1/f noise), aiming unified statistical modeling. Analytical formulations for 1/f noise (frequency domain) and RTN (time domain) have been derived, using a single modeling framework, where model parameters are the same in frequency and time domain. The modeling addresses the time dependent variability in the electrical behavior of MOSFETs, discussing the variability due to a single trap and the ensemble of traps. In the work here presented we detail the role of the observation window, in both time and frequency domain. We discuss how it impacts the variance of drain current (or threshold voltage) measured over time, and the number of observable traps in a given time window or frequency window. Besides analytical modeling, experimental results are presented and discussed.© 2021Co1−x-Px films (x = 0.02–0.05) deposited on cover glass by electroless plating from aqueous solutions in a continuous magnetic field with the strength of 2.5 kOe are presented. It has been found that in the pH range from 7.2 to 9.3, two special areas can be distinguished, they are characterized by the deposition of films with qualitatively different parameters in them. So, the change of the pH of working solutions from 7.2 to 8.7 causes the increase in the value of the induced magnetic anisotropy constant KU from 2.5 × 105 erg/cm3 to 6 × 105 erg/cm3. If the value of the hydrogen index is still increasing, an uneven drop to 5 × 104 erg/cm3 is observed. In the same way, the coercivity HC changes; at first it grows from 700 Oe to 1.5 kOe, and then it drops to Oe units. The concentration of phosphorus in the range of 7.2 to 8.7 increases linearly from 2 to 3 wt%, and in the range of 8.7 to 9.3, it increases from 3 to 5 wt%. The x-ray diffraction data show that the samples obtained at pH < 8.7 are characterized by the presence of the hcp phase of Co (α-Co). The observed reflections of films obtained at pH > 8.7 indicate the fcc-Co (β-Co) with the diffraction peak blurring: the greater the pH value of the samples obtained, the more the diffraction peak blurring. It is shown that the induced magnetic anisotropy in high-coercivity films relates to the modification of the Co lattice. The lattice passes from a distorted fcc to an hcp structure during the growth of crystallites in a magnetic field. The induced magnetic anisotropy appears in films that were obtained in the high pH field due to the ordering of magnetic ions pairs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Effects of intrinsic defects and doping on the M−type strontium hexagonal ferrites (SrFe12O19) has been systematically studied using density functional theory combined with the generalized gradient approximation (GGA) + U method. The energies of possible intrinsic point defects and doping in SrFe12O19 have been determined, and effects of those on the electronic and magnetic properties have been analyzed. The results show that, under an oxygen poor condition, the defects of iron vacancy are difficult to form, while the defects of oxygen vacancy are easy to form. In the case of oxygen rich condition, the defects of iron vacancy are difficult to form when Fermi energy level is close to VBM, however, when Fermi energy level approaches CBM, the defects of iron vacancy in some sublattice sites are tend to form, especially in the 2a sublattice. Meanwhile, under the oxygen rich condition, the defect formation energy of Co substituting for Fe is very low, which indicates that Fe is easy to be substituted by Co, preferentially in 4f2 sublattice, followed by 2a sublattice. The lattice constant of La-Co co-doped is smaller than that of perfect SrFe12O19, meanwhile, the total magnetic moment changes little. The density of states shows that La-Co co-doped SrFe12O19 exhibits n-type semiconductor characteristics.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Complete diagonalization method (CDM) and high-order perturbation method (PTM) with forth-order formulae have been used to explain the optical spectra and ground term 3A2g electron paramagnetic resonance (EPR) parameters g//, g⊥ and zero-field splitting (ZFS) parameter D of Ni2+-doped CsCdCl3 within the framework of molecular orbital (MO) scheme, the calculated results are in good agreement with the experimental data. The trigonal parametersv and v′, Reach parameters B and C and the local defect structure are determined. The effect of vibronic interaction on optical spectra of 3T2g and 3A2g transition has been discussed with a1g and eg vibronic models, and the Huang–Phys parameters and vibronic coupling constant are evaluated.© 2021 The Author(s)This paper reports on the study of inverted metal-oxide semiconductor (MOS) structures formed through mechanical exfoliation of MoS2 flakes onto Al2O3 or SiO2 layers grown on degenerately doped p type silicon substrates. Using Au/Ni metal top contacts, multi-frequency capacitance and conductance characterisation were performed to investigate electrically active defects in the MoS2/oxide structures. This data has been paired with physics-based ac simulations which indicate close to ideal interfacial properties.© 2021 The Author(s)Complementary Resistive Switching (CRS) using memristive devices has been intensively investigated in the last decade. The objective of CRS is to generate low and high resistance windows in the I-V characteristic of the selector device with the aim of reducing the sneak-path conduction problem in crossbar arrays. Though a wide variety of compact models for CRS have been proposed, the one presented here stands out for its simplicity, robustness, and accuracy. The flexibility of the memdiode model is demonstrated through a series of fitting exercises using experimental data found in the literature. The model script for the LTSpice XVII simulator is also provided.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.NMZ ferrites doped with rare earth having spinel composition Ni0.5Mn0.3Zn0.2X0.02Fe1.98O4, whereas X = Y, Pr and Gd were synthesized by sol gel auto-ignition method. XRD, FESEM, VSM and VNA were used to determine the phase, microstructural, magnetic and electromagnetic properties of rare earths doped NMZ ferrite. XRD analysis confirms the single phase of the rare earths doped NMZ ferrite. FESEM images shows Pr doped NMZ ferrite has less agglomerations and more porous structure as compared to NMZ and other rare earths doped NMZ ferrites. Magnetic analysis shows the enhancement in saturation magnetization and remanence with the doping of Y, Pr and Gd in NMZ ferrite. Dielectric properties were determined. Gd doped NMZ ferrite depicted higher ac conductivity, dielectric constant and other electromagnetic and related dielectric properties as compared to Pr-NMZ, Y-NMZ and NMZ ferrite. Similarly, Gd- NMZ spinel ferrite depicted maximum M'' to other doping contents (Y, Pr) and pure NMZ ferrite. The high saturation Q-factor of Pure NMZ spinel ferrite NPs, Y- NMZ, Pr-NMZ and Gd-NMZ were observed at 1.57 GHz, 1.58 GHz, 3.65 and 4.01 GHz frequency regions, respectively. NMZ and RE doped NMZ ferrite absorbers with thin substrate as absorber were simulated using FDTD method. The maximum value of absorptivity for Gd-NMZ at 2.4 GHz were noticed from the simulated absorbers. The absorptivity was also increased with the different incident angles. Therefore, Gd doped NMZ are more preferable for absorption devices in high frequency region.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Nanoparticles of ε-Fe2O3 in an amorphous silica matrix were prepared by the sol–gel method without using a precursor. X-ray diffraction patterns reflect a completely amorphous state for the samples even after heat-treated up to 600 °C, while at higher temperatures the formation of crystalline iron oxide phases was observed. Transmission electron microscopy analysis showed a wide size distribution of nanoparticles from 3±0.5 to 46±0.8 nm. The occurrence of ε-Fe2O3 particles depends on several factors like annealing temperature, particle size and iron concentration in initial chemicals. Based on the 57Fe Mössbauer spectra, three octahedral and one tetrahedral iron site were identified for ε-phase. The optimized conditions for the preparation of ε-Fe2O3 rich sample were confirmed and ~ 90% of the ε-Fe2O3 phase was obtained with the particle size of 15±0.6 nm. The high coercivity of ~ 1.18 T at room temperature was confirmed for our nanoparticle system.© 2021 Elsevier LtdCapacitive Metal-Insulator-Semiconductor structures with graphene as interfacial layer between the HfO2 dielectric and the top electrode have been fabricated and investigated at device level and at the nanoscale with Conductive Atomic Force Microscope. In particular, their electrical properties and variability have been compared to devices without graphene to evaluate their feasibility as ReRAM devices. At device level, we observe that, when graphene is present as an intercalated layer, several resistive switching cycles can be measured, meanwhile the standard structures without graphene do not show resistive switching behavior. Nanoscale analysis showed that the graphene layer prevents the microstructural irreversible damage of the oxide material during a forming process. Therefore, graphene somehow protects the structure during the CF formation. This protection would explain the observation of RS of the devices with intercalated graphene.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The Monte Carlo study has been directed to the magnetic behaviors of a ferrimagnetic decorated kagome-like lattice by establishing the mixed spin-2 and spin-5/2 Ising system. Magnetization, susceptibility, internal energy, specific heat and entropy as a function of temperature have been discussed under the influence of diverse Hamiltonian parameters. The change of the critical temperature and compensation temperature with various parameters is also gained. Interestingly, two compensation points behavior may appear in certain parameter range. In particular, we have found that the present system can display various multiple-loop hysteresis behaviors because of the competition among different Hamiltonian parameters.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we applied regularized inversion method [New J. Phys. 19, 073012 (2017)] for microstructure analysis of 10 ferrofluid samples with different ferroparticle concentrations, which were obtained by diluting of the first one. The experimental measurements of the magnetization M(H) of all samples were subjected to numerical inversion using 120 ferroparticle fractions. Since volume concentration of ferrofluid samples does not exceed 3%, the properties of each fraction were described using Langevin theory. The magnetogranulomertic analysis confirmed that all 10 samples have the same magnetic moment distribution function, which has two peaks. The first (small) peak in the magnetic moment distribution function demonstrates the presence of a certain number of aggregates or correlated ferroparticle structures in the samples, whose magnetic moments have been compensated. The second peak corresponds to ordinary single particles distributed in the sample. The main advantage of using numerical inversion method is the absence of an a priori fixed form of the distribution function instead of a standard log-normal or Γ-distribution.© 2021 Elsevier LtdUnder optical illumination of metal–insulator-semiconductor field effect transistors with insulated gate structure (MISFETs including MOSFETs and TFTs), photo-generated electron-hole pairs (ehp's) cause the photovoltaic effect (PVE) and the photoconductive effect (PCE) in the electrical characteristics of MISFETs. In the modeling and characterization of MISFETs under optical excitation for both optical sensing and/or electro-optical characterization of traps through photonic C-V and I-V responses, it is necessary to separate the PVE from the PCE in MISFETs. In this letter, we report the modeling and separate characterization of the PVE from the PCE in MISFETs applicable to MOSFETs and TFTs. We confirmed the proposed model and the technique through experimental results adopting the different substrate contact configurations and optical power of the device under characterization. As a result, the effective surface potential change for the PCE (VPCE) and the effective substrate potential change for the PVE (VPVE) could be quantitatively extracted.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In highly sensitive magnetic sensors coupled to magnetic flux concentrators, the optimal operation point with maximum sensitivity may appear deviated from zero magnetic field. Such characteristic can hamper the detection of very low magnetic fields. In this work a magnetic bias technique is presented which allows an efficient control of the operation point of the magnetoresistive sensor placed in the gap of two magnetic flux concentrators. Specifically, the magnetic field created compensates the shift of the output curve and is here generated by a current line directly integrated on chip. This method allows to control the input current and, therefore, change the local magnetic field towards a fine tuning of the offset field. The optimum configuration includes 44 current lines with 2.3 mA on top of each magnetic flux concentrator yielding a shift of 0.1 mT.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The effect of ethanol as a process control agent (PCA) on the mechanical alloying (MA) of Fe-20 at. % Al powders is presented. MA was performed at room temperature in an oscillation ball mill and its dynamic was studied by changing the milling frequency and time. We characterized the milled powders using X-ray diffraction (XRD), Mössbauer spectroscopy, and vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM). X-ray patterns for the milled powders without PCA showed a rapid formation of the disordered Fe(Al) solid solution after 25 Hz for 6 h of milling. Mössbauer spectroscopy confirmed two ferromagnetic sites related to the α-Fe phase and Fe(Al) disordered solid solution. However, intense cold welding of the powders to the milling tools for all milling frequencies led to a powder recovery of only 40% on average. The addition of ethanol as a PCA at a 25 Hz increased the powder recovery up to 96% even for different milling times, whereas X-ray diffraction and Mössbauer spectra showed a single α-Fe phase. VSM results exhibit the presence of a soft ferromagnetic character, in which a correlation between the structural parameters with the coercive field and saturation magnetization was deduced. Thus, while ethanol increases the powder recovery rate it also modifies the milling kinetics affecting the domain walls’ movement and the corresponding magnetic interactions between iron atoms.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The low temperature dependence of the nuclear magnetic resonance frequency and spin–lattice relaxation rate measured in the chiral magnet MnSi by Yasuoka and coworkers [J. Phys. Soc. Jpn. 85, 073701 (2016)] is interpreted in terms of helimagnon excitations. The theoretically predicted gapless and anisotropic dispersion relation which is probed at extremely small energy is experimentally confirmed. Whenever comparison is possible, the results are found quantitatively consistent with those of the inelastic neutron scattering and muon spin rotation and relaxation techniques. Further studies are suggested.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Atomically flat MnSi films were fabricated on Si(1 1 1)-7 × 7 reconstructed surface by molecular beam epitaxy(MBE). Both scanning tunneling microscopy (STM) images and low energy electron diffraction (LEED) patterns demonstrate a well-defined (3×3)R30o structure reconstruction. A thickness-driven metal–semiconductor transition in MnSi ultrathin films was observed with decreasing the thickness down to 6 ML (monolayers). The temperature dependence of the resistance and the negative magnetoconductivity suggest the MnSi ultrathin films with thickness lower than 6ML exhibit weak anti-localization (WAL) of two-dimensional (2D) electron systems. This finding that not only advances our understanding of the mechanism of thickness-driven metal–semiconductor transition, but also provides a new strategy to use ferromagnetic semiconductor as spin injector in spintronic devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this research work, we retrieve dynamics of new soliton solutions to the Kraenkel-Manna-Merle system which describes the nonlinear ultrashort pulse in saturated ferromagnetic materials having an external field with zero-conductivity by utilizing the new extended direct algebraic method. The soliton and other solutions achieved by this method can be categorized as a single (dark, singular), complex combo solitons as well as complex hyperbolic, plane wave and trigonometric solutions with arbitrary parameters. The spectrum of solitons is enumerated along with their existence criteria. Moreover, 2-D, 3-D, and their contour profiles of reported results are also sketched by substituting the diverse values to the parameters that facilitate the researchers to comprehend the physical phenomena of the governing equation. The results reveal the system theoretically possesses extremely rich soliton structures. The acquired solutions exhibit that the proposed technique is an efficient, valuable, and straightforward approach to constructing new solutions of various types of nonlinear partial differential equations which have important applications to applied sciences and engineering.© 2021In this paper, the open recoil loop is simulated by establishing the simulation model of hard-phase grains (Sm2Co7) dispersed in soft-phase (α-Fe) matrix. The influence of inter-phase exchange coupling effect on the openness is simulated by adjusting the soft/hard phase interface integral exchange constant (Aint). The results show that the openness does not depend on the inter-phase exchange coupling effect, since the open recoil loops can be acquired even the Aint decrease from 20 to 0 pJ/m. The interaction energy density analysis also does not provide strong evidence to support the correlation between openness and exchange coupling effect. The magnetization configuration evolution shows the irreversible reversal of the hard-phase grains is root cause of the openness, and the adjacent soft phase enlarge the openness degree for the recoil loop of the nanocompiste magnet. Our results are helpful to deepen the understanding of the openness in recoil loops for nanostructural permanent magnet materials.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Advancements of power electronic technologies result in significant improvement in efficiency of power delivery to applications that consume or feed electrical energy to a grid. A transformer is an integral part of the power delivery process. Transformers used for power delivery must be efficient, compact and of low cost, and more importantly, they should be compatible with the connected source such as a power inverter. For a desired power density, the transformer design involves optimization of its electrical and magnetic circuits permitted by the thermal limits of core and copper. The limit of the magnetic circuit is indirectly linked to the winding design. Better use of core influences the design of the electrical circuit as well. Therefore, proper choice of core material and geometry is very important design consideration. This article reviews the domain of soft magnetic materials suitable for handling large electrical power from grid frequency to high-frequency applications. The paper covers different examples and elaborates the role of a transformer for one specific application. Review of transformer design considerations used in different applications, which are categorized based on their load characteristics, is a novelty of this work.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the effect of rare earth Y on the wave absorption properties of Fe95Si1B2P0.5Cu1.5 alloy powders was investigated, regarding its problem of impedance mismatch in the S-band and C-band. The results show that the introduction of Y induces B atoms into the lattice of α-Fe, causing lattice distortion, while producing Fe2B and Y2Fe13.725Si0.275B. The content of Y affects the powders morphology, and the powders particles change from flake to bulk as the Y content increases. The addition of Y increases the real and imaginary parts of the magnetic permeability, while decreasing the real and imaginary parts of the dielectric constant. Furthermore, the main dielectric loss of the alloy powders turns from conduction loss to relaxation polarization, but the magnetic loss of the alloy powders remains the same as eddy current loss and natural resonance. Meanwhile, the dielectric loss is drastically reduced with little change in the magnetic loss of the alloy powders, which provided the conditions for improving the impedance matching of the material. The addition of Y substantially improves the effective absorption bandwidth and impedance matching of the alloy powders. Among the powders, Fe94.5Si1B2P0.5Cu1.5Y0.5 alloy powders shows superior absorption performance in the S-band and C-band: the minimum reflection loss (RLmin) can reach −42.405 dB at 3.5 mm, and in the thickness range of 1–5 mm, it can achieve full-band absorption in the S-band and C-band, including a maximum effective absorption bandwidth (EAB, RL ≤ 10 dB) of 4.25 GHz at a thickness of 2.4 mm and a EAB of 4.05 GHz at a thickness of 2.5 mm, which encapsulates the entire C-band.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Electromagnetic and thermal evaluation of transformers are required for better acquaintance with detailed and complex behaviors of the system components as well as accurate description of the corresponding magnetic and thermal performances. Hence, this paper is devoted to a comprehensive study of the impact of CuO nanoparticles on cooling performance enhancement of a three-phase transformer. Besides, as determination of proper values for heat generation rate of the transformer core is indispensable for thermal modeling, the core losses are acquired through electromagnetic modeling as an essential step. The results derived from the transformer with silicon steel core are compared with the case in which a type of nanocrystalline soft magnetic core material, Finemet, is used. In this paper, 3D simulations are performed for electromagnetic and heat transfer analysis of the transformer. The results gained for nanocrystalline core indicate its superior efficiency in lessening the core losses due to the drastic improvement found in its magnetic and thermal characteristics compared to conventional cores used in previous works. It also becomes apparent that the use of CuO nanoparticles in the pure oil as a novel approach leads to lower hotspot temperature accompanied by notable decrease in the average and maximum temperatures of the fluid. Mean heat transfer coefficients of the oil with and without nanoparticles are finally checked against experimental values to show the simulation results preciousness.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the structural and ferromagnetic properties of Mo1-xMnxS2 and Mo1-xCoxS2 (x = 0, 0.025, 0.05, 0.075, 0.1 and 0.25) nanosheets synthesized by a wet chemical process. X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns confirm the 2H polytype of MoS2 for both pristine and doped nanosheets. From X-ray absorption near-edge spectral (XANES) studies, Mn doping in MoS2 is found to be very ineffective even for x up to 0.25 and is found to be in Mn4+ oxidation state. Cobalt doping in MoS2 is very effective and found in a mixed oxidation state of 2+/3+. For x > 0.05, Co9S8 secondary phase is discerned in XRD. XANES and extended X-ray absorption fine structure study further confirm the absence of Co, Mn clusters. All the MoS2 nanosheets are multi-layered (~10 to 20 layers) as discerned from Raman and high-resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM) studies. HRTEM images also show the presence of planar and edge defects in MoS2 nanosheets. These defects arise from the bends, tears, folds and edges of the nanosheets. In addition to these defects, sulphur vacancy point defects are predominant as evidenced from electron paramagnetic resonance signal at g = 2.03. Pristine MoS2 nanosheets exhibit weak ferromagnetism [magnetization (MS) = 19 × 10−3 emu/g and 1.3 × 10−3 emu/g at T = 5 K and 300 K] mostly arising from the planar defects. While the magnetization increases roughly 6 (3) times higher for Mn-doped MoS2 compared to the pristine MoS2 nanosheets at 300 K (5 K). For Co-doped MoS2 nanosheets 7 times increase in MS is found at 300 K, however, the changes are minimal at 5 K. A small change in MS for Mo1-xMnxS2 nanosheets is due to ineffective Mn substitution at Mo sites. On the contrary, Co doped samples exhibit strong paramagnetic contribution at 5 K. Despite effective substitution of Co in MoS2, the saturation magnetization values obtained after subtracting the paramagnetic component are slightly less compared to Mn doped samples. This is most probably due to the dominant antiferromagnetic interaction and the Co9S8 phase segregation. Thus, our experiments show that controlled Mn and Co doping in the low concentration (x < 0.05) is a promising candidate for enabling ferromagnetism in MoS2 nanosheets for spintronics and sensor applications.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe report on a quantitative use of Kelvin probe force microscopy (KPFM) for the analysis of charge injection in thin oxides. Here, thin dielectrics are investigated through an atomic force microscopy tip that is used as a movable (virtual) top-electrode. The charge is injected and read-out respectively by alternating the direct contact of the probe with the oxide, and with non-contact surface potential imaging. The contact potential difference (CPD) between the atomic force microscope tip and the oxide surface is used to measure the charge distribution under multiple electrical stress conditions, thus correlating locally trapped charge with dielectric properties.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The effects of precipitated phases on the magnetic properties of 2304 duplex stainless steel (UNS S32304) were investigated. For this purpose, various artificial aging treatments were carried out at different temperatures (700, 800, and 900 centigrade) and times (20, 30, 60 120 min). The microstructural evaluations were performed by optical and scanning electron microscopy (SEM) equipped with energy-dispersive x-ray spectroscopy (EDS) and x-ray diffraction (XRD) method. In order to assess the magnetic properties, hysteresis loop was determined using the vibrating-sample magnetometer (VSM) method. The results showed that the aging treatment produces precipitates such as carbides chromium (M23C6), Cr2N chromium nitride, sigma phase and the secondary austenite in the ferrite/austenite interface that grows in to the ferrite grains and decreases the magnetic compound of the microstructure. The ferrite volume fraction decreases from 92.5% to 68.1% by increasing of the aging transformation intensity (ATI). This phenomenon drastically damages the magnetic properties. The saturation magnetization of the steel decreases from 123 emu/g to 91 emu/g with increasing of ATI. The lowest level of MS and highest aging transformation intensity occurred at the aging temperature of 800 °C for 120 min.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The concept of induced spin velocity is used to study a case of magnetic levitation in a device containing spinning and rotating magnets. Its background theory belongs to the geometry of curves in 3-dimensional Euclidean space and it is expressed in terms of the curvature and torsion of the trajectory. In the mechanical applications, spin velocity concept is useful, since spin velocities are induced in non-inertial frames and they transform using Galilean instead of Lorentz transformations. We describe a configuration of spinning and orbiting magnets similar to rolling bearings, and give conclusions about the electromotive force and the angular velocity, of the magnetized levitating parts.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.By combining rare earth-based Ce-Fe-B and rare earth free Alnico powders, composite Ce-Fe-B/Alnico spark plasma sintered (SPS) magnets have been fabricated and reported for the first time. It is observed that the two phases exit in the alloys interacting magnetostatically. The Alnico phase constitutes α1 and α2 phases as a consequence of spinodal decomposition process, while the Ce-Fe-B phase contained Ce2Fe14B and CeFe2 phases. By increasing the content of Alnico phase, the remanence magnetization and the maximum energy density of the composite alloys increased owing to the higher saturation magnetization of Alnico phase. Magnetic properties, such as remanence magnetization Js = 0.93 T, intrinsic coercivity Hcj = 202 kA/m and maximum energy density (BH)max = 19.8 kJ/m3 were obtained in spark plasma sintered composite magnets containing 15 wt% Alnico. The recoil loops demonstrated the presence of anisotropy variations in the alloys specifically at high applied magnetic field. Analysis of the Curie temperature and elemental analysis validated that the constituent phases of SPS magnets exist in the alloys. This work may shed light on the development of composite magnets with distinct phases and enhanced magnetic properties.© 2021A wideband electromagnetic (EM) wave absorber for the X-band (8–12 GHz) is designed using M-type hexaferrite, SrFe12-2xCoxTixO19 (x = 1.1, 1.2, 1.25, and 1.3)–CNT (0–3 wt%)–epoxy (10 wt%) composites. As x increases from 1.1 to 1.3, the ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) of the hexaferrite powder gradually decreases from 15.0 GHz to 6.4 GHz due to the decrease of magnetocrytalline anisotropy. The EM absorption frequency range changes in accordance with changes in the FMR frequency. Among the series of samples, the x = 1.25 sample demonstrates EM absorption properties optimized for the X-band with the lowest reflection loss (RL) of −40 dB and satisfying RL <−10 dB in the 7–13 GHz range. When 1 wt% carbon nanotubes (CNTs) are added to the composite (x = 1.25), permittivities ε′ and ε″ increased significantly owing to the CNT particle's high conductivity, and the intensive EM absorbing region expanded to a wide frequency–thickness range. A further increase in the CNT content (2–3 wt%) weakened the overall EM absorption due to an increase in reflection. Adding 1–2 wt% of CNT to hexaferrite is very effective because it not only increases the shielding effectiveness, but also yields better EM absorption at lower thicknesses of 1.5 mm or less.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Here, we report the Nernst thermopower (Sxy)- generation of a dc electrical voltage transverse to the applied temperature gradient and magnetic field- in the ferromagnetic metallic oxide series: R0.6Sr0.4CoO3 for rare earth cations (R = La, Pr and Nd) of different ionic radii. Besides Sxy, longitudinal thermopower (Sxx) and resistivity in absence of an external magnetic field were also measured. In each of these samples, Sxy increases rapidly around the ferromagnetic Curie temperature (TC), goes through a maximum value at a certain temperature, and decreases towards zero in low temperatures. The field dependence of Sxy measured at a fixed temperature exhibits hysteresis similar to magnetization, which indicates magnetic contribution (anomalous) to the measured Sxy. The sample possessing the largest ionic radius (R = La) shows the maximum Sxy value (~0.264 μV/K for H = 2 kOe) in this series. Our work guides that future studies need to be focused on the La-based cobaltites to enhance Sxy value through optimizing compositions.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Electronic and magnetic properties of half-metallic Heusler alloys can be modified by tuning their chemical compositions. We have carried out a combined theoretical and experimental investigation of Mn(1+x)Pt(1-x)Sb (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.5) alloys. Our first-principles calculations indicate that the stoichiometric MnPtSb exhibits nearly half-metallic band structure, but a robust half-metallicity can be achieved in Mn-rich compositions Mn(1+x)Pt(1-x)Sb (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.5) with x = 0.25 and higher in their cubic structures. In addition, while MnPtSb exhibits ferromagnetic alignment, Mn(1+x)Pt(1-x)Sb are ferrimagnetic for all non-zero values of x. We have also synthesized cubic MnPtSb and Mn1.25Pt0.75Sb alloys using arc melting and annealing. The magnetic properties of these alloys are consistent with our theoretical predictions. These results indicate that the Mn-rich Mn(1+x)Pt(1-x)Sb alloys have potential for spin-transport-based devices.© 2021A compact model is proposed using a stochastic approach to capture the resistive switching behavior of conductive-bridge random access memory (CBRAM) device featuring a solid polymer electrolyte consisting of Polyethylene Oxide (PEO). This model considers the statistical distribution of five electrical parameters used to describe the resistive switching observed in experimental data. A switching probability is defined to control the change of resistive state. This approach gives the model the stochastic behavior of current–voltage characteristics observed in this kind of devices. A good agreement between the simulation and the experimental curves is observed despite the unusual variability cycle-to-cycle for this type of ReRAM.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe used Density Functional Theory (DFT) to study the Fermi level pinning and Schottky barrier height in metal-MoS2 contacts. We showed that the Fermi level de-pinning could be attained by controlling the distance between the metal and MoS2. In particular, with proper buffer layers and the use of back-gated structures, the Schottky barrier height can be practically zeroed in some metal-MoS2 stacks, which is important to attain Ohmic contacts.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThis paper explores the possible use of silicon nanopillars as electronic devices. The silicon nanopillars studied in this work were fabricated by electron beam lithography and by plasma ion etching of silicon wafers. The electrical and physical properties of these pillars with full width at half maximum ranging from few nanometers to 100 nm and length of few hundreds of nanometer have been investigated by time-resolwed photoluminescence, infrared spectroscopy and current-voltage characteristics. An ultrafast blue luminescence component competing with non-radiative recombination at surface defects was quantified as originating from the no-phonon recombination. This component involved two decay processes with a peak energy at around 500 nm, which have the fast component close to femtosecond time scale. The emission exhibits also a slow component in the red spectral region with a time constant in the nanosecond regime. The nanopillars have been smoothened in an attempt to passivate surface defects. The results are indicative of an increase in the lifetimes-of carriers and an enhancement in the red component of the emission with much slower sates. The presence of ultrafast decay at blue-green spectral region is suggestive of the possibility of using the silicon nanopillars as ultrafast switching devices. Silicon nanopillar arrays can also be an ideal platform in trapping and sensing chemical or biological species using diamond NV centers.© 2021 Elsevier LtdTwo different Kelvin Probe Force Microscopy (KPFM) measurement configurations have been combined to evaluate at the nanoscale the effects of an electrical stress on Organic Thin Film Transistors (OTFTs) properties. As an example, Channel Hot Carrier (CHC) degradation has been induced to provoke some damage in the studied devices. The results show that the use of the two KPFM configurations, together with their nanoscale resolution, provides additional information about the damage in the different regions/materials of the devices, allowing to correlate device level characteristics with the nanoscale material properties.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the noise Power Spectral Density (PSD) of AlGaN/GaN High-Electron-Mobility Transistors (HEMTs) has been experimentally investigated in linear operation (VD = 50 mV) for different channel lengths (L) and widths (W) at different temperatures (5.32 °C till 100 °C). The origin of the noise will be analyzed to understand the physical mechanisms involved. It is shown that the Low-Frequency (LF) noise is dominated by 1/f noise, originating from number fluctuations. Additionally, in shorter devices, a higher 1/f noise PSD is found. The LF noise characteristics indicate that the AlGaN/GaN HEMTs on silicon substrates can be a promising candidate for analog and Radio Frequency applications (RF).© 2021Despite the breathtaking progress already achieved for electronic devices built from 2D materials, they are still far from exploiting their full theoretical performance potential. Many of these problems are due to the lack of suitable insulators which would go along with 2D materials as nicely as SiO2 goes with Si. For instance, amorphous oxides known from Si technologies contain numerous defects which degrade the device performance and stability, and hBN is not suitable for nanoscale devices due to limited dielectric properties. Thus, we suggest that an intensive search of beyond-hBN layered 2D insulators and other crystalline insulators such as CaF2, other fluorides and native oxides is required for the further development of next-generation 2D nanoelectronics.© 2021 Elsevier LtdSpin-transfer torque magnetic tunnel junction (STT-MTJ) technology is an attractive solution for designing non-volatile Logic-in-Memory (LIM) architectures. This work explores a smart material implication (SIMPLY) LIM scheme based on nanoscale STT-MTJs. The SIMPLY architecture is benchmarked against the conventional material implication (IMPLY) logic. Obtained results prove that for similar performance the STT-MTJ based SIMPLY scheme ensures more reliable operation (i.e., lower error rate by more than three orders of magnitude) and an energy saving of −70% than its IMPLY counterpart, at the only cost of minimal area overhead.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This work investigates the effect of different initial microstructures on the electromagnetic magnetisation curves/hysteresis of 50CrMo4 steel and technically pure iron introducing a novel measurement method. Surprisingly little is known about the relationship between microstructure and the magnetic properties, although this is of great importance for a better understanding and multi-physics modelling of induction heat treatment. Analysis of the magnetic hysteresis and Distortion Analysis of Magnetic Excitation (DAME) are important techniques to characterise magnetic behaviour of materials. To perform these measurements, a specific measurement setup based on excitation circuit/yoke with secondary coils was implemented. Using these methods, the characterization of the effect of mechanical properties (i.e.: hardness) and different microstructures on electromagnetic magnetisation curves/hysteresis is possible with high precision. The effect of the eddy-currents on the B-H hysteresis shows a systematic behaviour, which opens the possibility for a new kind of categorisation of these effects. DAME shows a closely linear relationship with the assumed precipitation size allowing indirect analysis of the microstructure, also at elevated temperatures.© 2021 Elsevier LtdDefect generation during time-dependent dielectric breakdown stress is investigated by a multi-energy level agnostic model. Monte Carlo simulations show that the characteristic power-law increase of the generated defects with stress time is readily obtained when considering distributed bond strengths. DC and AC unipolar simulations show the proportionality between the time-to-breakdown and the fluence and energy of the injected carriers. These results are consistent with the experimental observations of a fluence and energy-driven process in thin oxides.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we explore the use of a 180 nm CMOS single-poly technology platform for realizing analog Deep Neural Network integrated circuits. The analysis focuses on analog vector–matrix multiplier architectures, one of the main building blocks of a neural network, implementing in-memory computation using Floating-Gate multi-level non-volatile memories. We present two memory options, suited either for current-mode or for time-domain vector–matrix multiplier implementations, with low–voltage charge-injection program and erase operations. The effects of a limited accuracy are also investigated through system-level simulations, by accounting for the temperature dependence of the stored weights and the corresponding impact on the network error rate.© 2021 Elsevier LtdMulti-stack metal–insulator-metal (MIM) diodes of ultra-thin Ta2O5/Al2O3 dielectrics are investigated by experiment and modelling. Tunnelling transport is modelled using transfer matrix (TMM) and Wentzel-Kramers-Brillouin (WKB) methods. Rectification for a triple dielectric layer device is shown to occur at a turn-on voltage (VON) as low as 170 mV with a non-linearity of 3 and an asymmetry increasing from 2.2 at the VON to over two orders of magnitude at 1 V.© 2021 Elsevier LtdNature of gap states in chalcogenide semiconductors GexSe1-x is studied by combining X-ray photoelectron (XPS) and absorption (NEXAFS) spectroscopy with photoconductivity (PC) and internal photoemission (IPE) measurements at the semiconductor/insulator interface. It is shown that studied GexSe1-x layers are heterogeneous composite-like matrices and the gap states determining electron transport originate from formation of homopolar Ge-Ge bonds. Nanoscale phase separation effect is revealed manifesting in redistribution of GeSe2 and GeSe networks, respectively, with increase of Ge content with predominant contribution of GeSe.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThis paper deals with the behavior of degradation by NBTI effect in pMOS junctionless nanowire transistors (JNTs). The analysis has been performed through measurements followed by 3D numerical simulations and has shown that the increase in the oxygen precursors density close to the interface leads to the reduction of the saturation in the NBTI effect when the devices operate in partial depletion regime. Such effect can be associated to the change in the flatband voltage to more negative values as well as the threshold voltage with the increase in the precursor density. In the sequence of the work, it was shown that, as the operation temperature rises, there is an increase in the degradation of the threshold voltage due to NBTI, which is more pronounced for larger gate voltages. It was concluded that this effect could be associated to the increase in the recombination rate with the temperature, which enables the occupation of a larger amount of traps.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe low frequency noise performance of Gate-All-Around Nanowire (NW) or Nanosheet (NS) Metal-Oxide-Semiconductor Field-Effect Transistors (MOSFETs) is investigated, taking account of the impact of the device architecture, i.e., junctionless (JL) versus inversion-mode (IM) and process variations for the gate metal. The horizontal devices are characterized by 1/f noise, dominated by the number fluctuation mechanism, so that the power spectral density (PSD) is directly proportional with the trap density in the gate stack. The average 1/f noise PSD is becoming smaller going from single NW transistors on Silicon-on-Insulator substrates, to stacked horizontal NS devices on bulk silicon and, finally, vertical NWFETs with a substrate source contact. At low currents and frequencies below 1 kHz the 1/f noise in the vertical NWs is, in contrast to the horizontal devices, controlled by mobility fluctuations. In these devices white noise is observed above 1 kHz.© 2021 Elsevier LtdTunnel-barrier rectifiers comprising single and triple insulator configurations have been fabricated by atomic layer deposition (ALD) to investigate the insulator (Al2O3, Ta2O5, Nb2O5) layer quality and rectification performance for inclusion in rectenna arrays for infrared energy harvesting. ALD has provided superior control of nanometer film thickness (1–3 nm) as well as insulator film quality as tunneling has been found to be the dominant conduction mechanism for all fabricated devices. The key rectifier properties, such as asymmetry, non-linearity, responsivity and dynamic resistance have been assessed from current-voltage (I-V) measurements. The Au/Al2O3/Ti diode exhibits zero bias responsivity of −0.6 A/W, showing that it can be used for energy harvesting applications without the aid of external bias. The effect of resonant tunneling on rectification performance of triple insulator non-cascaded (Ta2O5/Nb2O5/Al2O3) and cascaded (Nb2O5/Ta2O5/Al2O3) rectifiers has been observed from experimental I-V characteristics and substantiated by theoretical simulations. Superior low-voltage asymmetry (6 at 0.1 V) and responsivity (4.3 A/W at 0.35 V) for triple insulator MI3M rectifiers have been observed. The resonant tunneling does not provide enhanced rectification at low bias as previously reported, rather it has much smaller effect. The latter indicates that dissimilar metal electrodes rectifier configurations are more promising for inclusion in optical rectenna.© 2021Two different types of GaN-based nanostructure FETs, such as FinFETs and gate-all-around (GAA) nanowire FETs, have been investigated along with discussing their important performances for a possible new application. The GaN-based FinFETs have better electrostatic control compared to conventional planar-type GaN-based HEMTs, which offers great performance improvement such as very low off-state leakage current, high breakdown voltage, high linearity with broad transconductance. Recent investigation demonstrated that an appropriately designed AlGaN/GaN-FinFETs could exhibit low saturation drain voltage and very fast switching characteristics with subthreshold swing of sub-60 mV dec, which indicates that they can be a promising candidate for low voltage/power logic application. GAA GaN nanowire FETs have even better electrostatic control and exhibit excellent device performances showing their potential low voltage/power logic applications. For clear understanding of the device performances, simulation including two models concerning the multi-level trapping effects and the self-heating effects has been conducted, which leads to good agreement with the experimental results. Negative transconductance and offset-like output characteristics, observed in the narrow nanowire devices, have been well explained using the deep trapping effect and the built-in potential at ohmic contact. Scaling of the nanowire FET has been implemented such as channel length, doping concentration, and diameter of nanowire, which helps to predict further improvement of the device performance.© 2021 Elsevier LtdA cheap, compact and customisable characterisation system for memristor devices, working between ± 10 V, is presented. SPICE (Simulation Program with Integrated Circuit Emphasis) simulations are performed to verify the circuit feasibility and a proper software is developed to drive the system. The potentiality of the realised system is tested by performing several electrical measurements on both Cu/HfO2/Pt memristors and two-terminals commercial devices.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe thoroughly benchmark the reliability of Cu-based CBRAM stacks with different switching layers against state-of-the-art OxRAM stacks. We optimize the switching conditions for maximizing the endurance lifetime in three CBRAM stacks, outlining the impact of the switching layer on the energy required for the switching operation and on the memory window. We show that CBRAM provide a larger memory window than OxRAM, but the switching energy is systematically higher, and the endurance lifetime is shorter. We also demonstrate that the larger memory window of CBRAM degrades over time and is thus only an apparent advantage with respect to OxRAM. Therefore, this study reveals that OxRAM devices investigated in this work are more suitable candidates than for applications targeting long data retention and low programming voltage.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this paper we compare the performances of SiN with respect to an optimized SiC encapsulation in Wall based Phase-Change Memory (PCM) integrating a Ge-rich Ge-Sb-Te alloy (GGST) suitable for high temperature stability in automotive applications. Thanks to the electrical characterization of 4 kb arrays, 3D electro-thermal simulations and TEM analyses performed on programmed devices, we demonstrate the higher programming efficiency in SiC-based PCM devices, thanks to the lower thermal conductivity of the optimized encapsulation. Indeed, the uniform temperature profile achieved in the active layer of SiC encapsulated PCM leads to a retention of one hour at 250 °C. A theoretical model is here proposed to describe the electro-thermal behavior of the device, linking the electrical properties, such as the resistance as a function of current characteristics, to the thermal conductivity of the materials that constitute the device. Finally, thanks to our findings, we provide some guidelines to achieve drastic current reduction via the thermal engineering of the next generation PCM technology.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.An efficient short-range magnetic coupling wireless power transferring (WPT) system by embedding metamaterials (MTM) resonator between the source coil and load coil, whose configuration was designed based on topology optimization, was proposed in this paper. The topology optimization model for designing the MTM microstructures to achieve WPT with maximum power transfer efficiency (PTE) at the required frequency was established. The different MTM microstructures were realized by different conductor patch combination in the discretized pixelated design domain. As a designing example, a short-range magnetic coupling MTM-based WPT system with high efficiency at specific frequency 1 GHz was designed. Taking two classical MTM microstructures as reference, the PTE of WPT system with the topology optimized MTM was improved considerably. The variation of the transmission characteristics of the designed WPT system caused by misalignment was analyzed. The comparison between the MTM-based WPT system and the typical 4-coil WPT system was also discussed.© 2021 Elsevier LtdMIS structures with double-layer HfO2/SiO2 gate stacks were fabricated. The admittance measurements revealed an anomalous voltage shift of the capacitance–voltage characteristics, modulated by the ac signal frequency. The effect is discussed in terms of the oxide charge modulation through the frequency dependent leakage mechanism.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic shape memory alloys, MSMAs, are modern alloys suitable for harvesting waste energy in low-power electrical equipment. This is due to their unique combination of large displacement, rapid mechanical responses, and great actuation capability. In recent years, significant efforts have been made to develop effective technologies for energy harvesting by MSMAs. However, so far, this topic has not been subject to any review. To address this issue, the current study puts forward an overview on the progress and challenges of MSMAs for the usage in a harvesting energy from vibrational, thermal, and acoustic energy sources. An emphasis is put on explaining the different designs of energy harvesting systems that use MSMAs. The review also presents some background information on the MSMAs and their working principles. It eventually identifies some directions for future studies in this field.© 2021 Elsevier LtdPoisson-Schrödinger (PS) simulations and an analytical charge model for a back biased FDSOI structure operated at deep cryogenic temperatures have been developed. PS simulations have been conducted down to 0 K, where metallic statistics applies, by replacing the F0 Fermi integral by a Heaviside function. Considering, as a first approximation, two separated channels for front and back interface, a set of implicit equations has been established based on a single subband scheme within the Airy approach, providing a good description of surface potential, inversion charge and capacitance characteristics of FDSOI structures operated at very low temperature and for various back biases and silicon thicknesses. This analytical charge model is a first step towards a compact model of FDSOI MOSFET for circuit design at cryogenic condition.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A series of Ni50Mn36.5Sb13.5-xSix (x = 0 - 2.5) Heusler alloys was prepared. Effect of Si-doping on the formation, martensitic transformation and magnetic properties of Ni-Mn-Sb alloys was investigated experimentally and theoretically. The increasing Si content leads to the increase of the Curie temperature TC and decrease of the saturation magnetization Ms at 5K. The martensitic transformation temperature Tm also shows a decreasing tendency with the substitution of Si for Sb. First-principles calculations indicate that the martensite has a lower total energy comparing with the austenite, which supports the phase transition observed experimentally. The energy difference between the martensite and austenite ΔEM suggests that the martensitic transformation temperature TM will decrease with a small amount of Si-doping, but increase when Si content is high. This explains the decrease of TM observed in the experimental samples, for in these samples, the Si content is in the ΔEM-decreasing region. The calculated total spin moment of the martensite shows a decreasing tendency with increasing Si content, which agrees with the variation of saturation magnetization Ms at 5K.© 2021Mn-containing Heuslers are important magnetic shape-memory alloys for fast and precise actuators in manufacturing, robotics, surgery, and other applications. Among the key requirements are a high magnetization and favorable thermal properties, especially a high Curie temperature. In this work, the effect of Fe and Co substitution on the structure and magnetism of Mn2NiSn alloys is investigated. The Heusler alloys have been produced by melt spinning and characterized by X-ray diffraction, magnetometry, and electron-transport measurements. It was found that Co substitution for Mn enhances the Curie temperature of Mn2NiSn and both Co and Fe substitution improve its magnetization. These improvements are accompanied by reduced thermal and magnetic hysteresis losses and by interesting structural changes, namely improved chemical order and site occupancies characteristic of quaternary (Y-ordered) Heuslers.© 2021 The Author(s)Nanolayers of pure boron (PureB) deposited on Si form p+-type regions at deposition temperatures from 50 °C to 700 °C. At 700 °C, commercial PureB photodiodes are produced for advanced detection systems including those in extreme-ultraviolet (EUV) lithography systems. In addition, potent MEMS applications of B-nanolayers have been demonstrated. Attractive diode characteristics were also found for devices where Ga wetting-layers were applied to the Si surface, both with/without an additional B capping-layer. The resulting “PureGa” and “PureGaB” diodes are assessed here in the light of investigations focused on the B-Si interface properties in PureB diodes. A very high density of acceptor states at the Si interface appears to be related to the p-dopant property of both B and Ga, even though diffusion into the Si is not expected for the applied processing temperatures from 50 °C to ~ 450 °C.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We study skyrmion states induced by the oblique field in a square magnetic island. To describe stable states and dynamics of the skyrmion, we employ the lattice model that accounts for all relevant interactions and uses parameters in the range of practical interest. Depending on the orientation of the field, two or four spatially separated energy minima emerge in the oblique field. The depth of the energy minima can be controlled by the strength and orientation of the magnetic field. We study the dynamics of the skyrmion and show that it can be moved between any two states by the field gradient. Possible applications for developing binary and quaternary skyrmion-based memory are discussed.© 2021The multifunctional and tunable properties of semiconductors can be achieved by intentional doping of the host lattice with appropriate impurities. In this study, the structure, ferromagnetism and dielectric response of Zr doped SnO2 nano-crystallites, fabricated using co-precipitation technique, have been investigated. X-ray diffraction studies confirm the successful fabrication of Zr doped SnO2 along with one minor peak belonging to SnO. The measured surface morphology shows non-uniform and denser grain distribution. The optical studies show decaying band gaps. The impedance analysis reveals grains and grain boundaries conduction exhibiting different relaxation times. The maximum grains capacitance has been observed in 4% of Zr content. Furthermore, above room temperature ferromagnetic-like behavior is observed, which is quite attractive for magnetic device applications. Hence, the studied diluted magnetic semiconductors are appealing not only for fundamental physics but also for technical applications in frequency related devices and in data processing and storage devices.© 2021 The Author(s)Since two decades ago, research on resistive memories has continuosly grown, gathering relevance through the variety of different technologies that fit into the non-volatile memories’ area. In this study, we discuss the performance and electrical characteristics of RRAM cells constituted by MIM stacks with dielectric formed by Nb2O5-doped SiO2. We report experimental results that show a clear improvement in the resistive behavior of the devices and an excellent analogical control of the intermediate levels between high-resistance and low-resistance states.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we studied the electrical and structural properties of Ni/Si/Al Ohmic contacts to p-type 4H-SiC. The p-type epilayer (NA = 1 × 1019 cm−3) was grown on the N-type epilayer with Al dopants. The properties of Ni/Si/Al contacts were analyzed by changing the thickness of Si film and the annealing temperature. After annealing at 700 °C, the Ni/Si/Al contact forms ohmic contact. Compared to Ni/Al contacts, Ni/Si/Al ohmic contacts are formed at lower annealing temperature. The contact resistivity of Ni/Si/Al (80/20/100 nm) contact is 1.3 × 10−4 Ω·cm2 after annealing at 800 °C. X-Ray Diffraction (XRD) and Scanning Electron Microscopy (SEM) are used to analyze the microstructure and observe the surface topography. The results show that Ni and Si react at low temperature to form Ni2Si, which is the reason for the formation of Ni-based ohmic contacts. At the same time, the addition of the Si layer weakens the reaction between Ni and SiC, which reduces the generation of free C elements. The Ni/Si/Al contact shows better ohmic contact characteristics.© 2021Ferroelectric tunnel junction devices based on ferroelectric thin films of solid solutions of hafnium dioxide can enable CMOS integration of ultra-low power ferroelectric devices with potential for memory and emerging computing schemes such as in-memory computing and neuromorphic applications. In this work, we present ferroelectric tunnel junctions based on Hf0.5Zr0.5O2 with materials and processes compatible with CMOS back-end-of-line integration. We show a device architecture based on W-Hf0.5Zr0.5O2-Al2O3-TiN stacks featuring low temperature annealing at 400° with performance comparable to those obtained with higher temperature annealing conditions.© 2021 Elsevier LtdPseudo-MOSFET delivers a fast, simple and reliable way of characterizing electrically SOI substrates without the need of full CMOS fabrication. However, the information refers to the back interface. Here, to probe the front interface, we extend the concept to a double-gate pseudo-MOSFET. The structure provides a pertinent test vehicle for the characterization and development of transistors channel and gate stack materials in a configuration similar to fully fabricated transistors. We show that the devices with undoped terminals need specialized modeling development to describe the double gate effect. Devices with doped terminals are immediately exploitable for parameter extraction.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The Blume-Emery-Griffiths (BEG) model is considered on the Bethe lattice (BL) in terms of exact recursion relations (ERR) under the effect of a crystal field (D) which was either turned on or off randomly for a given probability. The repulsive case of biquadratic exchange interaction ((K < 0)) between the nearest-neighbor (NN) spins is assumed and the effects of changing the coordination number are also investigated. The thermal variation of the order-parameters, i.e. dipole and quadrupole moments, is examined to obtain the phase diagrams. Very rich phase diagrams with the second- and first-order phase transition lines, tricritical, bicritical and critical end points and the occurrence of reentrant behavior are observed. Different phase regions were explored which include the ferromagnetic (F), paramagnetic (P), staggered quadrupolar (SQ) and ferrimagnetic (FI) phases.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the dynamic losses of modern high-permeability grain-oriented (HGO) electrical steel were investigated as a function of the clearance used during the shear cutting process and the frequency of the applied magnetic field from 3 up to 1000 Hz. The strips were shear cut at clearances of 0.01, 0.04, 0.05, 0.10 and 0.15 mm, and after cutting the samples were heat treated at 850 °C for 1 h. The edge regions were analysed using optical microscopy before and after the heat treatment, and a significant mechanical deformation and consequently a deterioration of magnetic properties was observed, which can be restored through stress-relief annealing. Clearances of 0.01, 0.04, 0.05 and 0.10 mm exhibit the same total magnetic loss; however, for the clearance of 0.15 mm, it increases by ≈10% due to the crack in the fracture zone and greater rollover region. The heat treatment improves the magnetic performance of the as-cut HGO steel strips by ≈8% and ≈15% for 1.5 and 1.7 T, respectively, at frequency of 60 Hz. Finally, a detailed study of the dependence of the losses (hysteresis Ph, classical eddy current Pc, and excess Pe) on frequency and maximum induction was performed. Interestingly, it was observed that Ph is much more influenced by clearance than other losses. In addition, the role of the maximum induction Bmax on each loss component was investigated as a function of frequency. Our findings show that below 0.2 T Pc is larger than Pe and Ph, however, above this threshold there is an inversion where Pe is larger than the other two components in the entire frequency range, even with 1.5 T of magnetic induction. This can indicate that different physical mechanisms that constitute the permeability spectrum exhibit different relaxation times, therefore, they are activated at different frequencies and magnetic field intensities.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present a study of the thermal phase transitions between paramagnetic (PM) and antiferromagnetic (AF) phases in the J1-J2 frustrated honeycomb Ising model. In this model, the competition between AF first-neighbour (J1>0) and second-neighbour (J2>0) interactions can lead to different levels of frustration by tuning the ratio J2/J1. By adopting a cluster mean-field approach, we provide a description of the nature of phase transitions and the role of frustration on the thermodynamics of the model for 0⩽J2/J1<1/4. Our results indicate that the Néel temperature vanishes at J2/J1=1/4 and only second-order phase transitions are present in the PM-AF phase boundary. Moreover, the thermodynamic quantities are affected by the strongly competitive scenario that takes place for J2/J1≈1/4. In particular, we found a round maximum in the specific heat and a finite entropy plateau within the PM phase, suggesting strong frustration effects. Therefore, our results suggest that a regime of strong frustration can be found near the PM-AF phase transition for J2/J1≈1/4.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this article, we introduce a Faraday rotator based on the gyroelectric (e.g. InSb) and gyromagnetic (e.g. MnF2) materials. We have designed a single layer of graphene placed on anisotropic materials, enhancing the Faraday rotation up to 30 degrees. More than 80% transmission has been achieved in the THz band (1 THz–7 THz). This design opens up a new way in ultrathin magneto-optical nanophotonic devices to realize polarization rotators with high transmittance in the THz band.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe phase transformation of ferroelectric (FE) HfO2 induced by electric field cycling was observed at a macroscopic scale using the conventional X-ray diffraction (XRD) technique. We confirmed that the increase in the switchable polarization (Psw) is the result of the phase transformation to increase the amount of the higher symmetric phase of HfO2, both observed at a macroscopic scale. During characterization, we found an anomalous shift difference between the in-plane and the out-of-plane interplanar spacing in every HfO2 film we fabricated. We speculate that this phenomenon is unique to HfO2 and may have played an important role in the phase transformation during the waking-up effect of FE-HfO2.© 2021This paper demonstrates an object orientated GPU accelerated micromagnetic simulator designed to model the material characteristics of complex magnetic alloy systems. The GPU simulator is written in C++ and uses object orientated programming to create a class that stores the magnetic information required to solve the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert (LLG) equation for a distribution of magnetic objects. Each magnetic object can be assigned individual properties based on the alloy distribution of interest. The simulator is verified against standard problem 4 of the “Micromagnetic Modelling Activity Group” (μmag). Standard problem 4 is chosen as it provides a benchmark for the modelling tools ability to accurately predict the magnetisation dynamics of a 500 nm × 125 nm × 3 nm Permalloy thin film.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Fe-based nanowire (NW) arrays have long been investigated due their potential applications in future-generation magnetic nanodevices. However, very few research studies have considered FeCr NWs so far. Herein, FeCr NW arrays with different compositions are fabricated using a pulsed ac electrodeposition technique in porous anodic alumina templates. The Cr electrolyte concentration changed between 2 and 8 mM, influencing morphological, compositional, structural and magnetic properties. As an additive, the element Cr enhanced coercivity and squareness of Fe NWs, inducing the formation of Fe (2 0 0) peak in the crystal structure. As an alloying component, although the Cr element kept the structural and magnetic properties almost constant, it considerably affected the NW length compared to Fe NWs. First-order reversal curve analysis showed significant reductions in magnetostatic interactions when increasing the Cr concentration. In this case, local interactions between the FeCr NW arrays were expected to increase compared to pure Fe NWs.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this work, an ‘on-the-fly’ measurement technique for the monitoring of CMOS inverters performance degradation is presented. This technique allows the characterization of the circuit degradation simultaneously with the applications of the stress. In our experiments, the inversion voltage (VINV) shifts measured during the application of pulsed voltage stresses at the input. It is demonstrated that the shifts can be described by a power law that accounts for the stress time and voltage dependences. Moreover, the circuit degradation has been correlated to the NMOS and PMOS degradations. The results show that the degradation of the CMOS inverter can be evaluated from an analytical equation that considers only the shifts of two parameters (threshold voltage VTH, and mobility µ) of the two transistors in the inverter.© 2021 Elsevier LtdGraphene Nanoribbons (GNRs) are an emerging candidate to challenge the place of current semiconductor-based technology. In this work, we extend a model for Armchair Graphene Nanoribbons Field-Effect Transistor (AGNRFET) to the high-k dielectrics realm and examine the influences of quantum capacitance on its transient phenomena. The model is coded with Verilog-A and evaluated through SPICE simulations. We have considered a comparison between the extended model with and without the influence of the quantum capacitance. Simulation results show a realistic scenario where influence of the quantum capacitance significantly impacts the transient behaviour in circuit design. This proves the proposed model to be a valuable aid for the circuit design of future graphene-based applications.© 2021 The AuthorsThe physical properties of the extensively studied Fe2P material family, well-known for its promising magnetocaloric qualities are greatly influenced by the unit-cell parameters of this hexagonal system. This sensitivity of the various magnetocaloric properties to structural parameters is particularly important for developing a material suitable for room-temperature magnetic refrigeration. A change in the unit cell, due to added elements can induce pronounced changes in the Curie temperature and the nature of the magnetic phase transition. Li belongs to a yet unexplored group of possible dopant elements – alkali metals, and exhibits an unusual behavior upon introduction to Fe2P. We observe a preference to replace iron atoms, as opposed to the common tendency of non-magnetic dopants to replace phosphorus, leading to a strong influence on the magnetic structure. The addition of Li introduces a deformation of the unit cell with a small change in volume and a decrease in c/a ratio, while the same crystallographic phase is maintained over a relatively wide concentration range. We show that lithium has an exceptionally strong effect on the Curie temperature of Fe2P reaching 800 K at 20% Li compared to 240 K for the undoped material.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We involve ab-initio calculations within the generalized gradient approximation (GGA + U) based on the density functional theory (DFT) and Heisenberg Hamiltonian model to study the magnetic phase stability, exchange interactions, electronic and magnetic properties of rare-earth orthoferrites RFeO3 (R = Dy, Er, Tm). We strongly believe that this model can provide an accurate description of the magnetism in this series of compounds. The 4f-electrons of rare earth elements are treated as valence electrons. In all selected perovskites, 3d shells hybridize with oxygen to form Jahn-Teller distortion, which guarantee superexchange interaction. GGA + U results show that insulating G-AFM configuration is the most appropriate to the spin arrangement of R/Fe ions and agree well with the experimental data. This ground state is typified by small superexchange coupling parameters JFe-Fe (3.30–3.38 meV) and Néel temperature values (669.93–685.50 K). The volume and the Jahn-Teller distortion (Q3) are responsible to decrease of JFe-Fe and Néel temperature values when changing R ionic radius. Our results reveal that the 4f valence states are critical factors to properly reproduce the ground state of these compounds.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Within the framework of the quantum mechanical approach, the microscopic theory for magnetoelectric coupling and spin-canting in the spin ordered FeCr2O4 is discussed. We describe two possible mechanisms of magnetoelectric coupling caused by the combined action of the odd crystal field from the tetrahedral environment of the iron ions, the spin–orbit interaction and the exchange field acting on the 3d iron electrons from the chromium spins. We also consider sources of spin-canting. The first one is DM interaction which induces an angle-canting about 2°, the second is a new one due to the common action of the Jahn–Teller and spin–orbit couplings, which yields up to the 50°.© 2021 Elsevier LtdTwo-dimensional (2D) materials represent an emerging technology for transistor electronics in view of their attractive electrical and mechanical properties. This work investigates molybdenum disulfide (MoS2) based field-effect transistors (FETs) fabricated on paper substrate for designing both digital and analog circuits, such as inverter, current mirror, and Physical Unclonable Function (PUF) bitcell. Electrical measurements of fabricated devices are exploited to setup a look-up-table (LUT)-based Verilog-A model to be integrated in a commercial circuit simulator. Obtained results prove the potential of paper-based MoS2 FETs as building blocks of next-generation integrated circuits for a wide range of practical applications.© 2021This paper presents the fundamental analog figures of merit, such as the transconductance, output conductance, transconductance over drain current ratio, intrinsic voltage gain and harmonic distortion (or non-linearity), of n-type vertically stacked nanowires with variable fin width and channel length. To have a physical insight on the results, the basic electrical parameters such as threshold voltage, subthreshold slope and low field electron mobility of the analyzed transistors were also studied. The studied analog parameters are presented in function of the transconductance over drain current, to allow for the comparison at the same inversion level.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe positive flat-band voltage (VFB) shifts of 4H-SiC (0001) MOS capacitors with Al2O3/SiO2 dielectric layers were systematically investigated. After nitridation, there was a negative shift of VFB due to the dipole layer at the SiO2/4H-SiC interface induced by Si-N bonds. However, with Al2O3 layer deposition on thermally grown oxide, an additional dipole layer was formed at the Al2O3/SiO2 interface, which induced positive shift of VFB. Interface state density was estimated to show that the Al2O3 fabrication process had no impact on the quality of SiO2/4H-SiC interface.© 2021 Elsevier LtdImpedance matching between the terahertz antenna and ultra-fast Metal-Insulator-Metal (MIM) diode is a crucial issue in realizing rectenna technology for harvesting infrared (IR) energy spectrum. In this paper, scandium oxide (Sc2O3)-based MIM diodes were fabricated using magnetron sputtering and their rectification performance compared to state-of-the-art Au/Al2O3/Au diodes. The fabricated Al/Sc2O3/Al diode has exhibited around two orders of magnitude lower zero-bias dynamic resistance (RD0 = 956 kΩ) and high zero-bias responsivity (β0 = 1 A/W) in advance to Au/Al2O3/Au diode. The results point to applicability of scandium oxide in MIM rectifiers for IR rectenna.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThin layers of MoOx have been deposited by thermal evaporation followed by post-deposition annealing. The density of states distributions of the MoOx films were extracted deconvoluting the absorption spectra, measured by a photothermal deflection spectroscopy setup, including the small polaron contribution. Results revealed a sub-band defect distribution centered 1.1 eV below the conduction band; the amplitude of this distribution was found to increase with post-deposition annealing temperature and film thickness.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The electronic and magnetic properties of one-dimensional polymers of zwitterionic quinone (ZQ) molecules with 4d and 5d transition metals (TM) are studied using density functional calculations. We present the results of first-principle calculations for the electronic and magnetic properties, including the magnetic anisotropy energy (MAE) of selected 4d- and 5d-ZQ polymers, using the Vienna Ab-initio Simulation Package (VASP). In particular, a pronounced magnetic character is found for TM-ZQ polymers with the TM ions Mo, Ru, Rh, Ag, Re, and Ir, having local magnetic moments between 1 and 4 μB and ferromagnetic or antiferromagnetic nearest neighbor exchanges. The large values of spin–orbit coupling lead to high magnetic anisotropy energies (MAE) especially for Rh-ZQ and Re-ZQ, exceeding the MAE of its 3d counterparts considerably. All investigated TM-ZQ polymer chains were found to be spin-polarized semiconductors, which make them, together with the high MAE, excellent candidate materials for spintronics.© 2021Thin films of VO2 are grown by atomic layer deposition onto low-cost amorphous substrates and compared to sputtered and pulsed laser deposited films on similar substrates. They were each analyzed in terms of the scaling with grain size of the resistivity change across the metal insulator transition, its thermal hysteresis and its full width at half maximum of the slopes. This finds a similar dependence and suggests that the cause is the sintering processes of these films during their deposition and annealing, which determine their microstructural properties.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Strongly anisotropic spin-orbit coupling (SOC) renormalization and strongly enhanced orbital magnetic moments are obtained in the fully self consistent approach including the orbital off-diagonal spin and charge condensates. For moderate tetragonal distortion as in Ca2 RuO4, dominantly planar antiferromagnetic (AFM) order with small canting of moments in and about the crystal c axis are obtained. For reduced tetragonal distortion, we find a tunable regime wherein the magnetic order can be tuned (AFM or FM) by the bare SOC strength and octahedral tilting magnitude. In this regime, with decreasing tetragonal distortion, AFM order is maintained by progressively decreasing octahedral tilting, as observed in Ca2−xSrx RuO4. For purely planar order, the only self consistent solution is FM order along crystal b axis, which is relevant for the bilayer ruthenate compound Ca3 Ru2 O7.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The authors regret that an error was detected in section 3.4: “Application to the CDDWD along curved paths”. By error, the results of Fig. 8 were computed by applying a current density of JHM = 15 TA/m2, not JHM = 1.5 TA/m2 as we indicated in the corresponding figure caption. This is the reason of the difference DW dynamics along the curved parts of two adjacent DWs. We repeated the simulation of Fig. 8 with the correct value JHM = 1.5 TA/m2, and in this case both DWs move with essentially the same velocity across the sample, so there the relative distance is preserved during the motion across the curved parts of the sample for typically injected current values (JHM ~ 1 TA/m2). The correct snapshots of Fig. 8 with JHM = 1.5 TA/m2 representing the DW dynamics are collected in the following Figure, which replaces the one in the paper: The authors would like to apologise for any inconvenience caused.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report on the elastic and magnetic properties of multiferroic Tb0.3Mn20.9O78.8 thin films. The films were deposited on (0 0 1) Si using radio frequency magnetron (RF) sputtering at 50 W and ambient temperature. The elastic properties have been established by surface Brillouin scattering (SBS) after fitting the discrete phonon dispersion in the k||d range of 0 – 5 by surface Elastodynamic Green's function. The uncertainties in elastic constants values were obtained from Taylor series expansion of the phonon phase velocity as a function of C11 and C44 values and subsequently fitted by the least-squares method. The optimum primary elastic constants and their uncertainties were determined as C11 = 180 ± 4.9 GPa and C44 = 43.0 ± 0.89 GPa. The derived elastic constants show that the films are ductile. Using a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM), the films have been noted to behave like soft ferromagnetic materials at T⩽150 K. Incommensurate magnetic ordering and spin-glass behaviors have also been observed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, the magnetocaloric effect of La1-xNaxMn1-yFeyO3 (x = 0.1, 0.2 and y = 0, 0.1) was investigated using magnetic characterization data. The X-ray diffraction confirms that all samples synthesized by flash combustion and calcined at 1000 °C have been crystallized in a rhombohedral structure with an R3¯c space group. According to the magnetization versus temperature results, LaMnO3 is a ferromagnetic material with a Curie temperature TC = 95 K. The substitution of the rare earth La by alkali magnetic metal Na leads to an increase of TC to 265 and 330 K accompanied with large magnetic entropy change/-ΔSMmax/ of 2.88 and 4.88 J.Kg-1K−1 for x = 0.1, 0.2, respectively. The addition of 10% of Fe in La1-xNaxMn1-yFeyO3 decreases the Curie temperature and the magnetic entropy change, while, the relative cooling efficiency increases. The Mössbauer spectrum recorded at room temperature represents a paramagnetic character of the manganites and proves the distribution of Fe3+ in the samples.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.It has been shown that a single-domain magnetic nanoparticle can be effectively switched by a linear down-chirp microwave field pulse (DCMWP) in zero temperature limit. However, finite temperature is ubiquitous in practice. Here, we study the effect of finite temperature on the DCMWP-induced magnetization reversal based on the stochastic Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation. It is found that any one of the three controlling parameters of a DCMWP, i.e. the amplitude, chirp rate, or initial frequency, decreases with increasing temperature while the other two are fixed. The maximal temperature at which the reversal can happen increases with enlarging the system size. These phenomena are related to the facts that the energy barrier induced by anisotropy increases with the system volume, and the effective magnetization decreases with temperature. We also provide a set of optimal parameters for practical realization of our proposal. These findings may provide a way to realize low-cost and fast magnetization reversal with a wide operating temperature.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThis work studied the effects of the fin width variation on Silicon-on-Insulator Junctionless Nanowire Transistors (JNTs) working in the temperature range of 300 K to 500 K. The effects of the temperature on the measured drain current and gate capacitance, and on the extracted electrical parameters such as the threshold voltage, the subthreshold slope, and the electron mobility were analyzed. Results show that JNTs with larger fin width may present better carrier mobility at a higher temperature than narrow ones as the degradation due to phonon scattering is decreased and the impurity scattering becomes more relevant. It is demonstrated that JNTs with narrow fin width show higher phonon scattering and higher mobility variation with the temperature than wider ones.© 2021 Elsevier LtdCurrent annealing, which utilizes high level of drain current during device fabrication, is proposed. A semiconductor device β-Ga2O3 field-effect transistor is preferred as test vehicle because of its inherently high drain current. With just a few seconds of current annealing, drain output performance can be boosted more than 50% without adding other processes. Both electrical measurements and numerical simulations are performed to investigate the annealing behavior. Especially, proposed substrate engineering to promote thermal isolation enables better power consumption during current annealing.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The formation of the crystalline organic polymer (OP) islands on top of double perovskite ferromagnetic La2Ni1–xMn1+xO6 (x = 0.4) thin films by RF sputtering is reported. The presence of randomly ramified organic polymer islands for film grown on top of SrTiO3 and LaAlO3 substrates suggest the fractal growth. The stability of fractal OP islands is tested by an in-situ oxygen annealing process as function of the annealing temperature. The evolution of the fractal structure of OP islands is followed in parallel with the evolution of structural and magnetic properties of LNMO thin films. The modification of the manganese valence state due to the presence of organic polymer fractals is studied by means of X-ray photoemission microscopy.© 2021 The Author(s)We report on the magnetic properties of geometrically frustrated K3CrO4, in which Cr5+ cations are arranged on a distorted pyrochlore lattice. The crystal structure, static and dynamic magnetic properties of the compound are investigated in detail. A combination of DC and AC magnetic susceptibility measurements together with thermoremanent magnetization decay measurements reveal several magnetic transitions: the onset of glassy canted antiferromagnetic order occurs at 36 K, followed by the appearance of ferromagnetic/ferrimagnetic cluster glass behavior below the freezing temperature of 20 K. Further field-induced, temperature-dependent transitions are observed in the range 3–10 K. The frequency dependence of the freezing temperature for the cluster glass state is analyzed on the basis of dynamic scaling laws including the critical slowing down formula and the Vogel-Fulcher law.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We propose a new mechanism of magnetization switching in magnetic nanosize samples originating from the interaction of incident circularly polarized electromagnetic wave with the electrons. Our mechanism is based on electrostatic interaction and spin–orbit interaction of the electrons and electrical field of the incident wave. The performed estimation shows that a realistic magnitude of laser electromagnetic wave is enough to induce magnetization switching. The dependence of this phenomenon on the frequency of the radiation and the parameters of electron band structure is analyzed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present the structural characterization, valence change of Fe, Raman spectra, and magnetic and microwave shielding properties of polycrystalline SrFe12-xZnxO19 (x = 0–1) samples. X-ray diffraction and Raman analyses indicated the samples having the M-type hexaferrite structure. The Zn doping caused a remarkable change in the lattice constants. Investigating magnetic hysteresis loops, we found an enhanced saturation magnetization (Ms) as increasing x from 0 to 0.1, and a reduced Ms as x > 0.1. Nearly the same tendency was also observed for the coercive force. Such changes have been thought to the Zn substitution and the valence change of Fe, as affirmed from analyzing the X-ray absorption data. Considering the shielding properties, we observed the samples with a thickness of 1.8 mm showing a low reflection loss. Among the investigated samples, the sample with x = 0.4 had the lowest reflection loss of about −20 dB at frequency of 11.7 GHz, corresponding to ~99% microwave energy being absorbed. We have considered that both dielectric and magnetic losses contribute to the microwave-absorption properties of SrFe12-xZnxO19.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The influence of microwave resonance phenomena on the transmission and reflection coefficients in a nanocomposite sample based on the opal matrix with embedded cobalt and palladium particles at frequencies from 26 to 38 GHz has been experimentally studied. With changing magnetic field, strong resonant-type variations in the transmission and reflection coefficients have been revealed. These variations have been found to be caused by both high efficiency of interaction of the millimetre-range electromagnetic waves with the nanocomposite, in particular, under the ferromagnetic resonance condition, and fulfilment of the geometric resonance conditions. At that, the geometric resonances are caused by the interference of waves that propagate in the plate towards each other and arise when an integer number of half wavelengths fit within the plate thickness. It has been shown that the half-wave geometric resonance can lead to a large, up to 100%, increase in the reflection coefficient of microwaves under the fulfilment of the ferromagnetic antiresonance condition.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Hot-pressed and hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets are generally made from rapidly quenched powder after crystallization treatment. In this work, the amorphous melt-spun ribbons are also employed directly as the precursor. The amorphous and crystallized powders with the composition of Nd28.47Pr0.56FebalB0.97Co3.63Al0.13Nb0.56Zr0.44 were employed for fabricating hot-pressed and hot-deformed magnets. The influences of processing parameters on the microstructure and magnetic properties have been investigated. For the hot-pressed magnets produced from both crystallized and amorphous powders, the grain pre-orientation and magnetic properties including coercivity, remanence and maximum energy product increase with the increasing temperature, pressure and holding time in the ranges of 650–800 °C, 300–600 MPa and 30–150 min, respectively. The hard magnetic properties of the hot-pressed magnets obtained from amorphous powder are slightly higher than those from crystalline powder due to the smaller grain size of the former. The magnetic properties of hot-deformed magnets are mainly determined by the deformation temperature and not influenced by the state of the powder and hot-pressed precursors. The hot-pressed magnets and hot deformed magnets with different microstructures exhibit different magnetization mechanisms. The optimal hot-deformation temperature is found to be 750 °C for obtaining a high maximum energy product of 39 MGOe. The present results suggest that the rapidly quenched amorphous powder can be used to not only directly prepare hot-pressed magnets with higher magnetic properties, but also to reduce the process step for hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report the structural and magnetic properties of Ca3-xDyxCo2O6 (x = 0, 0.1, 0.2, and 0.3). We found evidence of Cluster-glass (CG)-like freezing phenomena in these samples. The isothermal magnetization curve depicts step-like change indicative of the first-order transition, which decreases with the increase of substitution. The Brillouin function was used to determine the ‘spins’, participating at this first-order transition [Formula presented]. Relaxation measurements revealed the existence of short-range Cluster-glass-like behavior. Analyzing the results using Vogel-Fulcher law shows that the Vogel-Fulcher temperature (T0) and the relaxation time is around 10 K and 104 s, respectively.© 2021 Elsevier LtdA drift-diffusion approach to coupled spin and charge transport has been commonly applied to determine the spin-transfer torque acting on the magnetization in metallic valves. This approach, however, is not suitable to describe the predominant tunnel transport in magnetic tunnel junctions. In this work we present a coupled Finite Element solution to the spin and charge drift–diffusion equations. We demonstrate that by introducing a magnetization dependent resistivity one can successfully reproduce the resistance dependence on the magnetization orientation in the ferromagnetic layers. We then investigate the dependence of the resulting torques on system parameters, and show that the approach is able to reproduce the torque magnitude expected in a magnetic tunnel junction. As a unique set of equations is used for the entire structure, this constitutes an efficient Finite Element based approach to describe the magnetization dynamics in emerging spin-transfer torque memories.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe demonstrate by means of numerical simulations the switching of a perpendicularly magnetized free layer by spin–orbit torques based on a two-pulse switching scheme with improved writing power efficiency. In this scheme, the first pulse selects the cell, while the second pulse completes the switching deterministically. It is shown that the magnitude of the second current pulse can be reduced to about 50% of the critical current and the switching remains reliable with a switching time of 300 ps. With such a significant current reduction the writing power required for switching decreases by 40%, which results in a very energy efficient scheme. In addition, we develop a reinforcement learning approach to optimize the pulse configuration with the goal of achieving the shortest switching time. With this approach a switching time of 146 ps has been obtained, a reduction of 50% in relation to the non-optimized configuration. These research findings confirm that reinforcement learning is a promising tool to simplify and automate the search for a faster, energy efficient scheme in the two-pulse switching approach.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The permanent magnets in this study include the advantages of conventional bonded magnets, and the position of the N (S) poles can be set arbitrarily. This property is realized by using a viscoelastic fluid embedded with magnetization and applying an external magnetic field by another permanent magnet. If the material is modeled into the appropriate shape when an external magnetic field is applied based on the techniques in this study, it contains the potential to create permanent magnets that can achieve any magnetic field (H) envisioned by the user. The possibility of creating permanent magnets that are flexible in terms of the magnetic poles and shape of the molded material (especially compared to bonded magnets) is investigated. As the results, the hardening of the magnetized visco-elastic liquid creates a permanent magnet with identical poles in the same symmetrical direction on an axis. And the identical pole magnet have three peaks in terms of flux density on the surface considered that the reasons of control effect by other permanent magnet on the outside, shift of edge effect and switching magnetic poles in the edge.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe investigate the interplay between the series (S) and parallel (P) equivalent circuit representations of the MOS system conductance (G) and capacitance (C) in inversion. Experimental and simulated data for Si and InGaAs MOSCAPs are firstly analyzed mathematically. It is found that by interpreting the measured data in both the series and parallel mode, five independent values are obtained for the magnitude and frequency of the maxima and minima points of the −ωdCS,P/dω and GS,P/ω functions versus angular frequency (ω). The significance and application of the approach is presented and discussed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.BiFeO3 is a well-known room temperature multiferroic material. However, the presence of antiferromagnetic magnetic order and high leakage current limit its utilization in magnetoelectric devices. This study deals with conclusive identification of the presence of magnetoelectric coupling by carefully selecting higher bond strength cationic substitution and using contactless measurement. Complementary to the magnetic studies, detailed structural analyses are carried out to determine the B-site bond length, B-site bond angle, ionic size mismatch and electronic structure of the substituent. The structural modification due to cationic substitution leads to release of latent magnetization that is locked within the cycloid. Non-monotonic temperature dependence of magnetic coercivity is observed and the results are confirmed for various compositions. These results are explained using Ginzburg-Landau Mean field model. Crossover from anomalous to usual trend of magnetic coercivity as a function of temperature is presented covering the temperature regime beyond Neel temperature of BiFeO3. Results are explained in terms of effective anisotropy which includes contribution associated with the electric polarization. This proves the existence of magnetoelectric effect. Magnetic switching is shown to be affected by the presence of ferroelectric order. The inclusion of normal ferromagnetic response in the high temperature regime makes this a unique study. The importance of this study lies in the fact that such magnetoelectric characteristic cannot be explored through the conventional electrical response measurements as the presence of high leakage current in BFO makes such measurements extremely difficult.© 2021 Elsevier LtdDipole layers can be formed at epitaxial interfaces of perovskite oxides by intentionally inserting charged atomic layers. Perovskite oxides such as SrTiO3 (STO) can provide dielectrics with very high dielectric constants, but their bandgaps are so small that the suppression of leakage current is one of the critical issues when they are applied for DRAM capacitors. However, their conduction band offset will be manipulated if we can control the dipole layer formation. In this study, we investigated the opportunities of band alignment manipulation using the interface dipole effect especially focusing on the number of charge-introducing atomic layers. STO/LaAlO3 (LAO)/SrRuO3(SRO) stacks were fabricated by pulsed laser deposition method, to demonstrate the modulation of the band alignment at STO/SRO interface as large as ± 0.5 eV, when we change the number of inserted atomic layers of LAO.© 2021 Elsevier LtdCMOS circuits for Quantum Computing applications require FETs operating at cryogenic temperatures. In this work, we aim to present one of the first insights on the ability of the industry standard compact model BSIMCMG in capturing low temperature device physics. We have performed wafer-level DC-IV measurements on multi-fin n- channel bulk FinFETs with 3–4 nm wide fins and down to 20 nm designed gate length across a range of temperatures spanning from 393 K down to 4 K. Our initial results show that while our model to hardware correlation at room temperature is acceptable, at cryogenic temperatures the model may need improvement, especially in the saturation region of the device operation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic skyrmionium composed of two skyrmions with opposite topological charges shows the advantages of high mobility and no skyrmion Hall effect. However, the defects of practical materials are inevitable, which could influence the dynamics of the skyrmionium and even destroy its magnetic structure. Herein, we theoretically investigate the motion of the skyrmionium driven by spin waves on a racetrack with vacancy defects. Three modes of the motion (reflection, pinning, and depinning) are found by adjusting the size of defects, the amplitude and frequency of spin waves. When the defect radius Rd ≥ Rc, the skyrmionium is reflected along the direction of spin waves source and stops in front of the defect after a round-trip oscillation, ascribed to the competition between the driving force induced by spin waves and the potential well induced by defects. When the defect radius Rd < Rc, the skyrmionium can be pinned in the position of the defects, where the energy provided by spin waves is consumed by the wiggling of the skyrmionium. And the depinning of skyrmionium can be realized by increasing the driving force of spin waves, overcoming the energy barriers induced by defects. Our results provide an insight into the interaction between the skyrmionium and defects, which could be used to guide the design of the skyrmionium-based spintronic devices in practical materials.© 2021To sustain transistor scaling beyond lateral 7 nm devices, gate-all-around (GAA) junctionless vertical nanowire field effect transistors (JLNT) are one of the promising alternatives. To overcome the roadblocks of logic cell design using this emerging technology, this work explores compact modeling of 3D GAA-JLNTs based on physics of junctionless transport. The model features an explicit continuous analytical form of drain current calculations adapted for a 14 nm channel junctionless nanowire transistor (JLNT) technology and has been validated against extensive characterization results on a wide range of JLNT geometry, depicting good accuracy. Finally, preliminary simulations have been explored for performance assessment of logic circuits, such as inverters with passive load, active load and complementary topologies as well as ring oscillators, designed using the developed JLNT compact model.© 2021Low frequency noise (LFN) studies are carried out on n-channel gate all around nanowire (GAA NW) FETs. Measurements both as a function of applied polarisation at fixed temperature and conserving the same drain current bias points as a function of temperature are performed, to investigate the predominant flicker noise fluctuation mechanism and to execute low frequency noise spectroscopy allowing to identify the active traps in the depletion area of the devices. The good correlation between the normalized drain current noise SId / Id2 and the transconductance to drain current ratio squared (gm/Id)2 enables to establish that the 1/f noise is related to the carrier number fluctuations mechanisms for all investigated temperatures. The study of the generation recombination (GR) noise as a function of temperature confirms the presence of a GR component for which the characteristic frequency is independent on the applied voltage and present variation with the temperature, suggesting that they are related to active traps located in the Si film. Active traps related to hydrogen and divacancies were identified.© 2021 The AuthorsTCAD simulations of SiC power MOSFETs have been performed to study the dependence of positive-bias temperature instability (PBTI) on temperature and electric field. The model used to describe the kinetics of the transition rates between neutral and charged traps is the extended Non-Radiative Multi Phonon (eNMP). Connections between oxide defect configurations at the interface with SiC substrate have been made. Validation against experiments is shown.© 2021 Elsevier LtdSpin-transfer torque magnetic random-access memory (STT-MRAM) is considered as a premiere candidate for replacing conventional six-transistors static random-access memory (6T-SRAM) in processor caches. This paper explores STT-MRAMs based on double-barrier magnetic tunnel junction with two reference layers (DMTJ), while operating at cryogenic temperatures (77 K). To deal with large dynamc energy and long latency of write operation, we suggest to significantly relax the non-volatility requirement of DMTJ devices at room temperature by reducing the cross-section area, while maintaining the typical 10-years retention time at the target operating temperature. This leads the cryogenic DMTJ-based STT-MRAM to be more energy-efficient than its 6T-SRAM counterpart under both read and write operations, while exhibiting smaller area footprint.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic drug targeting (MDT) is gaining more attention in cancer therapy due to its capability in reducing chemotherapy's side effects. Utilizing an appropriate model for tumorous vasculature is important since morphological alterations occur in tumor's microenvironment. In this study, a 2D computational model based on finite element method was used to simulate magnetic nanoparticles' (MNP) trajectories in the presence of an external arrayed permanent magnet. Considering differences between healthy and tumorous vasculatures, we have studied three geometry-close permanent magnets creating six different modes of magnetic field distributions (MFD), and the conductivity of MNPs with three different diameters. In this study, we have described capture efficiency, fallout coefficient, and MDT efficiency ratio to evaluate the performance of magnetic drug targeting method and acceptable results were obtained when the mixture of differently sized MNPs were released in a specific order. We observed that at best the MDT efficiency ratio improved by 2.2 times in a healthy vasculature, and by 2.4 times in a tumorous vasculature compared to the case where there was no MFD.© 2021In this work, a current-to-transconductance ratio technique is proposed for simultaneous extraction of the threshold voltage (VT) and parasitic source (RS) and drain (RD) resistances in short channel metal–oxide–semiconductor field-effect transistors (MOSFETs). The proposed technique allows simultaneous extraction of RS, RD, and VT in any single MOSFET with the channel length modulation (CLM) and the structural asymmetry. The proposed method is experimentally verified through Si MOSFETs with intentional asymmetry by connecting an external resistor (Rext) to the source terminal. We experimentally confirmed that extracted RS, RD, and VT are independent of the drain bias (VDS) and intentional Rext employed for the asymmetry. We also compared the results with previously reported techniques.© 2021We propose a physical model of complementary resistive switching (CRS) based on the disruption and reformation process of a metallic filament inside each Oxyde Resistive Random Access Memory (OxRRAM) composing the CRS. The driving forces involved in this process are electromigration forces, electron phonon coupling and joule heating. The model accounts well for the experimental CRS current voltage characteristics. The stability of the CRS states and the CRS operation in pulse regime, including the current and voltage peaks generation are discussed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we present the influence of the curvature of magnetic nanodot on the vortex gyrotropic mode frequency. We show that gyrotropic oscillation of the magnetic vortices is highly influenced by the rounding of the nanodot shape due to the formation of the apex and single domain state in the upper part of the dot. The curved shape of nanodot could arise during the fabrication process of the nanodots, i.e., during lithography. We find that strong dependence of the gyrotropic mode frequency on curvature parameter is related to magnetic phase transition: from vortex to out-of-plane state. The found effect can be used, e.g., for the design of the spin torque nano oscillators.© 2021 The Author(s)In this article, we compare 3-D finite element models of a soft magnetic composite (SMC) material to 2-D models, obtained by slicing some 2-D intersections of the 3-D geometries, in terms of magnetization curves and losses. A 3-D nonlinear static model, providing computational B-H curves, is compared to two 2-D models, one with the magnetic field parallel to the 2-D plane, and the other with the magnetic field perpendicular to the 2-D plane. We find that the 2-D models provide largely inconsistent results with the 3-D model. A 3-D time-harmonic model, providing computational effective permeabilities and losses, is compared to two 2-D models, one with the magnetic field parallel to the 2-D plane, and the other with the magnetic field perpendicular to the 2-D plane. We find that the 2-D models provide largely inconsistent results with the 3-D model, with an exception of the computational losses of the 2-D model, with the magnetic field perpendicular to the plane, almost agreeing with the computational losses provided by the 3-D model. However, the computational permeabilities do not match in these two models. This article proposes to be very critical before publishing 2-D models of SMC materials without a proper justification by symmetry.© 2021A novel, low temperature process for the formation of Si-BC8 phase is obtained while growing Silicon nanowires. The nanowires growth is performed in a CVD reactor under exposure of the substrate to microwaves, employing Sn nanospheres as catalyst and a flux of SiH4 as precursor, respectively. Microwaves allow for selective heating of the metal catalyst while keeping the substrate at low temperature. At the end of the process, silicon nanowires with the metal sphere on top are obtained, together with the (unexpected) transition of a portion of silicon substrate from the diamond to the Si-BC8 crystallographic phase. Silicon atoms in Si-BC8 phase are arranged in body-centered-cubic unit cells resulting into a different energy-wavevector diagram compared to the silicon diamond cubic phase. Indeed, Si-BC8 possesses a direct band gap as low as 30 meV at room temperature. These features may be employed in a large variety of applications, requiring CMOS-compatible manufacturing. Systematic structural analysis and a phenomenological model for Si-BC8 phase formation are discussed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Recently, preparation of lightweight absorbers with high performance capability are urgently needed for practical demanded in order to solve the severe electromagnetic pollution. In the present study, two different composites (Fe3O4/carbon fiber and Fe3O4/rGO) were uniformly incorporated into resin epoxy matrix to obtain single and double layer X-band absorber with 20 wt% filler loading. Each of the composites were prepared via solvothermal process. According to the results, the minimum reflection loss values for each single layer Fe3O4/carbon fiber and Fe3O4/rGO absorber were −15 dB (3 mm thickness and 1.5 GHz bandwidth) and −50 dB (3 mm thickness and 4 GHz bandwidth) respectively. By assembling two-layer absorber in which Fe3O4/rGO composite placed at upper layer and Fe3O4/carbon fiber composite placed at bottom layer the minimum reflection loss reached to −52 dB (total thickness 2 mm and 4 GHz bandwidth). The special design of the absorber optimizes the thickness by improving the impedance matching characteristic. The results show that Fe3O4/rGO composite with high dielectric loss as an upper layer and Fe3O4/carbon fiber composite with high magnetic loss as bottom layer can be used as matching and absorber layer, respectively.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we have studied the set and the reset transitions in hafnium oxide-based metal–insulator-metal ReRAM devices using a capacitor discharge. Instead of applying a conventional voltage or current signal, we have discharged a capacitor through the devices to perform both transitions. In this way, both transitions are shown to be controllable. An accumulative process is observed if we apply consecutive discharges, and, when increasing the capacitor voltage in each discharge, the transitions between both resistance states are complete. In addition, it has been shown that faster transitions require larger capacitor voltages.© 2021 Elsevier LtdElectron trapping in ferroelectric and non-ferroelectric HfO2-based layers was studied at room temperature by charge injection and photodepopulation techniques. The comparison of inferred energy distribution and density of trapped electrons in differently processed samples shows insignificant impact of Al- and Si-doping on trapping properties suggesting intrinsic nature of the observed traps. A comparison to the HfZrO4 layers is provided. The volume concentration of deep traps, most of which are energetically distributed between 2 and 3.5 eV below the HfO2 conduction band, is found to be in the range of 1019 cm−3.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Field-induced domain wall motion has been observed in quasi-perpendicularly magnetized Pt/Co/Pt trilayers with interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (iDMI) using differential Kerr microscopy method in the creep regime. An oblique angle sputter deposition technique had introduced a thickness gradient in one of the layers of a trilyer, results in a small tilt of magnetic anisotropy from the film normal. The tilt angle has been estimated in each trilayer by determining the shift in the out-of-plane magnetization hysteresis measurements under bias magnetic field applied along various in-plane directions. The effective in-plane field at the domain wall due to iDMI has been determined by decomposing the symmetric and asymmetric contributions of the domain wall motion. Furthermore, the asymmetric contribution has been decomposed into two contributions due to the tilted magnetic anisotropy and the exponentially decaying chiral damping. The nature of the asymmetric contribution owing to the tilted anisotropy was studied by the collective coordinate model and a functional form of the total asymmetric contribution has been determined and used to fit the asymmetric contribution.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Core–shell nanoarchitectures are novel classes of nonstructural materials for their capacious applications. Iron (Fe) electrodeposited inside Cobalt-Nickle (CoNi) alloy nanotubes (NTs) were synthesized using two-step DC electrodeposition method within the nanopores of anodized aluminum oxide (AAO) template. The X-ray diffraction and electron microscopy confirm the presence of body-centred cubic (bcc) phase structure for Fe and face-centered cubic (fcc) for CoNi at core and shell region respectively. A comparative study of magnetization reversal mechanism has been done by verifying the angular dependence of coercivity which further in terms of thermal activation over an energy barrier with a 3/2 power dependence on the field. Furthermore, the parallel magnetization per unit area (MS/A) is found to be strongly dependent on the diameter of AAO templates, which shows a linear response as the diameter increases.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic material is one of the basic materials in industrial production and whose mechanical properties are key indicators to evaluate quality. At present, incremental permeability (IP), one method of nondestructive testing, is used in the mechanical properties testing field of ferromagnetic materials, but its 3D simulation prediction model and method have not been established. To solve this problem, a finite element simulation method for mechanical properties of ferromagnetic materials based on Jiles-Atherton (JA) hysteresis model was proposed in this paper, which is established on the basis of the experimental method of electromagnetic nondestructive testing via incremental permeability. In this paper, the finite element 3D simulation prediction model based on IP method is proposed. Besides, the difficulty in JA hysteresis model parameter measurement is solved by combining magnetic-force method and artificial fish swarm algorithm. The 3D simulation prediction model is applied to the yield strength prediction of ferromagnetic materials for the first time. By testing the yield strength of the material, the simulation method and 3D simulation prediction model proposed in this paper can accurately reflect the incremental permeability characteristics of real materials and can provide a simulation platform for testing the mechanical properties of ferromagnetic materials via IP method.© 2021Zinc ferrite (ZnFe2O4) magnetic nanowires with different lengths (6.3, 2.3, and 1.2 μm) and different average diameters (30, 38, 48, and 58 nm) were made in anodic aluminum oxide (AAO) templates by AC pulse electrodepositing method. In order to investigate structural, morphological, magnetic and optical characteristics of the nanowires, XRD, FESEM, EDS, and FTIR analyses as well as UV–vis spectroscopy and VSM were used. Combined XRD patterns with EDS analysis revealed that zinc ferrite was formed with a cubic spinel structure. Investigation of magnetic properties revealed that by increasing the length and diameter of the nanowires, due to increasing magnetostatic interaction between the wires, the transfer of magnetic structure from a single-domain to a multi-domain state is possible, resulting in a decrease in coercivity and squareness ratio. UV–vis spectroscopy results showed that the optical band gap of zinc ferrite nanowires is about 1.94 eV, which is in the visible light range.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, new analytical rogue wave solutions are first derived for the Kraenkel–Manna–Merle (KMM) system in ferrites by the truncated Painlevé method. Two free functions, which are respectively space and time variables, are involved in the solutions, and can be utilized to generate certain perturbations to the rogue waves. As the two functions are taken as trigonometric cosine functions, the novel periodic oscillation rogue waves can be observed. Further, it is found that the amplitude and frequency parameters of these cosine functions play crucial roles during the oscillation. The rogue waves can be separated into two symmetric ones by adjusting the amplitude parameter, while the rogue waves can be divided into many peaks and troughs by changing frequency parameter. Besides, both the amplitude and frequency parameters are also highly sensitive to the amplitude of the oscillation rogue waves. A series of figures and data are illustrated these new features.© 2021 Elsevier LtdDual gated 2ML WS2 MOS Capacitors have been fabricated with capacitance values as high as 2.7uF/cm2 (with single sheet charge centroid assumption for the WS2 channel). Frequency and temperature dependent C-V measurements were correlated with simulations to extract the interface trap density-energy (DIT(E)) profile. We observe an exponentially decaying defect distribution from the conduction band (EC) edge with a magnitude of 8 × 1013 cm−2 eV−1 and an inverse slope of 0.12 eV and a similar distribution with a peak magnitude of 1.2 × 1014 cm−2 eV−1 from the valence band (EV) edge with an inverse slope of 0.12 eV.© 2021 Elsevier LtdA compact charge model for Si gate-all-around n-type metal-oxide-semiconductor capacitors (nMOSCAPs) with cylindrical cross-sections including the quantum confinement effect is presented. The density-gradient equation with a penetrating boundary condition is integrated to consider the quantum confinement effect. From the integrated equation, an expression for the surface potential is derived, and a compact charge model is presented. To calculate the charge–voltage characteristics, parameter modeling for terms related to quantum correction is done. The results from the model for various radii show excellent agreement with numerical simulations.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The crystal growth and the structural, transport and magnetic properties of YbMn2Sb2 single crystals are reported. The crystals show a trigonal symmetry of La2O2S-type structure (space group P3¯m1, N. 164, hP5), where corrugated honeycomb layers of MnSb are separated by Yb atoms. No structural phase transition was observed down to 22 K. The resistivity measurements show a predominantly insulating behavior. The combined resistivity, dc susceptibility and specific heat measurements confirm successive features at 40 K, 116 K and 225 K, being the phase transition at TN=116 K due to the Mn+2 lattice antiferromagnetic ordering. Muon spin rotation experiments (μSR) reveal a more complicated scenario, with temperature dependence of the magnetic volume fraction reflecting a static and strongly disordered magnetic ground state. The role of spin–lattice coupling and its relationship with exchange interactions between Mn moments is discussed as a possible cause of the magnetic behavior observed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Although microfluidic devices are widely used for pathogen separation, they are highly sensitive to operating conditions which restricts its applications. Here, a magnetophoretic microfluidic device that benefits from characteristics of electroosmotic flow is described. The device is capable of separating magnetic particles (MPs) from human blood in considerably wide ranges of conditions with a perfect efficiency. The device includes two adjacent fluidic channels for the injection of blood containing particle-bonded pathogens and the buffer solution with a slit at the middle for shifting particles to the outlet. Integrating a conductive surface across the slit creates a manageable flow vortex that assists magnetic field to overcome drag force of particles and boosts their upward movement towards the slit. Obtained results indicate that by adjusting the strength of magnetic field and electric potential, a perfect on-chip separation is achievable for particles in the size range of 100 nm to 2.5 µm. Being significantly efficient in such a large range of operating conditions makes the device extremely versatile for targeting various particle-bonded pathogens.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents a study of the physicochemical and the dielectric characteristics of capacitor structures, with an organosilicate polymer fabricated by initiated chemical vapor deposition as dielectric. The polymer evaluated is the poly(trivinyltrimethylcyclotrisiloxane), and a comparative study on different bottom electrodes was performed. Preliminary results demonstrate that iCVD technique permits the deposition of low roughness, low defect and uniform polymer films, and the dielectric fabricated exhibits a high breakdown field and an original dielectric behaviour, which makes it a prominent candidate for high voltage 3D capacitors.© 2021 Elsevier LtdResistive switching random access memories are being thoroughly studied as prospective non-volatile memories. In this paper, we report electrical characterization of HfO2:Al2O3based metal-insulator–metal structures devised using atomic layer deposition. Dependences of electrical behavior on HfO2:Al2O3 cycle ratio is studied. An explanation for the differences between the Resistive Switching properties of the samples is proposed, based on the distribution of HfAlOx layers of the sample. Dependence of the RS properties of the samples on their growth temperature is discussed.© 2021Domain wall dynamics in highly magnetostrictive microwires is remarkably sensitive to thermal treatment. One of the reasons is a partial release of the internal stresses that originate during the production process. Another reason is an interaction of the domain wall with local pinning sites, such as surface inhomogeneities, free volumes, or clusters of ferromagnetic atoms, present in as-cast microwires. However, the observation of domain wall shape variations after thermal treatment or following an interaction with a pinning site is challenging. In this paper, we utilize the magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) to locally map the domain wall shape and velocity in cylindrical microwires. The domain wall is trapped in a magnetic potential well, moving back and forth with limited speed. Two complementary techniques are employed in the study: a laser-based setup and time-resolved MOKE microscopy. Different kinds of domain wall propagation are observed. While a planar domain wall propagates synchronously with the potential well, surface pinning gives rise to local jumps and distortions of the domain wall. We relate the first kind of motion to the pinning-free propagation of the domain wall and the second to the propagation of a distorted wall. Finally, local speed and the shapes of the domain wall before and after the introduction of an artificial pinning site are compared.© 2021The electrostatic discharge (ESD) protection is one of the main challenges for fully depleted silicon on insulator (FD-SOI) CMOS technologies. Several valuable solutions are already today using a BigMOS central clamp or a local protection. In the attempt to find an optimized solution, it is interesting to evaluate a BIMOS protection in thin silicon film according to a new design solution and new associated integration. In this paper, 28 nm FD-SOI standard topology thin silicon film Bipolar MOS (BIMOS) devices with its external bias resistance and reverse diode is proposed. Moreover, the initial design has been modified by including the resistance and diode as embedded elements inside the BIMOS transistor leading to a novel design and topology solution. The solution aims at reducing the silicon area but also to keep the targeted ESD and DC performances. In addition, silicon demonstrators have been fabricated, characterized and discussed. It appears that the new solution is not only functional but it can be tuned according to the ESD technology window. Finally, this proposed solution can easily be transferred to another technology node just by changing the size of parameters.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Since some p-type ZnOs show the ferromagnetic magnetization increasing with the temperature in a wide temperature range, we proposed a theoretical model to simulate the observed negative temperature-dependent magnetization. This model assumes that ferromagnetism appears from the electrons located in the dopant-induced localized impurity states in the bandgap and near the valence band edge. The strong Coulomb excitation among the electrons in the impurity states leads to spin split resulting in ferromagnetism.© 2021In this work, we review progress in III-V transistor technologies. Key approaches for silicon integration are described, with a distinction being made between large area layer transfer and selective growth techniques. We show how the integration approach must be tailored for the intended application to maximize performance, functionality and minimize cost. We also highlight performance boosters such as heterostructure channel stacks, which offer increased carrier mobility towards improved RF and RF-CMOS performance. Recent progress in tunneling field-effect transistors (TFETs) have enabled the TFET architecture as a process module, allowing for dense integration with MOSFETs on the same chip towards an extremely low-power CMOS technology. Finally, we highlight emerging applications for III-V devices at cryogenic temperatures, where there is a rising need for low-power electronics to support the scaling of quantum computers. The unique properties of III-V, their high mobility and band gap engineering make them highly suitable for this application.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Heusler compounds and alloys based on them are of great recent interest because they exhibit a wide variety of spin structures, magnetic properties, and electron-transport phenomena. Their properties are tunable by alloying and we have investigated L21-orderd compound Ru2MnSn and its alloys by varying the atomic Mn:Sn composition. While antiferromagnetic ordering with a Néel temperature of 361 K was observed in Ru2MnSn, the Mn-poor Ru2Mn0.8Sn1.2 alloy exhibits properties of a diluted antiferromagnet in which there are localized regions of uncompensated Mn spins. Furthermore, a noncoplanar spin structure, evident from a topological Hall-effect contribution to the room-temperature Hall resistivity, is realized in Ru2Mn0.8Sn1.2. Our combined experimental and theoretical analysis shows that in the Ru2Mn0.8Sn1.2 alloy, the magnetic properties can be explained in terms of a noncoplanar antiferromagnetic scissor mode, which creates a small net magnetization in a magnetic field and subsequently yields a Berry curvature with a strong topological Hall effect.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this paper a split-gate LDMOS transistor is investigated. A dedicated terminal, namely split-gate, is introduced in order to control the field plate region separately with respect to the channel region. The performances of the device, in terms of on-resistance, breakdown voltage and capacitances, are compared with those of a conventional device. The hot-carrier-induced degradation of the device is also investigated, highlighting the influence of the split-gate voltage. This work allows identifying a tradeoff between the performance and reliability of the component, which is controlled by the voltage applied to the split-gate terminal.© 2021 Elsevier LtdLead-free magnetoelectric (ME) composites comprises NiFe2O4 (NFO) and BaZr0.2Ti0.8O3 (BZT) were synthesized by using conventional double sintering solid-state reaction technique and it's structural, electric, dielectric, magnetic and ME properties were studied. The spectra of X-ray diffraction displayed the formation of parent phase and presence of two phases within the composites (ferrite-ferroelectric). DC resistivity as a function of temperature has been studied, it indicates the semiconducting behavior. Frequency dependent dielectric spectra of the composites indicates small polaron hopping model of conduction mechanism. Magnetic measurements at room temperature shows the composites are soft magnetic and such materials reveals M-H hysteresis type behavior. The composite with x = 0.3 showed the highest value of ME voltage coefficient ~3.82 mV/cmOe. Such ME composite materials furnish fabulous chances as prospective lead-free systems for multifunctional device applications.© 2021 Elsevier LtdMagnetic-field dependent geometrical magnetoresistance measurements and high-resolution mobility spectrum analysis have been employed to characterise the inversion-layer electron mobility distribution in fully-depleted silicon-on-insulator MOS transistors. The results reveal that the room-temperature electron population in the 12 nm thick Si channel layer is characterised by a broad electron mobility distribution that significantly departs from the ideal single-value discrete carrier approximation. At temperatures below 60 K, the linewidth of the distribution is shown to become significantly narrower, approaching a delta-like function at 30 K. Self-consistent Schrödinger-Poisson numerical calculations suggest that, since the total carrier population at 295 K is comprised of electrons in the ground-state level of the two subband ladders, intervalley scattering and phonon scattering will significantly influence the linewidth of the mobility distribution in the transistor channel. To the best of our knowledge, electron mobility distributions in Si-based devices have not been previously studied nor resolved in such detail.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetostrictive materials are potential candidates for many applications such as sensors, actuators, transducers, and other magnetoelectric applications. Cobalt Ferrite (CoFe2O4) has proven to be favourable in comparison to commonly used magnetostrictive materials due to its high magnetostriction coefficient and it's preparation being cost effective. This work deals with the preparation of CoFe2O4 (CFO) using four different wet chemical synthesis techniques in the form of autocombustion, co-precipitation, sol–gel and hydrothermal methods. Same conditions of heat treatment have been maintained for all the methods which facilitates a fair comparison of the performance of the samples prepared by various methods. The prepared CFO samples were subjected to subsequent characterization of their structural, magnetic, magnetostrictive and magnetoelectric properties. Static and dynamic magnetoelectric measurements were carried out on trilayered composites comprising of CFO synthesized by hydrothermal and sol–gel methods. Effect of in-plane and transverse compressive stress on the magnetoelectric response of CFO/PZT/CFO trilayered structure have been studied. All the experimental characterisations indicated the sample synthesized by hydrothermal method to yield better properties. The results thus reveal the importance of synthesis route towards attaining an improved magnetic, magnetostrictive and magnetoelectric properties of CFO.© 2021In this work, we fabricated the transmission line model test structures of Ti/Al/Ni/Au Ohmic contact on the lattice-matched In0.17Al0.83 N/GaN heterostructures, grown on the silicon and sapphire substrates respectively, and studied the temperature-dependent characteristics of the sheet resistance (Rsh) and the specific contact resistivity (ρSC). The ln(Rsh)-ln(T) plot has two distinct linearly dependent regions: 1) At T < 200 K, the slope is close to zero, indicating the comparable impurity and phonon scattering components; 2) At T > 200 K, it becomes much smaller than zero, as the phonon scattering effect becomes significant. Increasing the temperature from 100 K to 523 K, ρSC exhibits a typical roll-over behavior: 1) At T < 350 K, a “metal-like” property is important, featuring a power-law coefficient of α ~ 1.95, which is ascribed to the formation of TiN protrusions across the InAlN barrier after the rapid thermal annealing; 2) At T > 350 K, a thermionic field emission current model agrees well with the experimental data points, and the effective barrier heights are extracted to be about 1.21 eV and 0.81 eV for the samples on the silicon and sapphire substrates, respectively.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The changes of longitudinal spin Seebeck (LSSE) voltage with annealing temperature Ta and time in Y3Fe5O12 (YIG) films formed by densely packed nanocrystals on a Si substrate have been investigate. The value of thermoelectric performance (TP) decreases monotonically with increasing Ta from 1073 K to 1273 K, and it decreases by up to 24% (64%) in the YIG films with Pt = 5 nm (10 nm). The decreased TP is also observed with increasing annealing time. These results indicate that the microstructural changes in the YIG films by annealing temperature and time are caused the decreased TP, which are corresponded with a reduced coherence of the magnons in the YIG films.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The structures and magnetic properties of SmFe5−xTix (x = 0–1) melt-spun ribbons were studied. The specimens without Ti and with a Ti content of 0.4 or lower contained the metastable SmFe5 phase, whereas the specimens with a Ti content of 0.6–1 did not contain the SmFe5 phase but consisted of another metastable phase, namely, the Sm5Fe17 phase. It was found that the specimens with a Ti content of 0.8–1 also consisted of the Fe2Ti phase. Although the specimens with the metastable SmFe5 phase did not show a high coercivity, the specimens with the metastable Sm5Fe17 phase showed greatly increased coercivity, with the SmFe4.2Ti0.8 specimen exhibiting a high coercivity exceeding 20 kOe.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this work, the DC behavior of AlGaN/GaN Metal-Insulator-Semiconductor high electron mobility transistors (MO(I)SHEMTs) with two different gate dielectrics (Al2O3 and Si3N4) is analyzed through the experimental comparison of their basic and analog parameters. The transistors with Si3N4 insulator are more closely related to the normally-off devices (less negative threshold voltage) and less affected by the short channel effects (better DIBL behavior). Although the devices with Si3N4 layer presented a double conduction, that results in anomalous transconductance behavior, it is more suitable for analog applications since the Al2O3 devices suffer large self-heating. The very high gate leakage of Si3N4 MISHEMT degrades the subthreshold regime, which decreases the transistor efficiency at weak inversion. On the other hand, the devices with Si3N4 insulator present relatively large Early voltage and consequently high intrinsic voltage gain in strong inversion, reaching 84 V/V (38.5 dB). Even at high temperatures the intrinsic voltage gain is practically the same, degrading only 1.5 dB from 25 °C to 150 °C for a long channel device.© 2021 Elsevier LtdNanoribbons built on gateless (GL) Ultra-Thin Body and Buried Oxide (UTBB) Back Enhanced SOI (BESOI) pMOSFET are analyzed as a charge-based (CB) biosensor for different sensing materials and device's dimensions. Experimental GL UTBB BESOI pMOSFET are used as a reference structure for the CB biosensor and the influence of different materials and the device's dimensions are studied by numerical simulations. CB biosensor presents higher sensitivities in weak inversion and for negative charges in the front gate oxide once that, for negative charges, the conduction at the front interface in BESOI pMOSFET is favored. An optimization is performed for negative charges and devices with thicker buried oxide (tBOX = 50 nm) and silicon channel (tSi = 20 nm) are more sensitive, improving the BESOI biosensor's sensitivity in 14% in weak inversion. The improvement in strong inversion is higher (38%) but the absolute value is three times lower. The nanoribbon GL BESOI pMOSFET showed to be a promising structure for an integrated charged based biosensor, which can be easily fabricated in conjunction with the signal processing circuit.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We study the magnetic hyperthermia efficiency of magnetite ferrofluids based on bio-friendly oils extracted from Calophyllum inophyllum (punnaga), Brassica juncea (mustard), Ricinus communis (castor) and Madhuca longifolia (iluppai) seeds. Reported medicinal uses of these bio-friendly oils make them interesting candidates for hyperthermia from a perspective of topical skin applications. Magneto-caloric experiments are performed at a fixed frequency of 126 kHz and varying field amplitudes of 33.1–25.7 kA/m. Experimental findings show that field induced heating efficiency is the highest for the punnaga oil based ferrofluids (~170.0 ± 8.2 W/gFe) and the estimated intrinsic loss power of ~ 1.26 nHm2kg−1 is found to be comparable to several commercially available ferrofluids. The obtained results further indicate that field induced heating efficiency increased by ~ 11 times on ~ 88% reduction in medium viscosity, which is due to the reduction in Brownian relaxation time of the dispersed magnetite nanoparticles at lower medium viscosity. Dynamic hysteresis loop simulations are carried out to theoretically estimate the heating efficiencies and the experimental and theoretical data are found to exhibit similar trends. The obtained results are beneficial for optimal design of bio-friendly oil based ferrofluids for possible topical hyperthermia applications over skin surfaces.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe parasitic bipolar effect in fully-depleted (FD) silicon-on-insulator (SOI) transistors is revisited including impact ionization and band-to-band tunneling. We tested the transfer characteristic curves for different temperature and drain voltage, combined with TCAD simulation to analyze the dominant mechanism of parasitic bipolar transistor (PBT). In addition, the influence of gate length on PBT has also been analyzed. The current gain β of the PBT was measured at different temperatures and drain voltages. Back-gate biasing was demonstrated to efficiently suppress the bipolar amplification. TCAD simulations showed that the parasitic bipolar effect enhanced the leakage power in circuits. A strategy to counter its effect is proposed based on the power analysis of 6 T SRAM cell with back-gate modulation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.AlB2-type ternary intermetallic compound Tb2Ni0.90Si2.94 (space group P6/mmm,hP3, No. 191) was reported to exhibit spin freezing behaviour of the ferromagnetic clusters present in the system below Tf=9.9 K, along with the presence of spatially limited antiferromagnetic phase. In this work, on the basis of variable temperature zero-field neutron diffraction measurements, we have shown that the antiferromagnetic phase transition occurs for the compound below TN~13 K. Neutron diffraction study indicates ab-plane non-collinear sine-modulated antiferromagnetic ordering of the system with wave vectors of k1=[±1/6,±1/6,0] and k2=[±1/3,±1/3,0] down to 1.7 K. The weak and diffuse nature of the magnetic Bragg peaks along with limited coherence length further confirm the short-range nature of the antiferromagnetic phase in this compound.© 2021High-permittivity (к) oxide dielectrics have been widely demanded concerning the Internet of Things (IoT) requirements, such as flexible large-area manufacturing, energy efficiency, low-cost processes, and sustainable electronics, especially in thin-film transistors (TFTs). From there emerged the necessity of printing energy-efficient (vacuum-free) eco-devices using low-temperature methods (e.g., combustion synthesis, post-treatments) in the production and processing of nanomaterials, thus reducing the human carbon footprint. However, currently the main deposition method used is typically spin-coating which requires higher temperatures and long annealing times, not compatible with the printing industry. Besides the concerns with process integration, the market highly demands high-к dielectrics with great stability and high yield. To surpass these challenges, some crucial parameters in the ink design need to be considered to guarantee successful upscale for large-area electronics manufacturing.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe present a TCAD simulation of the negative capacitance gate-all-around (NCGAA) field-effect transistor with the 3-D Ginzburg-Landau-Khalatnikov Model. The baseline device is based on the 2020 IRDS Table, and the mobility model is calibrated to account for ballistic transport and to match the “1.5 nm node” IRDS on-current requirement. The NC parameters are extracted from experimental C-V data. The NC-GAA shows reduction in the off current by one order of magnitude and a 40% on-current boost. If the gate work function is shifted to align the NC-GAA's off-current with the IRDS high performance requirement, it is shown that NC-GAA can achieve the on-current and VDD requirement of every node through the “0.7 eq node,” which is the last node predicted in the 2020 IRDS Table. Furthermore, NC-GAA can even achieve a “0.5 eq node,” which is three additional nodes beyond the baseline “1.5 nm node.” We also show that these benefits are retained over a varying set of ferroelectric parameters.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A skyrmionium or 2π skyrmion is an exotic magnetic configuration that can be stabilized in ferromagnetic nanostructures, e.g., nanodisks. Differently from the standard (or π) skyrmion, it can move without suffering deflections due to the skyrmion Hall effect (SkHE), a property that is desirable for potential applications in spintronics. In this work, using micromagnetic simulations, it is investigated the influence of the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction on the azimuthal and radial spin wave spectra of the skyrmionium. First, the ground state of the ferromagnetic disk is obtained for several values of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya exchange constant Dint and a fixed value of perpendicular anisotropy constant Kz. The spin wave modes of the skyrmionium were obtained using in-plane and out-of-plane magnetic pulses. The results show that the values of the frequencies of the spin wave modes depend on the values of Dint. Additionally, it is shown that it is possible to create a skyrmionium using in-plane rotating magnetic fields, by tuning parameters such as the intensity of the applied perpendicular magnetic fields, and their duration.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.With the continuous expansion of the application field of sintered neodymium iron boron (NdFeB), its demagnetization behavior in specific devices deserves further attention. The systematic research on the demagnetization model of NdFeB and its application in specific devices was yet studied. To end this, a suite of tests was implemented to obtain the demagnetization curves at different temperatures of NdFeB. Referred to Jiles-Atherton (J-A) model, the hysteresis model used herein was fitted by the experimental data, so that a set of improved J-A model parameters for the tested materials was achieved. The model was further applied to the simulation calculation of electromagnetic buffer and the corresponding experimental research was also carried out. The simulation model was verified by comparing the electromagnetic buffering force and the buffering displacement obtained from both the simulations and experiments. The finite element model that had been verified by experiments was further applied to the calculation of more severe and complex working conditions. This article takes a specific application of sintered NdFeB as an example. Starting from the energy source, the influence of the nonlinearity of the sintered NdFeB hysteresis loop and temperature on the working process are fully considered. The calculation results of the simulation model provide a reference for the design of the electromagnetic buffer, and also provide ideas for the simulation and design of other electromagnetic devices© 2021 Elsevier LtdA new protocol based on Y-function is used for accurate statistical extraction of electrical parameters of High Electron Mobility Transistor (HEMT) devices for GaN technology. This protocol presented here is used for extraction of relevant electrical parameters such as oxide capacitance, threshold voltage, effective mobilities and access resistance. This study has been verified over a large range of channel lengths for two normally-off HEMT GaN wafers having different levels of access resistances.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ni45Fe55 has long been a high moment alternative for Ni80Fe20, which is commonly used in hard disk drive (HDD) read-write head design. In this paper we investigate the effect of ultra thin Ni79Fe21 seed layers on controlling the physical and magnetic behaviour of Ni45Fe55. Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) was used to observe grain size variation. Introducing a seed layer of 0.5 nm thickness reduced the average grain size diameter by over 80% to 2 nm. Diffraction analysis shows texture exists along the [010] direction for the unseeded and 0.25 nm seed layer films. The addition of the Ni79Fe21 seed layer reduces film texture. Bulk magnetic measurements showed seed layers improved uniaxial anisotropy, with decreasing easy axis coercivity HC, and an increase in the anisotropy field HK. The Fresnel mode of Lorentz microscopy was used to image micromagnetic behaviour during in situ magnetising experiments. The nano-scale visualisation of the magnetic structure allows for not only the mapping of hysteresis behaviour, but quantitative characterisation of the material in the form of magnetisation ripple. This was characterised in two ways; the ripple dispersion and wavelength. The addition of Ni79Fe21 seed layers acted to significantly reduce ripple wavelength and dispersion angle. The dramatic effect of seed layer addition suggests that the ultra-thin film is a good candidate for controlling both the physical and magnetic properties of Ni45Fe55 films, whilst maintaining a high magnetic moment density.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn recent years, laminates consisting of alternating layers of two binary oxides with layer thicknesses below 1 nm have attracted attention for their high dielectric constant values, reaching values of about 1000 in the case of Al2O3/TiO2 sub-nanometric laminates. This excellent dielectric performance of the sub-nanometric laminates relies on the Maxwell Wagner (MW) relaxation, exploiting the blocking of the mobile charge carriers of the semiconducting TiO2 at the interface with Al2O3. In this work, we explore the possibilities of enhancing the dielectric constant by MW relaxation in amorphous sub-nanometric laminates of Al2O3/ZnO. We demonstrate that the sublayer thickness and the interface of individual layers define the apparent dielectric constant of the laminates. In addition or further understanding, simulations and equivalent circuit analysis of the sub-nanometric laminates were conducted.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In order to study the effect of the uniaxial stress on the development of a cube-on-face texture, two sheet samples were heat treated with different positions to have a different self-load, resulting in a different stress. One specimen was heat treated at 1120 °C for 60 min with the broad face positioned horizontally to the specimen holder and the other specimen was heat treated with the broad face positioned vertically to the specimen holder with the other condition being the same. The former produced a weak {1 0 0} <0vw> texture, being only 30.9% whereas the latter produced a strong{1 0 0} <0vw> texture, being 81.1%. We found out that such a texture difference is related to the difference in the nucleation barrier coming from the stress disparity. Based on this understanding, specimens with a different percentage of the {1 0 0} <0vw> texture could be manufactured. The measurements of magnetic properties showed that the specimen with 78.4% of {1 0 0} <0vw> and 3.2% of {1 1 1} <uvw> had B50 = 1.75 and W15/50 = 2.19, but the specimen with 0.7% of {1 0 0} <0vw> and 81.3% of {1 1 1} <uvw> had B50 = 1.61 and W15/50 = 2.50. The results show that the magnetic flux density of B50 was increased by 8.7% and the eddy current loss of W15/50 was decreased by 12.4% due to the evolution of the {1 0 0} texture.© 2021The switching voltage (Vc) variability of STT-MRAM has been investigated with respect to the effects of temperature, magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ) diameter, bias pulse-width (PW) and backhopping (BH). Arrays of STT-MRAM devices having 1 transistor + 1 MTJ bitcell structure with ±10 nm MTJ diameters were tested under an applied ramped voltage waveform sweep at temperatures ranging from −10 °C to 125 °C with pulsewidths of 40 ns to 10 µs. We show that the Vc distributions as a function of temperature and PW are highly skewed. BH of the MTJ bits increases with increasing temperature, longer PW and smaller MTJ diameter. We also demonstrate the switching and BH performances of 40 Mb embedded MRAM macro having different MTJ diameters.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We consider and compare the peculiarities of nonreciprocal optical properties of the following three systems: a) a planar layer of cholesteric liquid crystal (CLC) in the external magnetic field directed along the CLC helix axis, b) an asymmetric Fabry-Perot resonator with a planar CLC layer inside and, finally, c) an asymmetric Fabry-Perot resonator with a planar CLC layer inside in an external magnetic field, again, directed along CLC's axis. We investigate the specific properties of matrices of reflection and transmission of such systems in all their details. Then we study the influence of absorption on nonreciprocal optical properties of these systems. Nonreciprocity depends on the polarization of the incident light in the absence/presence of absorption in such systems; while nonreciprocity appears for naturally polarized incident light in these systems only in the presence of absorption in the system. Nonreciprocity appears for naturally polarized incident light also in photonic crystals with the helix period gradient.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Low-temperature curable soft magnetic composites (SMCs) could be a good choice for high-frequency power applications because of their low eddy current loss and low processing temperature. However, most low-temperature curable SMCs have a shortcoming of low relative permeability, i.e., typically less than 30, due to their low packing density. To improve the relative permeability of such the low-temperature curable SMCs and ensure the applicability in power conversion with acceptable low core loss density, we proposed 200 ℃ curable SMCs cores with permalloy flakes and spherical powders with an acrylic polymer coating, i.e., TMPTA. The relative permeability, core loss density, hysteresis loops, and inductance versus DC bias of the cores were measured. The highest relative permeability of the SMCs cores increased to 38.7 as well as the maximum Bs of 1.140 T with acceptable low core loss density in the case of 15wt% permalloy flakes. It was found that the flakes could not only increase the packing density, but also provided more ‘conductive’ paths for magnetic flux. The reliability and the efficiency tests of the SMCs core with 15wt% permalloy flakes proved the feasibility of its applicability for high-frequency power converters.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we have investigated the structural properties of Germanium (Ge)-Antimony (Sb)-Tellurium (Te) (GST) and Ge-rich GST thin film samples. The structural properties of the films are studied after annealing temperatures from room temperature to 450 °C. We performed the annealing procedure using a heat rate of 10 °C/min to achieve the target temperature for a duration of 10 min under N2 flow. After heat treatment, we carried out X-Ray Diffraction (XRD), Fourier Infra-Red Spectroscopy (FTIR), Raman Spectroscopy and Scanning Electron Microscopy (SEM) equipped with Energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDS) to investigate the evolution of the structure in the samples.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Dy-phthalocyanine single-molecule magnet and the diluted samples using a diamagnetic Y-phthalocyanine with the ratios of Dy:Y = 3:7 and 1:9 were prepared by a solvothermal method. The direct current and alternating current magnetic susceptibility measurements were carried out to study their magnetic relaxation processes. It is found that antiferromagnetic coupling exists in all three samples based on the fitting results of direct current magnetic susceptibility using the Curie-Weiss law. Both the in-phase and out-of-phase components of alternating current magnetic susceptibility for the three samples show the clear frequency and temperature dependence, which is the typical behavior of single-molecule magnets. The effective energy barrier estimated in quantity using the Arrhenius law. Both of diluted samples show a larger coercivity in the hysteresis loops than that of Dy-phthalocyanine. The coercive fields of Dy-phthalocyanine, the diluted samples with the ratios of Dy:Y = 3:7 and 1:9 measured at 2 K with 300 Oe/s field sweep rate are 485 Oe, 551 Oe, and 747 Oe, respectively. This investigation could be helpful to understand magnetic relaxation mechanism and design functional single-molecule magnets.© 2021Accurate and fast characterization of hysteretic systems can accelerate progress in fields as diverse as biomedicine, sensors, data storage, and logic devices. Here, we introduce a fast approach to determine magnetic parameters (intrinsic coercivities of elementary domains, interaction fields between the domains, and the variances of both) of bistable hysteretic systems. The approach uses the first few points in first-order reversal curves (FORC) to mathematically and empirically determine the projections of traditional FORC diagrams onto the reversal field and applied field axes. Since this projection approach only requires a few points per each reversal curve (rather than 100+ points for 100+ curves compared to the traditional FORC method), the time of measurement is reduced by 50-100x over traditional FORC measurements. In addition, the projection results do not contain the typical FORC artifacts that have been disputed for decades. As a proof of concept, the projection analysis was used to determine the magnetic parameters of several arrays of bistable magnetic nanowires (MNWs), and the results were compared with the hysteresis loop and FORC results. For non-interacting arrays of MNWs, all three methods give the intrinsic coercivity with minor difference. While, the differences become significant for the interacting arrays of the MNWs that will be discussed in details.© 2021Magnetic field detection is one of the most important processes in academic and industrial applications. Flexible magnetic field sensors are often fabricated with magnetic nanoparticles. Superparamagnetic materials have better repeatability than ferromagnetic materials, but the sensitivity needs to be further improved. To solve this problem, in this paper we used C60@Fe3O4 which is superparamagnetic and has good dispersion as a sensitive material, and ordered hexagonally structured substrate was fabricated by light curing 3D printing technology to enhance the magnetic response of the sensor. Then we compared the magnetic response characteristics of three different size magnetic field sensors. We found that the medium size sensor has better sensitivity and the maximum sensitivity of magnetic field in the range of 0–400 mT is 0.097 T-1. In order to further explore the mechanism of the sensor, we used digital microscope to observe the changes of the sensor surface under the magnetic field, and further put forward the microstructure evolution model of the conductive network under the magnetic field. The sensor described in this paper can be used for repetitive magnetic field sensing without remanence.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn the present work the use of low temperature (77 K) charge injection and thermally activated emission is proposed as a universal method for characterization of shallow traps in high permittivity insulating oxides (HfO2, ZrO2, LaSiOx). A broad temperature range (77 K–300 K) allows one to evaluate density and energy distribution of electron traps within the energy depth range ≈1 eV below the oxide conduction band. The volume concentration of these traps is found to be in the range of 1019–1020 cm−3 in all studied materials indicating that shallow trapping will significantly affect performance of the high-k oxide-based devices operating at low temperature and/or very short pulse times.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The Pb2Fe2-xMnxGe2O9 (x = 0.43) orthorhombic antiferromagnet single crystals have been synthesized by a modified pseudo-flux technique and their magnetic and magnetodielectric properties have been investigated. It has been established that partial substitution of highly anisotropic Mn3+ ions for iron ones significantly affects the magnetic structure of the crystal. Under magnetization of the crystal along the rhombic b and c axes, magnetization jumps have been detected, which are indicative of the occurrence of orientational transitions identified as first-order ones. No weak ferromagnetism characteristic of the pure crystal in the rhombic a axis direction has been detected. The field dependences of the magnetization for the pure and Mn-doped crystals have been analyzed using the thermodynamic potential that takes into account the crystal symmetry. It has been shown that, in the Mn-substituted crystal, the antiferromagnetic vector in the ground state is parallel to the rhombic b axis; in this state, weak ferromagnetism has not been observed. Under magnetization along the b axis, a conventional spin-flop transition occurs. The orientational transition under magnetization along the c axis has been attributed to the reorientation of the antiferromagnetic vector relative to the a axis with the simultaneous occurrence of a weak ferromagnetic moment along the c axis. Magnetic phase diagrams of the Mn-doped crystal for the magnetic fields H||b and H||c have been built. In the Mn-doped crystal, at E||c and H||c, the orientational transition-induced magnetodielectric response jump has been detected, which is higher than the jumps observed for the undoped crystal by a factor of 3. The magnetodielectric properties of the pure and Mn-doped crystals have been analyzed using their magnetic phase diagrams.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Exploring the law of hybrid interface states (HIS) to the spin-dependent transport properties in magnetic single-molecule junctions is extremely significant for developing organic spintronic devices. Utilizing the first-principles method, the quantum interference systems consisting of a class of anthraquinone-based molecules sandwiched between two ferromagnetic electrodes are constructed and related spin transport properties are theoretically investigated. By substituting neutral, electron-withdrawing, and electron-donating functional groups on the cross-conjugated sites, valid modulation of the HIS and their spin polarization (SP) are demonstrated, which are caused by the distinct shift of molecular orbitals and the induced overlap with HIS. Accordingly, the spin-dependent transport calculation shows that an enhanced tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) at low bias voltage and a reversed TMR at high bias voltage are realized by using the electron-withdrawing groups. We provide direct evidence of the distinctive TMR effect as the change of molecular SP around the Fermi energy combined with the shift of destructive quantum interference (DQI) feature. This work supplies a novel way to modulate the spin-dependent transport in molecular junctions by manipulating the HIS and the DQI feature simultaneously.© 2021 The Author(s)In this letter, the serial configuration of two RRAMs is used as a basic cell to generate an unpredictable bit. The basis of the operation considers starting from the Low Resistive State (LRS) in both devices (initialization step), then, one of them is switched to the High Resistive State (HRS) (bit generation step) without knowing, in advance, which one is the switching device (unmasking step). In this proposal, the larger resistance variability of HRS compared to LRS is considered to improve the masking performance of the cell (masking step). The presented experimental results are a proof-of-concept of the applicability of the proposal.© 2021 Elsevier Ltd28 nm FD-SOI technology is electrically characterized aiming at cryogenic applications. Electrostatics and transport are evaluated and compared while lowering temperature from 300 K down to 4.2 K. Split CV technique is applied in both long and short channel transistors thanks to multiple parallel structures designed to increase the gate area. FD-SOI versatility is shown over a wide temperature range of operation, as the back gate tuning efficiency is preserved at low temperatures. Insights on back gate bias behavior at room and low temperatures are obtained and the electrostatic coupling between front and back channels can be successfully modelled by using 1D Poisson-Schrödinger calculation from 300 K down to 4.2 K. A generic form of empirical models for the effective mobility is found to be useful for cryogenic operation, since the phonon scattering contribution presents strong temperature dependence. While long channel MOSFETs exhibit strong mobility improvement, short channel transistors show lower mobility gain with temperature reduction.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Field and frequency dependencies of the permeability bring information about the magnetization dynamics in the material. In this work, a novel method of reconstruction of the permeability radial dependence in amorphous magnetic microwires with circumferential anisotropy in the near-surface region is suggested. The approach is based on the dependence of the wire impedance on the permeability. In a low MHz frequency range, for fixed current amplitudes, the deviation of Z dependence from that predicted by classical electrodynamics can be attributed to permeability's spatial distribution. Thus, the latter can be reconstructed from the frequency dependence of the impedance. Permeability radial distributions in the near-surface region were obtained for the Co69Fe4Cr4Si12B11 microwires with low negative magnetostriction with metallic core diameter 90 µm. Frequency range 2–10 MHz allowed the inspection of the layer from 0.6 of the wire radius to its surface.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe reconfigurable field-effect transistor (RFET), is an electronic device whose conduction mechanism can be reversibly reconfigured between n-type and p-type operation modes. To enable this functionality, those devices do not rely on chemical doping caused by impurities but rather on electrostatic doping, i.e. the generation of mobile carriers via an external potential. This functionality has been first concieved in the early 2000s to reduce the source-drain leakage in ambipolar thin film transistors. Over the years many different concepts have been developed employing different conduction mechanisms as well as channel materials, such as silicon nanowires, carbon nanotubes or two-dimensional layered materials. In addition the focus the research shifted more and more towards the circuit level, bringing the unique device characteristics to fruitation. In this work, we will give an historic overview of the main development phases including thier key-achievements starting from the earlier years reaching untill today. Further, we discuss the most interesting circuit properties arising from the device functionality and summarize the broad range of their potential future applications.© 2021In this investigation the magnetic and plasmonic properties of nanomagnetic Fe3O4 and gold nanorods are combined by synthesizing a magneto plasmonic nano fluid. They are then examined by probing the enhanced magneto-optical properties such as linear dichroism and Faraday rotation. The nanofluid is excited to transverse excitation of gold nanorods by a laser and the magneto-optical response of this ferrofluid is investigated. The results are compared with gold nanospheres incorporated magnetic nano fluids. The structural cascading of rods into chain-like structure in the presence of an applied magnetic field enables the electric field enhancement leading to improved dichroism and faraday rotation. These fluids can be used for biomedical applications such as targeted drug delivery and magnetic hyperthermia. The aspect ratio of the gold nanorods can be tuned to suit the absorption and hence such fluids can be a potential via media where in magnetic hyperthermia and photodynamic therapy can be combined.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This study verified the possibility of synthesizing DyVO4 nanoparticles by a microwave-assisted hydrothermal method as a cryogenic magnetic cooling material. The synthesized DyVO4 nanoparticles were approximately 10 nm in size with a typical tetragonal zircon-type phase. No antiferromagnetic-to-paramagnetic transition was observed in the temperature-dependent magnetization measurements within our measurement range due to the small particle size. The Curie–Weiss temperature (−2.65 K) obtained from Curie–Weiss fitting indicated weak antiferromagnetism, and an effective moment was calculated as 7.71μB. Based on isothermal magnetization measurements with an applied magnetic field, the DyVO4 nanoparticles showed a different paramagnetic behavior with bulk antiferromagnetic DyVO4 due to particle size effects, and a positive slope was found in the Arrott plots, indicating a second-order magnetic phase transition. Furthermore, a structural transition due to the Jahn–Teller effect was weakly observed at approximately 10 K. At ΔH=50kOe, the maximum change in magnetic entropy and relative cooling power were 10.32 J kg−1 K−1 and 175.44 J kg−1, respectively.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we investigated the effects of annealing temperature and metal thickness on the Schottky barrier height in state-of-the-art Ti/4H-SiC rectifiers. By varying these two parameters, a controlled lowering of the Schottky barrier height has been obtained, thus giving the possibility to improve the efficiency of device in terms of power consumption.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn nowadays deeply scaled CMOS technologies, time-zero and time-dependent variability effects have become important concerns for analog and digital circuit design. For instance, transistor parameter shifts caused by Bias Temperature Instability and Hot-Carrier Injection phenomena can lead to progressive deviations of the circuit performance or even to its catastrophic failure. In this scenario, and to understand the effects of these variability sources, an extensive and accurate device characterization under several test conditions has become an unavoidable step towards trustworthy implementing the stochastic reliability models and simulation tools needed to achieve reliable integrated circuits. In this paper, the statistical distributions of threshold voltage shifts in nanometric CMOS transistors will be studied at nominal and accelerated aging conditions. To this end, a versatile transistor array chip and a flexible measurement setup have been used to reduce the required testing time to attainable values.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The effects of a Ge substitution for 50% Sn on the crystal structure, magnetization and the magnetocaloric effect of Mn3SnC were investigated using high-resolution X-ray diffraction, magnetic and calorimetric measurements. Results show that the Ge substitution enlarges the magnetovolume effect, though it reduces the lattice parameter. On the other hand, the Ge substitution increases high field magnetization and reduces the Curie temperature. The Ge substitution also reduces latent heat during the ferrimagnetic transition and the magnetocaloric effect at the magnetic field change 0–5 T. It is suggested that the Ge substitution perhaps reduces the electronic entropy change via a change of the electronic structure and its stability against an external magnetic field. This effect is dominant over an increase of the magnetic entropy change leading to the reduction of the magnetocaloric effect.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe multiplication operation is one of the most used, but also one of the most energy-expensive operations in digital systems. Here, we focus on a promising strategy to perform the analog multiplication which is based on the use of two coupled spin-torque oscillators (STOs) using the concept of Degree of Match (DOM). The study is based on the theory of non-linear auto-oscillators with negative damping universally used for STOs. The robustness of the DOM is assessed with respect to the variability and noise perturbances parameters.© 2021Magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) are widely used in biomedical applications. Biocompatibility and superparamagnetic response of the MNPs make them viable, especially as contrast agents in magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and tracer agents in magnetic particle imaging (MPI). Nickel ferrites (NiFe2O4) coated with citric acid (CA) and polyacrylic acid (PAA) were synthesized by hydrothermal process. Nickel ferrites were structurally characterized by fourier transformed infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), x-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), dynamic light scattering (DLS), and thermogravimetric analysis (TGA). Nickel ferrites were also magnetically evaluated with electron-spin resonance (ESR), and physical properties measurement system (PPMS). The samples crystallite size of 9–12 nm achieved with XRD is in good agreement with the magnetic domain size that was obtained by PPMS results. Furthermore, nickel ferrites were also evaluated with magnetic particle spectroscopy (MPS) to determine the expected performance in MPI scanner. MPS results of NiFe2O4@PAA showed minimum relaxation time and high resolution (FWHM, mT) as compared to Vivotrax (magnetic insight) and Perimag (micromod) commercial reference tracers used in MPI. All results show that nickel ferrites have a great potential to become an optimum tracer agent for MPI.© 2021 Elsevier LtdA study of convolutional neural networks (CNNs) was performed to analyze the influence of quantization and variability in the network synaptic weights. Different CNNs were considered accounting for the number of convolutional layers, size of the filters in the convolutional layer, number of neurons in the final network layers and different sets of quantization levels. The conductance levels of fabricated 1T1R structures based on HfO2 memristors were considered as reference for four or eight level quantization processes at the inference stage of the CNNs, which were previous trained with the MNIST dataset. We also included the variability of the experimental conductance levels that was found to be Gaussian distributed and was correspondingly modeled for the synaptic weight implementation.© 2021We describe a detailed atomic model of the SiC/SiO2 interface states due to carbon clusters which lower the field effect mobility of SiC below its Hall effect value, due to the oxidation process. The carbon clusters are on the SiO2 side. We show for the first time that carbon clusters containing a mixture of sp2 and sp3 sites explain the results, with these sp2 sites forming small sub-clusters to maintain a large local band gap.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A magneto-dielectric substrate material with high permeability and low loss at high frequency is necessary for a miniaturized antenna. Keeping the loss low is essential, in order to restrain the eddy current effect and to possess a high magnetic resonance frequency. In this work, the effects of the NaOH concentration and soaking time on crystal structures and morphologies of Co80Ni20 alloy particles are studied based on a polyol process. The results reveal that the size of particles increase with the promotion of the concentration of NaOH and soaking time. The electromagnetic (EM) properties of Co80Ni20 alloy particles/ polyurethane composites with various soaking times are studied at the NaOH concentration of 1.5 mol/L. The results reveal that the real part of permeability (μ'), the real part of permittivity (ε'), the magnetic loss tangent (tanδμ), the dielectric loss tangent (tanδε) of the composite with the soaking time of 3 h are 2.0, 11.0, 0.09, and 0.057 at 1 GHz, respectively, and the eddy current effect is suppressed effectively. The calculation of the permeability shows that the composite possesses a high domain wall resonance frequency. This work is significant for developing a magneto-dielectric substrate material using at 1 GHz.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe present a hybrid density-functional study of indium phosphide coated with titania subnanometric films. We modelled the InP phase with a 2.4 nm thick (1 1 0) slab, and studied the junctions formed with thin films of (1 0 1) and (0 0 1) anatase TiO2. In both cases, the interface is stabilized by In-O and Ti-P chemical bonds. By analysing the band edges alignment, one can see that in both cases a staggered type-II heterojunction is formed, with important implications for photocatalysis.© 2021 Elsevier LtdExcitonic and band-to-band transitions in monolayer WS2 were observed using transient photoconductivity in metal-insulator-silicon structures. Significant improvement in sensitivity was achieved by introducing an Al/WS2 contact scheme. We attribute this improvement to high density of traps in the AlOx interlayer formed at the interface which gives rise to displacement current due to capture of electrons or holes optically generated in WS2. This new method is found to be viable with transferred monolayer films.© 2021 Elsevier LtdRandom Telegraph Noise (RTN) in Resistive Random Access Memories (RRAM) is an important phenomenon both for the investigation of device physics and for reliability issues. The characteristics of these signals depend on the number of active traps, on the interaction between these traps at different times, on the occurrence of anomalous effects, etc. Using the Locally Weighted Time Lag Plot (LWTLP), a fast numerical procedure, data from RTN current-time (I-t) traces can be represented with a pattern that allows a deeper understanding of the device physics. In the context of self-organizing maps, a neural network devoted to clustering, we have analyzed the LWTLPs to classify the RTN traces obtained from a long measurement with more than 3 million data points. This RTN pattern classification, obtained in an unsupervised learning scheme, allows a comprehensive characterization of the signals and the physics underlying the device operation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Density functional theory simulations were used to investigate double-perovskite Sr2CoRuO6 for its structure and magnetic properties. Calculated results show that rocksalt B-site order is stable under all the considered ferromagnetic (FM) and antiferromagnetic (AFM) configurations. Moreover, electronic and magnetic properties are strongly coupled to octahedral tilting. The ground state of rocksalt Sr2CoRuO6 is C type AFM with a0a0c- tilt and a 0.72 eV gap between Ru4d and Co3d orbitals. Possible reason for the presence of ferrimagnetism is attributed to G type AFM with ferrimagnetic moment of 1 μB per formula unit.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Automated technologies for quality inspection of fruits have attracted great interest in the food industry. The development of nondestructive mechanisms to assess the quality of individual fruit prior to sale may lead to an increase in overall product quality, value, and consequently, producer competitiveness. However, the existing methods have limitations. Herein, a texture sensor based on highly sensitive hair-like cilia receptors, to allow a quick quality evaluation of fruit is proposed. The texture sensor consists of up to 100 magnetized nanocomposite cilia attached to a chip with magnetoresistive sensors in a full Wheatstone bridge architecture. In this paper we demonstrate the use of ciliary sensors in scanning fruits (blueberries and strawberries) in different maturation stages. The contact of the cilia with the fruit skin provided qualitative information about its texture in terms of ripeness stage. Less mature fruits exhibited, on average, a highest peak voltage of 0.14 mV for blueberries and 0.12 mV for strawberries, while overripe fruits exhibited 0.58 mV and 0.56 mV, respectively. The results were confirmed by sensorial assessment of the fruit freshness, and therefore attesting the application potential of the sensing technology for fruit quality control.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Corrosion has a great endangerment for the fatigue performance of bridge steel members. As a newly developed self-magnetic leakage (SMFL) nondestructive testing (NDT) technique, metal magnetic memory (MMM) is regarded as a potential and feasible approach for examining fatigue damage of ferromagnetic material. Thus, the tension-tension high cycle fatigue (HCF) tests for the Q345qD bridge steel sheet specimens with local corrosion were carried out in this paper, and the normal component HSF(y) of SMFL field on the surface of specimens were investigated innovatively via MMM method. The experimental results show that the mutational crest (or trough) and the crest-trough (or trough-crest) behavior on the curves of HSF(y) signal and its gradient K can accurately indicate the range of corroded region and locate fatigue crack position. Then, the significant experimental correlations between magnetic characteristic parameters and crack size were demonstrated. The maximum value (or the minimum value) Km and the crest area Ka of the gradient curve can be utilized for the comprehensive characterization of crack initiation and propagation in the corroded region. Comparing with the experimental correlations proved that the established improved magnetic dipole models were reliable to simulate the variation of HSF(y) signal at the corroded region before and after cracking. Finally, based on the naive Bayesian model, the statistical evaluation of normalized fatigue life for corroded bridge steel was realized by classification via magnetic characteristic parameter. This research will serve as a base for future studies of fatigue crack detection and fatigue life estimation on the corroded bridge steel component based on MMM method.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The two new rare-earth pyrocoboltates R2Co2O7 (R = Ce, Yb) adopt the layered monoclinic Ca2Nb2O7-type structure with the space group P21 (No. 4). Both compounds have been investigated by DC magnetic susceptibility χdc(T), AC magnetic susceptibility χac(T) and isothermal magnetization M(B) measurements. The observed effective magnetic moment of Ce2Co2O7 indicates a contribution from the Co sublattice while that of Yb2Co2O7 is mainly from the localized 4f13 electronic configuration of Yb3+ ion. A magnetic ordering of the antiferromagnetic-type is observed in Ce2Co2O7 at TN≃ 34 K. This ordering is accompanied by the opening of a magnetic spectral gap, Δ=57.7 K (~ 5.0 meV) in the spin-wave spectrum and it survives in an external magnetic field of 7 T. In addition to the transition at TN,χac(T) measurements reveal a dome-like feature centered at ≃ 20 K in high frequency which indicates the presence of possible short-range correlation. In Yb2Co2O7, a magnetic phase transition is observed below TN=2.94 K, which is suppressed below 1.9 K in an external magnetic field of 3 T. In the low-T region where the crystal electric field effects can be neglected, an effective spin-1/2 state is realized in Yb2Co2O7, with a Landé-g factor of 3.76 which is comparable to values observed from electron spin resonance (ESR) measurements on related systems. In addition, M(B) of Yb2Co2O7 shows a metamagnetic-like feature at a critical field of HC≈2.5 T. Signatures from both compounds reveal the presence of strong magnetic frustrations with frustration index f of 9.17 and 15.12 for Ce2Co2O7 and Yb2Co2O7, respectively.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The evolution of the ferromagnetic (FM)/antiferromagnetic (AFM) orders and charge order (CO) as a function of the particle size and applied magnetic field (H) has been studied in detail in the canonical phase-separated system La1−x−yPryCaxMnO3 with larger Pr content (La0.15Pr0.45Ca0.40MnO3). At lower particle size (~ 45 nm) a low TC FM phase dominates with no direct evidence of the AFM and CO phases in the magnetization (M) data. As the particle size increases, the AFM and CO grow with a concomitant decrease in the FM fraction, as shown by a decrease in the magnetization and explicit transitions. All three electronic orders become distinctly visible at particle size ~ 139 nm, with TCO ~ 213 K, TN ~ 173 K, and TC ~ 58 K. At larger sizes, e.g., ~ 370 nm, FM appears as the robust phase while the AFM and CO are quenched. However, the presence of the AFM/CO clusters in this sample is signed by the hysteresis in the FCC and FCW magnetization in the FM regime. The paramagnetic (PM) region susceptibility as a function of temperature exhibits scaling of the type χ=[Formula presented], where TCON is the temperature at which the FM response becomes visible. The exponent remains γ ≈ 1.17 for samples with less dominant CO. At the ~ 139 nm, the CO is the most robust, and the exponent takes a value γ ≈ 1.31. The effect of the magnetic field in the case of the ~ 139 nm samples shows that the AFM melts at HAFM ~ 40 kOe, while the CO melts at HCO ~ 50 kOe. The scaling of the paramagnetic regime susceptibility (H/M) at different H shows that γ remains confined to the range 1.30–1.34 up to 20 kOe, and then decreases slightly to ≈1.24 at 30 kOe. At the AFM melting magnetic field ~ 40 kOe, it drops to ≈1.13, and at further higher fields, the above scaling breaks down. Thus TCON remains a good substitute for the canonical TC in the scaling law χ=[Formula presented] in strongly phase-separated manganite. Our results show that a phase-separated system with FM dominance deviates from the Curie-Weiss law valid for canonical ferromagnets. However, the presence of explicit CO makes the H/M – T scaling akin to a 3D Heisenberg ferromagnet.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Pulsed eddy current testing (PECT) has the advantages of rich information, efficiency and noncontact among defect nondestructive testing. Pulsed eddy current imaging technology also has a wide range of applications. However, the imaging method based on single feature is mostly adopted at this stage. In order to make better use of pulsed eddy current signals, signal slice based method was proposed for pulsed eddy current sequence imaging. Through the difference analysis of air-subtracted signal (ASS) and non-defect-subtracted signal (NDSS), sequence imaging in different ways is carried out. The influence of defects was explained by visualizing the diffusion of eddy currents in different specimens using a finite element model. ASS and NDSS image sequences were evaluated through image quality evaluation and quantitative identification. The result shows that there are some image frames in the image sequence that are better than the images generated by a single feature value in the image quality evaluation and quantitative analysis. It proves that the image sequence contains more defect information, which also illustrates the information richness of pulse eddy current detection.© 2021We present a susceptibility model of bi-anisotropy soft magnetic composites (BSMCs) consisted of bi-anisotropy single-domain particle (BSDP) with a unified anisotropy which is a both polar and azimuthal angles related bi-anisotropy. We find that the product of initial susceptibility and resonance frequency in the BSDP is beyond Snoek's law. We derive the susceptibility of BSMCs further based on that of BSDP and find it is related to the orientations of both magnetization in static state and easy magnetization plane. More importantly, the maximum susceptibility of BSMCs is the same as that of a BSDP when the magnetizations in static state of BSDPs are oriented in one direction or plane. Our model provides an approach to improve the susceptibility of BSMCs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Dzyaloshinskii – Moriya interaction (DMI) plays an important role in the formation of chiral spin textures useful in spintronics. Interfacial DMI is of great interest, as was recently shown, it leads to the stabilization of chiral spin textures not only in ferromagnetic metals, but also in insulator systems such as rare-earth iron garnets. In this paper, we explore transformations of uniform magnetic states induced by the DMI in ferrimagnetic system of restricted geometry. We show that change of the DMI constant induces a series of phase transitions in the square magnetic nanoelement: homogeneous magnetic state – vortex – skyrmion/meron – multidomains – domain structure (K>/<0) and construct phase diagrams in terms of “DMI constant – nanoelement size”. Our findings show that manifestation of DMI in a system of restricted geometry depends on the initial magnetic configuration stabilized by competition between exchange and relativistic interactions. The transformations of the “out – of - plane” and “in-plane” single-domain magnetic states induced by the DMI are considered, and their distinctive features are revealed. The influence of an electric field acting through inhomogeneous magnetoelectric interaction on localized magnetic states is discussed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the influence of the transverse size of a magnetic tunnel nanojunction on the magnitude of the magnetoresistance. During modeling, the size of the right contact was fixed, while the size of the left one gradually changed until they coincided. We found a sharp drop in the tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) in nanocontacts with mismatched cross section. This can be explained by the peculiarities of the spatial distribution of the electron density, which is different for majority and minority-spin states. Thus, our study indicates that the quantum size effect can also be a factor affecting the TMR ratio. Taking into account the observed effect can be important when designing the TMR-based nanodevices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The hydrothermal reaction of 2-methylimidazole (hereafter abbreviated as 2-mim) with cobalt (II) sulfate heptahydrate in methanol affords a novel sulfate cobalt (II) complex with formula [Co(C4H6N2)4](SO4)∙(H2O) (1). Its crystal structure was refined from X-ray diffraction data, complemented with the structural information derived from spectroscopic (IR and UV–Vis), thermal data and magnetic measurements. The crystal structure of 1 is made up of isolated [Co(2-mim)4]2+ cations, (SO4)2- anions and lattice water molecules. An extensive network of hydrogen bonds ensures the interconnection of the different entities. Greater knowledge on these interactions has been provided based on the Hirshfeld surface analysis and 2D fingerprint plots. Heating of 1 above 97 °C initiates gradual decomposition stages, which lead to the metal oxide as a final product at 710 °C, as proven by TGA/DSC analysis. A UV–Vis spectroscopy study confirms the tetrahedral environment around the metal. The determined bandgap energy Eg = 2.6 eV from the UV–Vis spectra indicate the interesting semiconducting behavior of our compound. Static magnetic measurements and EPR study revealed the presence of the easy-axis anisotropy with axial term D = –5.45 cm−1 and very small rhombicity, confirmed by the first-principle calculations. Complex 1 behaves as a field-induced single-ion magnet with two relaxation channels. The high-frequency relaxation can be described by the interplay of the two-phonon Orbach and Raman process, the relaxation barrier Ueff = 11.4 cm−1 agrees well with the difference between the two lowest Kramer's doublets.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the analog properties of advanced GaN/AlGaN High-Electron-Mobility Transistors (HEMTs) are studied as a function of temperature (T). The drain current, the threshold voltage, the transconductance and the output conductance are experimentally investigated under saturation operation. Moreover, important figures of merit for the analog performance, such as transconductance-over-drain current, Early voltage and intrinsic voltage gain are analyzed for different channel lengths in the temperature range of 25 °C till 200 °C. The results indicate that due to change in the Fermi potential, the analog parameters reduce with increasing T. Furthermore, the performance increase for longer channel devices is correlated directly with the lower drain electric field penetration.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe effective electron-injecting layer (EIL) is one of the important factors in organic light-emitting diodes (OLEDs) to achieve high performance devices. Herein, we have proposed the modification in cesium fluoride thickness and demonstrated that the performance of OLED is enhanced while varying the thickness of EIL. The cesium fluoride thickness may greatly influence the electron injection ability from the cathode to electron transport layer (ETL). The optimized green phosphorescent OLED consisting CBP:Ir(ppy)3 emissive layer reveals forward viewing power efficiency (PE) of 46.3 lmW−1, current efficiency (CE) of 51.7 cdA-1 and external quantum efficiency (EQE) of 14.2%, at 100 cdm−2, which has enhancement of PE, CE, and EQE of 38.6%, 44.8%, and 46.4%, respectively at 100 cdm−2. The thickness variation of cesium fluoride EIL resulted in very balanced electron injection which is also valid for other OLED devices. The employment of optimized EIL is a favourable approach to enhance the performance in OLEDs applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A new high-entropy spinel oxide, namely (Co,Zn,Fe,Mn,Ni)3O4, has been prepared by solution combustion synthesis method at different temperatures from 350 °C to 750 °C. The structure and magnetic property are compared with those of (Co,Cr,Fe,Mn,Ni)3O4, (Zn,Cr,Fe,Mn,Ni)3O4 and (Co,Cr,Fe,Mn,Zn)3O4. The X-ray diffraction demonstrates all samples are single-phase spinel structure. Their lattice parameters decrease with reduction in the ionic radius of Cr3+, Zn2+, Co2+ and Ni2+. The energy dispersive spectrum spectra and mapping show a random, uniform and equiatomic distribution of all the elements. Further, magnetic moment and crystallite size can be controlled through the components of high-entropy oxides, to achieve tailorable magnetic property.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The quantitative contribution of inclusions to coercive field in iron powder cores with different amounts of Si oxide inclusions was separated from that of other microstructural factors and analyzed. Coercive field decreased by 2.8 A m−1 with a 0.01 mass% decrease in the amount of Si in oxide. Si oxide inclusions also affected the recovery and recrystallization of the α-Fe phase, and the contribution of crystal grain boundaries and the contribution of dislocations decreased with a decrease in the amount of Si in oxide. The contribution of inclusions was compared with Kersten's calculation model based on changes of the domain wall area and Neel's calculation model based on changes of the number of magnetic poles, and the observed value was closer to the results of Kersten's calculation model. This suggests that the contribution of magnetic poles generated around an inclusion is small and the change of the domain wall area around the inclusion makes a larger contribution to coercive field.© 2021In this context, we pay our attention to the skyrmion Hall effect of a skyrmion in a nanotube when it is driven by a rotating magnetic field. By using micromagnetic simulations, we study the motion of a skyrmion driven by a rotating magnetic field in a nanotube. We find that the skyrmion moves parallel to the nanotube axis besides rotating around the nanotube, which is due to the skyrmion Hall effect. Both the core polarity of skyrmion and the rotation direction of magnetic field determine the orientation of the skyrmion motion along the nanotube axis. The strength of the skyrmion Hall effect is related to the size of the nanotube, the frequency of the rotating magnetic field and the Gilbert damping coefficient. And the damping coefficient is the only factor that affects the size of skyrmion Hall angle. We also demonstrate that nanotube model has an amplification effect on the skyrmion Hall effect compared with the plane model.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effects of magnetic field, temperature, potential parameters and impurity on the magnetic and thermodynamic properties of GaAs quantum dot confined by the parabolic-inverse square plus Gaussian potential are investigated. The Hamiltonian of the system is solved within the effective-mass approach and energy levels are obtained. The results show that temperature, magnetic field, potential parameters and impurity have a great influence on the magnetic and thermodynamic properties of the structure.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This article focuses on the realization of a magnetic gear with transverse flux architecture. In order to analyze both the behavior and modeling of this magnetic gear architecture, an experimental test bench was developed, and 3D finite element computations were performed. The instrumentation of this test bench serves to measure torque, transverse flux in pole pieces, speeds and efficiency. A comparison between experimental findings and 3D finite element model output is proposed in order to validate system behavior.© 2021We report on the first-order reversal curves (FORC) of magnetization and effect of defects on magnetization process in Fe71Ga29 thin films with different values of sputtering power (50 – 120 W). Phase purity of the thin films was confirmed by grazing incidence X– ray diffraction (GI-XRD). The reversible and irreversible contributions to the magnetization are evidenced through the minor loop parameter such as pseudo hysteresis loss (WF*) and energy loss coefficient (WF0). In particular, the energy loss coefficient is found to decrease from 28 × 106 (A/m. mT) at 50 W to 21 × 106 (A/m. mT) at 120 W, which signifies a decrease in domain wall resistance. FORC infers narrow switching, which leads to low coercivity distribution at 120 W as a result of less defects.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Determining the residual field in a magnetic shield is essential in quantum measurement. However, it faces some problems which limit the measuring accuracy. In order to overcome the main problems for the measuring method based on magnetic resonance, a method which detects the electron paramagnetic resonance frequency of 133Cs atoms is reported. By using a rotating exciting magnetic field and choosing appropriate frequency of probe light, the influences of the Bloch-Siegert effect on the measurement of the residual field is eliminated, and by extracting the sums of the residual field and the fictitious field caused by light shifts under different pump light powers and using a second-degree polynomial fitting, the influences of light shifts on the measurement of the residual field is eliminated, thus the residual field is obtained accurately. The test results demonstrate that a high measuring accuracy of 0.01 nT can be achieved for this method.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This work is aimed to understand magnetic behavior at low temperature of nano particles of Zn0.5Co0.5Fe2O4 ferrite. The sample has been synthesized by using a Sol Gel method. Rietveld refinement of XRD data confirms the single-phase cubic spinel crystal structure with lattice constant a = 8.41 Å. The average crystallite size ~30 nm has been determined by Debye-Sherer formula. The field emission scanning electron microscopy micrographs show the spherical nature of nanoparticles and energy dispersive X-ray measurement confirms the elemental composition in the sample. Also, the Mapping of the sample has been performed which shows the appropriate distribution of elements in the sample. Magnetic measurements have also been performed in variable applied magnetic field (up to 5 T) and temperature (up to 2 K). The zero field cooled, field cooled curves have been measured under the applied magnetic field 50, 100 and 500Oe. The competition between thermal and magnetic energy has been studied in detail. In addition, the M-H loop has been measured at different temperatures i.e. 300 K, 200 K, 120 K, 100 K, 50 K and 5 K, by applying a variable external magnetic field up to ±5 T. The M-H loop is observed continuously decreasing with increasing temperature. The Bloch's law fitted in the saturation magnetization which gives Mo = 113.045emu/gm, T0 = 547.45 K and αB = 1.5. Also, the Kneller's law fitted in variable coercivity with respect to temperature which suggests that the blocking temperature ~360 K (i.e. above the room temperature). Furthermore, the dM/dH peak height is increasing with increasing temperature which indicates the good magnetic state of the sample.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents the design, implementation, and experimental measurements of a custom-made MPI relaxometer to characterize superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs) as a tracer for Magnetic Particle Imaging (MPI). The relaxometer is electromagnetic interference (EMI) shielded and serves as a zero magnetic field MPI scanner at 4.6 kHz, and 9.9 kHz. The post-processing analysis was performed on commercially available Vivotrax, Perimag®, and Synomag nanoparticles for the evaluation of relaxation time, resolution, frequency spectrum of the odd harmonics up to 20th harmonic, and relative signal strength essential parameters for MPI. Sinusoidal excitation magnetic fields of 5 mT, 10 mT, and 15 mT were respectively applied to assess their implications on the resolution of the samples. Moreover, measurements were performed at two different frequencies (4.6 kHz, 9.9 kHz), and the driving frequency-dependent relaxation time of the magnetic nanoparticles was calculated. Perimag® was found to be the highest resolution tracer material at all experimental conditions for MPI scanning. The relative signal strength of the Synomag tracer outperformed other nanoparticles that determine the signal-to-noise ratio (SNR) for MPI.© 2021Gd cladded in a seamless 316L austenitic steel tube has been swaged into wires by the powder-in-tube (PIT) technology, resulting in an outer diameter of 1 mm, a wall thickness of approx. 100 µm and a filling factor of around 62 vol%. Such wires provide an advantageous geometry for heat exchangers and have the benefit to protect the Gadolinium, i.e. from corrosion when being in contact with a heat transfer fluid. The magnetocaloric composite has been studied by static and pulsed magnetic-field measurements in order to evaluate the performance of Gd as a core material. By the analysis of magnetization and heat capacity data, the influences of deformation-induced defects on Gadolinium are presented. The subsequent heat treatment at 773 K for 1 h in Ar atmosphere allowed restoring the magnetic properties of the wire after deformation. Data of the pulsed magnetic-field measurements on the Gd-filled PIT-wires and a Gd–core separated from the jacket are presented, with an achievable temperature change of 1.2 K for the wire and 5.2 K for the Gd in 2 T, respectively. A comparison to previously studied La(Fe, Co, Si)13-filled composite wires is included. It indicates that performance losses due to the passive matrix material cannot be overcome only by an increased adiabatic temperature change of the core material, but instead the wire components need to be chosen regarding an optimized heat capacity ratio, as well.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We measured spectra of magnetic linear dichroism (MLD) of 5I8 → 5F2, 5F3 transitions in the basal plane of the HoFe3(BO3)4 single crystal in the light propagated along the trigonal c-axis at temperature 2 K as a function of magnetic field 0 – 65 kOe directed along a and b axes. The substantial anisotropy of the MLD in the basal plane was revealed. The anisotropy of the MLD is strongly different for different electron transitions, that is, the MLD is mainly connected with the excited electron states. Transformations of the MLD spectra permitted us to retrace variations of the Ho ion magnetic moment orientation in different excited electron states as a function of the magnetic field. It was shown that in the excited states the local Ho magnetic moments do not reveal reorientation transitions synchronously with that of the Fe-sublattice. A small splitting of the ground doublet of the Ho3+ ion was observed during certain electron transitions. This means that during these electron transitions the local crystal field can change not only in the excited but in the ground state as well.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Multi reinforcement based composite films has been fabricated and tested for electrical, magnetic and EMI shielding behavior. The main objective of this research was to analyze how a magnetic material is more susceptible to increase the EMI shielding effect than conductive composite. The EMI shield was made using Zinc and Silver nanoparticle, Cobalt nanowire and Caryota urens natural fibres (CUNFs). The hand layup method was used for making shielding composite followed by post curing process at 120 °C for 48 h. The obtained results assured that the hybrid specimens exhibited improved performance by boosting shielding efficiency with increasing concentration of conductive and magnetic fillers. Notably, the SEM micrographs exhibit more adhesion for surface modified surfaces than those unmodified surfaces. A highest attenuation of ~ 50.8 dB was achieved for composite designation SP3, which contains 6phe of ZnO, Ag and Co-nanowire, which confirms the importance of adding magnetic filler. These improved EMI shielding hybrid composites could be used in many applications such as defense products, communication instruments and EMI filters.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Using a low energy effective Hamiltonian for a ferromagnetic semi-Dirac material the energy eigenvalues and eigenvectors for a heterostructure including ferromagnet/normal metal/ferromagnet (FM/NM/FM) made of semi-Dirac materials have been obtained. Then analytic expressions for spin current density components and spin transfer torques for the heterostructure as a function of the ferromagnetic magnetization, chemical potential as well as length of the spacer layer have been obtained. It is shown that the spin current density and spin transfer torques are very sensitive functions of the length and chemical potential of the spacer layer. More interestingly, a beating pattern of oscillations, in terms of the thickness of the NM spacer, occurs for the y-component of both the STT and spin current density. The variation of spin transfer torque components versus the angular and azimuthal angles for the second magnetization direction is also noteworthy, where we get symmetric behaviour but different magnitudes. The obtained calculations make possible to study the spin current density and spin transfer torques regarding the arrangement of the magnetizations in the two ferromagnetic layers.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this study, iron oxide nanoparticles (IONPs) were synthesized via explosion of ST37 wires with various diameters in distilled water. Synthesized IONPs were studied by XRD, UV_ visible, FE_SEM, EDS and VSM analyzes. The XRD results showed that the produced powders are magnetite (Fe3O4) with cubic structure. The UV–visible results confirmed the results of the XRD and the presence of magnetite by showing the peak in the 200 nm range. FE_SEM results revealed that synthesized IONPs were spherical in shape. According to XRD and FE_SEM results, with increasing in the wire diameter, the size of nanoparticles was increased and as a result, the saturation magnetization was also increased.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Using skyrmions or skyrmionium as information storage, e.g., racetrack memory, requires a basis of knowledge on how these topological spin structures react to changes in material parameters, which can be, for instance, purposed for stable storing, efficient writing, and faster transportation. Here, we examine the dynamics of topological spin textures, magnetic skyrmions and skyrmionium at the boundaries where material properties vary. Using micromagnetic simulations, we investigated the dependence of the location and radius variation in exchange stiffness, magnetic saturation, Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya Interaction, and anisotropy. There is also a comparison made between the feasibility of skyrmionium as an alternative to skyrmions as a method of storing and transportation information.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Based on a self-consistent t-matrix approximation, we explore the influence of magnetic and nonmagnetic doping on the surface electronic states and conductivity of topological insulators. We show that warping parameter has a crucial impact on the density of states and dc conductivity of the doped surfaces. As the warping strength is increased, the surface density of states at high energies is suppressed and the resonant states induced by impurities in the vicinity of the Dirac point gradually disappear. It is found that nonmagnetic impurities break electron-hole symmetry at low warping strength, while the symmetry remains unchanged when the surface is magnetically doped. Our findings reveal that surface conductivity can be controlled by tuning the doping, the direction of external magnetic field and that of impurity magnetic moments. Also, the surface conductivity features in topological insulators with warped energy dispersions are not significantly affected by the presence of impurities compared to that of materials with circular energy contour.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of the polycrystalline FeRh0.98Al0.02 alloy have been investigated as function of its physical state. A flake FeRh0.98Al0.02 sample undergoes an antiferromagnetic (AFM)-ferromagnetic (FM) phase transition around 275 K during heating and displays a 20 K thermal hysteresis upon the following cooling with an applied field of 5 kOe. However, for a solid chunk sample, the transition temperature is around 308 K on heating and the hysteresis is 16 K. The maximum magnetic entropy change (ΔSM) is 3.1 and 2.7 J/kg K for μ0ΔH = 30 kOe and the refrigerant capacity (RC) is 120 and 185 J/kg for the flake and chunk samples, respectively. The temperature of the ΔSM maximum for the flake samples changes for different values of ΔH, which is characteristic for a first-order transition. On the other hand, the temperature remains almost constant for the chunk sample.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The flaky porous Fe4N@SiO2 particles were prepared by nitriding Fe2O3@SiO2 which was fabricated by hydrothermal synthesis and sol-gel coating treatment. The structure, morphology, magnetostatic and electromagnetic properties of the Fe4N@SiO2 particles were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscope (SEM), high resolution transmission electron microscope (HRTEM), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and vector network analyzer (VNA). For comparison, the flaky Fe4N particles without SiO2 shell were prepared by nitriding Fe2O3 and characterized by the same technologies. The results show that the SiO2 shell enhances the interface polarization effect on Fe4N and effectively adjusts the relative permittivity, which brings a much better impedance matching for Fe4N@SiO2 than Fe4N. The minimal reflection loss (RL) of the Fe4N@SiO2 can reach −27.8 dB with a thickness of 2.0 mm and −23.7 dB with a thickness of only 1.5 mm. By contrast, the RL values of Fe4N without SiO2 shell are more than −2.2 dB at the whole frequency range of 2 ~ 18 GHz. The influence mechanism of SiO2 dielectric shell on the microstructure and properties was revealed. This work gives a remarkable proof that coating a dielectric shell on the high conductive ferromagnetic cores is an effective way to obtain microwave absorbers with enhanced absorption performance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Grain boundary diffusion of Tb can improve the microstructural and magnetic properties of NdFeB magnets. In this paper, we investigated diffusion behavior and coercivity enhancement by dip-coating TbH3 powders in sintered NdFeB magnets. The results show that the coercivity increased rapidly from 14.02 kOe to 23.72 kOe after diffusion. Tb atoms diffused to the surface of the magnet and then into the interior, forming a network Tb-rich shell around (PrNd)2Fe14B grains. The higher magnetocrystalline anisotropy (PrNd,Tb)2Fe14B phases determine the coercivity enhancement. The Tb diffusion model was build up from coating layer to the magnet. This work may shed light on developing sintered NdFeB magnets with coercivity enhancement by diffusion technology.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This paper represents a developed theoretical model for studying the magneto-optical (MO) effects of reflected light from the interface of two semi-infinite MO materials with a graphene sheet between them. For this purpose, we have developed a 4 by 4 transfer matrix method, and we have evaluated this method analytically and numerically. Our model can be used to investigate the MO responses of the structures such as MO and MO, dielectric and MO, and dielectric and dielectric materials interface with a graphene sheet between them. The intensity reflection coefficient (IR), Kerr rotation angle (θK), and ellipticity (ηK) from these structures can be calculated using this method. We have analytically evaluated our model by comparing with few previous works of other authors. However, for numerical evaluation, we have considered a graphene sheet lied on the interface of air and InAs (S1 structure) under an external magnetic field in the THz frequency region. The MO responses of the S1 structure have been investigated and compared with other two structures responses, one is semi-infinite InAs layer (S2 structure), and the other one is a graphene sheet on SiC substrate (S3 structure). The effects of applied magnetic field strength and ambient temperature on the MO responses of these three structures have been investigated.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.GaFeO3 and (Ga0.97Nd0.03)(Fe1-xMnx)O3 (where × = 0.01–0.03)are synthesized by ceramic method. X-ray diffractometer (XRD), Field Emission Scanning Electron Microscope (FESEM), electrical properties (such as dielectric, impedance, modulus, and conductivity), P-E loop (polarization) and magnetic studies are carried out to investigate the structural, microstructural, electrical and multiferroic properties of the materials. The XRD peaks of all the specimens have pure phases with an orthorhombic crystal structure bearing Pc21n space group as obtained from the Rietveld refinement. Variation of dielectric constant with temperature represents that GaFeO3 and the doped samples exhibits dielectric anomaly well above the room temperature. It is also noticed that transition temperature increases with the increment of Mn content. The complex impedance plot exhibits two semicircles, which represents the presence of bulk and grain boundary effects. The modulus spectroscopy validates the existence of a non-Debye type of relaxation. P-E loop and PUND analysis at room temperature confirms the presence of weak ferroelectricity in the materials. However, ferroelectric property is enhanced with the increase of Mn content.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We systematically investigate the strain-dependent microstructure and anomalous Hall effect in Pt/Tb3Fe5O12 (TbIG) grown on (1 1 1)-oriented Y3Al5O12 (YAG) substrates with different thickness of Ga3Gd5O12 (GGG) buffer layer. Structural measurements indicated that the out-of-plane lattice spacing of TbIG layers firstly increased with the rising thickness of GGG (tG) and then decreased, which was attributed to the impact of the buffer layer on strain relaxation of the epitaxial films. A variation of compensation temperature was found at tG about 30 nm. Furthermore, both the anomalous Hall resistance and its sign change temperature increased and then kept constant with increasing tG. Our results indicated that strain played a key role to tune the physical properties of Pt/TbIG/GGG heterostructures, providing a possible approach to tune the spin-orbital coupling in heavy metal/ferromagnetic insulator system by strain engineering.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In search of light-weight, stable, cost-effective and efficient microwave absorbing material, here, we have investigated electromagnetic wave (EM) attenuation properties of transition metal based MFe2O4 [M = Mn, Fe, Co, Ni, Cu, Zn] nano-hollow spheres in-detail within a widely-used frequency range of 1–20 GHz. The divalent cation, M2+ [M = Mn, Co, Ni, Cu, Zn] substitution in Fe3O4 displays a clear enhancement of EM absorption properties compared to traditional magnetite where MnFe2O4 NHS is found to exhibit an optimal reflection loss (RL) of about − 32.7 dB, total shielding efficiency (SETotal) ~ −42 dB and a high attenuation constant (α) ~ 196 Np/m. Favorable impedance matching, significant dielectric and magnetic loss contribute to the enhancement in absorption properties. Interestingly, with increase in filler concentration (in epoxy resin matrix) from 0 wt% to 50 wt%, MnFe2O4 NHS shows a gradual increase in RL values and an excellent RL of about − 45.6 dB at thickness ~4.2 mm is obtained for 50 wt% composite with a total effective bandwidth (RL < −10 dB i.e. absorption >90%) of ~3.6 GHz. Moreover, analysis of quarter-wavelength model for best matching thickness (tm) displays a good agreement between experimental and simulated tm values. The overall results indicate that ferrites in the form of hollow structures are much more efficient than their bulk counterpart and optimized MnFe2O4 NHS is found to be most suitable for high-frequency applications as an efficient low-cost microwave absorber.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe drain current of the amorphous InGaZnO thin-film transistors (TFTs) shows the Arrhenius and the non-Arrhenius dependence at the high temperature and the low temperature respectively. The gate-voltage-dependent effective temperature is introduced into the Arrhenius equation. Considering the normal Meyer-Neldel (MN) rule and the inverse MN rule, the equation successfully describes both the Arrhenius and the non-Arrhenius dependent drain current at the low and the high gate voltage. The calculated results of the equation are verified by the available experimental data of the amorphous La-doped InZnO TFT and the amorphous InGaZnO (InO3:Ga2O3:ZnO = 1:1:1 mol%) TFT.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThe effect of high-temperature irradiation with 15 MeV protons on the parameters of high-voltage 4H-SiC Schottky diodes has been studied at irradiation temperatures of 23–500 °C and doses in the range from 7 × 1013 to 2 × 1014 cm−2. After the irradiation with a dose of 1014 cm−2 at room temperature, the forward current at a forward voltage U = 2 V decreases by ~10 orders of magnitude. In this case, the cutoff voltage Uc, equal to ~0.6 V in unirradiated devices, decreases to Uc ≈ 0.35 V. By contrast, irradiation with the same dose at a temperature of 500 °C leads to an increase in Uc up to Uc ≈ 0.8 V. At the same reference value of the forward voltage U = 2 V, the decrease in current, compared to the value in unirradiated devices, was smaller by ~4 orders of magnitude. In the entire range of doses and irradiation temperatures under study, the forward current–voltage characteristic of diodes at U > Uc is linear up to U ≤ 2 V.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically investigate nonlinear localized excitations in a Heisenberg honeycomb ferromagnet with a second neighbour Dzialozinskii-Moriya interaction, which has been proved to possess the topological band structure. Using the time-dependent variational principle, we obtain the equation of motion for the system in the Glauber coherent-state representation. By means of the semidiscrete multiple-scale method, different types of nonlinear localized excitations are gotten. Our results show that both two-dimensional discrete breathers and bulk gap solitons may occur in the Heisenberg honeycomb ferromagnet.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report the observation of large exchange bias effect in hexagonal Mn3Ga melt-spun ribbons with triangular antiferromagnetic order. The observation shows that the maximum field cooling exchange bias field can reach 3.3 kOe, and the large value of exchange bias field can persist above room temperature until 385 K (blocking temperature). Meanwhile, the zero-field cooling exchange bias field can also reach the considerable value around 0.25 kOe–0.4 kOe. The training effect result conforms well to the typical exchange bias effect. After annealing the ribbons sample, the ordered sample does not show the exchange bias any more, which relates to the atoms ordering in Mn3Ga ribbons.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report the successful synthesis and characterization of a diluted magnetic semiconductor Cu2(Zn,Mn)(Sn,Al)Se4 with stannite structure. 15% of Mn doping into the quaternary semiconductor Cu2ZnSnSe4 does not induce any type of magnetic ordering. Only when Al is codoped with Mn, is ferromagnetic transition observed in Cu2(Zn,Mn)(Sn,Al)Se4. Our results demonstrate that Mn substitution for Zn introduces local moments, while Al substitution for Sn introduces carriers, respectively. Both spins and carriers are crucial in the formation of ferromagnetic ordering in Cu2(Zn,Mn)(Sn,Al)Se4.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the role of gold nanoparticles on the temporal response of a porous silicon gas sensor has been studied. The porous layer was prepared by a laser-assisted etching process using 810 nm wavelength and 2 W infrared laser diode as an illumination photonics source. The experimental etching conditions involve 20 mA/cm2 current density and 10 min etching time. Gold nanoparticles were incorporated into porous silicon structures via the ion reduction process. The characteristics of sensors were studied comprehensively by SEM, XRD, and the electrical properties were investigated for the sensor before and after the gold nanoparticles incorporation process. The obtained results manifested that the decay time of the sensor was reduced by a factor almost greater than (50%) as compared with the bare porous silicon sensor. The results were discussed based on the role of gold nanoparticles that enhanced the thermal conductivity of porous silicon. A higher thermal conductivity of about (130 W/mK) due to the gold nanoparticles was achieved as compared with the bare porous silicon gas sensor.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A series of Fe3O4 thin films with growth temperature ranging from 400 to 600 °C are prepared by magnetron sputtering on α-Al2O3 (0 0 0 1). XRD and XPS measurements indicate that all the samples are pure Fe3O4 (1 1 1) epitaxial thin films. Microscopic strain is highly sensitive to the growth temperature. As a result, the magnetic and electrical measurements show some interesting phenomena related to the strain relaxation. The saturation magnetization demonstrates a monotonous increase in relative change as large as 85.9% originating from the strain relaxation effect. The improvement of magnetic anisotropy in Fe3O4 thin films is attributed to the reduction of strain-induced anisotropy. However, the resistivity changes suddenly at the growth temperature of 450 °C, which is dominated by mesoscopic grain size rather than microscopic strain.© 2021Magnetic skyrmions are topological spin textures that have attracted significant attention owing to their diverse physical characteristics. Recently, various applications utilizing the Brownian motion of skyrmions have been reported. However, the diffusion of skyrmions is suppressed by pinning sites in magnetic thin films, which can limit computing speed. In this paper, we explore the stochastic dynamics and diffusion coefficient of skyrmions under a perpendicular alternating current (AC) magnetic field. The skyrmion diffusion coefficient increased exponentially as the AC magnetic field was increased owing to the stretching motion of the string-shaped skyrmions. This study may provide a technological framework for the realization of low-power-consumption Brownian devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The critical behavior of bi-skyrmion host centrosymmetric bi-layer manganite La1.37Sr1.63Mn2O7 has been explored and found that it exhibits second-order magnetic phase transition. The critical exponents have been determined using different methods and found to satisfy the Widom and Rushbrooke scaling relations. The critical exponents are compatible with 2D-Ising universality class, which suggests that anisotropy in bi-layer La1.37Sr1.63Mn2O7 due to its layered structure plays a crucial role. Further, we have presented a possible magnetic phase diagram of the bi-skyrmion host bi-layer La1.37Sr1.63Mn2O7.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A class of high-entropy spinel oxides system, (Al,Cr,Fe,Mn,Ni)3O4, (Co,Cr,Al,Mn,Ni)3O4, (Co,Cr,Fe,Al,Ni)3O4, (Co,Cr,Fe,Mn,Al)3O4, (Co,Cr,Fe,Mn,Ni,Al)3O4 nanocrystalline powders, have been prepared by the solution combustion synthesis method with the temperature at 550 °C, 650 °C, and 750 °C. The phase composition analysis of the samples shows that all samples are single-phase spinel structure (Fd-3 m) and the crystalline size and lattice constant increase as temperature goes up. Furthermore, magnetic hysteresis loops indicate that magnetic moment and crystallite size can be controlled through non-magnetic Al3+, making it possible to achieve tailorable magnetic property. XPS results show that in all HEOs, the valence of Fe is + 3, the valence of Co is + 8/3 (+2: +3 = 1:1), the valence of Ni is + 2, the valence of Cr is + 3, the valence of Mn is + 3. The magnetic difference between the HEOs is caused by element substitution.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work we have investigated the influence of Ar sputtering pressure (PAr) in the magnetic properties of polycrystalline sputtered Fe0.89Ga0.11 thin films. The structural characterization shows that the samples are composed by several fiber-like crystallographic textures in which the fiber axis is always along the growth direction, whereas their portion weights evolve with PAr during the sputtering deposition. Magnetometry and ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) experiments evidence the existence of a perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) that increases systematically for increasing PAr. By proposing a model that takes into account the interfacial, magnetoelastic and magnetocrystalline contributions to the magnetic free energy, we find that the magnetocrystalline one appears as the main responsible of the increasing PMA. The PMA values estimated from the model predict satisfactorily the experimental values obtained from FMR.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) technique is used to investigate the effect of oxygen partial pressure (PO2) and substrate temperature (TS) on the defect properties of Ni0.65Zn0.35Al0.8Fe1.2O4 (NZAFO) thin films. NZAFO thin films are deposited on MgAl2O4 (MAO) (1 0 0) substrates using pulsed laser deposition technique under various PO2 and TS. The FMR study reveals that the FMR parameters such as linewidth, line intensity and g-factor of the NZAFO thin films are sensitive to the variations in PO2 and TS. The observed changes in the FMR parameters are attributed to the variation of density and uniformity of defects in NZAFO thin films. Thus the significance of the present work suggests that the FMR may serve as an effective tool to monitor the growth condition of complex oxide films.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We show microstructural segregation in oxide containing [Co/Pt]n superlattice films with strong perpendicular magnetic anisotropy for application in advanced high-density magnetic recording media. By adding optimized mixtures of oxides into the Co and Pt layers of the superlattice, films with columnar grains, ~8nm grain pitch (GP), σGP/<GP>~17% and controlled intergranular exchange are demonstrated. The magnetic, microstructural and crystal properties of these films were investigated as a function of Pt thickness and oxide content.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ultra-thin grain-oriented silicon steels were processed via the conventional process and strip casting process, and the mechanisms of texture inheritance and inhibitor induced secondary recrystallization were comparatively studied in detail. In the conventional route with commercial grain-oriented silicon steel as the starting material, exact {1 1 1} 〈1 1 2〉 dominated the deformation texture after cold rolling with ~ 63% reduction, and strong Goss texture was formed in 0.08–0.10 mm thin-gauge primary recrystallized sheet. Meanwhile, weak {2 1 0} 〈0 0 1〉 and {h11} < 1/h12 > textures were also observed because of the inhomogeneous deformation with initial deviated Goss texture. After high temperature annealing, the sheet experienced incomplete secondary recrystallization with abnormal growth of Goss grains accompanied by normal growth of {2 1 0} 〈0 0 1〉 and {4 1 1} 〈1 4 8〉 grains, considering the absence of pinning force on grain boundary migration. In the strip casting process, the intensity of γ-fiber texture was increased, while grain size decreased from ~ 13.3 to ~11.4 μm and the area fraction of Goss grains decreased from 2.8% to 0.6% in the primary recrystallized sheet with decrease of thickness from 0.15 to 0.08 mm. During high temperature annealing process, MnS, (Nb,V)N and AlN provided continuous and sufficient inhibition force for normal grain growth, which guaranteed the formation of complete secondary recrystallization of exact Goss grains. Superior magnetic induction B8 was up to 1.97 T in the strip casting process, which was 0.09 T higher than the conventional route. Meanwhile, the iron losses P1.7/50 and P1.0/1000 were as low as 0.85 and 20.7 W/kg, respectively, which were comparable to the reported ultra-thin grain-oriented silicon steels. The present study provided a novel method to produce high efficiency ultra-thin grain-oriented silicon steel, which may significantly contribute to energy saving in high-frequency electrical devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present the open source micromagnetic framework, MagTense, which utilizes a novel discretization approach of rectangular cuboid or tetrahedron geometry “tiles” to analytically calculate the demagnetization field. Each tile is assumed to be uniformly magnetized, and from this assumption only, the demagnetization field can be analytically calculated. Using this novel approach we calculate the solution to the μmag standard micromagnetic problems 2, 3 and 4 and find that the MagTense framework accurately predicts the solution to each of these. Finally, we show that simulation time can be significantly improved by performing the dense demagnetization tensor matrix multiplications using NVIDIA CUDA.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Exploring magnetic anisotropy (MA) in single-atom-doped two-dimensional (2D) materials is greatly needed for the development of nanomagnetic devices. Taking full advantage of the natural hollow sites of 2D Tetraoxa[8]circulene-based nanosheet (TOC), we systemically study the MA of the TOC doped by single 3d tradition metal (TM) atoms (V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Co and Ni) via first-principles calculations. Specifically, we find that the Co@TOC system has large perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA), up to 1.76 meV/atom, which originates from the hybridization of Co-(dxz, dyz) and O-pz orbitals with strong spin-orbit splitting near Fermi level. Furthermore, the PMA of Co@TOC can be enhanced up to 7.28 meV/atom by applying biaxial tensile strain of 9%. The large PMA provides a practical single-atom magnetic system for potential spintronic applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The impact of magnetic domains in magnetic flux concentrators is studied using the simulation software MuMax3. First, the simulation parameters are validated using experimental results from magnetic force microscopy; second the simulation output is benchmarked with the one obtained using Comsol Multiphysics. Finally, the impact of magnetic domain is assessed, showing how micromagnetic effects can become relevant, if not dominant, when scaling the gap between the MFC and the sensor.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we have shed light on the electronic and magnetic properties of Cu doped SnO2 within the first-principles density functional theory. To treat the substitutional disorder we have exploited the Koringa-Kohn-Rostoker (KKR) method combined with the coherent potential approximation (CPA). Moreover, in order to express the exchange correlation potential we have used the local density approximation (LDA) and the self-interaction corrected (LDA-SIC). The intrinsic SnO2 is a N-type semiconductor and has a direct forbidden gap at Г point which is equal to 2.45 eV. In addition, we have calculated the wavelength in vacuum corresponding to the undoped SnO2 which is about 506,13 nm located in the visible range. These features are in great demand in optoelectronic applications. Besides, the doped compound by Cu has an orbital moment, a very rare characteristic especially in the presence of transition metals and not rare earths. We have also met the half-metallic behavior during doping with a low concentration of the Cu impurity which is highly sought after in spintronic devices. Finally, the hyperfine magnetic field Bhf (KG) has also taken into consideration to determine which layer contributed the most and we have determined the link between the hyperfine field and the magnetic moment of Cu.© 2021 The Author(s)A layer-by-layer sputtering method was used to fabricate nanostructures (ZnO/C)25 composed of zinc oxide and carbon alternating layers, with a total multilayer thickness of 146 nm and 153 nm. At low temperatures, the multilayers show signatures of local ferromagnetic order: magnetic hysteresis, weak magnetization and the characteristic shape of the thermomagnetic curve. In-plane and out-of-plane magnetoresistance (MR) was measured in a pulsed magnetic field up to 20 T in the temperature range of 15–300 K. At T ⩽ 20 K, MR changed its sign from negative in low magnetic fields to positive in moderate fields, and then back to negative in high magnetic fields. At T ⩾ 80 K, MR was negative in the full range of magnetic fields studied. The unusual MR behavior can be associated with the influence of the Zeeman effect on the Fermi level position in the case of 2D variable hopping conduction along the interfaces, scattering on magnetic heterogeneities and the effect of magnetic blockade.© 2021 Elsevier LtdA new device structure for the Si tunnel field-effect transistor (TFET) is proposed along with feasible fabrication processes. The device consists of a Si fin with high impurity concentration at the fin surfaces, which are realized using the tilted-ion-implantation technique (TII) to effectively generate the gate-normal band-to-band tunneling (BTBT) and simultaneously create carrier conduction paths from the source to the drain. Device simulation revealed that the asymmetric impurity distribution, with a higher concentration on the source side and a lower concentration on the drain side controlled by the TII energy and angle, has potential for the realization of a high eGR/hGR by reducing the BTBT distance and a low off-state leakage. As a result, a steep on/off switching with a current ratio greater than 105 under an operating voltage of 0.3 V can be achieved by careful optimization of the implanted impurity distributions.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Introducing a magnetic moment into nonmagnetic two-dimensional semiconducting materials is significant for them in spintronic application. Here, we systematically study the electronic structures and magnetism of 3d transition-metals (TMs) doped two-dimensional (2D) InP3 monolayer (m-InP3) using density functional theory. Our results indicate that all the 3d TMs doping can induce different magnetism (except for Sc), and it mainly originates from the unpaired d electrons filled in the non-bonding orbitals. In particular, Fe doping system obtains the largest total magnetic moment of 5 μB. Furthermore, the V, Mn, Co, Ni and Zn doped 2D m-InP3 appear half-metallicity, while Ti, Cr, Fe, Cu doping possess dilute magnetic semiconductor (DMS) property. For the two identical 3d TM atoms doping systems, the ferromagnetic couplings are found in the Ti, V and Fe doping. Remarkably, the largest perpendicular magnetic anisotropy energy (MAE) with 340.38 μeV is found in the Fe doped system and its physical origin is analyzed by the projected density of states and the d-orbital resolved MAE based on the second-order perturbation theory. These findings provide a promising pathway to realize 2D m-InP3-based materials application in future spintronic devices.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe present a detailed analysis of large-signal Sawyer–Tower measurements on a power GaN HEMT device in OFF-state. The measurements show hysteresis which results in an energy loss dissipated as heat in the range of sub-μJ's. We model this important phenomenon in this paper using a previously calibrated model of the same device. We propose two models, one with linear Effective Series Resistance (ESR) and another using non-linear ESR (NLESR). It is found that to model the non-linear profile of hysteretic curve from Sawyer–Tower measurements, non-linear ESR and output capacitance are needed. The similarities and differences between these two models have been explained in detail. While linear ESR is shown to be a simple model for modeling the hysteretic losses, non-linear ESR and output capacitance model the dynamics of charge imbalance that occurs during the charging and discharging processes more accurately. A detailed analysis based on recent literature suggests that 2DEG electron trapping by acceptor type traps in the underlying buffer layers are the primary cause of this charge imbalance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.To explain the observed room temperature ferromagnetism found in pristine oxides of TiO2, HfO2 and In2O3 thin films, a model of oxygen vacancy was proposed. An electronic structure calculation had been carried out using the tight binding method in the confinement configuration to show that a vacancy site in these oxides could create spin splitting and high spin state. The exchange interaction between the electrons surrounding the oxygen vacancy with the local field of symmetry could lead to a ferromagnetic ground state of the system.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The thermal expansion of the rare earth intermetallic compounds Sm3(CoxFe1-x)29-yCry (x = 0.9, y = 7; x = 0.8, y = 6.5; x = 0.7, y = 6) have been systematically investigated by high resolution synchrotron x-ray diffraction measurements (~120–480 K; ~ 300–823 K). The magnetic and thermal properties of Sm3(Fe0.9Co0.1)24Cr4 have been studied as a typical example of the Sm3(CoxFe1-x)29-yCry system by magnetic measurements (ac susceptibility, ~ 5–300 K; DC magnetisation, ~ 77–650 K) and specific heat measurements (~2–300 K). The Debye temperature of Sm3(Co0.9Fe0.1)22Cr7 was found to be θD = 410 ± 10 K from analyses of the specific heat data while the density of states at the Fermi level was N(EF) = 5.08 ± 0. 04 ev−1 atom−1. A pronounced contribution of the nuclear specific heat of Sm3(Co0.9Fe0.1)22Cr7 is evident below 5 K with the nuclear specific heat coefficient found to be A = 758 ± 30 mJ mol−1 K−1. Rietveld analyses of the x-ray diffraction data demonstrate the remarkable magneto-volume anomalies of Sm3(CoxFe1-x)29-yCry around their Curie temperatures TC with negative values of the volume magnetostriction detected below the Curie temperatures and values in the range ωs = − 1.1 × 10−3 to ωs = − 4.3 × 10−3 at 300 K.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the problem of a magnetic vortex motion in a field of extended linear inhomogeneity is solved theoretically. The motion parameters are calculated by the method of collective variables (Thiel's equation) with the vortex effective mass and the third-order gyrovector. On the basis of the equation of motion, the influence of the core mass and the third-order gyrovector on the character of the vortex motion as a quasiparticle is analyzed. Using the method of magnetostatic charges, analytical expressions are obtained for the effective potentials where the vortex core is located: (a) near the edge of the magnet or at the boundary of different magnetic phases, (b) near the linear inhomogeneity of local anisotropy (bidirectional and unidirectional). The solution of the equation of motion made it possible to obtain the trajectories of the core in various physical situations. In addition, the paper discusses the features of the Hall effect for vortices/skyrmions, which are provided by the inertial properties and a third-order gyrovector. It is shown that when the core of a linear inhomogeneity crosses a unidirectional anisotropy or the boundary of magnetic phases, a curvature of the trajectory is observed, which is similar to the refraction of light at the boundary of optically dissimilar environment. It is important to note that the introduction of the mass and gyroscopic effect of the third order in the equation of motion showed that the motion of the vortex, even in a homogeneous potential, is not translational. In this case, the trajectory is an overlay of cycloids of different rotation frequencies (analytical expressions are obtained for the frequencies). It is shown that, the introduction of the mass and the gyroscopic term of the third order, the motion of the vortex core cannot be considered translational at least during the time of the transition mode until the stationary mode of motion takes place.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline samples of Sr1−xLaxFe12O19 (x = 0.1, 0.3, and 0.6) hexaferrite were prepared by spark-plasma sintering (SPS) and its structural and magnetic properties have been investigated. The SPS process were performed under vacuum, at 900 °C, and in only 5 min. X-ray powder diffraction patterns showed that before SPS sintering samples are composed by several phases where the SrFe12O19 (SrM) is not higher than 12%. From Rietveld refinement method, we have found that after SPS process the content of SrM phase increased, in mean, up to 68%. However, it was found the presence of secondary phase such as α-Fe2O3 and LaFeO3 (%) whose phase content also vary with increasing the La-content. A finite element simulation model were used to study the temperature evolution within the sample during the SPS treatment. Magnetization measurements at room temperature yielded values of saturation magnetization between ~43 to ~27 emu/g and coercivities, HcB, in the range 3.11 to 2.88 kOe with increasing x. The influence and possible interaction between detected magnetic phases was studied by means of first-order reversal curves (FORCs) measurements. Results indicated that magnetic behavior of the La-doped strontium hexaferrites obtained by SPS technique are analogous a system composed of a broad distribution particles that are exchange-coupled with a certain number of other of neighboring particles. From FORC maps the coercivity profiles of the studied samples were extracted. The asymmetric behavior of these profiles were related to a broad distribution of the particle size and/or the influence of the secondary magnetic phases.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Were fabricated melt-spun ribbons of the quinary alloy Mn0.5Fe0.5NiSi0.945Al0.055. After an annealing time of 4 h at temperatures between 1073 K and 1223 K, samples underwent a martensitic-like magnetostructural transformation around room temperature from a paramagnetic Ni2In-type hexagonal structure to a ferromagnetic TiNiSi-type one. The phase transformation practically remained unchanged with the annealing temperature, whereas the first cooling process induced a massive cracking in the samples. In comparison to the reported in literature for bulk alloys, the melt-spun ribbons showed a lower maximum magnetic field-induced entropy change but a well-broader working temperature range. A relatively low magnetic hysteresis loss was obtained across the martensitic transformation.© 2021Surface reconstruction is a common physical phenomenon, driving the atoms near the surface to form a different spacing or symmetry from the bulk atoms to minimize the free enthalpy of the system. The formation of an asymmetric (7 × 2) reconstruction was observed on (1 1 2)-oriented Fe surface, which may be related to the anisotropic strain distribution induced by lattice mismatch. The influence of reconstruction on in-plane magnetic anisotropy has been studied in epitaxial Fe/Co bilayers grown by molecular beam epitaxy. The evolutions of Co layer thickness-dependent magnetic anisotropy for reconstructed and unreconstructed configurations were investigated by magneto-optic Kerr effect technique. The most significant difference caused by reconstruction took place when tCo = 3 nm, showing a reconstruction-dependent in-plane spin reorientation transition with a rotation of 90°, which can be attributed to the dramatically enhanced magnetic interface anisotropy of Fe/Co bilayers.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric effect (MCE) is the entropy change in magnetic materials upon application and removal of magnetic fields, providing an alternative path for refrigeration other than conventional gas cycles. In this work, we report a large MCE of the antiferromagnetic compound ErAl2Ge2. The maximum magnetic-entropy change is −19.52 J/kg K under a magnetic field change of 0–70 kOe for isotropic ErAl2Ge2 powder. This value increases to −24.84 J/kg K for a single crystal when the direction of the magnetic field H is parallel to the ab-plane. By using the anisotropy of the MCE of an ErAl2Ge2 crystal, large rotating magnetic-entropy changes of −6.30 J/kg K for H = 20 kOe and −9.03 J/kg K for H = 40 kOe can be obtained. Thus, a single crystal or textured ErAl2Ge2 may be used as the refrigerant of a rotating magnetic refrigerator, a magnetic cooling system with a simple structure.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Here we report on detailed studies of the magnetic properties of the wurtzite (Ga,Mn)As cylindrical shells. Ga0.94Mn0.06As shells have been grown by molecular beam epitaxy at low temperature as a part of multishell cylinders overgrown on wurtzite (Ga,In)As nanowires cores, synthesized on GaAs (111)B substrates. Our studies clearly indicate the presence of a low temperature ferromagnetic coupling, which despite a reasonably high Mn contents of 6% is limited only to below 30 K. A set of dedicated measurements shows that despite a high structural quality of the material the magnetic order has a granular form, which gives rise to the dynamical slow-down characteristic to blocked superparamagnets. The lack of the long range order has been assigned to a very low hole density, caused primarily by numerous compensation donors, arsenic antisites, formed in the material due to a specific geometry of the growth of the shells on the nanowire template. The associated electrostatic disorder has formed a patchwork of spontaneously magnetized (macrospin) and nonmagnetic (paramagnetic) volumes in the material. Using high field results it has been evaluated that the total volume taken by the macrospins constitute about 2/3 of the volume of the (Ga,Mn)As whereas in the remaining 1/3 only paramagnetic Mn ions reside. By establishing the number of the uncoupled ions the two contributions were separated. The Arrott plot method applied to the superparamagnetic part yielded the first experimental assessment of the magnitude of the spin–spin coupling temperature within the macrospins in (Ga,Mn)As, TC=28 K. In a broader view our results constitute an important contribution to the still ongoing dispute on the true and the dominant form(s) of the magnetism in this model dilute ferromagnetic semiconductor.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Modification of the anomalous Hall effect (AHE) in epitaxial Fe films with δ-doping of Bi has been investigated by the multivariable scaling. We observe that the intrinsic contribution of the AHE and the side jump coming from dynamic scatterings are robust despite of the strong spin–orbit coupling of Bi impurities. However, the skew scattering and the side jump coming from static scatterings have noticeable changes due to the δ-doping of Bi.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present a concept of a tunable optical excitation of spin waves and filtering their spectra in a ferromagnetic film with 180° Néel domain wall. We show by means of micromagnetic simulation that the fluence of the femtosecond laser pulse and its position with respect to the domain wall affect the frequencies of the excited spin waves, and the presence of the domain wall plays crucial role in control of the spin waves’ spectrum. The predicted effects are understood by analyzing the changes of the spin waves’ dispersion under the impact of the laser pulse.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The superconductive phase transition in the aluminum film on top of the yttrium iron garnet single crystal has been studied. It is shown that the fall of resistance is observed at different temperatures depending on mutual orientation of current in a superconductive layer and magnetization in a ferrimagnet. The effect is discussed in terms of local superconductive ordering suppressed by both stray field from the ferrimagnet and self magnetic field of the current. The observed effect provides new ways to control conductivity using the plane wire patterning with different orientation of the circuit elements with respect to magnetization.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work we investigate the critical behavior of two manganite compounds, Pr0.5Sr0.5MnO3 (PSMO) and Pr0.5Sr0.41Ca0.09MnO3 (PSCMO). These are complex magnetic systems, which undergo a paramagnetic to ferromagnetic phase transition on cooling, followed by a first order magnetic transition to a charge ordered antiferromagnetic states at lower temperatures. Magnetization measurements and magnetocaloric calculations were performed in order to determine their critical behavior. As a main result we show that the scaling of the entropy change -ΔSM with magnetization M, instead of the usual scaling with magnetic field H, is a powerful tool to study the critical behavior through magnetocaloric analysis. We use this property, in conjunction with Modified Arrot Plot technique, to determine the basic critical exponents β and γ for each sample. The exponents values indicate that the samples are near to universality class models based in nearest neighbor interactions. Besides intrinsic differences between the Ca-doped and the undoped sample, we confirm the applicability of the magnetocaloric analysis in order to determine critical behavior in complex magnetic systems.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A particle-level 3D simulation was carried out to explore the difference between the shear stress and the microstructure of magnetorheological fluid in the present of different distributions of non-uniform magnetic field. The non-uniform magnetic field used in the simulation was generated by a permanent magnetic. Three types of non-uniform magnetic field distributions with the same average magnitude were obtained by locating the simulation box at different positions above a permanent magnet. The quasiequilibrated structures were first examined before the beginning of the shear simulation. Then, the typical evolution of shear stress under non-uniform magnetic field was investigated. The shear stress curve included a sharper growth region in the beginning compared to the stress curve under the vertical uniform magnetic field. At the same shear rate, the shear stresses under non-uniform magnetic fields were different from these under the vertical uniform magnetic field. The chain-like structures inside magnetorheological fluid were responsible for the difference of the shear stresses. Specially, the chain-like structures with inclination θ>90° and azimuth φ≈90° were beneficial for improving the shear stress. The volume average magnetic field was employed to quantitatively describe the characteristics of the non-uniform magnetic field. The shear stress curve of magnetorheological fluid under the volume average magnetic field matched well with the stress curve under the corresponding non-uniform magnetic field.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A recently-developed molecular field theory (MFT) has been used to fit single-crystal magnetic susceptibility χ versus temperature T data below the respective antiferromagnetic ordering temperature TN for a variety of collinear and coplanar noncollinear Heisenberg antiferromagnets. The spins in the system are assumed to interact by Heisenberg exchange and to be identical and crystallographically equivalent. The fitting parameters for χ(T) of collinear antiferromagnets are measurable quantities: the Weiss temperature θp in the Curie–Weiss law, TN,χ(TN), and the spin S. For coplanar noncollinear helix and cycloid structures, an additional fitting parameter is the turn angle between layers of ferromagnetically-aligned spins. Here MFT fits to anisotropic χ(T) data from the literature for single crystals of the collinear antiferromagnets GdCu2Si2 and CuO and the noncollinear antiferromagnets LiCrO2 with a 120° cycloidal structure and α-CaCr2O4 with a 120° helical structure below their respective Néel temperatures are presented. The MFT fit to the anisotropic χ(T⩽TN) data for CuO is poor, whereas the fits to the data for GdCu2Si2, LiCrO2, and α-CaCr2O4 are quite good. The poor fit for CuO is attributed to the influence of strong quantum fluctuations associated with the small Cu spin and the quasi-one-dimensional magnetism that are not taken into account by the MFT. The magnetic contribution to the zero-field heat capacity of the collinear antiferromagnet GdNiGe3 at T⩽TN is also fitted by the MFT.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The film-based magnetic sensors possess prominent superiorities in miniaturization and integration. Because of the presence of shape demagnetization, the magnetic film effective permeability is dramatically degraded, restricting the performance improvement of planar magnetic sensors. This study reports an efficacious approach to compensate for the shape demagnetization and actively increase effective permeability by introducing grooved grating patterns on a magnetic film surface. The grating patterned films are demonstrated that the maximum values of effective permeability and its variation rate with a magnetic field are increased by 446.03% and 606.77% compared with the same thickness smooth film. It is experimentally demonstrated that the magnetic behavior of the patterned film is modified. The magnetization curves of grooved films exhibit two magnetization rising stages. In addition, the anisotropy of the grooved films can be also tuned through the shape anisotropy of the gratings. Effective permeability and anisotropy field can be enhanced together by grooved grating patterns, which cannot be realized in smooth magnetic films. These results indicate that the surface grating etching strategy provides an effective method to modify the film magnetization behaviors. The grating-patterned films have enormous potential for ultra-sensitive and wide-range micro-magnetic sensors.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Mn-doped transition metal perovskites have shown versatile magnetic phenomena, and research on these materials has been revived in recent decades. Many controversies over the microscopic spin configuration remain unsolved, presumably due to the complicated spin and orbit interactions, which are strongly coupled with each other and sensitive to structural and chemical modulation. Here, the Mn-doped orthochromite YCrO3 was investigated to shed some light on this issue. The orthochromite YCr1-xMnxO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.6) was synthesized and studied by X-ray diffraction, magnetometry and neutron powder diffraction. For x = 0.2–0.5 samples, the Cr3+ (Mn3+) sublattice adopts a Γ4 (Gx,Ay,Fz) antiferromagnetic structure with a canted ferromagnetic component. Negative magnetization behavior is observed for the x = 0.1 and 0.2 samples, which is suppressed and reversed by the applied magnetic field. As the doping concentration further increases to x = 0.6, the system exhibits a distinct spin-glass behavior below a spin-freezing temperature. These phenomena are attributed to the competition between weakened antiferromagnetic Cr3+-Cr3+ interactions and enhanced ferromagnetic Cr3+-Mn3+ interactions with Mn3+-doping. This work provides deep insights into understanding the complicated magnetic phenomena in Mn-doped correlated transition metal oxides.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Alloys of composition (Fe-Co)83(Sn-P)5B12 have been prepared by planar flow casting method in air with substitution Co = 0; 5; 10 at. % for Fe and substitution P = 2 at. % for Sn. All as-cast ribbons were amorphous and submitted to chemical and thermal analyses, scanning and transmission electron microscopy and magnetic measurements. Hysteresis loops of strips after nanocrystallization at 380 and 400 °C for 30 min changed their shape – the saturation magnetization increased for Co containing alloys Js = 1.74–1.80 T. The off-axis component of magnetic anisotropy decreased significantly due to the annealing. Coercivity in this case considerably increased due to the growth of grain size and crystalline volume fraction. The samples annealed at 350 °C disclosed a relaxed state with changes in microstructure and achieved very good soft-magnetic properties namely for P substituted alloys.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Unique tags are often added to items to prevent counterfeiting and tampering. While there are many techniques for generating unique patterns, tags that are inexpensive, scalable, easy to read, and difficult to replicate are particularly useful for tracking applications. In this work, we present a novel tagging concept that utilizes self-assembly methods to create physically unclonable patterns using magnetic particles. By combining a distribution of Nd-Fe-B magnetic particles with a hard polymer inside a strong magnetic field, patterns are generated that are easily read using magneto-optic techniques. Image processing and template matching techniques are then used to determine the likelihood that two different magnetic tags are classified as the same. For optimal selections of particle percent mass, statistical analysis predicts that pattern matching yields at most one false positive for every 1015 true positives. Results further illustrate that variations in particle size and particle percent mass have a strong effect on the predicted pattern uniqueness. Finally, a magnetic field model was then used to help predict broad trends in pattern statistics and particle structures. This paper shows that magnetic self-assembly patterns hold promise as unique embedded tags for a large range of applications from microelectronics to luxury goods to low-cost off-the-shelf items.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic–dielectric composites with synergetic magnetic and dielectric losses have exhibited great potential in the practical applications of microwave absorbing material. This paper reports a simple low-temperature in situ hydrothermal approach for synthesizing novel composites composed of the dielectric Ti3SiC2 wrapped with magnetic CoNi nanoparticles. The microstructure, morphology, electromagnetic properties, and microwave absorption performance of as-synthesized samples were investigated. By adjusting the content of formed magnetic CoNi nanoparticles on the surface of Ti3SiC2, obvious regulated frequency-dependence of electromagnetic parameters for the proposed CoNi/Ti3SiC2 composites can be realized. Consequently, the effective absorption bandwidth (RL < −10 dB) and optimal reflection loss value of CoNi/Ti3SiC2-40 composites under thinner thickness of 1.55 mm can reach up to 4.88 GHz and −41.41 dB, respectively. Exceptional microwave absorption performance of the CoNi/Ti3SiC2 composites is attributed to its simultaneously improved attenuation characteristics and optimized impedance matching, and thus can be undoubtedly identified as high-efficiency microwave absorbing material.© 2021 The Author(s)This work gives insights into processing and characterisation of bulk nanocrystalline FeCr materials. The investigated FeCr alloys, consisting of 30, 50 and 70 at.% ferromagnetic Fe and remaining anti-ferromagnetic Cr, are processed by arc melting and subsequent severe plastic deformation by high pressure torsion. The physical similarities between elemental Fe and Cr in combination with the nanocrystalline structure of the as-deformed alloys, necessitates advanced characterisation techniques for the as-deformed state: In-situ annealing synchrotron X-ray diffraction measurements as well as electron microscopy experiments are linked to magnetostrictive measurements and reveal a single phase microstructure. Surprisingly, the nanocrystalline FeCr alloys remain supersaturated solid solutions upon annealing above 500 °C, meaning a decomposition in a FeCr nanocomposite is suppressed. For the chosen annealing conditions grain growth is faster than decomposition and enhanced magnetostrictive values are found compared to materials in the as-deformed state.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Two-dimensional (2D) ferromagnetic monolayers are highly desirable in the spintronic field owing to their atomic-thickness and controllable spin degree of freedom. We investigated the 2D transition-metal trichalcogenides MnGaX3 (X = Te, Se, S) as the promising candidate monolayer ferromagnets via first-principles calculations. Our calculations show that monolayer MnGaTe3 and MnGaSe3 are ferromagnetic (FM) metal and half-metal with large magnetic moments and sizeable magneto-crystal anisotropy energy. Both the monolayers are mechanical and dynamical stable, and can be exfoliated from the corresponding layered crystals. More importantly, Monte Carlo simulations predict high Curie temperature for MnGaTe3 (720 K) and MnGaSe3 (910 K). Plus, their ferromagnetic configurations become more stable under the increasing biaxial tensile strain from 0 to 5%. Metallic MnGaTe3 converts into half-metal under biaxial tensile strain, and the band gap of semiconducting spin-channel of half-metallic MnGaSe3 increases under the increasing strain. The distinct half-metallic and robust intrinsic ferromagnetism at high temperature render the two monolayers attractive in spintronics.© 2021 The Author(s)The article presents a design methodology of a thin layer, high-frequency cylindrical invisibility cloak intended for quasi-static magnetic fields. The proposed bilayer structure of a cloaking shell is synthesized using isotropic ferromagnetic and conductive materials. An analytical formula is derived to find the properties of a ferromagnetic layer in the wide frequency spectrum of an external time-harmonic magnetic field. The cloaking properties of the shell can be adjusted by the selection of conductive materials and estimated using an introduced formula. Analytical calculations are accompanied with numerical results of exemplary cloaking structures. The thin layer structures are able to maintain cloaking effect from a specific frequency, up to high frequencies of the magnetic field as long as displacement currents can be neglected. Additionally, the results of an experimental verification of the broadband magnetic cloak efficiency are reported. The cloaking shell composed of ferromagnetic polymer and conductive materials is subjected to the time-harmonic magnetic field. Three samples are presented and the magnetic field distortion, measured in the background area, is discussed. In order to obtain a desired effective electrical conductivity, a method of fabricating conductive layer, utilizing copper film on polytetrafluoroethylene base, is used. The experimental results are compared with both 3D and 2D numerical model of the cloak.© 2021Double-disc chemical-assisted magneto-rheological finishing (DDCAMRF) process is a successfully developed precision material removal process that has been applied to the polishing of brittle materials viz. monocrystalline silicon wafer. The mechanism of silicon polishing using the DDCAMRF process depends mainly on the magneto-rheological (MR) fluid, which behaves as a multi-point finishing tool. The MR fluid synthesized in the present work comprised of carbonyl iron powder, alumina abrasives, deionized water, and glycerol as the base fluid. The application of a magnetic field in the prepared MR fluid samples significantly affects its rheological properties, which in turn affects the quality of finished wafer surface. Therefore, the rheological, as well as magnetic properties of prepared MR fluid samples need to be studied in detail. The flow behavior of MR fluid is affected by the applied magnetic field, which therefore exhibits transition from Bingham-fluid like structure to gel-like structure. To characterize MR fluid's magnetic behavior, the M−B curve of the prepared MR fluid samples was plotted to determine the saturation magnetization using the data obtained from vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). Rheological properties like viscosity and yield stress of the prepared MR fluid were measured by using the parallel-plate rheometer. The obtained rheological data from the rheometer was fitted using the defined constitutive equations of respective fluid models, viz. Bingham-Plastic (BP), Herschel-Bulkley (HB), and Casson's (CS), respectively. The experimental results were analyzed, and the effect of increase in temperature on viscosity and yield stress was also discussed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The fabrication of composites consisting of ferromagnetic and ferroelectric complex oxides is important for the development of versatile multifunctional electronic devices. Herein, 0–3 type ceramic (BiFeO3)1-x-(Y3Fe5O12)x (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.3) composites, comprising Y3Fe5O12 particles randomly dispersed in a BiFeO3 matrix, were synthesized via a solid-state reaction. Two phases, BiFeO3 and Y3Fe5O12, were observed without the formation of any secondary phases. With increasing Y3Fe5O12 content in the composites, the leakage current dramatically decreased while the magnetic moment increased. A sputter deposition technique was introduced to grow BiFeO3-Y3Fe5O12 composite thin films on (0 0 1)-oriented SrTiO3 substrates. The BiFeO3-Y3Fe5O12 thin films grown at 650 °C exhibited isotropic magnetic behavior with low magnetization, whereas the magnetic hysteresis loops of the annealed films revealed two distinct slopes. The portion of the steeper slope near the zero field originated from the soft magnetic Y3Fe5O12 and increased with higher annealing temperature. This new fabrication of BiFeO3-Y3Fe5O12 composite thin films is promising to the design of new electronic devices with multifunctional properties.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.During the last two decades, in-depth investigation on smart magnetic polymer foam or known as magnetorheological (MR) foam has captured researcher's attention and motivated them to develop a wide spectrum of technology and the vast development of this said polymeric foam material in several potential fields such as in engineering and materials technology. MR foam can be identified as one of the MR materials, consisting of magnetic particles and porous absorbent matrix with the rheological properties that can be regulated continuously, rapidly, and reversibly using an external magnetic field. In particular, it is crucial to highlight the types of MR foam fabrication methods as it will be a significant parameter that would affect the designed and the final properties of MR foams. In other words, the main classifications and properties of MR foam are strongly dependent on the types of the fabrication method that were used such as ex situ and in situ. MR fluid foam, MR elastomer foam, MR plastomer foam, and in situ MR foam are the varieties of MR foam, which can be categorized accordingly based on the different types of the fabrication methods. Besides, the components of MR foam, such as the magnetic particles and absorbent foam matrix, are entirely evaluated to provide the researchers with a clear guidance on the selection and the use of suitable main components for the developments of MR foam. In this overview, the main intensive focuses on the fabrications of MR foam, classifications and potential applications have also been revised to enhance the real-world practicality of this material.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Graphene is well known for its extraordinary electronic and mechanical properties. Moreover, it has been shown that graphene's magnetic properties are also interesting due to its long spin diffusion length and, theoretically expected and experimentally demonstrated, spontaneous spin-polarization of nanoribbon zigzag edges. However, it is also quite clear now that there exist many other quasi two-dimensional (2D) graphenelike systems which do deserve attention, too. So, here the attention is also directed to the edge magnetism problem in stanene (2D Sn) and phosphorene (2D P). It is shown that these materials can exhibit a (so far hardly explored) phase with one zigzag edge being magnetic and the other - paramagnetic. This new phase may prove to be attractive for spintronics.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetism in Hf6Co23 intermetallic alloy at room temperature has been confirmed from perturbed angular correlation measurements using 181Hf probe. The strength of hyperfine magnetic field at room temperature for this intermetallic compound has been found to be Bhf=2.5(2) T while the earlier report of hyperfine magnetic field in Hf6Co23 has discrepancy. The hyperfine magnetic field at Ta impurity site has also been calculated by density functional theory and the result is found to be Bhf=-4.964 T (at 0 K). This value is closer to the present experimental value measured at 298 K. The compound Hf6Co23 has been found to decompose reversibly to Hf2Co7 at 473 K. Ferromagnetism in this material has been found up to 423 K and its Curie temperature is, therefore, set as TC>423 K. From recent measurements by X-ray diffraction, transmission electron microscopy, scanning electron microscopy, electron probe microanalysis and differential scanning calorimetry, Hf6Co23 was reported to be stable in a wide range of temperature and there was no phase existence of Hf2Co7 while the previous reported phase diagram showed a decomposition of Hf6Co23 to Hf2Co7 at a higher temperature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A comparative study of magnetic, electrical, and magnetotransport properties for the polycrystalline bulk Pr0.6A′0.2Sr0.2MnO3 (A′ ≡ Y, La) compounds has been presented in this article. The aforementioned ABO3 type perovskite compounds have been prepared with considering the average A-site ionic radius (〈rA〉) located around the phase boundary of the ferromagnetic insulator to ferromagnetic metal ground states of the prepared phase diagram for R0.8AE0.2MnO3 (R ≡ trivalent rare earth cations, AE ≡ divalent cations) compounds as a function of 〈rA〉. The decrease in chemical disorder along with an increase in electronic bandwidth from Y to La doping increases the ferromagnetic transition temperature from 90 K to 175 K, respectively, and also suppresses the resistivity as well as magnetoresistance substantially. The temperature-dependent resistivity curves exhibit the metal–insulator like transitions around 100 K and 200 K for the doping with Y and La, respectively. Moreover, a resistivity minimum at low temperature is also observed for both systems. This behavior is best explained using a model, developed considering the presence of electron–electron elastic scattering or interaction at low temperatures. However, the Y doping system exhibits stronger electron–electron interaction compared to the La doping system, since the previous one accommodates a higher chemical disorder and lower electronic bandwidth.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In the present issue, the magnetoelectric effect in a multiferroic antiferromagnetic spin system with the Dzyaloshinskii Moriya interaction is investigated. The Dzyaloshinskii Moriya interaction is assimilated to a local electric polarization coupled to an electric field which is a site-dependent field as well as the applied external magnetic field. By using the spin-wave theory as a diagonalization method and via the partition function, the physical properties of the system such as magnetoelectric polarizability, magnetization, and electric polarization are obtained. The numerical results reveal that the site-dependent magnetic and electric fields play a remarkable role in the quantum phase transition phenomena that occur in our system. In fact, the magnetoelectric properties response of the system due to the change of the temperature or the external fields reveals the formation of the intermediate states tuneable by the site-dependent parameters. Furthermore, the electric polarization and the magnetoelectric polarizability response of the system due to the variation of the magnetic field show that the magnetoelectric effect can be control by varying the magnetic or/and the electric site-dependent parameter. Overall, the cumulative influence of the site-dependent magnetic and electric fields is a good strategy to detect, elucidate, and control the unconventional phases transition that undergoes a multiferroic antiferromagnetic quantum spin system. Moreover, the results obtained in this work are very interesting for the technological application point of view because there could provide a new prescription for the construction of multifunctional spintronic devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A number of topological phases are found to emerge in the ferromagnetic Kitaev-Heisenberg model on CaVO lattice in the presence of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction. Heisenberg and Kitaev terms have been considered on nearest and next-nearest neighbor bonds in a variety of ways. Both isotropic and anisotropic couplings are taken into account. Topological phases are characterized by Chern numbers for the distinct magnon bands as well as the number of modes for topologically protected gapless magnon edge states. Band structure, dispersion relation along the high-symmetric points of first Brillouin zone, density of states and thermal Hall conductance have been evaluated for every phase. An extensive Phase diagram has been constructed. Topological phase transition in the parameter space is also studied.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric effect is characterized by a magnetic entropy change and an adiabatic temperature change. The DyMn2O5 system has attracted wide interest, particularly because of its multiferroic properties. Using ab initio methods, we investigated its electronic properties, such as the band gap value, the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties were also investigated using Monte Carlo simulations. We noticed an easy axis of magnetic spins along the y-direction with a large magnetic entropy change (ΔSMmax = 11.09 JKg-1K-1). These values were obtained with a magnetic field up to 70 kOe, making DyMn2O5 a good candidate for magnetic cooling at low temperature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Employing both experimental and first-principle techniques, the structural, dielectric, magnetic, and electronic characteristics of spinel-structured copper ferrite (CuFe2O4) nanoparticles (NPs) are examined. The CuFe2O4 NPs are synthesized by a co-precipitation technique (CPT) and characterized by transmission electron microscopy (TEM), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM), and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS). The SEM results display that the CuFe2O4 NPs possess mixed spinel phases. The composition of NP elements is determined via Energy-dispersive X-ray (EDX) spectroscopy. The magnetization and coercivity are evaluated by VSM measurements. The principal peaks of the O 1s, Cu 2p, and Fe 2p states are appeared at peculiar binding energies in XPS spectra. The magnetic features and electronic structures of the CuFe2O4 NPs are examined via density functional theory (DFT) together with on-site correction for Coulomb interaction using the generalized gradient approach (GGA + U) technique for exchange and correlation term. The CuFe2O4 NPs derived from the bulk spinel structure possess a magnetic semiconducting character. The results of density of states (DOSs) reveal an insulating character having an energy band gap of ~1.75 eV for both spin channels. The local magnetic moments display a ferrimagnetic spin arrangement in the CuFe2O4 nanostructure, manifesting through the hybridized d states of Fe/Cu and the p orbitals of O atoms. The K-edge X-ray absorption spectra (XAS) of Cu, Fe, and O ions in the CuFe2O4 nanostructure are also modeled with GGA + U technique and compared with the XPS results. The structural features of the local environment of Cu2+, Fe3+, and O2- ions are scrutinized theoretically to discern the ion sites centered at octahedral or tetrahedral lattice voids. The alternating current (AC) conductivity diminishes with the augmentation in frequency, yielding a semiconductive nature. The characterization of CuFe2O4 NPs can provide insights into their preferential magnetic and dielectric behaviors applicable in miniature magnetoelectronic and energy-storage devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Needle-shape single crystals of Co5/3Nb1/3BO4 warwickite were grown using the flux technique. X-ray diffraction measurements have revealed an orthorhombic structure (Sp. Gr. Pbnm) where the octahedral M1 site is occupied by a mixture of Co2+/Nb5+ ions and the M2 site is exclusively filled by Co2+ ions. Using dc magnetization measurements it was established that the new material undergoes two magnetic transitions: an antiferromagnetic transition at TN1 = 27 K and a ferrimagnetic one at TN2 = 14 K, below which a hysteresis cycle opens. Both magnetic transitions are marked by anomalies in the specific heat. High magnetic anisotropy with c-axis as a hard magnetization direction was detected.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Origin of ferromagnetism across the interface of two different diamagnets is an important issue in the magnetism of 2D materials in condensed matter physics. In recent years, a number of theoretical results have been reported on the magnetism of graphitic carbon nitride however the experimental verification is not well established. In the present work, graphitic carbon nitride (g-C3N4) has been decorated with silver nanoparticles to investigate the induced magnetic moment in diamagnetic g-C3N4 due to proximity effect of ultrafine conducting islands (Ag) grown on the surface of g-C3N4 and the interaction at the interface. Here Ag atoms act as n-type donor and each donor atom injects electron to the pz orbital of N atom. Due to charge transfer effect, localized holes are generated in Ag 4d orbitals, which show strong ferromagnetic ordering with coercivity (~1325) in the composite system. Very interesting Mott-type transition from metal to insulator (M−I) is observed. This complex nature of charge transport is explained by electron-electron interaction in the insulating region and electron scattering in the metallic region. Accordingly, the magnetotransport (MR) study also shows an interesting transition from positive magnetoresistance to negative magnetoresistance. In the hopping region, the positive MR is explained by wave function shrinkage model where the negative MR is due to quantum interference effect. In particular, this correlated magnetic and electric responses cause the Ag nanoclusters decorated graphitic carbon nitride system a potential candidate for future spintronic application.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we investigate the giant magnetoimpedance (GMI) hysteresis at high-frequency (10 MHz – 1 GHz) of Co-based amorphous magnetic ribbons. The first-order reversal curve (FORC) method was used to analyze their hysteretic behavior present at a low magnetic field (below 7 Oe). Results show that the GMI hysteresis is related to both the system magnetic anisotropy and the current frequency (through the skin depth). The GMI hysteresis gradually decreases upon frequency increase before disappearing, while a clockwise rotation of the FORC distributions is observed. These results are attributed to a heterogeneous magnetic structure in the magnetic ribbon volume. On the other side, while the cut-off frequency depends on the magnetic anisotropy strength, an inverted GMI hysteresis revives for the higher anisotropy ribbon. Above this frequency inversion, FORC results indicate a hardening of the effective switching field as a thicker region is probed. We propose that in this case, the stronger perpendicular anisotropy creates important differences between the superficial and volumetric anisotropy, enough to induce interaction between the two regions of different magnetization directions. This sensitive FORC protocol can be applied for investigating the GMI hysteresis, and thus the complex magnetic structure of several soft magnetic systems.© 2021The NixZnyMn1-x-yFe2O4 ferrite ceramics were prepared by the sol–gel auto-combustion method. X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy, infrared spectroscopy, vibrating sample magnetometer and vector network analyzer were used to characterize the microstructure and magnetic properties of the samples. The results show that only cubic spinel structure was detected by XRD in all sintered samples except the sample Zn0.4Mn0.6Fe2O4. The lattice parameter decreases monotonously with Ni content and simply increases with Mn content, which is stemmed from the change of ionic radii. The saturation magnetism increases when Ni content x is less than 0.4. The initial permeability has the largest value at x = 0.2, which fits in with the mechanism of domain wall motion. The Curie temperature increases with the increase of x due to the enhanced A-B interaction. The highest Tc is 505℃ for Ni0.8Zn0.2Fe2O4 ferrite. The effect of adding Mn elements on the magnetic properties depends on the content of Zn. When y is 0.2, the magnetic parameters (Ms and μi) increase with Mn content. However, when y is 0.4, they decrease because of redistribution of cations and the increase of α-Fe2O3. In addition, all samples with Ni elements show strong electromagnetic wave absorption capability in 2–13 GHz range, the minimum RF is −25.36 dB at 4.74 GHz for the Ni0.6Zn0.2Mn0.2Fe2O4 samples.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A zinc oxide whisker/polydimethylsiloxane-micro-arc oxidation (T-ZnOw/PDMS-MAO) composite coating was fabricated via MAO treatment coupled with spraying T-ZnOw/PDMS on sintered NdFeB magnet. The surface morphologies, chemical compositions and corrosion resistance of the composite coating were investigated using SEM, XRD, FT-IR, accelerated immersion test and electrochemical test, respectively. The effect of the composite coating on magnetic properties of NdFeB magnet was also studied. The results show that the composite coating has no significant effect on the magnetic properties of NdFeB magnet. The porous structure of the MAO coating is efficiently sealed by the PDMS molecules and the T-ZnOw/PDMS hybrid coating exhibits excellent superhydrophobicity with a contact angle of 168.67 ± 5.71° and sliding angle of 5.12 ± 2.81°. The T-ZnOw/PDMS-MAO composite coating can significantly enhance the corrosion resistance of the sintered NdFeB magnet.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The optical frequency comb has produced a great impact on the optical field and has been exploited widely in optical frequency metrology, optical atomic clocks and precision spectroscopy. Here, we propose a new kind of frequency comb, spin-wave frequency comb. Our theoretical study shows when spin wave passes a oscillating magnetic domain wall, a comb-like frequency spectrum is generated due to the strong interaction between the propagating spin wave and the domain wall. The amplitude and the frequency spacing on the frequency comb can be manipulated by tuning the domain wall oscillation. Similar to its optical counterpart, the spin-wave frequency comb proposed here may be exploited to design new magnonic devices. Moreover, the nonlinear control of spin wave through its coupling with oscillating domain wall consumes much less energy compared to the parametic excitation, and thus, points out a new way for low power consumption manipulation of spin waves.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This article proposes a novel approach to investigate the field-induced structuration in ferrofluids (FFs) at room temperature. The in-house experimental setup has been fabricated to perceive the influence of dipolar interaction and particle size of dispersed magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) in FFs on the static magneto-optical (MO) properties under the influence of an external magnetic field. The diffraction fringes are observed in FF when a high-power laser passing from the diluted fluid system which appearing at a specific dilution and varies with the different sizes and volume fraction of MNPs. The change in shape and size of the diffraction fringes is observed with the variation of both, size of dispersed MNPs and the Dilution of the FFs which is used to calculate the refractive index coefficient. The number of diffraction rings increases with an increase in the size of dispersed MNPs and its diameter decrease with an increase in particle volume fraction. The effect of thermal lens and nonlinear optical (NLO) behavior gives the validation of field-induced refractive index coefficient appearing in FFs commutated by the fringe diffraction method. Further, the variation of intensity of transmitted light has been corroborated with the forward scattering resulting from the Brownian motion of the nanoparticle. The experiment validates the chain formation in FFs, as MNPs are working as mesoscopic cylinders resulting in specified scattering patterns. This experimental approach can lead to a new pathway for the development of potential applications such as tunable optical filters, optical limiters, and various photonics fields based on the tunable MO properties of FFs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetocaloric properties of MnxFe5−xSi3 with x = 1, 1.1, 1.2, 1.3 were investigated for use in an active magnetic regenerator (AMR) for room temperature refrigeration. The Mn content was adjusted to tailor their Curie temperature and, hence, the operating range of the magnetic refrigerant. The peak magnetic entropy change and the maximum adiabatic temperature change for MnxFe5−xSi3 decreased with increasing Mn substitution. An in-house AMR testbed was built to investigate the suitability of the refrigerant in an AMR cycle. The maximum temperature span between cold and hot ends achieved by the AMR testbed using Mn1.2Fe3.8Si3 was 4.75 K at 300 K compared to 7.5 K for Gd. It was also demonstrated that the morphology of the refrigerant can have a measurable effect on the heat exchange between the refrigerant and the cooling fluid, which highlights that designing a solid magnetic refrigerant also requires appropriate technology to process the material to the desired size and shape. The magnetic refrigerant characteristics of MnxFe5−xSi3 were substantially inferior to those of Gd, but MnxFe5−xSi3 remains attractive in terms of material cost and processability.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.La0.5Sr0.5CoO3−δ system displaying coexistence of metallicity and ferromagnetism, and the interplay between distinct spin states of Co ions has gained significant attention from the fundamental as well as the applications point of view. In this regard, the effect of V5+ doping on the dynamics of spin and oxidation states of Co ions in the La0.5Sr0.5CoO3−δ system has been studied using structural, X-ray photoemission spectroscopy, magnetic and transport measurements. The La0.5Sr0.5Co1−xVxO3−δ (x = 0, 0.01, 0.02 and 0.1) series was prepared by conventional solid-state reaction method and its chemical homogeneity was established by inductively coupled plasma mass spectroscopy. The increase of lattice parameters/volume with increasing V5+ content in rhombohedrally crystallized (R3-c) samples is attributed to the presence of Co2+ ions. The presence of Co2+ ions and the reduction of Co3+ ion concentration with V substitution is verified from the results of core-level photoemission spectra of Co. Detailed magnetic measurements show an increase in Curie temperature, effective magnetic moment, soft magnetic nature and suggesting strengthening of underlying magnetic interactions. As a result of multiple oxidation states of Co ions and the delocalization of electrons, rise in the conductivity is noticed. Such enhancement in the conductivity and ferromagnetic ordering temperature, simultaneously, with V doping implies a strong coupling between spin and charge degrees of freedom. To understand the underlying mechanism more clearly, different possible scenarios have been discussed. The most appropriate scenario i.e., the conversion of Co3+ ions into Co2+ ions and admixture of Co4+ ion spin states with V5+ doping was found to be consistent with all the experimental observations.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Herein, adhesive composite insulating coatings containing epoxy resin, MgO and aluminum dihydrogen phosphate have been developed to obtain Fe-Si-Al soft magnetic composites (SMCs) with enhanced magnetic and mechanical properties. The influences of MgO content, MgO particle size and water content on magnetic and mechanical properties have been comprehensively investigated. It is shown that MgO can not only improve the curing quality of aluminum dihydrogen phosphate to enhance tensile strength, but also reduce eddy current loss by breaking conduction path. The water content determines the viscosity of the aluminum dihydrogen phosphate solution, thereby affecting the curing quality of the insulating layer. The content and particle size of MgO affect both the curing quality of the aluminum dihydrogen phosphate insulating layer and the uniformity of the insulating layer. When the experimental parameters have been optimized, the green strength can reach 51.66 N and product strength also exceeds 30.32 N. Meanwhile, permeability, core loss and DC-bias performance can also be effectively optimized via adjusting insulation layers. This work may shed new light on developing multi-functional insulation coating for SMCs products, and pave the way for researching adhesive insulation layer.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we proposed an equivalent circuit of a cell device (high-voltage silicon diode), considering effects of temperature and reverse voltage on it, and obtained the analytical expression of impedance of a cell device. Subsequently, in order to improve the reverse voltage distribution of the high-voltage diode stack consisting of a serial connection of cell devices, uniform voltage impedance was inserted in parallel with each cell device. Taking into account the impedance and the uniform voltage impedance of each cell device but also the leakage impedances connected to high-voltage terminal and ground terminal, the most generalized equivalent circuit of the high-voltage diode stack was newly proposed, from which the analytical expression on the reverse voltage applied to each cell device was obtained. Consequently, analyzing the ratio of the uniform voltage impedance to the impedance of a cell device and the non-uniformity of the reverse voltage distribution, the way to improve the reverse voltage distribution of the high-voltage diode stack was found, and it was verified experimentally. Finally, the possibility to estimate the reverse voltage distribution of the high-voltage diode stack quantitatively was supported by an analytical method, not experimental method.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Effect of growth-induced uniaxial anisotropy and thickness of non-magnetic Cu spacer between the ferromagnetic/antiferromagnetic Co/CoO multilayers on the exchange bias, coercive field, and magnetic anisotropy have been studied in 10–300 K temperature range. Co(8 nm)/Cu(tCu)/CoO(4 nm) (tCu = 0.6–2.6 nm) multilayers on Si (1 0 0) substrates were prepared using the oblique-angle magnetron sputtering deposition to induce growth induced magnetic anisotropy. The top Co layer was allowed to be naturally oxidized to obtain antiferromagnetic CoO. The films show a strong uniaxial in-plane anisotropy determined by ferromagnetic resonance measurements. Magnetization measurements for both easy and hard magnetization directions revealed that the exchange bias and coercive fields decrease by increasing Cu thickness. The existence of strong exchange bias across the thickest Cu layer shows the long-range character of exchange and dipolar interactions at 10 K. Dependence of Cu spacer thickness shows an oscillatory behavior that can be ascribed to the competitions between Ruderman–Kittel–Kasuya–Yosida (RKKY) and dipolar interactions.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The caustic of magnetoelastic waves (MEW) propagating in thick-film ferromagnets is investigated. The model of continuous medium is employed, and MEW are considered in the long wavelength approximation. It is shown that in thick-film samples the difference between the internal and external magnetic fields leads to a special form of the anisotropy of the MEW spectrum and, accordingly, to the appearance of a caustic. The possibility to control this phenomenon with the frequency of MEW is revealed. In particular, the directions and frequency ranges of the waves where the caustic occurs are obtained.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the electron magnetic resonance (EMR) of Ni47Co3Mn35.5In14.5 alloy in ribbon and powder form are investigated. The EMR spectra for ribbons were registered within the temperature ranges 4 K ⩽T⩽100 K and 140 K ⩽T⩽380 K and for powdered ribbon within the temperature range 140 K ⩽T⩽380 K. Additionally, the magnetic properties of ribbon were also studied by using vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) in the temperature range of 85 K ⩽T⩽400 K. At high temperature, the EMR signal consist of a single, asymmetric line. The temperature dependence of the inverse integrated intensity exhibits a Curie–Weiss like behaviour and Curie temperature (TC) determined from VSM equals 333 K. Below TC for ribbon sample the low field microwave absorption (LFMA) line was observed. The EMR spectra recorded for the powder sample are of a different shape than those for the ribbon sample. The powdering causes an increase of the effective skin depth, and the high-temperature lines lose asymmetric character. The Curie temperature is shifted relative to Curie temperature determined for the ribbon sample, but the structural phase transition is preserved.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.To realize the efficient current-induced spin-orbit torque (SOT) magnetization switching, the understanding of spin source with unique physics for the charge-to-spin conversion is very important. Here, we demonstrate the current-induced SOT magnetization switching by considering non-collinear spin moments mixed by Rashba-like Sy, Dresselhaus-like Sx, and out-of-plane like Sz by using micromagnetic simulation. The magnetization switching with considering three configurations of out-of-plane magnetization (along the z-direction), in-plane magnetization along the x and y-direction have been studied. The current induced out-of-plane spin moment can effectively contribute unconventional out-of-plane damping like torque to switch the mz at zero magnetic field. Similarly, the current induced Dresselhaus-like spin moments can switch mx effectively. Our results may provide a new degree of freedom for the understanding of current-induced SOT magnetization switching by non-collinear spin source for the potential application of spintronics devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The recent increasing demand for magnetic materials for applications such as electric motors in electric vehicles, as well as issues with restrictions to the supply of certain rare-earth elements, has led to renewed interest in SmFe-based alloys. The SmFe12-type crystal structure is especially desirable due to its high saturation magnetisation, but it is difficult to obtain this metastable phase on its own. Co, Zr, and Ti substitutions have been found to improve the magnetic properties and stabilise the hard magnetic Sm1Fe11Ti1 phase, while melt spinning and the hydrogenation disproportionation desorption recombination (HDDR) process have been found to produce fine grain size, and thus high coercivity. Therefore, in this work the effect of Co and Zr content on the magnetic properties of melt-spun and HDDR processed (Sm1-xZrx)(Fe1-yCoy)11.2Ti0.8 samples has been examined, where 0 ⩽ x ⩽ 0.3 and 0 ⩽ y ⩽ 0.25. Melt-spun, HD, and DR samples were analysed to determine the effect of varying the Co or Zr content. Amorphous Sm1Fe11Ti1 phase was found in all melt-spun samples. Co was found to exist in equal amounts in the α-(Fe, Co) and (Fe, Co)2(Ti, Zr) phases in the HD treated samples, while Zr existed mostly within the (Fe, Co)2(Ti, Zr) phase. The crystal size of the α-Fe or α-(Fe, Co) phase was shown to increase with increasing Co content but decreased with increasing Zr content. Increasing Co content generally improved Mr and Ms in the DR treated samples, whereas increasing Zr content was generally detrimental to Mr, Ms, and Hcj. However, each sample had a different fraction of the Sm1Fe11Ti1 phase, and higher Sm1Fe11Ti1 phase fractions were found to increase the Mr, Ms, and Hcj. Values of Mr, Ms, and Hcj corrected for the fraction of Sm1Fe11Ti1 phase were highest in the (Sm0.8Zr0.2)(Fe0.8Co0.2)11.2Ti0.8 sample. This composition should be investigated further to determine if superior magnetic properties can be produced, by optimising the DR treatment conditions to obtain 100 % Sm1Fe11Ti1 phase.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.MnAl(C) alloys are widely considered as potential candidates of rare earth-free permanent magnets. Fabrication of MnAl(C) magnets remains an intensive research topic. In this work, liquid-phase sintering is primarily explored to prepare MnAl(C) magnets by sintering (Mn54Al46)98C2 with Mn65Ga35 as an additive. The sintering temperature of 1273 K ensures the Mn65Ga35 in liquid-state and (Mn54Al46)98C2 in solid-state. The liquid-phase sintering leads to a noticeable densification effect on the magnets, in which the internal porosity is significantly reduced. As the weight percentage of Mn65Ga35 increases from 0 wt.% to 40 wt.%, the remanence magnetization μ0Mr increases from 1.44 kGs to 1.83 kGs, the coercivity Hc increases from 1.08 kOe to 1.52 kOe, and the energy product (BH)max increases from 0.25 MGOe to 0.45 MGOe. The Hc increase is explained based on the nucleation model. This work might provide a possible approach to fabricate MnAl(C) magnets.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Temperature dependence of the spin Hall magnetoresistance (SMR) has been investigated herein Pt/Cr2O3/Y3Fe5O12 structure. Well below the Néel temperature of Cr2O3, the SMR is not observed at the noise level of 1.2 ppm. In vicinity of the Néel temperature, only a positive SMR tracks the YIG magnetic switching process, supporting that the SMR of normal metal/antiferromagnetic insulator/ferromagnetic insulator trilayer is controlled by the Néel vector of the antiferromagnetic insulator. A high field magnetoresistance is observed up to an external magnetic field of 20000 Oe which has a field angle dependence symmetry consistent with the SMR. We attribute this high field magnetoresistance to be induced by the Hanle magnetoresistance in Pt.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Glioblastoma multiforme (GBM) is the most common and malignant form of astrocytoma with a median survival time of 1–2 years after diagnosis. The major treatment hurdle is the limited delivery of drugs to the brain due to the insurmountable blood brain barrier (BBB). Literature review reveals that nanoparticulate delivery system, in particular, magnetic polymeric nanoparticles in the presence of an external magnetic field may have enhanced permeation across the BBB. Therefore, the objective of this study was to fabricate the core of the polymeric nanoparticles with magnetic property. This core was fabricated by a modified seed synthesis method using tris(acetylacetonate) iron (III) [Fe(acac)3] as a precursor. To prevent the oxidation of Fe(acac)3, an overcoating with oleic acid was performed. The resulting oleic acid magnetic nanoparticle (OAMNP) was successfully prepared with a yield of 187.5 ± 4.2 mg. The particle size of the core was 9 ± 0.3 nm with a polydispersity index (PDI) of 0.189 ± 0.001. OAMNP was dispersed within the polymeric matrix comprising of poly(lactic acid)–methoxy poly(ethylene oxide) (PLA–PEG) and poly(lactic-co-glycolic acid) (PLGA) (PEG PLGA) by single emulsion solvent evaporation technique. The resulting nanoparticle had a particle size of 201 ± 2.1 nm with a PDI of 0.197 ± 0.003. The presence of co-polymer block linkage on the surface of OAMNP was qualitatively confirmed by proton NMR and FT-IR analysis. The mean entrapment efficiency of OAMNP within the PEG PLGA matrix was 43%. The iron concentration was 60 ± 3.1 µg/ml which was below is cytotoxic concentration, and in line with published literature. Furthermore, in the presence of an external magnetic field superior efficacy of OAMNP PEG PLGA NPS in U-138 cells was observed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Zr6Co23 thin films deposited on Al2O3(0001) substrate by RF magnetron sputtering have been investigated. The effects of thickness δ on the magnetic properties are discussed using random magnetic anisotropy calculations and the ferromagnetic resonance measurements (FMR). Correlations between the microstructure, magnetic extrinsic and anisotropy properties, in particular the impacts of surface morphology and the roughness Rrms, exchange Aex, easy axis deviation θu° and magnetic anisotropy constants Ki,i=1,2, have been studied. The results showed that when the Zr6Co23 thickness was 150 nm, the Zr6Co23/Al2O3(0001) showed the optimum magnetic properties. The coercive field Hc = 172 × 104 A/m, maximum energy product (BH)max of 81.91 kJ/m3 and anisotropic field HA is around 9.31 × 104 A/m. The excellent properties of this film lead us to conclude that it is a very suitable candidate for spintronics and ultra high density magnetic storage applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Understanding the magnetic interaction force between permanent magnets is important for the design and optimization of the system where they are implemented. However, the methods that are utilized in the literature to compute this force are either time-consuming or approximated with a low degree of generalization. This article presents a surrogate model developed based on a data-driven approach using a deep learning method which addresses this problem. Firstly, a charge model is applied to derive a semi-analytical model (SAM) of the interaction forces between permanent magnets. Using this SAM, the features of the deep learning model (DLM) have been selected, and the training, validation and test datasets that are used to train the DLM have been generated. The DLM training process took 2 h and 30 mins to complete. The difference between the SAM and deep learning model is less than 4.2%, and there are 99.2% and 96.05% of the cases over 885 random tested samples where the errors are less than 2% and 1%, respectively; this indicates that the selected deep learning model is feasible and can provide accurate results compared to the original SAM. Moreover, the permutation feature importance (PFI) analysis shows that the most predictive feature is the separation distance between the magnets, and the heights of the magnets have less predictive power than their radii; the generality of the deep learning model is also demonstrated based on the PFI criteria. Furthermore, compared with Finite Element Analysis (FEA) and the SAM, the surrogate model yields a high accuracy of prediction (the minimum, average and maximum differences between the surrogate and FEA models are 0.06%, 0.42% and 1.74%, respectively) while it required a computational time less than 10-4 s, which is multiple orders of magnitude lower than its FEA and SAM counterparts. The developed data-driven surrogate model can facilitate the design, optimization processes of permanent magnet systems and online computation of the magnetic force through a dynamic study. In addition, using the superposition principle, the magnetic forces between cross-shaped permanent magnets can be computed using the surrogate model. The authors have further designed a user-friendly software interface to compute the magnetic force using the recently developed surrogate model; the software is publicly available under the CC BY 4.0 license, and can be found at: https://github.com/vantainguyen/Force-between-magnets-machine-learning.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of an Nd-Fe-B-type permanent magnet depend on the microstructure and the chemistry of the material. To compensate for unfavorable microstructural features, such as micron-sized grains of the hard-magnetic phase, the intrinsic coercivity is often enhanced by the addition of heavy-rare-earth elements, but these additions also reduce the magnetization. In some applications, like electro-mechanical devices, a high intrinsic coercivity is only required in certain regions of a magnet. In such cases, using magnets with locally tailored magnetic properties, i.e., multicomponent magnets, would enhance the magnet-containing device's performance. Here, we propose a spark-plasma-sintering (SPS) approach to the manufacture of multicomponent Nd-Fe-B magnets. By exploiting the SPS-specific processing conditions, namely fast heating rates (100 °C/min) and low consolidation temperatures (≈670 °C), such magnets can be prepared directly from nanostructured melt-spun powders (the one-step SPS approach) or SPS-processed precursor magnets (the two-step SPS approach). Optimizing the SPS processing conditions prevents the grain coarsening related to the pre-existing microstructural inhomogeneities of the powders. The magnetic characterization reveals reliable performance over a wide range of operating temperatures. The high remanent magnetization of a heavy-rare-earth-free powder (Br = 0.82 T) and the high intrinsic coercivity of a powder containing 1.5 at. % Dy (Hci = 2075 kA/m) are preserved in a multicomponent magnet characterized by an abrupt change in magnetic properties close to the interface between the respective magnet parts.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The vibron quasi-bound state stability was analyzed for the series of compounds CeCuxAg1-xAl3, 0.2 < x ≤ 1 (tetragonal phase) by using heat capacity and inelastic neutron scattering. The measurements of heat capacity show a significative reduction of ordering temperatures from 2.3 K at CeCu0.85Ag0.15Al3 down to 1.6 K for CeCu0.7Ag0.3Al3, increasing again up to 2.8 K for CeCu0.3Ag0.7Al3, while Kondo temperatures change from 9 K to 7 K. The electronic contribution of heat capacity, γ, slightly increases with unit-cell volume from 200 mJ/mol-K2 (x = 0.85) to 210 mJ/mol-K2 (x = 0.3), indicating small changes in the density of electronic states at Fermi level. The measurements of inelastic neutron scattering indicate the existence of two underlaying crystal-field excitations for cerium ions in paramagnetic regime well described according to Vegard's law while the volume of the series CeCuxAg1-xAl3 compounds is increased. Additionally, a new magnetic excitation is found only in CeCu0.85Ag0.15Al3 and CeCu0.7Ag0.3Al3 compounds that comes from the coupling between a crystal field excitation and a single “orthorhombic” phonon mode, via single ion magnetoelastic interaction. The intensity of this coupling increases from 0.4 meV/ion for CeCuAl3 to 0.7 meV/ion for CeCu0.7Ag0.3Al3, but after, it fades away for CeCu0.3Ag0.7Al3. The intensity of this coupling is highly dependent on the energy resonance between phonon mode and crystal-field excitation, but also on the strength of the oscillator that vanishes when the volume of the unit-cell increases sufficiently. Furthermore, the existence of this coupling suggests the presence of an effective attraction between pairs of 4f-electrons, which would explain the reduction of ordering temperatures for compounds with copper composition around 50%.© 2020 Elsevier LtdSilicon Photonics Technology using sub micrometer SOI platform, which commercially emerged at the beginning of the century, has now gained market shares in the field of fiber optic interconnects, from Inter-to Intra-Data Center communications. With growing demands in terms of aggregated bandwidth, scalability, transceiver form factor, and cost, Silicon Photonics is expected to play a growing role, especially with the foreseeable need to co-package photonic transceivers with next generation Ethernet switches. This new paradigm will be possible only with an evolution of existing Silicon Photonics manufacturing platforms, in order to solve the challenges of 3D packaging, laser integration, reflow-compatible optical connectors and high efficiency, low footprint modulators. Achieving these challenges may pave the way to Terabit scale communications in Data Centers and High Performance Computing Systems (HPC).© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Spinel soft ferrites are magnetic materials which form an important classification of metal oxides containing ferric ions. These materials are represented with empirical formulae M2+Fe23+O4 (where M = Mg2+, Co2+, Ni2+, Zn2+, Fe2+, Mn2+ etc.). Nanoscale particles of these soft ferrites are important for several applications such as in the design of power antenna, low noise electronic devices, high frequency, biocompatible biomedical tools, for use in eco-friendly wastewater treatment and catalysis. Ni-Zn ferrites are unique due to their properties such as high electrical resistivity, saturation magnetization and magnetic permeability. In addition, Ni-Zn ferrite nanoparticles provide a large surface to volume ratio as compared to their bulk counterparts and these materials have exceptional properties like spin coating, surface anisotropy and superparamagnetism. These properties could further be exploited to develop advance high frequency systems, necessary for defence, communication and medical applications, representing an important future innovation in the field of material science. Therefore, this review intends to provide an extensive overview on synthesis, characterization and high frequency applications of Ni-Zn nanoferrites in the last two decades.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Composite Cu/NiFe wires with two different compositions of electrolytic NiFe layers were investigated by the small angle magnetization rotation (SAMR) method. From the measurements the induced anisotropy and the saturation magnetostriction constants were determined. The measurements were compared with the theoretical model based on the quasistatic approximation. The experimental results well agreed with the theory.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic refrigeration, based on the magnetocaloric effect, is an attractive alternative to the conventional vapor-compression technology. In a solid state magnetic refrigerator the traditional alternated fluid flow is replaced by two solid thermal switches (TSs) that control the heat flux. These TSs are materials, or devices, whose thermal conductivity changes with an external stimulus. Here, we numerically investigate how the performance of a solid state magnetic refrigerator depends on the TS thermal conductivities (k) and corresponding k-variations (Δk) with the magnetic field. Two different scenarios were considered: a single TS and a double TS magnetic refrigerator. We have numerically varied the thermal conductivity of the thermal switches, operating frequency and working temperature. The use of only one thermal switch with near-ideal Δk is enough if the required performance does not overcome half of the adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad) of the magnetocaloric material. To overcome this value the device must use two effective thermal switches. Using an additional thermal switch is only beneficial when ΔTad needs to be overcome, or when the first thermal switch shows a modest Δk. These results simplify the operability control, which will increase the interest for magnetically activated thermal switches operating at acceptable magnetic fields.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the electronic and magnetic properties of bulk spinel ferrite MnFe2O4 were carried out using ab initio calculations and Monte Carlo simulation. The electronic properties as well as, the exchange coupling interactions and the magnetic anisotropy were calculated using Density functional theory. The obtained exchange couplings between nearest n eighbours (JAB = −21.8 K, JBB = 13.7 K and JAA = 8.6 K) and the magnetic anisotropy were used as input parameters in a classical Ising model to study the finite-temperature effects on the magnetic properties of bulk MnFe2O4 with different size. It is shown that MnFe2O4 has a magnetic transition around 559.26 K.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Flexible nanocomposite films of poly(vinylidene fluoride)(PVDF)/nickel ferrite (NiFe2O4) fiber were made using solvent casting method. The NiFe2O4 fibers with a diameter of 400 nm were synthesized initially by means of electrospinnig technique. Studies of XRD and FTIR confirmed the formation of both α and β phases in the composite films. The presence of α-phase was diminished with the incorporation of NiFe2O4 and a maximum β-phase percentage (68%) was obtained. SEM and AFM analyses also demonstrated the transformation of the microstructures from α to β phase. The ferroelectric properties were tested with respect to NiFe2O4 loading and the composite film with 10 wt% NiFe2O4 exhibited a high Pmax value of 1.46 μC/cm2. VSM studies revealed the ferrimagnetic behaviour of the films and exhibited a maximum saturation magnetization value of 4.2 emu/cm3. Local ferroelectric properties were investigated through their domain switching behavior using dynamic contact electrostatic force microscopy (DC-EFM), and magnetic force microscopy (MFM) was used to analyze the magnetic properties. The magnetoelectric cross-coupling between ferroelectric and ferrimagnetic orderings is verified through the variations in ferroelectric parameters under different magnetic fields. Then a nanogenerator was fabricated using the composite films and generated an open circuit voltage of 10 V (peak-peak). Additionally, these films were made into magneto-mechano-electric (MME) generator, which could generate a 4.8 V (peak-peak) output voltage under a weak AC magnetic field of 10 Oe at 50 Hz.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we report the effect of V and Y-doping on the structural and magnetic properties of the GdCrO4 compound obtained by the co-precipitation method. The analysis of the X-ray diffraction data using the Rietveld refinement confirm the formation of a single phase consistent with the zircon-type structure (tetragonal and I41/amd space group) and a decreasing of lattice parameter with increasing of doping. The T-dependent magnetic susceptibility is consistent with a ferromagnetic and an antiferromagnetic orders for YCrO4 and GdVO4 samples, respectively. On the other hand, the positive signal of Curie–Weiss constants of doped samples indicate the predominance of ferromagnetic correlations. Furthermore, the displacement of the maximum of susceptibility and the thermal hysteresis as a function of doping can be an indication of frustration effects. Isothermal magnetization measured at T = 2 K show a change of slope at low magnetic fields for V-doped samples and a decrease of the magnetic moment for Y-doped GdCrO4. At T = 15 K, the analysis of MvsH curves reveal that only part of Gd3+ magnetic moments are ordered.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The effect of cation composition on the magnetic, electronic, optical, and structural properties of the spinel oxides AB2O4 (A = Fe, Mn, Co; B = Al, Ga, In) were studied within DFT-GGA + U approximation. The spinels were considered both in the normal and inverse structure. FeB2O4 (B = Al, Ga, In) spinels have an inverse structure, whereas AB2O4 (A = Mn, Co; B = Al, Ga, In) prefer a normal structure. We find that the studied spinels are antiferromagnetic materials with the composition-dependent bandgap. The bandgap width is determined by the minimum of the conductive s-band formed by B-site cations states and can be increased by the applied pressure. The microscopic mechanisms of the relationship between composition, structural and electronic properties are analyzed. The ability to manipulate the structural, electronic, and optical properties is attributed to the different s-orbital energies and sizes of the B-site cations.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe present two novel barrier-well heterostructure diodes, for use as zero bias detectors in microwave and mm-wave applications. One based on the GaAs platform and one based on In0.53Ga0.47As lattice matched to InP. This is achieved by adding quantum wells to Asymmetric Spacer Layer Tunnel (ASPAT) diodes next to the barrier. The DC characteristics of these new diodes were simulated in SILVACO Atlas TCAD software using experimentally validated physical models based upon conventional ASPAT diodes. The highest extracted curvature coefficients of these diodes at zero bias were 33 V−1 and 35 V−1 for GaAs and In0.53Ga0.47As based structures respectively. A C-V analysis was performed, and it was found that the addition of quantum wells reduced the zero-bias capacitance of these devices when compared with the standard ASPAT diode. The new diodes exhibited estimated cut-off frequencies of 532 GHz and 800 GHz for the GaAs and In0.53Ga0.47As based structures respectively. The lower cut off frequencies for the In0.18Ga0.82As/AlAs/GaAs devices is largely due to their inherently higher series resistance© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In the present study, we demonstrate the measurement of resistivity tensor (ρ) in the plane of a polycrystalline film of ferromagnetic permalloy (Py). To this end, conventional Hall-bar and a more recent extended van der Pauw methods were utilized for determining 2D ρ in the film plane. The samples were prepared by normal incidence sputter deposition within an in situ magnetic field to induce in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy in the film. Since ρ might be affected by the internal magnetization of the film, we performed measurements by rotation of a saturating magnetic field in the film plane. Both methods indicate that the average resistivity is lower along the magnetic easy axis of the film compared to the hard axis. Since X-ray diffraction results indicated no dominating texture in the film, we concluded that there is a correlation between uniaxial magnetic axes and principal resistivity axes. This is an important finding that allows determining the direction of magnetic anisotropy axes without magnetometry. The results also verify atomic or pair ordering to be the origin of uniaxial magnetic anisotropy in the Py since resistivity is sensitive to the level of order in solids. The extended van der Pauw utilized here can be easily performed on the as-deposited samples, which is of practical interest.© 2021 Elsevier LtdLogic gates are designed using symmetric lateral doping-free bipolar junction transistor (BJT) on silicon on insulator (SOI) using differential pass transistor logic, and their performance matrices are presented. Charge carriers are induced in lightly doped emitter and collector regions using two unique approaches. i.e., the charge plasma (CP) and polarity control (PC). AND, OR and XOR gates are designed using four types of devices (CP-NPN, CP-PNP, PC-NPN, and PC-PNP) and transient and noise margin analysis are performed. The transient response shows rise and fall time less than 100 ps while worst-case noise margin of 0.25 V observed for an input voltage of 1 V. Moreover, 2:1 multiplexer is also designed and explored for output transient and voltage levels. The delay of less than 2.2 ns is achieved with a nominal deviation of 0.1 V and 0.04 V for high and low output levels respectively.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Present work deduces the development of Nd3Pr3Fe67Co3Nb3Ti1B20 nanomagnets produced through magnetic annealing the amorphous precursors prepared through rapid solidification technique. Changes in structure and magnetic properties were investigated at as-cast and annealed stages. Results revealed that magnetic field annealing stimulates the kinetics of crystallization and modifies the structure and magnetic properties of the Nd3Pr3Fe67Co3Nb3Ti1B20 nanomagnets. Thermal analysis showed a glass transition temperature at 845 K and a crystallization temperature at 890 K for the alloy. X-ray diffraction studies demonstrated that as-cast alloy has amorphous structure while annealed magnet has multi-phase crystalline structure. Phase analysis elucidated that optimal annealed structure is compose of 34% Nd2Fe14B, 32% Pr2Fe14B, 21% α-Fe and 13% Fe3B phases. The HRTEM studies provoked that magnet microstructure consists of 55 nm Nd2Fe14B, 50 nm Pr2Fe14B, 24 nm α-Fe and 20 nm Fe3B magnetic grains which were interacted through ultra-thin grain boundaries. Henkel plot showed that grains of hard magnetic Nd2Fe14B (Pr2Fe14B) phase are coupled to grains of soft magnetic α-Fe (Fe3B) phase. Magnetic properties of nanocomposite magnets depend critically on the mass fraction of alloy constituent elements, casting conditions and heat treatment parameters. A small deviation of ±30 K from the ideal annealing temperature may affect the morphology of phases in the microstructure, which, in turn, influences the resultant magnetic properties of the final magnetic product. Optimal annealed Nd3Pr3Fe65Co3Nb3Ti1B20 rod magnet enunciated coercivity of 630 kA/m, remanence of 0.83 T and magnetic energy product of 84.3 kJ/m3. The present research work opens a new way to manufacture high performance magnetic components for advanced electronic devices, magnetic systems and magnetic recording media.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The present study is focused on the investigation of the magnetic properties of hexagonally ordered iron nanowire arrays electrodeposited into anodic alumina templates. A series of 9 arrays of nanowires with a diameter of 52 nm, an interwire distance of 100 nm, and a length varying from 3.6 to 21.2μm is analyzed. Scanning electron microscopy, X-ray diffraction, SQUID magnetometry, and first-order reversal curves (FORC) analysis are used for the characterization of the nanowire arrays. The increase in coercivity with nanowire length is well described by a model of interacting wires, which are magnetized likely by a vortex domain wall mechanism. According to the width of distribution observed in the FORC diagrams, interaction fields decrease with increasing length, which supports the proposed model.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWith the recent advances in carbon nanotube (CNT) electronics, transistors made of thin films of single wall CNTs (SWNTs) are gaining great attention due to their high quality electrical characteristics. With such improvements it has become essential to develop suitable models to accurately predict the electrical transport in such devices which in the current scenario remains scarce. This work presents a numerical simulation of current transport in SWNT thin film-based transistors (TFTs). The developed model considers both Ohmic and Schottky type contacts that are exhibited by such field effect transistors based on which two separate modes of transport for electrons and holes are described. The electron transport is described through a tunneling transmission process while the hole transport is described by a thermionic transmission process where the model treats each SWNT individualistically and determines the overall current through a novel iterative process. The accuracy of the proposed model is verified by comparing it with multiple experimental data.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic order and its changes upon martensitic transition are investigated in non-stochiometric Ni50Mn28Ga22 single crystal exhibiting magnetic shape memory effect by ferromagnetic resonance. The resonance is measured with magnetic field applied in plane along two 〈1 0 0〉 perpendicular directions in the flat rectangular sample. While for one field direction the spectrum can be explained by the standard ferromagnetic resonance, for the other the spectrum suggests the two sublattice model of ferrimagnetic resonance. Magnetic anisotropy of martensite, determined from the resonance fields, well corresponds with the magnetocrystalline anisotropy obtained by the static methods. On transition to the austenite phase magnetic anisotropy disappears while exchange resonance mode derived from the two sublattice model persists. The position of the modes indicates that the minority sublattice of excess Mn atoms is only weakly antiferromagnetically coupled with the majority sublattice of Mn atoms in the ordinary sites. The effective exchange field HE = 5.5 Ms, where Ms is spontaneous magnetization, is about three orders smaller than the values found for ordinary ferrimagnets.© 2021 Elsevier LtdZ2-FET, a partially gated diode, was explored for Electrostatic Discharge (ESD) protection. Its sharp switching behavior is also promising for single-transistor (1T-DRAM) memory application. Based on detailed TCAD simulations, we develop a pragmatic SPICE compact model, including DC and memory operation. The model is validated via TCAD and experimental data. The proposed model reproduces the S-shaped V-I characteristics, the hysteresis and the turn on/off voltages. This model is implemented using Verilog-A and allows to evaluate, through SPICE simulation, the figures of merit for DC, transient and memory operation. It is useful for cell optimization and memory matrix design.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Different heat treatment processes were applied to soft magnetic 08 steel with different degrees of deformation to determine the effects on the materials’ magnetic properties. The cylindrical billets were upset in two different reduction and heat treated with three different processes, and cube samples with different strain values were selected for latter magnetic property testing. The magnetic properties of 08 steel were measured using a vibrating sample magnetometer, and the effects of strain and heat treatment on the magnetic properties were analyzed. The results indicated that in conventional heat treatment on a production line, as strain increases, the corresponding magnetisation increase and then decrease, and the value magnetisation are stable under different strain levels; such stability makes the 08 steel suitable for industrial production. Furthermore, the average grain size and uniformity of grains of all the samples were evaluated, and greater uniformity and a larger average size can lead to improved magnetic properties.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We here report on the complex magnetic structures within the Sr2Fe3Ch2O3 (Ch = S and Se) system that we studied by means of powder neutron diffraction. Successive magnetic transitions occur in the magnetic phase diagram of both compounds with an incommensurate character of the magnetic structure at higher temperatures and a lock-in to commensurate low temperature structures. The commensurate propagation vector for the Ch = S compound is different from the Se containing compound which could be indicative for changes in the size of competing exchange interactions implied by structural changes within the two materials.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Nucleation of reverse domains from saturated states and the following domain-wall (DW) propagation in electron-transparent anisotropic Nd-Fe-B sintered-magnet specimens (with thickness of 300 to 500 nm) was investigated. The specimens were in-situ imaged by Foucault-mode Lorentz microscopy with a 5-kOe in-plane magnetizing specimen holder. Three types of DW structure were found to play an important role in magnetization reversal: (i) long DWs running across GBs of several grains continuously while propagating perpendicularly to the easy axis; (ii) a pair of 180° Bloch DWs forming a hairpin-shape junction near the GB while propagating parallel to the easy axis; and (iii) zig-zag composition DWs pinned at c-plane GBs. The results of observations by electron holography showed that the magnetization misaligns from the easy axis locally near hairpin tips of head-on DWs when they are pinned on c-plane GBs. Stability of the head-on DW was investigated by micromagnetic simulation. The observed evolution of domains is explained in terms of the pinning fields of the GBs and the nucleation field of the DW, which both depend on surface damage of the specimens.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic skyrmions are emerging as key elements of unconventional operations having unique properties such as small size and low current manipulation. In particular, it is possible to design skyrmion based neurons and synapses for neuromorphic computing in devices where skyrmions move along the current direction (zero skyrmion Hall angle). Here, we show that, for a given graph, skyrmions can be used in optimization problems facing the calculation of the shortest path. Our tests show a solution with the same path length as computed with the Dijkstra's Algorithm. In addition, we also discuss how skyrmions act as positive feedback on this type of problems giving rise to a self-reinforcement of the path which is a possible solution.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Motivated by the recent advances in perovskite-based solar cells, here we investigate stability, electronic properties and vibrational characteristics of lead-free perovskite, CsMnCl3, and its low dimensional forms by means of first-principles calculations. Structural optimizations reveal that, regardless of whether it is bulk or ultra-thin single layer cubic perovskite structure, CsMnCl3 crystal exhibit robust antiferromagnetism in its ground state due to oppositely aligned magnetic moments of Mn atoms. In addition to total energy calculations, phonon band dispersions indicate that CsMnCl3 structure sustains its dynamical stability down to its thinnest single layer crystal structures. The calculated Raman spectrums state that while the first-order Raman scattering is forbidden for bulk CsMnCl3 due to the cubic symmetry; dimensional-reduction-driven symmetry breaking leads to emergence of experimentally-observable distinctive Raman active modes in bilayer and single-layer crystal structures. Moreover, the electronic band dispersions reveal that from its bulk to ultra-thin single layer structures CsMnCl3 crystals are robust antiferromagnetic insulators. Multiple valid features like controllable dimensionality, robust antiferromagnetism and wide electronic band gap make cubic CsMnCl3 crystal as a potential candidate for nano-scale optoelectronic applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Experimental and theoretical investigations on the structural and magnetic properties of the MnBi and MnBiC hard magnetic phases are presented. X-ray diffraction patterns showed that the highest concentration of MnBi low-temperature phase (LTP) was obtained for annealing at 400 °C for 12 h. X-ray photoemission measurements (XPS) of the core levels (Mn 2p and 3d; Bi 4d and 5p, respectively) show chemical shifts by C addition, providing evidence that the C atoms enter the MnBi structure in the vicinity of both type of metallic atoms. C atoms were assumed to occupy the 2d interstitial crystal sites of the hexagonal NiAs structure type, as suggested in earlier studies. The theoretical calculations show that C addition enhances slightly the magnetic moment of the samples compared to pristine LTP MnBi, in agreement with our magnetic measurements. Also, following both theoretical and experimental investigations, we obtained increased magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy (MAE) by adding C as interstitial dopant.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In the present work exchange bias in Mn rich Ni-Mn-Al film has been studied. The film has been deposited by cosputtering from the targets of Ni, Mn and Al. It exhibits an antiferromagnetic B2 phase at room temperature. At low temperature, magnetization versus temperature (M-T) measurement shows a bifurcation among ZFC and FC curves. Hysteresis (M-H) loops measurements reveal the occurrence of exchange bias phenomenon at low temperature. Large HEB of 2.2 kOe for 20 kOe cooling field has been observed. There occurs a field induced ordering at temperature ~50 K reflected as coinciding ZFC (zero-field cooled) and FC (field-cooled) curves at large magnetic field. AC susceptibility measurement indicates the occurrence of cluster glass behaviour at low temperature. The exchange constant obtained from the best fit to the experimental data was found to be Ji ≈ −2 meV. The negative interface exchange constant indicates AFM coupling occurs among the coexisting phases. Exchange bias phenomenon may be associated to the coexistence of antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic like ordering at low temperature. Cooling field dependence of HEB and coercive field HC indicate that an increase in anisotropy and growth of ferromagnetic clusters occurs at high magnetic field.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Monte Carlo methods are widely used to study magnetism. However, their use to the calculation of coercivity has been problematic because of difficulties in quantifying Monte Carlo time. Here we propose a new approach of studying coercivity based on Monte Carlo sampling of the switching time at different reverse fields. This method allows comparative analysis of how coercivity is affected by various factors without needing time quantification of the Monte Carlo step. We apply the new method to study antiferromagnet-ferromagnet exchange coupling systems and show that practically large coercivity and enhanced maximum energy product can be achieved by properly adding antiferromagnet to high-magnetization ferromagnets such as Fe16N2. The finding is important to the design of new rare-earth-free permanent magnets.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The electrical resistivity modulation by the application of external magnetic fields, known as magnetoresistance effect (MR), is a widely studied subject driven by both technological applications and fundamental challenges, although being difficult to make numerical predictions from first analytical principles. In this work, we present a MR simulator protocol that combines micromagnetics with classical electrodynamics and works well for room temperature anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) for a large magnetic field variation range. As a proof of concept, we applied it to simulate the AMR of a previously reported Co-C composite nanostructure defined by a central nanostripe as the current line with transversal voltage contacts. In addition to the macroscopic measurable quantities like average magnetization and MR signal, the method returns the microscopic spatial magnetization distribution and gives insights about the magnetization reversal mechanism. For example, for this particular case, the magnetic domain walls are predominantly nucleated near the magnetic voltage terminals and their propagation features are the main responsible for the MR observed behavior. Other elements can be easily incorporated to the protocol in order to simulate materials with additional complexities such as crystalline grains or magnetocrystalline anisotropy.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A diode, a device allowing unidirectional signal transmission, lies at the heart of modern information technology as a fundamental element of logic operations. Here, we study the motion of the skyrmion driven by the spin wave (SW) in the presence of a transverse magnetic field. We show that the external magnetic field leads to a shift of SW dispersion relation and induces an asymmetric skyrmion propagation when SWs are injected from opposite sides. Based on this finding, we propose the concept of a SW-driven skyrmion diode. We numerically compute the spin-wave transport coefficients to quantify the number of reflected magnons, which explains the skyrmion velocity asymmetry. Our results offer a new insight to design skyrmion devices embracing chiral SWs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Rational design of microstructure and components provides an effective method to address the challenge of developing advanced microwave absorption (MA) materials. In this work, combining the preparation of the precursors (SiO2@RF) for the deposition of Fe-glycerate (Fe-G) nanosheets and in situ pyrolysis process, followed by removal of the SiO2 template, the bird-nest-patterned C@Fe3O4 (BN-HDCF) composites with hollow dual-shell structure are rationally constructed to obtain superior MA performance. The results demonstrate that the eddy effect is suppressed by lamellar Fe3O4 shell, which benefits the entrance of electromagnetic waves (EMWs) and the cavity and groove of bowl like carbon core could boost the attenuation of EMWs. Importantly, due to the integration of the synergistic effects and the multiple polarization loss as well as the improved impedance matching, the as-prepared BN-HDCF composites demonstrate excellent MA performance in view of both minimum reflection loss (RLmin, −80 dB) and effective absorption bandwidth (EAB, below −10 dB, 6.1 GHz) with a thickness of 2.23 mm, covering the full X band with a thickness of 3.1 mm. Such impressive MA performance lights the way to the fabrication of the hierarchical structure of advanced absorbents.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Co2Z-type hexaferrites were synthesized with sol–gel method, and then were composited with pure iron powders to form a new type of iron-based soft magnetic composites (SMCs). The morphology, components and magnetic properties of all samples were characterized by XRD, SEM, EDS, B-H Analyzer and DC Current Source. All results indicate that Co2Z-type hexaferrites are well dispersed in the SMCs and play the role of insulation. Fe/Co2Z SMCs with the high Ms and low Hc present the higher effective permeability, lower core loss at high frequencies and more stable D-C bias characteristics than the pristine Fe SMCs. All results indicate that Co2Z hexaferrites with the high resistance could effectively improve the high-frequency performance of Fe/Co2Z SMCs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Symmetric and asymmetric ferromagnetic permalloy nanocaps of 100 nm diameter are investigated using micromagnetic simulations to study the influence of geometrical asymmetry on the magnetization reversal as a function of thickness. Symmetric nanocaps are featured by having a maximum thickness exactly at the center, whereas, in asymmetric nanocaps, the maximum thickness is at an oblique direction, 20° off to the center of the caps. Magnetization reversal and switching processes in asymmetric nanocaps are found to be strongly dependent on the field direction as well as on the thickness of the nanocaps. In the symmetric nanocaps, magnetization reversal happens via coherent rotation of the magnetic moments. On the other hand, magnetization reversal in asymmetric nanocaps happens via the formation of a non-uniform C-state. An increase in the nucleation field of C-state with the thickness of nanocaps indicates that the stability of the C-state increases with the thickness of the nanocaps. Formation of a C-state due to the shape-induced asymmetry results in distinct M-H loops that depends on the orientation of the nanocaps to the external field direction.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We show the possibility of high-frequency oscillations in a spin-torque oscillator that consists of an in-plane magnetized free and pinned layers in the presence of in-plane magnetic field by numerically solving the associated Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert-Slonczewski (LLGS) equation. We discover that frequency can be tuned significantly by tuning the direction of the in-plane magnetic field. Further, we observe the oscillation frequencies as high as 65 GHz for appropriate in-plane magnetic field angles. We also show the tunability of microwave frequency from ~15 GHz to ~68 GHz by tuning the magnitude of the direct current or the in-plane field angle and from ~35 GHz to ~65 GHz by varying the strength of the in-plane magnetic field. The power is proved to be enhanced by the in-plane field angle and current.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.B20-type FeGe is one of the noncentrosymmetric materials hosting magnetic skymions. In this work, we have prepared B20-type FeGe films by pulsed laser melting of metal Fe deposited on Ge(1 0 0). The formation of the B20 phase is confirmed by X-ray diffraction. The FeGe samples show a superparamagnetic behavior and their blocking temperatures increase with increasing the pulsed laser energy density. We conclude that this phenomenon is due to the increased grain size of the B20-type FeGe with increasing laser energy density. The presented method can be used to obtain different B20-type transition metal germanides and silicides, which can be magnetic skyrmion-hosting materials for spintronics.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Electromagnetic non-destructive controls are performed daily by steel manufacturers and steel user companies. Many methods exist, including Eddy Current Testing (ECT), Magnetic Particle Inspection (MPI), Magnetic Incremental Permeability (MIP), Magnetic Barkhausen noise (MBN) … In this domain, progresses are constant, however there are limitations and accurate simulation tools able to improve the methods efficiency are still expected. Most of steels are ferromagnetic and characterized by a strong nonlinear hysteretic magnetic behavior. A precise taken into account of hysteresis is mandatory in the development of useful simulation tools. The hysteresis standard of characterization imposes restrictive conditions (geometrical, electrical …) and most of Non-Destructive Testing (NDT) industrial end-users face difficulties to obtain these inevitable experimental results. In this manuscript, we describe an alternative method to adjust the hysteresis simulation parameters based on experimental results coming from classic NDT industrial equipment. The acquisition of a flat coil impedance in an ECT configuration and under the superimposition of a quasi-static magnetic excitation (MPI equipment) is performed to plot the tested specimen MIP signature. The Dodd & Deeds (D&D) analytical solution for an ECT flat coil is used to return the corresponding permeability. An optimization process based on a modified Jiles-Atherton (J-A) model is run to extract a suitable combination of hysteresis parameters. Finally, the good comparison with an experimental B(H) characterization is worth as a validation of the method.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The ongoing quest for defect-free thin films systems that are apt for being used as spin filtering materials for spintronic applications did yet not deliver satisfying results regarding materials that would be up to the pertinent requirements. Using soft x-ray absorption spectroscopy (XAS) and x-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD) measurements at the Co-L2,3 and Fe-L2,3 absorption edges, we have investigated the magnetic properties of a nanostructured thin film with self-assembled CoFe2O4 nanopillars embedded in BiFeO3, the latter being a well-known system for its combined multiferroic and spintronic properties. In this BiFeO3-CoFe2O4 heterostructure we observed a significant XMCD signal at the Co-L2,3 edges which turns out to be the largest among the presently reported for Co ions at room temperature. A quantitative analysis of the Co-L2,3 spectra unveils that such a large Co-L2,3 XMCD signal stems from the impeccable fully inverted spinel ordering of the A- and B-sites in antiphase-free CoFe2O4 nanopillars. This twofold perfect CoFe2O4 ordering feature yields an unprecedented optimization within a multifunctional ferrimagnetic-multiferroic thin film system highly relevant for spintronic applications, also resulting in an equally unprecedented macroscopic magnetic moment for such material as compared to its pure form as well as to technologically relevant thin film compound systems.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a profound study has been carried out on the microwave absorbing materials in NiCexFe(2-x)O4 (x = 0.0, 0.01, 0.03, and 0.05) spinel ferrites. The series of NiCexFe(2-x)O4 composition were synthesized by solid state reaction method. The Rietveld refinement of X-ray diffraction (XRD) profiles showed that all compositions were crystallized into a single-phase of nickel ferrite (NiFe2O4, space group Fd-3 m). The lattice constant was found to decrease from 8.3346 Å to 8.3310 Å with the increasing substitution of Ce3+ from x= 0.0 to 0.05. The surface morphological observation by Scanning Electron Microscope (SEM) revealed that the particle size decreased with the increasing of Ce3+ ions substitution. The magnetic properties parameters such as saturation magnetization (Ms), remanence magnetization (Mr), and coercivity (Hc) were obtained from magnetic-hysteresis (M−H) curves. The Ms were decreased (from 49.7 to 26.8 emu/g) whereas the μ0Hc was increased (from 154 to 188 Oe) with increasing substitution of Ce3+ in the NiCexFe(2-x)O4 series. The microwave absorption performance obtained from the Vector Network Analyzer (VNA) measurement showed that the increasing substitution of Ce3+ will enhance the microwave attenuation from 91.25% to 98.59%. It is expected that the composition of x= 0.05 (NiCe0.05Fe1.95O4) can be used as a reference to design new microwave absorbing materials.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The Fe-Si/Fe3O4 soft magnetic composites (SMCs) have been fabricated via in-situ reaction method. A layer of Fe3O4 was formed on the Fe-Si particles in the KNO3 solution, and the growth mechanism of the Fe3O4 coating layer has been studied, and its formation and thickness can be controlled by adjusting the concentration of KNO3 solution to obtain the microstructure of the composites and then adjust the magnetic performance of SMCs. The formation of Fe3O4 shell on Fe-Si particles can effectively reduce the core loss of the composites. The samples in-situ reacted in 0.1 mol/L KNO3 solution exhibit excellent comprehensive properties with high saturation magnetization, relatively high permeability (34), great frequency stability of permeability, and very low core loss of 13.6 w/kg (measured at 20 mT and 150 kHz).© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The work demonstrates the use of the laser optoacoustic method for observing the changes of the light extinction coefficient in unstable ferromagnetic fluids over time. The initial stabilized fluids were further diluted with a carrier liquid to violate the stability of the colloidal system. The form of optoacoustic signals excited in a ferromagnetic fluid carries information about its optical properties, which allows one to measure the light extinction coefficient of this fluid and obtain its distribution over the depth of fluid. The effect of dilution of ferromagnetic fluid on its optical properties was demonstrated. It was shown that the light extinction coefficient decreases by about 20% after 7 days after dilution, and after 30 days, its value decreases by half. The observed decrease in the extinction coefficient over time is a result of structural changes occurring in diluted ferromagnetic fluids. The proposed optoacoustic method can be useful for studying the optical properties of ferromagnetic fluids for developing optical devices based on them and also may be used to evaluate the stability of ferromagnetic fluids obtained by new technologies and fluids with a new type of stabilizer or carrier liquid.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The application based on current-driven domain wall (DW) motion mainly depends on the effective control of the moving velocity of the DW and its structural stability. In this paper, we show that a single square hole has a certain suppression effect on Walker breakdown (WB), and by introducing periodic square holes and improving the relevant design, a suppression effect on WB can be achieved in a limited time. As a result, the domain wall remains structurally stable while moving at a very high velocity. The size and position of the holes have an important influence on energy dissipation (ΔE) which plays a crucial role in the suppression of WB. We find that the ΔE strongly relies on the hole size (a), and theΔE has a polynomial relationship with the critical distance. When the current density is the critical value of JWB, the square hole size a = 16 nm and the distance between adjacent holes l = 1500 nm, WB can be suppressed perfectly, and the magnetic domain wall can keep moving at high speed for a long time.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Asymmetrical giant magnetoimpedance (AGMI) effect was investigated in FINEMET/Fe50Pd50 composite ribbons. Composite ribbon samples of 33 μm-thickness FINEMET sputtered with a layer of Fe50Pd50 film were produced, and the microstructure and magnetic properties were investigated. The results showed that the MI response was enhanced by Fe50Pd50 coating layer. The Fe50Pd50 coating layer generates a bias field to FINEMET ribbon, which leads to the asymmetry of GMI curves. The bias field decreases with the increasing of the thickness (t) of Fe50Pd50 coating layer. The asymmetry of GMI curves almost disappears at t = 70 nm. Asymmetry could be tuned by changing the thickness of Fe50Pd50 coating layer, which is analyzed in terms of exchange coupling and dipole–dipole interaction between FINEMET ribbon and Fe50Pd50 layer. The high sensitivity of GMI was used to separate the two interactions for the first time. The results opened the possibilities for application of FINEMET/Fe50Pd50 composite ribbons in linear magnetic field sensors.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Mn2RuGa is known to be a ferrimagnetic compound below 460 K, while Ru2MnGa is an antiferromagnet with Néel temperature as low as 15 K. In the present work, we have studied the solid solutions of these two compositions, namely Mn2-xRu1+xGa (x = 0.2, 0.5), intending to design a fully compensated ferrimagnet. We successfully synthesized the compositions which crystallize with an inverse Heusler (XA) structure. The magnetic transition temperatures of both the alloys are found to be just above room temperature, and the magnetization data indicate a ferrimagnetic ordering. The compositions show spin glass like state at low temperature, which possibly emerges from the disorder and random magnetic correlations due to doping. Most interestingly, the x = 0.5 alloy shows the vanishingly small moment at low temperature, which can be explained on the basis of antiparallel alignment of moments at two inequivalent sites of Mn. The composition also shows a significant amount of exchange bias at low temperature. The observation of exchange bias for a system with a low value of net magnetization is much preferred for magneto-electric applications. Interestingly, both the samples show a transition from a high-temperature semiconducting phase to a low-temperature metallic phase. The electrical transport in the high-temperature phase is found to be dominated by small polaron hopping.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this study, 6-nm CoxPd1−x alloy films were deposited on MoS2 flakes at a high temperature (HT) of 200 °C. The morphology and magnetic properties of these flakes was studied. In contrast to the nanoparticle assembly fabricated through room-temperature deposition, HT growth led to a relatively uniform coverage on MoS2 flakes with a roughness of less than 1 nm. The flat CoxPd1−x alloy films form magnetic single domains on individual MoS2 flakes. For 6-nm Co0.5Pd0.5 and Co0.35Pd0.65, the magnetic coercivity (Hc) was approximately 50 Oe. Co0.5Pd0.5/MoS2 exhibited more distinct azimuthal angle-dependent magnetic behavior than that of Co0.35Pd0.65/MoS2. The different angle-dependent Hc variation for various MoS2 flakes could be attributed to the shape and demagnetization effect at the edge. After hydrogen exposure, the Hc of Co0.5Pd0.5/MoS2 was enhanced by 30% ± 10% and the magnetic domains extended over the MoS2 flakes, which indicated that H absorption in Co0.5Pd0.5 bridges magnetic coupling across the MoS2 edge.© 2021 The Author(s)This paper presents a generalized EKV charge-based MOSFET model that includes the effects of trapped charges in the oxide bulk and at the silicon/oxide interface. It is shown that in the presence of oxide- and interface-trapped charges, the mobile charge density can still be linearized but with respect to both the surface potential and the channel voltage. This enables us to derive closed-form expressions for the mobile charge density and the drain current. These simple formulations demonstrate the effects of charge trapping on MOSFET characteristics and crucial device parameters. The proposed charge-based analytical model, including the effect of velocity saturation, is successfully validated through measurements performed on devices from a 28-nm bulk CMOS technology. Ultrahigh total ionizing doses up to 1 Grad(SiO2) are applied to generate oxide-trapped charges and activate passivated interface traps. Despite a small number of parameters, the model is capable of accurately capturing measurement results over a wide range of device operation from weak to strong inversion. Explicit expressions of device parameters also allow for the extraction of the oxide- and interface-trapped charge densities.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We explore the effect of magnetic field and shear flow on the helicoidal structure of a ferrocholesteric liquid crystal (the suspension of magnetic nanoparticles in a cholesteric liquid crystal) with finite orientational coupling between magnetic nanoparticles and cholesteric matrix. We consider the geometry in which the helicoid axis is perpendicular to the magnetic field and the shear plane. It is shown how the interplay between magnetic and hydrodynamic forces affects the untwisting of the initial helical structure of the ferrocholesteric, inducing orientation transitions into the ferronematic phase with different orientational and magnetic ordering. We find the field dependences of the ferrocholesteric helix pitch and obtain diagrams of orientation transitions. It is established that the increase in the anchoring energy brings to the reduction of threshold fields necessary for the untwisting of the structure. We study the magnetic characteristics of a deformed ferrocholesteric state and analyze the ability of shear stresses to magnetize a ferrocholesteric liquid crystal. Two regimes of the magnetization vector behavior that depend on the magnitude of the anchoring energy have been found.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline Heusler compounds Ni2Mn0.75Cu0.25Ga0.84Al0.16, with a martensitic transition between ferromagnetic phases, and Ni2Mn0.70Cu0.30Ga0.84Al0.16, with a magnetostructural transformation, were investigated by magnetization and heat capacity measurements, both as a function of temperature and magnetic field. The compound Ni2Mn0.75Cu0.25Ga0.84Al0.16 presents a large magnetocaloric effect at a transition between magnetically aligned structures. In addition, Ni2Mn0.70Cu0.30Ga0.84Al0.16 shows very high entropy change at room temperature, although irreversible, under a magnetic field change 0–1 T. The magnetocaloric properties of the studied samples are compared with selected compounds in the literature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Spintronics on flat surfaces has been studied over the years, and the scenario is relatively well-known; however, there is a lack of information when we consider non-flat surfaces. In this paper, we are concerned about the spin dynamics of the ferromagnetic model on the spherical surface. We use the Schwinger bosonic formalism for describing the thermodynamics of spin operators in terms of spinon operators. Opposite to the flat two-dimensional model, which is disordered at finite temperature, the curvature of the spherical surface provides non-zero critical temperature for Schwinger boson condensation, which characterizes order at finite temperature even in the absence of external magnetic fields. The thermodynamics is then analyzed in the low-temperature regime. In addition, we consider the presence of both static and oscillating magnetic fields, the necessary condition for inducing the ferromagnetic resonance, and we show systematically that the studied model is well-described by SU(2) coherent states, which provides the correct dynamics of the magnetization. The archived results can be applied for describing a diversity of experiments such as spin superfluidity, angular momentum injection by spin pumping and spin-transfer torque in non-conventional junctions, magnon dissipation, and magnetoelectronics on the spherical surface.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Electronic, magnetic, dynamic, elastic, thermodynamic, and thermoelectric properties for Co2-based full Heusler alloys are investigated theoretically. The full potential–linearized augmented plane wave (FP-LAPW) method within density functional theory (DFT) incorporated on WIEN2k code is employed in our calculation. Through this study, we found that the FM-L21 is the most magnetic-structure stable phase for both Co2ZrAl and Co2ZrSi compounds, as well as they, are dynamically stable where all the calculated of the optic and acoustic phonon frequencies have positive values. Band structure calculation demonstrated that all compounds exhibit band gaps of about 0.88 and 1.54 eV using mBJ-GGA potentials for Co2ZrAl and Co2ZrSi in a localized minority spin channel (unlike the other direction which appears a metallic behavior) with high spin polarization (100%) in its ground state. Under high pressure, both compounds keep the same electronic behavior in both spins’ channels with a little decreasing in gap energy, unlike the total magnetic moment which doesn't change. The semi-local Boltzmann transport theory has been used to investigate thermoelectric properties and we found that both compounds exhibit a high Seebeck coefficient and high-power factor up to 1.25 mV/K for Co2ZrSi. Also, the quasi-harmonic model has been applied to study the temperature effect on heat capacities at constant volume, in which entropy, Debye temperature and lattice thermal conductivity are analyzed and discussed. To get more information about the elastic behavior; the elastic stability in the equilibrium state and under two pressures values (12 GPa and 24 GPa) are found. The findings predicted the stability of these compounds’ properties with and without pressure, which makes them candidate materials for devices fabrication in several areas such as spinotronic, thermoelectric, shape-memory and spin filters.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic skyrmion is a particle-like spin texture promising for future novel spintronic devices. For such applications, microscopic mechanism of nucleation of skyrmion is essential to control the unique spin texture. Although real-space visualization techniques with high spatial resolution could be powerful to investigate the mechanism at the nanometer length scale, a direct visualization of skyrmion nucleation process from the helical stripe state is still technically challenging because not only a high spatial resolution but also a high temporal resolution is required to resolve the transient state. Furthermore, the location of the intermediate state is likely to move along the stripe, which hampers a successful visualization. Here, taking advantage of the high spatial resolution of aberration-corrected differential phase contrast scanning transmission electron microscopy, we observe the nucleation of skyrmion from helical stripes in a thin plate of FeGe1-xSix (x ~ 0.05). By slowing down the kinetics with a careful control of both magnetic field and temperature, while pinning the helical stripe by artificial surface pits fabricated on the surface of the thin plate specimen, we directly visualize the nucleation intermediate state of skyrmion. We find the theoretically predicted antiskyrmion-like spin texture is actually created as the intermediate state during nucleation.© 2021The present study is written to provide an overview of the effect of the particle size on the heating and drug release potential of the magnetic materials under magnetic fields. As a symbol representing the change of particle size, a dimensionless σ parameter is defined by dividing anisotropic energy by the thermal one. According to the obtained results, at the boundary of ferromagnetic and superparamagnetic nanoparticles (σ≈1), there is the maximum heat production. On the other hand, single-domain nanoparticles with the largest size (σ≫1) have the lowest releasing heat under AC magnetic field. There is also a considerable heat production under AC magnetic fields for both superparamagnetic (σ < 1) and soft-ferromagnetic materials (σ > 1). However, the results are significantly different when MNPs are used as heating cores in drug release systems. Here, the soft-ferromagnetic materials have a low heating and hence low drug release potential. According to the results obtained, increasing σ causes three important events. The first is the reduction of the spin canting effect which results in the amplification of the spin rotations in the same direction and hence a higher potential of Neel heating mechanism. The second is the growth of the macrospin size which leads to more spin torque and hence more heating energy. The third is blocking the macrospin and consequently activation of the Brownian heating mechanism. However, the results are significantly different when MNPs are used as heating cores in drug release systems. Here, the soft-ferromagnetic materials have a low heating and hence low drug release potential. As a reason one can say that in drug release systems, there are barriers to activation of the Brownian mechanism which reduce the heating and drug release potential of soft-ferromagnetic nanoparticles.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.SmFe11Ti alloys with ThMn12 structure are prepared by arc melting followed by melt spinning. Effects of thermal annealing on the phase constituent, microstructure and magnetic properties are investigated in details. Before and after annealing, the phase constituent of alloys remains unchanged, containing 1:12 main phase, α-Fe phase, Fe2Ti phase as well as amorphous phase. Under thermal annealing condition of 800 °C/30 min, the highest remanence and coercivity, as high as 0.63 T and 380 kA/m, are obtained, respectively. The improvement of coercivity may be attributed to decreased defects and improved inhomogeneity of main phase composition, while enhanced remanence ascribes to the strong exchange coupling effect. In addition, the temperature coefficient of coercivity of −0.42%/K is determined, showing excellent thermal stability.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.An analytical model for the domain wall structure in ultrathin films with perpendicular easy axis and interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction, submitted to an arbitrary in-plane magnetic field, is presented. Its solution is simplified to the numerical minimization of an analytic function of just one variable. The model predictions are compared to numerical micromagnetic simulations, using parameters of existing samples, revealing a very good agreement. Remaining differences are analyzed, and partly corrected. Differences with the predictions of the simplest model, usually found in the literature, in which only the domain wall moment's in-plane orientation can vary, are exemplified. The model allows accurate computations, as a function of in-plane field module and orientation, of the domain wall tension and width, quantities controlling the creep motion of domain walls in such films.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This paper deals with the experimental investigation of the effect of impregnation process on the normal magnetization curve and iron losses of electrical steels. To address this issue, several laminated toroidal magnetic circuits have been designed to characterize the magnetic properties with the flux metric method. The first configuration considers magnetic circuits wrapped with adhesive tape so that the dielectric resin will be deposited only on the outer surface of the magnetic circuit. In the second configuration, the magnetic circuits are unwrapped, which will allow the resin to diffuse within the inter-laminar spaces of the magnetic circuit. The obtained experimental results show significant effects on the magnetic properties in both cases. However, depending on the considered configuration, the resin diffusion also has an influence on the changes in magnetic properties.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The dependences of the alternating current magnetic susceptibilities of nanocomposite rare-earth titanates on the magnetic field are investigated. The nanocomposites are prepared in opal matrices with rare-earth titanate particles having a pyrochlore structure. The measurements are performed within the temperature range from 2 to 10 K in magnetic fields up to 30 kOe. It was found that the field dependence of the real part of the susceptibility is approximated by a dependence similar to the Cole-Cole formula and it is close to the field dependence of the differential susceptibility.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, an Al/Ti Schottky-electrode was fabricated on a 4H- SiC surface via sputtering, and an Al2O3 layer was inserted into the metal semiconductor contact-surface using atomic-layer deposition. We studied the inhomogeneity of the Schottky-barrier height by inserting the dielectric layer (Al2O3) with different thicknesses. The Schottky-barrier heights and ideality factors were extracted for different measurement temperatures. The experimental results show that the barrier height changes to only 9% and the ideality factor approaches 1. Moreover, with the insertion of Al2O3, the difference between∅eff and ∅B0 is most closer. This indicates the Al2O3 layer can passivate the surface defects to improve the contacts inhomogeneity. The TEM images also indicate that the insertion of Al2O3 reduces the diffusion of Ti into SiC to start a solid state reaction to form titanium silicides and carbides co-exist at the interface, which improves the inhomogeneity of the Schottky interface. In particular, the thickness of Al2O3 is 0.8 nm.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Due to deficiencies of poor dielectric loss and narrow absorption bandwidth, how to improve the performance of cobalt-based absorbers remains a challenge in the field of microwave absorption materials. In this work, a convenient and efficient strategy combining hydrogen plasma-metal reaction (HPMR) and chemical dealloying has been developed for the fabrication of nanoporous Co@void@C nanocomposites (NCs). The performance exhibits apparent enhancement owing to the synergistic effects of yolk-shell and nanopore architectures. The minimum reflection loss (RLmin) value reaches −19.5 dB at the thickness of 1.6 mm and the effective absorption bandwidth (EAB, RL ≤ −10 dB) goes up to 6.8 GHz at the thickness of 1.9 mm. For comparison, the porous Co@C NCs with only nanopore architecture have a narrow EAB of 2.6 GHz and Co@void@C NCs with only yolk-shell architecture cannot effectively absorb the incident microwave (RL > −10 dB) within 2–18 GHz. The novel Co-based absorber with yolk-shell and nanopore architectures possesses great potential for the application in microwave absorption field.© 2020 Elsevier LtdSeveral methods of depositing pure boron (PureB) layers on silicon are examined with respect to their potential for fabricating advanced PureB (photo)diodes with back-end-of-line (BEOL) CMOS compatibility. PureB devices were fabricated in two different batch furnace chemical-vapor deposition (CVD) systems or by electron-beam-assisted physical-vapor deposition (EBPVD), and their electrical characteristics were found to be comparable to those of devices previously fabricated using single-wafer CVD and molecular beam epitaxy (MBE) systems. For all methods, the material properties of the B-layers and the I-V characteristics of the PureB diodes follow the same temperature dependence over the range 50 °C–400 °C. This was also the case for the EBPVD layers which were deposited at 50 °C and then annealed at higher temperatures, instead of being deposited at these temperatures as for the other methods. At 400 °C, the ability to achieve an optimal suppression of the electron injection into the PureB anode regions, corresponding to an electron current density of ∼20 pA/cm2, was verified for all methods. The advantages and disadvantages of each deposition method is evaluated with respect to equipment availability, B-layer selectivity, conformality, and thickness control. The batch furnace systems could be attractive for high-volume production, but hardware improvements as discussed here would be needed to reduce the effects of gas depletion. On all points except conformality, EBPVD appears to be a very good option for fabricating nm-thin B-layers suitable for fabricating high-performance 400 °C PureB diodes.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The exchange coupling of magnetic hard/soft SrFe11AlO19@NiFe2O4 (SFAO@NFO) core-shell structure was investigated by taking into consideration the effects of TiO2 (TO) and SiO2 (SO) nanoparticles as multiple shells. The SFAO@NFO core-shell structure was synthesized via an auto-combustion sol-gel method. The NFO nanolayer caused the resulting saturation magnetization, magnetic remanence and coercivity of SFAO to be reduced from 43.18 emu/g, 24 emu/g and 5500 Oe to 17.13 emu/g, 7.74 emu/g and 2300 Oe, respectively. This was attributed to the NFO performance as a magnetic dead layer (MDL), and to the SFAO@NFO exchange coupling effect. The TO and SO nanolayers were also synthesized via a templating approach and a modified Stöber method, respectively, in order to act as additional shells and capping layers, recovering magnetic properties of the initial core-shell structure. It was found that the TO nanolayer shell can serve as a room-temperature ferromagnetic material due to its surface defects and oxygen vacancies. The TO and SO nanolayer shells increased the saturation magnetization, and magnetic remanence of SFAO@NFO from 17.13 to 30.51 and 34.10 emu/g, and 7.74 to 11.57 and 14.06 emu/g, respectively, while also decreasing the coercivity from 2300 Oe to 600 and 850 Oe, respectively. As a result, the additional shells enhanced magnetic exchange coupling properties of SFAO@NFO core-shell structure by removing the effect of the MDL.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.NiCuZn ferrite ceramics were prepared by injection molding, debinding and sintering at 1150 °C. The effects of heating rate in thermal debinding on microstructure, bending strength and magnetic properties of sintered samples were investigated by scanning electron microscopy with energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy, X-ray diffraction, the Dual Column Tabletop Testing Machine, RF impedance Analyzer and B-H curve analyzer. The results showed the heating rate in thermal debinding played an important role on the sintered NiCuZn ferrite prepared by injection molding. When the heating rate in thermal debinding was quick above 1.2 °C/min in the lager cuboid samples, CuO precipitate was found at the grain boundary of ferrite and the intergranular fracture occurred, which was different from the normal transgranular fracture under the condition of slow heating rate. Furthermore, the density, bending strength, permeability and core loss of the sintered samples were improved with the decrease of heating rate. The influencing mechanism of thermal debinding on the difference was also discussed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The Stoner-Wohlfarth (SW) is the most used model of magnetic hysteresis, but its computation is time-consuming. We approximate piecewise this model by easy-to-compute analytic functions. Our parametrization is suitable for fast quantitative evaluations and fitting experimental data, which we exemplify. Applicability of this parametrization is as broad as that of the SW model, which can be extended to include more parameters.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A study of mixed spin-1/2 and spin-1 Ising model on “folded” square lattice model was carried out using the previously proposed general approach for renormalization group transformations. Considering the symmetries of the model, the study was divided into ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic cases. We found that the critical points of the renormalization group transformation for a low-temperature phase transition are unstable at any value of the intralayer interactions and nonzero interlayer interaction in the ferromagnetic case. However, in the antiferromagnetic case this is observed only for one phase. In addition, the magnitude of the shift exponent was calculated for each of the cases. As in the two-layer spin-1/2 Ising model, it has a singularity only at certain parameters and only in the ferromagnetic case. In other cases, the magnitude of the shift exponent is close to 0.5.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ball milled Mn-Al powders are ideal raw materials for fabricating bonded Mn-Al permanent magnets, and selecting proper precursor phase and milling medium for ball milling are of great importance to realize optimal magnetic properties in the final magnets. In this work, we studied the effect of different precursors and mediums of ball milling on the magnetic properties in the bonded magnets and the corresponding microstructural origins. ε-phase as the precursor leads to a serious decomposition behavior during the subsequent annealing after ball milling, resulting in a strong reduction in magnetization in the powders but just slightly better coercivity, so τ-phase is a superior choice as the precursor. In the case that τ-phase is adopted as the precursor, the milling medium of ethanol (wet-milling) or argon (dry-milling) has a remarkable influence on the morphologies of the milled powders. The former condition can fabricate thin polycrystalline flakes, and form stronger texture inside simultaneously, while the latter condition produces isotropic polycrystalline particles. The bonded magnets prepared using wet-milled powders thoroughly show superior magnetic properties including magnetization, remanence and coercivity than the magnets based on dry-milled particles. This work may promote the understanding of the nanostructures of Mn-Al ball milled powders, and provide the reference for the fabrication of Mn-Al rare-earth-free bonded magnets. Prime Novelty Statement. Ball milled Mn-Al powders are ideal raw materials for fabricating bonded Mn-Al permanent magnets, and selecting appropriate precursors and milling mediums for ball milling are important to obtain optimal magnetic properties in bonded magnets. In this work, ball milling with two precursors, ε phase (high temperature phase) and τ phase (metastable ferromagnetic phase), are performed. Powders from τ-precursor after annealing treatment showing good properties (M1200kA/m of 73 Am2/kg and Hc of 250 kA/m). While for ε-precursor, during the subsequent annealing treatment for the transformation from ε to τ, obvious decomposition occurs, inducing the distinct magnetization deterioration (36 Am2/kg) as well as slightly higher coercivity (331 kA/m). In comparison, the τ-precursor is superior to ε-precursor. In case that τ-phase is adopted as the precursor, the milling medium of ethanol (wet-milling) and argon (dry-milling) has a remarkable influence on the morphologies of the milled powders. Wet-milling condition can fabricate polycrystalline thin flakes with stronger texture, while the dry-milling condition produces isotropic particles. The bonded magnets prepared using wet-milled powders thoroughly show superior magnetic properties including magnetization, remanence and coercivity than the magnets based on dry-milled particles. This work may promote the understanding of the nanostructures of Mn-Al ball milled powders, and provide the reference for the fabrication of Mn-Al rare-earth-free bonded magnets.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe fabricated the Fe3O4/alkyl-sulfonic acid molecules hybrid nanoparticles by self-assembly monolayers (SAMs) in air and nitrogen ambience to investigate the impact of the oxidation on the spin transport. X-ray photoelectron spectra (XPS) and Fourier transform infrared (FTIR) spectroscopy measurements infer that the chemical bonding between Fe3O4 and alkyl-sulfonic acid remains unchanged as interfacial oxygen content reduced. The resistivity of nitrogen ambience synthesized sample is 1/3 of that in air indicates more tunneling channels are active in less oxygen content samples. The stable and robust room temperature tunnel magnetoresistances up to ∼ 9.9% is observed for both ambience fabrication samples, demonstrating that the magnetoresistance in Fe3O4/sulfonic acid nanoparticles is not sensitive to the oxygen. These provide Fe3O4/molecule interface as a promising candidate for spintronic applications.© 2021This paper focuses on Monte Carlo Simulations (MCS) to investigate the effects of variations in molecular exchange coupling strengths and nature between the magnetic molecules and ferromagnetic electrodes in cross-junction-shaped magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ) based molecular spintronics devices (MTJMSD). To encompass a wide range of futuristic molecular spintronics devices, we systematically studied the effect of a magnetic molecule analog coupling with two ferromagnetic electrodes. We studied three cases when molecules established: (i) Ferromagnetic couplings with two ferromagnetic electrodes, (ii) Antiferromagnetic couplings with two electrodes, and (iii) Ferromagnetic coupling with one electrode and antiferromagnetic coupling with another electrode. We varied the strength and nature of exchange coupling to study the temporal and spatial propagation of molecular coupling impact on two ferromagnetic electrodes. Our results showed that in the cases when molecular coupling strength was ~ 10% of the ferromagnetic electrode's Curie temperature, then 16 molecular analogs could influence the magnetic properties of 2,500 atoms above room temperature. This theoretical study is directly in agreement with the experimental observation of ~ 10,000 Single Molecular Magnet (SMM) channels controlling the magnetic and transport properties of microscopic cross-junction-shaped MTJ testbed above room temperature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.To increase the coercivity and corrosion resistance of Nd–Fe–B sintered magnets in high temperature and highly corrosive environments, low melting point Tb62.5Co37.5 alloy powders were added to the starting magnets through intergranular addition. In this study, the magnetic properties, corrosion resistance, and microstructure of magnets were investigated after adding various contents of Tb62.5Co37.5 powders. The coercivity of the magnet was significantly improved from 18.20 to 27.10 kOe when a small amount of Tb62.5Co37.5 powder was added; also, the remanence first increased and then slightly decreased. The microstructure and composition of the modified magnets were studied; it was found that the significant increase in coercivity and the negligible reduction in remanence is because of the densification, improved grain alignment, uniform and continuous Nd-rich phase distribution, as well as the generation of a (Nd, Pr, Tb)2Fe14B “core–shell” structure surrounding the main phase grain. Furthermore, the corrosion resistance of the magnets was improved significantly owing to the reduction in the electrochemical potential difference between the Nd2Fe14B main phase and the Nd-rich phase.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Artificial magnetoelectric material with enrichment of magnetoelectric (ME) coupling coefficient was achieved via mixed-oxide route in cobalt substituted BaTiO3 multiferroics. The observed large ME coupling coefficient induced by spin–orbit interaction through the symmetry breaking due to the off-stoichiometry oxygen. Structural details extracted from the Rietveld refinement indicate the rapid arrival of a single hexagonal phase (P63/mmc) at the expense of the tetragonal phase (P4mm) above x = 0.03. SAED patterns evidence to the structural coexistence, morphotropic phase boundary (MPB), (P4mm + P63/mmc) in x = 0.01 and 0.03 while hexagonal phase alone in x ≥ 0.05. Core-level XPS spectrum of Ba(3d), Ti (2p), Co (2p), O (1s) evidences the occurrence of the single oxidation state of Ba ion (Ba2+) and aliovalent of Ti (Ti4+ and Ti3+), Co (Co3+ and Co2+) and O (O2− and O1−) ions respectively. The weakening of ferroelectric loops arises from the formation of the non-ferroelectric hexagonal phase by the non-stoichiometric oxygen. For the first time, a high value of energy efficiency of 54.7% was achieved in the BaTi0.99Co0.01O3 sample. The ferromagnetism originated from the contributions of the super-exchange interaction of Co3+(octahedral)-O2−-Co3+(pentahedral) and double-exchange interaction (Co2+-O2−-Co3+) Among all the samples, an excellent magnetoelectric coupling coefficient (αME) value of 29.6 mV/cm Oe is attained in the hexagonal BaTi0.93Co0.07O3 sample.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report an element- and time-resolved investigation of femtosecond laser induced ultrafast dynamics of the Co 3d and Dy 4f spins in a ferrimagnetic Co80Dy20 alloy as a function of the temperature. We observe that the Co characteristic demagnetization time (τCo) remains nearly constant (~0.2 ps) on increasing the temperature. Conversely, the Dy characteristic demagnetization time (τDy) decreases from ~1 ps to ~0.4 ps with the rise of temperature. Comparing our experimental data with literature shows that τCo and τDy are independent of the alloy composition or the demagnetization amplitude and that τDy scales with the relative temperature T* = TCurie – T.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Hematite (α-Fe2O3) thin films with different thicknesses between 4 and 16 nm were synthesized by atomic layer deposition, employing 500 to 2000 cycles of FeCp2/O3. After a thermal reduction process, under a controlled atmosphere of hydrogen, it was possible to convert hematite to magnetite (Fe3O4). SEM images of the iron oxide thin films showed that they are macroscopically homogeneous, although the magnetic measurements by MOKE indicated that the samples should present holes that are responsible for pinning the domain walls, raising the coercivity to values ​​that vary between 0.3 and 0.7 kOe. XRD revealed the presence of the Fe3O4 phase by identifying the main peaks. The signal obtained by Raman spectroscopy was identified at 667 cm−1, which suggests the presence of the phonon mode A1g of Fe3O4 in the reduced sample. Controlling the thickness of Fe3O4 thin films allows adjusting their magnetic properties, coercivity and remanence, so that they can be used in potential technological applications.© 2021 The Author(s)Disorder induced by chemical inhomogeneity and Jahn-Teller (JT) distortions is often observed in mixed valence perovskite manganites. The main reasons for the evolution of this disorder are connected with the cationic size differences and the ratio between JT active and non-JT active ions. The quenched disorder leads to a spin-cluster state above the magnetic transition temperature. The effect of Cu, a B-site substitution in the La0.8Sr0.2MnO3 compound, on the disordered phase has been addressed here. X-ray powder diffraction reveals rhombohedral (R-3c) structures for both the parent and B-site substituted compound with negligible change of lattice volume. The chemical compositions of the two compounds were verified by ion beam analysis technique. With the change of electronic bandwidth, the magnetic phase transition temperature has been tuned towards room temperature (318 K), an important requirement for room temperature magnetic refrigeration. However, a small decrease of the isothermal entropy change was observed with Cu-substitution, related to the decrease of the saturation magnetization.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Nanoparticles of Mn0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4, Mn0.5Zn0.5Fe1.95Sm0.05O4 and Mn0.5Zn0.5Fe1.9Gd0.05Sm0.05O4 ferrites are prepared by solution combustion method and characterized to comprehend their structural, microstructural and magnetic properties. The single-phase formation and spinel cubic structure of the samples analyzed by XRD method. The average crystallite sizes were found in the range 10.26 to 16.68 nm. The lattice parameters were found in the range 8.4157 to 8.4508 Å. The particle size was studied by using TEM micrographs and found to be in nano range. The results are good agreements with XRD results. A strong correlation between the size of the particle with respect to the Sm3+ and Gd3+ content has been identified using TEM micrographs. The M-H loop of Mn0.5Zn0.5SmxGdyFe2-(x+y)O4 (where x = 0, y = 0; x = 0.05, y = 0; x = 0.05, y = 0.05) nanoparticles exhibit ferromagnetic nature with saturation magnetization and coercivity. The M-H loop of Mn0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 nanoparticles exhibit a high saturation and remanent magnetization. The saturation magnetization and remanent magnetization found in the range 44.16 to 5.805 emu/g and 24.46 to 0.093 emu/g, respectively. The saturation and remanent magnetization decreases after Sm3+ and Gd3+ substitution on Fe- site in Mn0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 is because of the distinction in the cation distribution at tetrahedral site and octahedral site. Meanwhile, experiments demonstrate that the solution combustion method has significant effect on structure and magnetic behavior of the prepared ferrite nanoparticles.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Present work reports a detailed investigation on the magnetoresistance and magnetocaloric behavior of Ni and Cr-doped Mn5Si3 alloys with general formula Mn5−xAxSi3 (where A = Ni/Cr; x = 0, 0.05, 0.1 and 0.2). Both pure (undoped) and doped alloys show a reasonably large amount of magnetoresistance (MR). Doping at Mn-site, both by Ni and Cr, results in a monotonic decrease in MR values. Magnetocaloric effect (MCE), on the other hand, is found to be interesting, and all the alloys show both conventional and inverse MCE around the magneto-structural transition temperature. Among the two types of MCE observed, the inverse MCE is found to decrease with increasing doping concentration and consistent with the MR behavior, whereas doping results in a significant increase in conventional MCE values.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this article, we present a new kind of Fe-C-B-P-Cu nanocrystalline alloys containing high P content with excellent comprehensive magnetic properties and processability. This kind of nanocrystalline alloys exhibits the high saturation magnetic flux density (Bs), low coercivity (Hc) and high effective permeability (μe) in the range of 1.73–1.84 T, 3.2–8.4 A/m and 6000–13000, respectively. It was found that increase of P content remarkably decreases the sensitivity of Hc to annealing temperature (Ta) and widen the optimum annealing temperature range to obtain a low Hc. With the increase of P content, the growth of α-Fe grains is retarded, but the nucleation of α-Fe grains is increased, resulting in reduced grain size and the intergranular amorphous layer, and precipitated high density of α-Fe nanocrystals. Based on the crystallization and structural features, the relationship between soft magnetic properties and microstructure for this kind nanocrystalline alloy was discussed in detail.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The effect of the structural disorder in Ni films on their magnetic, magneto-optical (MO), transport, optical properties, and the spin polarization degree of conduction electrons as well as the electronic structure has been investigated. Room temperature (RT) DC magnetron sputtered onto glass substrates Ni films have been found to be amorphous. It was experimentally shown that an amorphous Ni films (i) are not ferromagnetically ordered at least for T>78K temperature range, (ii) do not show any MO response at RT, (iii) have 10 times larger resistivity than crystalline phase which nearly does not depend on temperature, (iv) exhibit the optical conductivity (OC) spectrum without interband absorption peaks typical for crystalline Ni, (v) have spin polarization degree of conduction electrons close to zero. Annealing of amorphous Ni films at T = 600 K causes their crystallization with the formation of the face-centered-cubic phase and restores the physical properties typical for crystalline Ni. The experimental OC spectrum of crystalline Ni film exhibits an intense interband absorption peaks located at E = 1.4 and 4.55 eV; it is in reasonable correspondence with the calculated interband OC spectrum of Ni. Main absorption peaks in the experimental OC spectrum were put in correspondence with the electron excitations between definite electronic states of the E(k) structure of Ni. The experimentally determined spin polarization degree of conduction electrons of crystalline Ni films was found to be close to that for bulk Ni and consists of P≈40%.© 2021Studies of magnetization of undoped and Mn-doped nanosized titanium dioxide powders showed that its dependence on the magnetic field can be approximated by the function that is a linear combination of two Langevin functions with different parameters. The linear part along with the diamagnetic contribution typical for metal oxides is due to the contribution of two types of paramagnetic centers. The first one is present in both undoped and doped powders. As follows from the published models, the centers are complex lattice defects Ti+3 ions + O− vacancies. The second is the vast majority of the manganese ions (and related oxide vacancies) in the doped powders that are uniformly distributed over all nanoparticles. The nonlinear part, even present in the undoped samples, is caused by the contribution of a small number of regions with a high magnetic moment (ferromagnetic clusters). These regions do not interact magnetically, and the powder as a whole exhibits superparamagnetic behavior. According to our estimates, the introduction of Mn into the TiO2 lattice mainly leads to the predominance of the paramagnetic contribution to the magnetization over the diamagnetic contribution characteristic of the TiO2 lattice and a small increase in the number of the ferromagnetic clusters.© 2021A magnetic skyrmion is a topological object having particle-spin like configuration, which can be stabilized in ferromagnetic systems with Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction. In this report, we investigate tunable microwave properties of magnetic skyrmions in a circular nanodisk using micromagnetic simulations. An in-plane ac magnetic field excites gyrotropic dynamics with a clockwise and a counter-clockwise mode. We have shown the dependence of microwave responses on the size of the skyrmion by tuning the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction, magnetic anisotropy, and out-of-plane external bias magnetic field. A remarkably large frequency shift of 4.2 GHz has been observed for a change of 40 mT bias field. Furthermore, a broad microwave tunability of 10.8 GHz has been shown with a variation of magnetic anisotropy of 1 × 105 J/m3. The manifestation of inertial mass of the skyrmion, its dependence on the resonance responses and the sizes of the skyrmion are explained by using Thiele's equation. The inertial mass of the skyrmion is estimated to be in the order of 10−23 kg. The results open up the potential use of the skyrmions in reconfigurable nano-magnonic devices with large tunability.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Exchange-coupled composite (ECC) media present a possible layered structure for microwave-assisted magnetic recording (MAMR) systems. In this paper, MAMR writability and read/write characteristics were computed using a micromagnetic simulation, which assumed ECC media with graded and notched anisotropy structures. Writability was estimated from the switchable maximum averaged anisotropy field for footprint images. The calculation indicated 40–50% enhanced writability by microwave assistance for both graded and notched anisotropy structure media with suitable magnetic parameters. A read/write simulation indicated that notched-structure media with strongly coupled magnetic layers tended to be advantageous for signal-to-noise ratio and indicated well-confined recorded bits with a narrow magnetic write width.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigate on structure, surface morphology, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of Mn1-xSmxCoGe (x = 0, 0.2, 0.4 and 0.6) alloys. MnCoGe crystalizes in TiNiSn type doublet orthorhombic (O1, O2) structure [parent compound (x = 0)] changes into a mixed phase of orthorhombic and hexagonal structures while doped with Sm and hexagonal phase is enhanced with increase of Sm content. Lattice parameters and phase fractions are reported. Surface morphological images of SEM shows Sm embedded on MnCoGe. The partial substitution of Sm at Mn site in Mn1-xSmxCoGe leads to a wide transition from the ferromagnetic–paramagnetic [FM-PM] around room temperature. However, some anomaly is observed for x = 0.6 due to induced triplet transitions such as Curie (TC-FM-PM transition appears at 270 K), Martensitic (TM-FM-Martensitic ~ 200 K) and Neel transitions (TN antiferromagnetic-paramagnetic [AFM-PM] transition at 30 K). The Arrott plots confirm the order of transitions. The Curie and Neel's transitions are explored from isothermal magnetic measurements. The change in magnetic entropy (ΔSM) [−23 Jkg-1K−1 (x = 0) to −0.045 Jkg-1K−1 (x = 0.6)] are decreased for Sm doped (x = 0.2, 0.4 and 0.6) samples. These observations provide constructive information that will be highly benefit applications for this class of magneto response materials which is used for magnetic refrigeration technology near room temperature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The present work reports the influence of different types of surface area, hydrophobic, and hydrophilic fumed silica mixed in silicone oil as a thixotropic additive on carbonyl particles based magnetorheological fluids (MRFs) were prepared. Scanning electron microscopy analysis confirms the fumed silica particles attached to the surfaces of CIPs. The vibrating sample magnetometer result shows the MRF4 and 5 have a better magnetic saturation value of 30.12 emu/gm and 40.12 emu/gm, respectively. The experimental rheological flow curve behaviours are investigated using the magnetorheometer. The Herschel–Bulkley rheological model is found to be in good agreement with the experimental curves and suggested shear thinning property is observed. The results showed that the hydrophilic silica with larger surface area type presented (i.e.MRF 4 and 5) better magnetorheological fluid characteristics in terms of shear stress, with a high value of dynamic yield stress, and have much-improved sedimentation ratio up to seven days.© 2021 Elsevier LtdDye sensitized solar cells (DSSCs) have been in the research limelight for some years and plenty of research were devoted to the investigation of material properties for device enhancement. The electrical modeling facilitates the simulation of the device characteristics of the DSSCs. In order to develop highly efficient DSSCs, it is crucial to elucidate the electric mechanism within the cell through the electrical modeling. In this work, we propose a simplified explicit method to estimate the four parameters (photo-generated current (Iph), saturation current (Is), ideality factor (n) and series resistance (Rs)) used in the equivalent circuit by using the single diode model. By using the proposed explicit method, two series of simulated I-V curves (blocking layer and chenodeoxycholic acid additive) were generated from LTspice software by using the experiment data of current–voltage (I-V) measurements reported in our previous research. The simulated I-V curves derived from the software show good fitting to the corresponding experimental I-V curves, which demonstrate that the simplified explicit method reported here can be used to serve as an effective approach to evaluate the electrical properties of the DSSCs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Working with the weak antilocalization measurements, we investigate the spin diffusion length in Bi δ-doped Cu films with the fine-tuned Bi concentration. By exploiting the long spin diffusion length of Cu and the strong spin-orbit coupling of Bi with the δ-doping technique, the spin diffusion length can be tuned artificially. Furthermore, it is found that the spin relaxation is dominated by elastic scatterings from Bi impurities in Bi δ-doped Cu systems, which follows the Elliott-Yafet mechanism.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents an area and energy-efficient non-volatile Last-level Cache (LLC) using a STT-MRAM based on a state-of-art perpendicular magnetic tunnel junction (pMTJ) and an Vertical Gate-All-Around Field-Effect Transistor (GAA-FET). This work presented, in this article is carried out from device to circuit, architecture and up to the system level. A detailed analysis of STT-MRAM has been presented by comparing an Vertical GAA-FET (GA) with a bulk-FET (B) at cell level. It is observed that GA-STT-MRAM is advantageous and offers 93.10% and 60% reduction in leakage-power dissipation and area, respectively over B-STT-MRAM. Furthermore, at architecture level, 20% to 80% reduction in sizes of LLCs (ranging from 512 KB to 64 MB) is observed by using GA-STT-MRAM and around 80.78% leakage power reduction is achieved in comparison to SRAM based LLCs. In addition to the architecture level, GA-STT-MRAM is found to have 83.26% and 39.40% energy reduction compared to a B-STT-MRAM and a conventional SRAM, respectively at system level. The GA-STT-MRAM proves to be a more promising candidate to replace conventional semiconductor based LLC for next-generation energy-efficient microprocessors having on-chip non-volatility.© 2021 The Author(s)The field exponent for the magnetic entropy change n=dlnΔS/dlnH in a magnetic field was evaluated using the Landau model to provide a classification for the nature of the ferromagnetic-to-paramagnetic transitions at the Curie temperature TC in magnetocaloric materials. The magnetic phase transition can be classified as a first-order magnetic transition (FOMT), a second-order magnetic transition (SOMT) or a critical point (CP) at the border between the first and second order transitions. The value of n is mapped as a function of the reduced temperature and the reduced magnetic field for the FOMT, SOMT and CP. The influence of the magnetic field on the transition temperature was found to be relatively weak for the SOMT and corresponds to a power law for the CP and FOMT.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a ferromagnetic resonance study on the influence of the electrolytic bath acidity on the magnetic anisotropy and hardness parameter of arrays of 50 nm diameter Ni nanowires in porous alumina membranes, is reported. Fine tuning the effective magnetic anisotropy of the arrays has been achieved by progressively changing the nanowires microstructure from polycrystalline textured to single-crystalline as the electrolyte acidity is reduced. The micro-structural analysis carried out by X-ray diffraction and high resolution transmission electron microscopy has revealed that a preferred crystal texture is not a sufficient condition for the enhancement of the magnetic anisotropy. Instead, a correlation between the increase of crystallite size and quality, and the increase of both the magnetic anisotropy and hardness parameter has been shown. Ferromagnetic resonance and alternating gradient magnetometry experiments have shown that no additional magnetic contributions take place in Ni NWs grown from highly acidic electrolytes (pH 1.6), whereas a significant additional anisotropy contribution progressively appears as the electrolyte acidity is reduced (pH 5.0). Besides the careful adjustment of electrodeposition conditions, achieving a very long length for the nanowires is also a key requirement to have a precise control on the effective magnetic anisotropy energy, which can be fine tuned in the wide range from 64-167 kJ·m−3 as a result of an energy enhancement of magnetoelastic origin. Ferromagnetic resonance measurements have demonstrated that nanocomposites based on arrays of nanowires made of low cost and abundant elements like Ni exhibit hardness parameters in the range 0.47–0.75 within the semihard region, where those with κ>0.5 are suitable for permanent magnet applications. These features make arrays of low diameter Ni nanowires very appealing for their use in the development of agile microwave and spintronic devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Angle resolved-Auger photoelectron coincidence spectroscopy (AR-APECS) has been exploited to investigate the role that electron correlation plays in the exchange-coupling at the ferromagnetic/antiferromagnetic interface of a Fe/CoO bilayer grown on Ag(001). The effective correlation energy Ueff, usually employed to assess the energy distribution of core-valence-valence Auger spectra, has been experimentally determined for each possible combination of the orbital (eg or t2g) and the spin (majority or minority) of the two valence electrons involved in the Auger decay. Coulomb and exchange interactions have been identified and compared with the result obtained on the Fe/Ag system. The presented analysis reveals in the Fe/CoO interface an enhancement of the Coulomb interaction for the eg orbital and of the exchange interaction for the t2g orbital with respect to the Fe/Ag case, that can be associated with the stronger electron confinement and to the exchange coupling between the two layers, respectively.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this, nickel ferrite CozCdyZnxNi(1-x-y-z)Fe2O4, where x + y + z = 0, 0.15, 0.3, 0.45, 0.6 and 0.75 nanocomposite systems were developed using sol–gel method. The single phase spinel structure and the changes in structural parameters of the nickel ferrite (NFO) nanoparticles obtained by a Rietveld refinement method. Significantly, doping of Zn, Cd and Co elements in nickel ferrite compound inducing systematic rearrangements of Ni2+ and Fe3+ ions between tetrahedral and octahedral sites. The highest saturation magnetization 99 emu/g with low coercivity 147.7 Oe was achieved at x + y + z = 0.45 sample favors the permeability enhancement. The ferrimagnetic loop with highest magnetization explores better domain orientation nature. The frequency dependant electrical and inductance response measured in the frequency range 1 Hz–800 KHz and 40 Hz–5 MHz, respectively. The improved magnetic and electrical properties of novel ferromagnetic core materials create the possibility to develop the navigation technology and frequency based sensor applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This work intended to give a comprehensive overview of the atomic ordering dependence of magnetic and magneto-transport properties for polycrystalline Fe3Si films on Si(1 1 1) substrates by inserting the MgO buffer layer between them. X-ray diffraction results display that the single phase polycrystalline Fe3Si film fulfilling fundamental reflections, B2-Fe3Si film and D03-Fe3Si film are acquired. Scanning electron microscopy images present the distribution of the particles dispersed and embedded in the films, resulting in rough surface. The Ms value increases and Hc value decreases with the improvement of structural and chemical order. The highly ordered D03-Fe3Si film has the highest Ms value of 610~657 emu cm−3, and the lowest Hc value of 81~93 Oe. Fe3Si films characterize metallic behavior and the resistivity declines with the improvement of atomic ordering. The phonon contribution governs the resistivity in the high temperature range and the electron–electron scattering and anomalous single magnon scattering mechanisms are available at the low temperature region of ~30 K~100 K and below ~30 K, respectively. The analysis of anomalous Hall effect demonstrates that Berry curvature dominates the anomalous Hall effect via a proper scaling law. The enhancement of intrinsic anomalous Hall effect contribution is due to the impact of the improvement of structural and chemical order on the band structure/Berry curvature modifications, accordingly affecting the intensity of spin–orbit coupling, whereas the extrinsic contributions behave in opposite manner.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We proposed a concept to generate the spin-valley Seebeck effect using the Kane-Mele-Hubbard model and electric field in zigzag nanoribbons. For this purpose, we apply a thermal gradient across the stanene and germanene nanoribbons. Then, we investigate the valley thermospin properties. Our results show that the edge magnetization can generate a controllable spin- and valley-polarized current by tuning the electric field in the silicene-like materials with large spin-orbit interaction. Moreover, a pure valley current is observed in a wide range of temperatures. Remarkably, we found that it is possible to produce the spin-valley-locked effect and high values of spin-valley Seebeck coefficients by controlling the chemical potential.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of nanocrystalline hard magnetic alloys such as coercivity and maximum energy product are strongly depended on microstructure and interactions between grains. There are a lot of advanced experimental techniques for microstructure characterization but the analysis of intergrain interactions is still challenging. One of the wide-spread methods for doing that is plotting δM(H). This work is aimed to elucidate how different factors effect δM(H) plots for high-anisotropy nanocrystalline alloys. Specifically, changes of δM(H) plots caused by both intergrain exchange and magnetostatic interactions, grain size dispersion, and demagnetization factor are analyzed systematically using macrospin-based simulations. It is demonstrated that all these factors should be considered for a reliable evaluation of exchange coupling in alloys. A concept of such analysis is presented and applied to rapidly quenched Nd-FeCo-B alloy.© 2021 Elsevier LtdAgeing effect on the performance of Ag/ITO/MoOx/n-Si/LiFx/Al carrier selective contact (CSC) silicon solar cells has been investigated based on silicon surface morphology (planar, different pyramid sizes, and chemical polishing of pyramids). The cells with small silicon pyramids (~2 µm) have shown better stability with time than the medium/large pyramids (~5/~8 µm). The chemical polishing of pyramid peaks and valleys has further reduced the cells ageing effect due to minimization of the microstructural stress (tensile in the valleys and compressive at the peaks) at the MoOx/n-Si interface, which has been verified indirectly with cells fabricated on a planar surface. The cell's performance degradation based on morphology points out the instability of the MoOx layer and Schottky barrier reduction, which results in hole-transport hindrance at the MoOx/n-Si junction with the S-shape in J-V graphs under illumination. The ageing effect on device performance is further investigated using the Sentaurus TCAD simulations with the MoOx layer work function variation, and the study indicates the band bending reduction (minimal carrier inversion) and hole transport barrier at the junction region.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We show that the energy, force, and torque between two spherically symmetric multipole density distributions are identical to those between two point multipoles, and apply this point-sphere equivalence to coated spherical dipole magnets. We also show that the potential and field of such a distribution are equivalent to those due to point multipoles located at the center of the distribution. We expand the inverse-distance potential in terms of harmonic (Hermite irreducible) tensors, whose properties enable us to express the potential energy, force, and torque for two arbitrary source distributions in a series of point-multipole interactions. This work generalizes recent work on interactions between uniformly magnetized dipole spheres [B. F. Edwards, D. M. Riffe, J.-Y. Ji, and W. A. Booth, Am. J. Phys. 85, 130 (2017)] to interactions between spherically-symmetric multipole spheres.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Using first-principle calculations, the magnetic properties of the monovacancies and the Sb-related defects including VZn, VO, SbZn, SbO, SbZn-VZn and SbZn-2VZn are studied. It is found that the isolated VZn with the charge state of 0 and −1 can contribute to ferromagnetism in ZnO material. The substitution of Sb on O sites (SbO0) also results in magnetic property. Moreover, the SbZn-2VZn complex is another defect having non-zero magnetic moment and energetically favors for the ferromagnetic state. The resultant density of states (DOS) and spin density distribution clearly show that the ferromagnetic interaction is majorly due to the O-p Zn-d and Sb-p states. To check this calculation, Sb-doped ZnO samples were grown by pulsed laser deposition with different Sb composition under P(O2) = 1.3 Pa. SQUID study showed that all of these samples are ferromagnetic at room temperature. The variation of the saturation magnetization against the Sb composition is discussed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The atomic site occupation, electronic structure, magnetism, martensitic transformation of Ga2-based Heusler alloys Ga2MnTM (TM = Sc, Y, Lu) have been investigated by first-principles calculations. For three alloys in cubic phase, the L21-type structure is more stable than XA-type structure, and the magnetic state is ferrimagnetic (FIM) at each equilibrium lattice constant. The total magnetic moments are mainly contributed by Mn atoms due to its strong exchange splitting. For Ga2MnY and Ga2MnLu, the magnetic states between ferromagnetic (FM) state and FIM state alternately appear with increasing crystal constant. Potential martensitic transformation can be gained due to the proper thermodynamic driving force (negative values of ΔE) and c/a, together with the analysis of phonon spectra, by considering the tetragonal distortions of cubic Ga2MnTM (TM = Sc, Y, Lu). The energy minima locate at c/a = 1.29, 1.21, 1.27, respectively. The three alloys in martensitic state show different variations of total magnetic moments and still maintain FIM state with changing c/a. The martensitic transformation and abundant changes in magnetic states motivate researchers to further explore new Z2-based Heusler alloys.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.An advanced wide-field Kerr microscopy and magnetometry approach for the investigation of magnetic anisotropy in magnetic films is demonstrated. We have analytically analysed the longitudinal Kerr contrast in a wide-field magneto-optical Kerr microscope, specifically its dependence on the light polarisation direction and the plane of incidence and verified it experimentally. While normally the sensitivity direction (i.e. the direction of maximum contrast for antiparallel domains) of the longitudinal Kerr effect is along the plane of incidence for both, p - and s-polarized light, we found a deviation of the sensitivity direction from the incidence plane for p-polarised light. Based on a multi-component Kerr imaging technique we have developed a fully automated procedure for the measurement of magnetisation reversal loops along arbitrary in-plane field directions for magnetic films with in-plane anisotropy that does not require any mechanical adjustment of the system or sample displacement. The method is applied to the investigation of the magnetic anisotropy of a sputtered iron thin film. Additionally, a sample holder was introduced, which allows for the application of mechanical stress onto magnetic films due to substrate bending, and its applicability to the stress manipulation of the anisotropy direction was demonstrated for a nickel-iron film.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetorheological fluid is a kind of intelligent material with a controllable state. It has three working modes: valve mode, shear, and squeeze. The squeeze mode can produce greater response under the external excitation conditions, with significant application potential and advantages. In this paper, a magnetorheological fluid squeeze performance test device was designed, and the squeeze experiments under different magnetic field strengths and loading speed conditions were implemented, and then the MRF squeeze flow theory model was established, which is the key factor affecting the squeeze force are revealed. The experimental results show that the squeeze force change trend presents three stages, of which the first stage represents the state before yielding; the loading speed has a significant effect on the change of the squeeze force curves, especially around 1 mm/s, the squeeze force curves show different development trends. Through theoretical analysis, it is concluded that loading speed, magnetic field change gradient, and magnetorheological fluid dynamic yield strength are the key factors affecting the squeeze force, which provide basic theoretical support for the evaluation and research application of the extrusion performance of magnetic material.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The microstructure of 20 nm thick polycrystalline Co25Pd75 alloy films exhibiting perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA), studied on the atomic scale by analytical transmission electron microscopy (TEM) techniques, is presented. Thin CoPd alloy films are considered promising candidates for pinning MgO-based perpendicular magnetic tunnel junctions (pMTJs) for spin- transfer torque magnetic tunnel junctions (STT-MRAM). The CoPd alloy films studied were grown by DC magnetron sputtering on four different seed layers: MgO, Ta, and Ta/Ru/Ta trilayer and Ta/Pd bilayer. The effect of the seed layers on the Co25Pd75 structural quality, the size and texture of crystallites as well as their compositional homogeneity and structural coherency of the grain boundaries formed between adjacent crystallites, are investigated. The detailed structural analysis reveals that Co25Pd75 layers grown on the Ta/Pd bilayer and Ta/Ru/Ta trilayer seeds consist of larger crystalline columns, with sizes ranging from 25 nm to 15 nm respectively, compared to the other two samples. Correlation of the Co25Pd75 crystalline quality with coercivity is suggested.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the evolution of Griffiths phase and the magnetic ordering state in the intermetallic compound LaCeCo7. A ferromagnetic-like ordering phase is built up at 260 K but an anomalous magnetic susceptibility related to the Griffiths phase occurs in 300 K. The studies of critical behavior confirm that LaCeCo7 exhibits a second-order paramagnetic-ferromagnetic phase transitions. The critical exponents of β = 0.665, γ = 1.151, and δ = 2.728 determined by the magnetic field dependence on magnetic entropy change method deviate a little from the theoretical estimated long-range mean-field model (β = 0.5, γ = 1.0, and δ = 3.0). This result implies that the disorder effect in the intermetallic LaCeCo7 possibly plays a key role on the anomalous critical behavior and the establishment of magnetic ordering phase.© 2021FeSiAl/Ni0.4Zn0.45Co0.15Fe2O4 ferrite core–shell particles and cylindrical magnetic cores have been synthesized by sol–gel auto-combustion method. The magnetic cores were prepared by pellet molding process and high temperature annealing at 700 °C for 1 h. The reaction, surface morphology and magnetic properties of FeSiAl/ Ni0.4Zn0.45CoFe2O4 ferrite cores have been investigated by Differential thermal analysis-thermogravimetry (DTA-TG), X-ray diffraction (XRD), the impedance analyzer and Vibration sample magnetometer (VSM). The results indicates that there are three stages to form ferrite. The cores of unphosphated FeSiAl/Ni0.4Zn0.45CoFe2O4 ferrite will be oxidized in air at 700 °C. The spinel ferrites are successfully prepared by sol–gel and form a homogeneous as well as porous structure on the surface of the cores. The maximum permeability is 41 at 6 wt% ferrite. Ms decreases from 106.6 emu/g to 103.6 emu/g, with the increase of ferrite content.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe thermal-oxidation/wet-etching gate-recess mask using low-pressure-chemical-vapor-deposition (LPCVD) SiN/atomic-layer-deposition (ALD) AlN combined with high-quality LPCVD-SiN/ALD-SiO2 gate dielectric has been developed for the fabrication of normally-off GaN MISFETs by the self-terminated gate recess etching technique. The experimental results showed that the SiN/AlN layer could effectively hinder the formation of surface oxide on GaN cap, and ALD grown SiO2 could effectively protect the GaN channel from high-temperature damages by the following LPCVD. As a result, the fabricated devices exhibit a small on-resistance degradation, 200 mV hysteresis @ Vth = 2.4 V, <1 nA/mm gate leakage current and 6 × 108 on/off ratio.© 2021This article reports the fabrication and characterization of metal–semiconductor high electron mobility transistors (MS-HEMT) and metal–oxidesemiconductor (MIS-HEMT) grown on the semi-insulating SiC substrates with 0° and 4°-off axis. For the MIS-HEMT, the HfO2 film was used as the insulator deposited by atomic layer deposition. With a gate length of 2 μm, MS-HEMT and MIS-HEMT devices with 4°-off SiC substrates exhibit a drain saturation current density (JDS,max) of 895 and 1016 mA/mm, the maximum transconductance (Gm,max) of 225 and 175 mS/mm, a cut-off frequency (fT) of 8.1 and 9.4 GHz, and a maximum oscillation frequency (fmax) of 22 and 27.4 GHz, respectively, which are better than those with 0° SiC substrates. Furthermore, the devices with 4°-off substrate are verified with less interface states and buffer traps through the temperature-dependent and pulse current–voltage measurements.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization processes and magnetic domain structures in Ta/CoFeB/MgO stacks were studied in a series of samples with various CoFeB thicknesses d ranging from 1.24 to 1.60 nm with a step of 0.04 nm, using polar magneto-optical Kerr effect (PMOKE) magnetometry and microscopy. Thickness dependence of the magnetic anisotropy was evaluated and the first and second order anisotropy constants were quantified for each thickness. Accordingly, this dependence was deduced to result in magnetization reorientation from out-of-plane to in-plane through an easy-cone magnetization region (1.39 nm ≤ d ≤ 1.41 nm) as d was increased. PMOKE imaging of the magnetization reversal processes for stacks with out-of-plane easy axis indicated both a significant increase of the density of nucleation centers and a change in domain morphology with increasing d up to the magnetization reorientation thickness. Magnetization reversal dynamics was described by a thermal activation model consistent with a Barkhausen length of about 120 nm. The thinnest films with d = 1.24 and 1.28 nm exhibited straightened narrow stripe domains resulting from magnetic dipolar repulsion. A thorough study of narrow stripe domains was performed via direct and indirect magnetization reversal processes. The application of such structures as spin wave nano-channels could be promising.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Rare-earth-lean Sm(Fe,Co,Ti)12 alloys with the ThMn12 crystal structure and less than one Ti atom per formula unit have the potential of exceptionally powerful permanent magnets, but all prior attempts to develop high coercivity in bulk alloys, especially coercivity combined with crystallographic texture, have fallen short of the expectations. This study was aimed at improvement of the currently best Sm(Fe,Co,Ti)12 magnets prepared through melt-spinning which are inherently isotropic. Modifications of the alloys with B and Zr, already demonstrated in earlier studies to be effective separately, have been implemented simultaneously. A systematic study of Sm1.1-x(Fe,Co)11.3-yTi0.7By alloys melt-spun at a tangential speed of 50 m/s and annealed at 600–950 °C allowed for monitoring the continuous evolution of the two consecutive crystal structures, those of the TbCu7 and ThMn12 types. Zirconium was found to facilitate the formation of the 1:12 structure at the expense of the 1:7, whereas boron has the opposite effect, at certain concentrations completely suppressing the 1:12. When the two alloying elements are introduced simultaneously, they inhibit growth of the 1:12 crystallites at annealing temperatures higher than 800 °C, thus allowing for the development of a higher coercivity. Because of instrumental limitations, bulk magnets were prepared through a two-step process – compaction of the melt-spun ribbons at 650 °C and additional treatment at a higher temperature – and they were characterized by a reduced, 90–93%, density. Nevertheless, an isotropic Sm0.9Zr0.2(Fe,Co)10.8Ti0.7B0.5 magnet exhibited fair values of the remanence (7.4 kG), maximum energy product (8.5 MGOe) and coercivity (5.4 kOe), as well as high Curie temperature of 525 °C and remarkably small temperature coefficient of the coercivity, −0.25%/°C.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe demonstrate effective reduction of interface states and current collapse in AlGaN/GaN metal insulator semiconductor heterostructure field effect transistor (MISHFETs) with Al2O3 and in-situ AlN passivation layer. Here, first, a 3 nm-thick in-situ AlN layer is grown on AlGaN/GaN structure by using MOCVD at 1070 °C, and second a 7 nm-thick atomic layer deposition (ALD) Al2O3 layer is immediately deposited on the AlN layer. The X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) analyses for the Ga 3d core level and multi-frequency capacitance–voltage (C–V) measurement show that the density of interface states originated from the Ga-O bonds, which is dramatically reduced with the in-situ AlN passivation layer. The AlGaN/GaN-based MISHFET with the Al2O3/in-situ AlN layers exhibits the low gate-lag effect (8%), remarkably less than that of the device with the typical GaN capping layer (21.5%). These results indicate that the Al2O3/in-situ AlN double passivation layer is very effective in suppressing the current collapse, and hence, it is found to be the promising method for the fabrication of AlGaN/GaN MISHFETs with enhanced performance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Improving the ways of magnetic structure investigation with the lowest possible resolution is important in the study and practical implementation of fundamental magnetism. Here we discuss one of the most modern magneto-optical method of domain structure (DS) imaging, scanning near-field magneto-optical microscopy (SNMOM), and propose the new technology based on focused ion beam (FIB) treatment to produce aperture cantilevers with carbon hollow pyramid tip (ACCT). Estimated ACCT light transmission coefficients show better results compare to commonly used aperture silicon cantilevers. By measuring the polarization characteristics of aperture with diameter from 83 to 263 nm, we illustrate the possibility of ACCT to maintain a liner polarization of transmitted light. Testing of ACCT in atomic-force and SNMOM modes shows that ACCT are the effective tool in near-field imaging. Features of morphology and DS of Bi-substituted iron garnet (Bi: IG) films synthesized and used as the test objects, including DS peculiarities of 100 nm-size, is revealed.© 2021 Elsevier LtdAs an important part of three-dimensional (3D) magnetic sensors, the vertical Hall devices directly determine the overall performance of the sensors. However, the traditional vertical Hall devices (5CVHD) have large offset and low sensitivity due to an inherent electrical asymmetry. In order to solve this problem, the traditional five-contact vertical Hall devices are optimized to obtain the five-contact vertical Hall devices with slim waist (SW-5CVHD) in this paper, and an anti-parallel coupling method which is suitable for the devices is applied. In addition, based on TCAD software, this paper gives a new 3D process simulation model that is more accurate than the traditional 2D model. The 3D simulation results show that the SW-5CVHD have higher sensitivity and lower initial offset compared to the traditional 5CVHD. After applying the anti-parallel coupling method, the novel devices achieve a higher symmetry by double identical SW-5CVHD interconnected into what we call the anti-parallel coupling double SW-5CVHD (APSW-5CVHD). As the structure of APSW-5CVHD is fully symmetrical, which can be better combined with the spinning current technology for offset cancellation. As a simulation result, with a bias voltage of 1 V and after spinning current a mean equivalent residual offset of 60.0µT with a standard deviation of 74.4µT is achieved among 15 samples. Moreover, the Hall voltage sensitivity is approximately 21.7 mV/VT at 1 V bias voltage.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The microwave refraction coefficient of a composite consisting of flakes of Fe-Si-Nb-Cu-B alloy placed into epoxy resin matrix has been studied. Magnetic field dependences of the transmission and reflection coefficients have been measured in the frequency range from 12 to 38 GHz. The minima of the transmission and reflection coefficients caused by ferromagnetic resonance and the maximum of the reflection coefficient caused by ferromagnetic antiresonance have been observed. From the frequency dependences of the transmission and reflection coefficients and from the linewidth of ferromagnetic resonance, the permittivity and permeability have been estimated, which has allowed one to assess the wavenumber and complex refraction coefficient. It has been shown that the material under consideration behaves as a dielectric at DC and as a lossy dielectric at microwave frequencies in the absence of magnetic field. Near the field of ferromagnetic resonance, the real and imaginary parts of complex refraction coefficient are of the same order as in a conductive medium.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Realizing a non-ferromagnetic intergranular phase for the ThMn12-type Sm(Fe,Co,Ti)12 compound is a prerequisite for developing high coercive magnets. In this work, we demonstrate that the addition of Ga into the Sm-(Fe,Co)-Ti system results in the formation of non-ferromagnetic Sm–Ga-rich intergranular phases with good wettability on Sm(Fe,Co,Ti)12 grains. In the Sm-(Fe,Co)-Ti system, when the alloy composition was varied to the Sm-rich region as Sm1+w(Fe0.8Co0.2)11Ti (w = 0–0.7), soft ferromagnetic C15-type Sm(Fe,Co)2 intergranular phase and TbCu7-type Sm(Fe,Co,Ti)~7 phase formed along with the ThMn12-type main phase in the as-cast alloy. We demonstrated that by introducing Ga, the formation of these secondary soft ferromagnetic phases can be hindered as the excess Sm and Ga formed non-ferromagnetic Ba5Si3-type Sm5Ga3 and TII-type SmGa intergranular phases with an excellent wettability on Sm(Fe,Co,Ti)12 grains. Fine Sm(Fe,Co,Ti)12 grains of 1–2 µm, well isolated by the Sm–Ga-rich intergranular phase, were realized by melt-spinning the Ga-doped alloy and the maximum coercivity obtained was 0.5 T. According to the detailed microstructure characterizations, the weak-links to the coercivity of this novel microstructure of well-isolated and fine Sm(Fe,Co,Ti)12-based grains is the presence of defects at the interfaces which could lead to a locally reduced magneto-crystalline anisotropy.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Distinctive effects of dopant valency is discussed using an impurity level 1% doping each of Cr3+ and Ni2+ in CaBaCo4O7. Through a comparative study of the magnetic and dielectric properties of magnetoelectric CaBaCo3.96Cr0.04O7 and CaBaCo3.96Ni0.04O7, we highlight that Cr doping does not significantly alter the properties in spite of differences in magnetic spin and ionic radius compared to Co3+ and Co2+ while Ni doping induces spectacular changes. Particularly, about 4 times larger electric polarization change (~650 μC/m2 at 5.6 kV/cm) is observed in CaBaCo3.96Ni0.04O7 compared to CaBaCo3.96Cr0.04O7 and a stronger magnetoelectric coupling leading to a polarization change of ~12% in 15 T magnetic field, below 40 K. Further, magnetodielectric effects hint to competing magnetic phases over the temperature range of magnetic transitions. The article discusses the observed disparity in the light of a possible site selective doping of Cr3+ and Ni2+ in the triangular and kagomé layers, respectively, of the parent compound.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic, optical phonon behavior of the polycrystalline YFe0.9Cr0.1O3 (YFC-10), prepared by solid-state reaction route, had been studied via static and ac magnetization measurements and Raman spectroscopic techniques respectively. The results indicated that YFe0.9Cr0.1O3 undergoes unusual cluster-glass transitions at low temperatures viz. Tf1 (SG1) = 108 K (Freez.1) and Tf2 (SG2) = 30 K (Freez.2) coexisting with the long-range weak ferromagnetic (WFM) state. Raman spectroscopic (RS) measurements revealed 12 distinct modes of vibrations at all temperatures with 83–433 K. Interestingly, the freezing transition at Tf1 is found to be accompanied by significant phonon renormalization. From the detailed analysis of the line-shape function of the Raman modes, the anomalous T-variation of the peak position and the linewidths suggests the existence of spin-phonon interaction in the present solid solution. Moreover the temperature dependent synchrotron X-ray diffraction studies between 10 and 300 K revealed the anomalous thermal variation of the lattice parameters and microscopic structural parameters such as super-exchange angles and (Fe/Cr)O6 octahedral bond lengths and bond angles at both the freezing transitions. Overall, the system exhibits the strong magnetoelastic and spin phonon coupling over a broad thermal regime viz. from Liquid. N2 to temperatures above room temperature (RT = 300 K) which makes YFe0.9Cr0.1O3 reliable for application purpose.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe have investigated the exchange bias effect in La0.7Sr0.3MnO3/SrRuO3 bilayers that epitaxial grown in different directions and various substrates. A linear-tunable exchange bias effect, which related to the spin states of the SrRuO3 layers have been discovered. The spin state of Ru4+ play the centre role in the interaction, and proposes mechanisms to understand the Mn-O-Ru antiferromagnetic coupling. This study emphasizes the effect of the spin state as well as the exchange strength on the interfacial coupling, which may open a constructive approach in improving the performance of the related spintronic devices.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWhen the AlGaN/GaN HEMT is working for a long time under the high-power and high-temperature conditions, the internal heat will reduce its reliability. Here, the author first proposed a 2-D temperature distribution model to explain the mechanism of internal charge modulation to reduce the junction temperature of AlGaN/GaN HEMT. The etched AlGaN layer affects the channel 2DEG distribution and a new hot spot is generated in the thermal field, which effectively reduces the temperature and gets a more uniform temperature distribution. A quantitative analysis of the temperature model has been given to describe the effect of structure parameters on temperature optimization, and deeper etching depth is beneficial to reduce the junction temperature. The model is verified through simulation results and experimental tests, which prove its applicability. It is concluded that this model can effectively describe the temperature optimization of AlGaN/GaN HEMTs with the gate-edge etching technique.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the high frequency and microwave absorption properties of two-dimensional (2D) Sm2Fe14B nanoflakes were investigated. Both planar magnetocrystalline and shape anisotropy was obtained for the 2D Sm2Fe14B nanoflakes prepared via die-upset process, which can effectively increase the effective out-of-plane anisotropy field and improve the high frequency intrinsic magnetization (the product of initial permeability and resonance frequency). The nanoflakes have a diameter of approximately 1–2 μm and a typical thickness of approximately 200 nm. Compared with irregular Sm2Fe14B powder, a higher complex permeability and a lower complex permittivity were obtained for the 2D Sm2Fe14B nanoflakes because of the suppressing eddy effect and the oxidized grain boundary phase (GBP) layer, which facilitates the microwave absorption performance. A minimum RL value reaches −16.9 dB at the perfect matching frequency of 12.1 GHz.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The crystal structure and magnetic properties of Cu0.6Mn2.4Ge2 have been re-investigated by a combination of extensive magnetic measurements and neutron scattering experiments, aided by electronic structure calculations. The material is found to be a soft ferromagnet with the ordering temperature TC = 316 K. The magnetocaloric effect evaluated from field-dependent magnetization isotherms is equal to 1.2 J/(kg·K) and 2.5 J/(kg·K) under the maximum applied magnetic field of 2 T and 5 T, respectively. The compound crystallizes in the hexagonal space group P63/mmc. A complex structural disorder necessitated testing of several disorder models against the results of non-polarized and polarized neutron scattering experiments and magnetization measurements. Simulations at the density-functional theory level were also performed to identify the most robust solution that properly described the data observed. The final magnetic structure model reveals non-equal magnetic moments on the Mn1 and Mn2 atoms (2.29(9) µB and 2.7(1) µB, respectively) and the presence of vacancies and minor Cu substitution defects in both Mn sites. The work demonstrates how the non-polarized and polarized neutron scattering methods can be combined with electronic structure calculations to establish the microscopic structure of magnetic materials with complex crystallographic disorder.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Here we investigate the effects of wheel speed and heat treatment on the melt-spun ternary Y2Fe14B alloy, aiming to clarify its structure, phase precipitation and magnetic properties. For directly quenched alloys, the optimum magnetic properties can be achieved when the wheel speed is within a relatively wide range of 30–40 m/s. The Y2Fe14B alloy prepared at 36 m/s shows the highest coercivity of 149 kA/m and remanence of 0.88 T with the maximum energy product (BH)max of 6.8 MGOe due to the single hard magnetic phase structure. For the amorphous ribbons prepared at 50 m/s, when the annealing temperature increases from 773 to 1073 K, the α-Fe phase precipitates first accompanied by the appearance of Y2Fe14B phase and a small quantity of Fe-B phase. The magnetic properties of annealed samples are much lower than those of the optimized as-spun alloys. The effects of Nd substitution for Y on the structure, magnetic properties and thermal stability of (Y1-xNdx)2Fe14B (x = 0–1) alloys have been systematically investigated. The Hcj and (BH)max exhibit almost linear increase with the increasing Nd substitution. Relatively low temperature coefficients can be obtained in the Nd substituted alloys. The current results are important for exploring high performance and low cost Y­based rare earth permanent magnets with improved thermal stability.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The size of crystallites is one of the most important factors that determine the key characteristics of nanocrystalline thin magnetic films that make them very promising media for various applications. In this paper, using micromagnetic simulation, we study in detail the influence of the grain size on the magnetic microstructure of the films and its relation with high-frequency dynamics of magnetization. When the grain size exceeds some critical value Dcr, a sharp broadening and shift of the ferromagnetic resonance line are observed at certain frequencies of the alternating magnetic field. Using a two-magnon scattering model, it is shown that these effects are caused by the scattering of spin waves on the inhomogeneous stochastic magnetic structure—magnetization ripple. An expression for the determination of the critical size Dcr is obtained. The micromagnetic simulation results agree with the main conclusions of the static and dynamic theories of magnetization ripple and also confirmed by experimental data reported by other authors.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Commercial N50 Nd-Fe-B magnet was processed by a combined diffusion process with Pr65Cu15Al20, followed with Pr50Tb30Al20 (at %). The coercivity increment from the original 965.6 kA/m to 1672.5 kA/m was achieved in the combined diffusion sample by introducing 0.23 wt% Tb. However, the coercivity of the conventionally diffused sample with similar Tb content by Pr50Tb30Al20 reached only 1386.2 kA/m. Microstructural and compositional analyses revealed that relatively continuous grain boundary phases were first formed in the diffused sample by Pr65Cu15Al20, moreover, appropriate Tb-rich shells around 2:14:1 grains were further formed during the following diffusion by Pr50Tb30Al20 alloy. The combined diffusion process was helpful in promoting Tb diffusing along the grain boundary phase and further forming uniform Tb-rich shells. It provided a promising way of accelerating Tb diffusing and enhancing Tb availability.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the current-induced domain wall (DW) motion driven by spin Hall effect (SHE) is theoretically investigated via an atomistic model. The SHE is taken into account in the atomistic model as a Slonczewski torque term. We first consider a bilayer system consisting of a ferromagnetic layer (FM) adjacent to a heavy metal (HM). To study the effect of spin Hall angle and FM thickness on DW motion in perpendicularly magnetized FM, an in-plane current is injected into HM. The results show that the critical current density, DW velocity and DW displacement strongly depend on the spin Hall angle and thickness of FM. To demonstrate the efficiency of SOT, we also study the DW motion driven by spin-transfer torque (STT) in a FM/NM/FM system by injecting a charge current perpendicularly to the plane of the structure. The DW velocity and DW displacement of two cases are compared. At the same current density, it is clearly observed that the DW in the presence of SOT is more easily moved with higher velocity and DW displacement. In addition, the critical current density of SHE driven case is smaller compared with spin torque case. To move the DW with the velocity of 100 m/s, the injected current density required for the STT case could be 10 times as high as the SHE case. The proposed model can be used to optimize all factors for spintronic device design with low power consumption, fast speed and high endurance such as the DW-based devices and the perpendicularly magnetized SOT-MRAM.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.An aerial metallic pipeline experiences induced voltage if drawn in close vicinity of a high voltage power transmission line as suggested by Faraday's law of electromagnetic induction. Such voltages, if not appropriately mitigated, may prove fatal. This paper initially focuses on the evaluation of the induced voltage under the normal operating condition of power transmission lines followed by methods of passive mitigation of the induced voltages. The research also formulates the strategies to enhance mitigation efficiency by optimizing certain features of passive loop techniques using a new optimization algorithm called Slime Mould Algorithm (SMA). A 400 kV single circuit horizontal configuration line with an aboveground pipeline serves as a comprehensive test case to study the efficacy of the proposed algorithm. Results show that the induced voltage levels can be reduced up to 60% using the optimal location of loop conductors and the number of loops, in addition to using shielding material with high permeability. Comparing the obtained results with those obtained using Carson's formula and with genetic algorithm indicates the superior performance of the proposed technique.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Characterization of structural and magnetic properties of MNP ensembles is crucial in tailoring their performance for biomedical applications. In this work, we evaluate the size distribution of magnetic cores in single- and multi-core nanoparticles in water suspension using transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and static magnetization curve, with the geometrical core size ranges from 8.3 to 40.2 nm. A reasonable core size derived from the magnetization curve is obtained in comparison to the geometrical size from TEM image. The magnetic moment distribution possibly reveals that the reduction of effective magnetic core size is due to the magnetization degradation in cores. The hydrodynamic size and average anisotropy energy ratio obtained from the AC susceptibility response of MNPs from 5 Hz to 100 kHz are also evaluated. The complex distribution of relaxation time is constructed by applying a non-negative least square method to an AC susceptibility model that incorporates the inter- and intra-potential-well contributions. It is found that a log-normal distribution might not be adequate to represent the hydrodynamic size distribution reconstructed from the AC susceptibility responses of the suspended samples. It is demonstrated that the AC susceptibility model used in this study can be used to fairly estimate the average anisotropy energy ratio for MNP ensembles dominated by thermally blocked particles. Moreover, it can be suggested that besides the geometrical core size, the degree of core aggregation also plays an important role in determining the anisotropy energy ratio and effective magnetic moment.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Electrospun nanofibers produced from magnetic materials form a magnetic network which may be used for neuromorphic computing and other novel applications. While the influence of bending radii on the magnetization reversal in such nanofibers was already discussed in the literature, the often occurring beads along the fibers have not yet been investigated in detail. It can be assumed that such beads will support domain wall formation due to a reduction of the relative impact of the shape anisotropy, in this way influencing magnetization reversal along the fiber. Here, we simulate magnetization reversal processes in iron, nickel, cobalt and magnetite fibers with a bead in the middle, produced in three typical dimensions gained by electrospinning. In most cases a vortex state occurs during magnetization reversal, independent from the material and the dimensions. For some angular orientations of the external magnetic field, double-vortex or meander states are visible, usually also followed by vortex states. These simulations underline the strong and highly reliable impact of beads along electrospun fibers, making these structures useful for data storage, transport and other applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In order to control the polarity of the magnetic vortex, a pair of fast pulsed magnetic fields is applied on a permalloy nanodot pair. The pair of pulsed fields consists of two perpendicular magnetic field pulses with a certain time interval. The width of each pulse is about hundreds of picoseconds, and the amplitude is just ~20–30 mT. The two pulses can be considered as a CW or a CCW rotating pulsed magnetic field. The rotation direction of the pulsed field determines the final polarity regardless of the initial vortex state. We analyzed the controllability of the polarity in terms of energy, which in turn is related to the amplitude and the width of the pulse. When the frequency of the rotating magnetic field is 1.25 GHz, which is equal to the eigenfrequency of the system, the minimum pulse amplitude is achieved to reverse the polarity.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The current paper focuses on determining the degree of powder orientation in a magnet centrifugally cast in a magnetic field and on determining the influence that the amount of ferromagnetic powder has on this parameter. Strontium ferrite powder and epoxy resin were used as starting materials. The manufactured magnets were cylindrically shaped and had a circumferential orientation. It was shown that the magnetic powder particles were oriented along the easy axis of magnetization in the direction tangential to the cylinder's surface. On the basis of magnetic measurements, it was found that the powder particles’ degree of orientation decreases with increasing powder content in the magnet. For small contents of up to 20 vol% magnetic powder, a significant degree of orientation of the powder particles was observed. It was found that at 60 vol% magnetic powder content, the obtained magnets are isotropic. It was observed that at higher powder content, particle chains aligned with the magnetic field lines begin to interact with each other, which as a consequence causes the deterioration of particle orientation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The longitudinal charge and spin conductivities for a two-dimensional system with random static disorder are investigated in the presence of Rashba and Dresselhaus spin-orbit interactions. The Matsubara Green function technique is used to determine the relaxation time for the impurity scattering and the charge and spin conductivities are obtained by employing the Kubo formalism. It is shown that the spin and charge conductivities are enhanced by the Rashba and Dresselhaus spin-orbit interactions while they are reduced by the presence of impurities. Finally, the effects of Rashba and Dresselhaus interactions on the ratio of longitudinal spin conductivity to charge conductivity are studied.© 2021 The Author(s)Effect of the diameter on the CPP-GMR performance of electrodeposited Co/Cu multilayered nanowires was systematically investigated using our home-made anodized aluminum oxide (AAO) templates with the nanochannel diameter ranging from 35 to 130 nm. The nanochannel diameter was precisely controlled by tuning the anodization voltage ranging from 20 to 110 V. The Co/Cu multilayered nanowires with the aspect ratio of ~1000 were synthesized in the AAO nanochannels by applying a rectangular pulsed potential electrodeposition technique using an acidic aqueous solution containing Co2+ and Cu2+ ions. An ideal alternating Co/Cu multilayered structure with each layer thickness of several nanometers was clearly observed in the nanowires with the diameter ranging from 35 to 95 nm. The multilayered nanowires with the diameter ranging from 35 to 70 nm were spontaneously magnetized in the axial direction due to the preferential crystal orientation of hcp-Co (002) which was induced by the magnetic shape anisotropy. With decreasing the diameter down to 35 nm, the coercivity increased up to 1.37 kOe while the squareness reached 0.73 at the diameter of 50 nm. The CPP-GMR value reached 23.4% at room temperature in the Co/Cu multilayered nanowires with the diameter of 70 nm.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The pervoskite oxygen vacancies have been accepted as essential functional defects and are effective in regulating their multifunctional properties. The bulk sample La2CoMnO6 (LCMO) was prepared by solid state routing and the film La2CoMnO6 by plus laser deposition (PLD). The samples phase purity was verified by means of X-ray diffraction measurement. It has been established from the core level of X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy that the concentration of Mn3+ ions increases, impairs the double exchange between Mn3+ and Mn4+ and thus leads to the degraded magnetic properties. A source of synchrotron radiation is used to analyze the valence band spectroscopy measurements from which, mainly as a result of oxygen vacancies, a huge change in the density of states (DOS) are observed near the Fermi level (EF). Such findings are related to records of resistivity and magnetization. Rutherford backscattering spectrometry (RBS) measurements were made using 2 MeV He2+ ions on the LCMO film and information regarding film thickness was extracted. These findings indicate that a dip in DOS at Fermi-level has slowed LCMO film conduction. It can be a result of changes in orbital hybridization due to oxygen vacancies that modify the octahedra of MnO6.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Due to its favorable properties of low core loss and high saturation magnetic flux density, amorphous material is widely used as the core material of low and medium frequency transformers. However, its magnetostriction is much higher than that of grain-oriented sheet steel, a very common material for conventional transformers, resulting in high acoustic noises. This paper proposes a comprehensive model of magnetostriction in amorphous material based on the interdependence between magnetostriction and magnetization by combining the isotropic magnetostriction effect and Jiles-Atherton energy balance theory. Incorporated in coupled magneto-mechanical field calculation, the proposed model can correctly simulate the butterfly loops of magnetostriction, magnetic hysteresis loops and vibration displacements. The theoretical results of magnetostriction characteristic are verified by both single sheet test and the experimental results of amorphous transformer prototype.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) plays a key role in the formation of exotic chiral magnetic textures. Here, the interfacial DMI and magnetic anisotropy of Co(0 0 0 1)/diamond(1 1 1) interfaces are investigated by first-principles calculations. The significant DMI with clockwise chirality can be generated at Co/diamond interface. The DMI strength of Co film decreases on boron doped diamond (B-Dia), while DMI chirality turns into anticlockwise on nitrogen doped diamond (N-Dia). Large perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) appears at both Co/Dia and Co/B-Dia interfaces, which is weakended at the Co/N-Dia interface. The DMI can be ascribed to the occupied (dz2, dxz) orbitals of interfacial Co atomic layers, while magnetic anisotropy energy is determined by (dx2-y2, dxy) and (dz2, dyz) orbitals. These results provide a promising route to tailor the interfacial DMI and PMA of ferromagnetic films and hence to modulated topological magnetic textures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report the magnetic anisotropy of films of the magnetostrictive alloy galfenol deposited on a LiNbO3 substrate measured with the magneto-optic Kerr effect (MOKE). This anisotropy is present in 250 nm thick films but is absent in 600 nm thick films, most probably showing a loss in epitaxy with thickness. An anisotropy constant of ku = 3.45kJm−3 is deduced. Magnetic stripe domains (width 30 μm) oriented along the easy axis, parallel to the substrate (11¯00) axis, could be created and imaged.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Domain wall dynamics in magnetic bistable glass-coated microwire were studied. A new experiment is presented which can provide information about propagating domain wall geometry and its changes. The proposed experimental set-up and data processing provide information about spatial distribution of axial magnetic flux around a propagating domain wall. The measurements were carried out on an Fe-based microwire with unidirectional effect. Shortening of the wall with applied magnetic field was observed. It was probably a stray field around a head-to-head (or tail-to-tail) domain wall which caused the observed effect to lack strength. Despite this fact it was confirmed that increasing damping of domain wall motion resulted in the wall shortening. The observed behaviour can be interpreted as a combined effect of eddy current damping and a conical type of wall with the apex at the head of the propagating wall.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the thermal stability of spin-orbit torque magnetic tunnel junction (SOT-MTJ) thin films by tuning multiple interlayer couplings among synthetic anti-ferromagnetic layer (SAF), reference layer and free layer. We find that the bridge layer (here we use W) can influence the thermal stability of perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) in all the magnetic layers through the interlayer couplings. Increasing the thickness of bridge layer decouples the SAF and reference layer, resulting in higher PMA of SAF layer and lower PMA of reference layer. The reference layer further adjusts the PMA of free layer by orange-peel coupling via the tunneling barrier layer MgO such that we find another way to optimize the anisotropy without changing ferromagnetic layers. This work is helpful for engineering the interlayer coupling of SOT-MTJ thin films to achieve SOT devices with high thermal stability.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic Fe40Co37Zr11N12/ZrN/Ni80Fe20 film systems with a uniaxial anisotropy in the film plane were synthesised by reactive magnetron sputtering and by post annealing in a static magnetic field. Investigation on the energy exchange interaction between the ferromagnetic layers without and with an interface layer were carried out. This exchange impacts the static magnetisation properties as well as the natural resonance frequency behaviour and its damping features caused by spin current generated damping and/or anti-damping effects. As static polarisation loops are slightly but distinguishably different dependent on the interface thickness, the films definitely exhibit a distinct variation in their frequency spectra. By means of the interface layer with different thickness, various dynamic behavioural patterns could be observed. This can be assumed because the observed ferromagnetic resonance dual lines show remarkable changes in their full width at half maxima (FWHM) at frequencies of around 600 MHz attributed to the Ni80Fe20 layers and 2.3 GHz attributed to the Fe40Co37Zr11N12 layers if interface layer are applied.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Using the tight-binding model, we have studied the impact of AA and AB (Bernal) stacking on eigenstates and eigenvalues of bilayer graphene nanoflakes with triangular geometry. The zero eigenvalues of any single layer nanoflake will be doubled through AB stacking. However, we have noticed that in AA stacking, the eigenvalues are simply achievable through merging two sets of single layer eigenvalues that once added to and once subtracted from inter-layer hopping. Besides, in a single layer within some strict zero energies, the AB stacking still maintains them sublattice-polarized. However, the AA-stacking neglects the sublattice-polarized character of zero states in single layers constituent. Next, we consider onsite electron–electron interaction utilizing single-orbital Hubbard model to show how the different stacking affects the onset of the ground state magnetization in bilayer quantum dots with different stackings. Especially, in AA stacking bilayer, the system always needs a nonzero onsite interaction strength (Uc) to be magnetized.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ni50-xCuxMn38Sn12 + B3% at (x = 0, 1, 3 and 5) melt spun ribbons have been fabricated by melt spinning technique. Structural, electrical and magnetoresistance properties of the ribbons were investigated in this study. It was identified that the austenite phase with the L21 type structure was formed in the ribbons, regardless of composition. Temperature dependence of resistance measurements exhibited the first order martensite transition in the ribbons. The largest negative magnetoresistance (~55%) was obtained at 262 K in the RB1 ribbon. Depending on the Cu-content and magnetic field, a noticeable shift of martensite transition temperature to low temperatures has been clearly observed. From magnetic field dependence of the resistance, it was seen that the resistances dropped sharply with the increase of the applied magnetic field and overlapped near 80 kOe, regardless of temperatures, which strongly indicates the magnetic field-induced martensite-austenite transition.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.MnAl ribbons have been successfully nanostructured by applying cold-rolling. The use of this mechanical process deforms the as-spun ribbons and increases the density of defects in the material. The microstructural characterization of the cold-rolled samples has been performed by SEM and XRD and has allowed studying the evolution of the surface of the ribbons with the number of the passes increasing. These microstructural changes, in addition to the crystallization of β-phase during the annealing step, have successfully modified the magnetic properties of the as-spun ribbons, raising the coercivity from 1.5 to 3.5 kOe. Remarkably, this large increase in coercivity is accompanied by only an 8% decrease in remanence by comparison with that of the starting ribbons, achieving values above 35 emu/g for all the cold-rolled and annealed samples.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.MnZn ferrites of the nominal composition (Mn0.81Zn0.19)Fe2.13O4, doped with cobalt, have been studied concerning the evolution of their medium (500 kHz) frequency power losses and initial magnetic permeabilities upon ageing at various temperatures for various times. Thermal ageing results to significant power loss reduction by about 50% at 400 kHz-50 mT (i.e. at 90 °C from initially 58–29 mW cm−3) and about 30% at 500 kHz–100 mT (i.e. at 90 °C from initially 690–480 mW cm−3), accompanied with a simultaneous decrease of the relative initial permeability from initially 1700–1200. The extent of power loss reduction depends on ageing time and temperature and can be described by a thermally activated process, during which Co2+ ions fall from a metastable high energy state to a stable lower energy state with an activation energy 0.33 eV/cation. Addition of TiO2 to an amount of 4000 ppm (wt.%) appears to retard the cobalt-induced ageing process by increasing the activation energy to 0.45 eV/cation, while equal amount additions of SnO2 did not seem to have any effect.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Recently, with the quick evolution of electronic technologies, and the development of telecommunication, high-performance microwave absorbing composites in which ferrite is one of their components have attracted a lot of attention. These composites should have high absorption intensity, a wide absorption bandwidth, a thin thickness, and finally light weightiness. These composites often exhibit efficiency to fulfill coveted magnetic and dielectric characteristics. This review provides a brief presentation of ferrites and among them are spinel ferrites and hexagonal ferrites. In addition to that, it discusses the classifications of ferrites according to magnetic properties, the synthesis methods to prepare nano ferrites, and control their properties. Also, it presents the main mechanism to absorb the microwaves (e.g. dielectric and magnetic losses) and finally discusses the microwave absorbing characteristics of ferrites and their composites in terms of matching frequency, reflection loss (RL) values, and absorption bandwidth.© 2021 Elsevier LtdA polycrystalline silicon vertical thin film transistor (VTFT) is fabricated, and the electrical parameters are extracted and compared with the typical lateral thin film transistor (LTFT). The similar subthreshold slope and the distinct field effect mobility is verified by the DOS calculation in the deep and shallow trap regions, respectively, and in this article, it is used to compare with the grain boundary trap density at a lower Vds = 10 mV that eliminates the velocity saturation effect. The accurate threshold voltage is also calculated by a systematic model including the grain boundary barrier modulation effect. A pseudo-subthreshold region is demonstrated, and the threshold voltage exactly corresponds to the 3kT point of the grain boundary barrier. The low field effect mobility of VTFT is mainly due to the small grain size and also slightly affected by the parasitic resistance, which can be improved by optimizing the processing conditions, especially by improving the sidewalls smoothness and the active layer quality.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The influence of temperature on the ferrofluid magneto-optical response after magnetic field commutation is studied. Its contribution to the diffusion and mobility of the ferrofluid nanoparticles is considered by means of thermal agitation and the temperature-dependent viscosity of the fluid. Experimental responses after magnetic field switch on and off show a significant dependence on temperature. Taking into account both mentioned thermal influences, a qualitative description is provided, in which viscosity turns out to play an important role. In addition, a model based on an adaptation of a paramagnetic gas theory is used to analyze the transmission relaxation evolution after magnetic field switch off. The results are in good agreement with the experimental measurements, demonstrating the validity of this adaptation to consider the temperature dependence of this response.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.An array of magnetic nanowires of amorphous Co20Fe60B20 alloy has been prepared by oblique angle deposition of material on nanorippled substrate. The angle of incidence is chosen such that the deposition takes place on only one facet of the nanoripples. Grazing incidence small angle x-ray scattering measurement has been done in order to characterize the morphology of the nanowires. It is found that the oblique angle deposition results in columnar growth, and each individual nanowire consists of nanocolumns having average diameter of 7 nm and a tilt angle of 37° with respect to the surface normal. Azimuthal angle dependence of longitudinal magneto-optical Kerr effect measurement shows that the nanowires possess a well-defined uniaxial magnetic anisotropy with the easy axis of magnetization tilted by an angle of 25° with respect to the direction of the ripples. The magnetization follows the Stoner-Wohlfarth model with a very narrow distribution in the direction of easy axis. It is suggested that, tilt of the easy axis can be understood in terms of the interplay of two shape anisotropy terms corresponding to the ensemble of strongly interacting nanocolumns through magnetostatic dipolar interaction, and the overall shape of a nanowire.© 2021 Elsevier LtdDopants-dependent polarity transition of switching behaviors for HfOx:Cu-based RRAM were investigated. By inducing different concentrations of Cu dopants and setting compliance current, the BRS and URS behaviors of HfOx:Cu films were demonstrated. The chemical bonding states and the doping concentrations of HfOx:Cu films were analyzed by XPS technology. The electroforming processes of BRS and URS behaviors under different polarity of applied voltage were explored to understand the different behaviors of HfOx:Cu films. The uniform distribution of resistances and switching voltages, large memory window and good reliability can be observed for BRS sample. While the excess dopants in the film resulted in the poor reliability of URS sample. The different switching behaviors was closely related to the type and number of defects in the film and their migration may show some effect on multi-level behavior. The switching mechanisms of BRS and URS behaviors of HfOx:Cu films were clarified in the view of oxygen vacancies and Cu ions, and the physical models were proposed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Based on the Monte Carlo simulation, we have investigated the magnetic and thermodynamic behaviors of the graphene-like quantum dots described by a ferrimagnetic mixed-spin (3/2, 5/2) Ising model. The curves of the magnetization, magnetic susceptibility, internal energy and the specific heat as a function of temperature have been given under various physical parameters. The interesting turnover phenomenon has been found owing to the competition between the crystal field and temperature. It is found that the value of the blocking temperature increases with decreasing the crystal field or increasing the exchange coupling and external magnetic field. We have also investigated the hysteresis loops and found the impossibility of the triple-loop hysteresis behavior for certain parameters. The area of the hysteresis loops can be improved by increasing the exchange coupling and decreasing the absolute values of the crystal field and temperature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetite (Fe3O4) nanoparticles capped with oleic acid and oleylamine were prepared by wet-chemical method. Faraday rotation on the synthesized Fe3O4 nanoparticles were measured as a function of magnetic field strength and concentration. The magnitude of the three components of the dielectric tensor of the Fe3O4 nanoparticle were obtained based on single-scattering model. These are Im∊xy=5.2×10-4,Im∊xx/yy=-0.07, and Im∊zz=-0.32. Besides, we found that Faraday rotation data obtained show two distinct features when compared to the data reported in the literature. The distinct features are 1) saturation in Faraday rotation with magnetic field strength, and 2) negligible concentration dependence. More importantly, our samples did not follow chain formation like other samples reported in the literature. These observations can be attributed to a stable colloid without any aggregation in our samples as a result of sample preparation method. In samples reported in the literature although they are stable these suffer from aggregation which can lead to the formation of chains easily than in our samples.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Multicomponent doping may be a promising way to optimize the composition of SmCo5-based alloys. Moreover, the magnetic properties of Sm-Co alloys are particularly sensitive to Cu. In this paper, the effect of Cu content and annealing process on the structure and magnetic properties of Alnico alloy doped SmCo5–xCux ribbons was studied. It was found that Cu addition refines the grains, expands the difference in Cu concentration of Sm- and M-rich (M = Al, Ni, Fe, Cu) Sm(Co, M)5 grains, promotes the solute and phase separation, and increases both coercivity and magnetization of the x ≤ 3 as-spun ribbons. The x = 0.3 as-spun ribbons exhibit excellent magnetic properties of Hc = 24.6 kOe, Mr = 55.9 emu/g, and M9T = 69.1 emu/g. Annealing at 600 °C for 30 min further improves the Hc to 30.1 kOe but decreases the Mr and M9T to Mr = 41.6 emu/g and M9T = 54.2 emu/g, respectively. The formation of the lamellar or granular Sm2(Co, M)7 grain boundary phase and ordered Sm(Co, M)5 grains may play important roles in improving the coercivity of the annealed ribbons.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.It has been observed by the Monte Carlo simulation that the Magneto Caloric effect (MCE) of the ferrimagnetic mixed spin-7/2 and spin-3/2 3D Ising system is influenced by the change of crystal field coefficients. The peak value of the magnetic entropy change ΔSP has a second order polynomial dependency on the reduced crystal field coefficient De. This relation is only valid for the low magnetic field and low De values. The inverse of the coefficients of the polynomials has a linear dependency with the 4/3 power of the magnetic field. Full width half maximum (FWHM) of temperature dependence ΔS curve increases with the increment of De. The relative cooling power (RCP) increases with De and at De = 4 a large percentage change of ΔRCP % (~55%) is observed for the reduced field h = 5.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ion substitution is considered to be one of the efficient approaches to improve the magnetic properties of the barium hexaferrites. In this work, we fabricated BaFe12−xAlxO19 (x = 0, 1, 2, 4, 6) via a simple auto-combustion method and investigated their structures, morphologies and magnetic properties. The coercivity is greatly affected by annealing temperature and Al3+ content. In addition, the Al3+ substitution sites in BaFe12−xAlxO19 were further investigated by the Mössbauer spectroscopy and the superparamagnetic components were found in the BaFe8Al4O19 and BaFe6Al6O19. The highest coercivity of 13.7 kOe was achieved in the BaFe8Al4O19, which increases by 168.6% compared with that of BaFe12O19. This work opens up a new and meaningful insight for the understanding of microstructure and coercivity mechanism towards the Al3+ substituted barium hexaferrites.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The effect of hydrostatic pressure on martensitic transformation (MT), superparamagnetic (SPM) and exchange bias (EB) behaviors in polycrystalline Ni45Cu5Mn35In15 has been intensively investigated by various experimental methods. The experimental results show that the studied alloy experiences a MT from the austenitic state with a L21-type cubic structure to the martensitic state with a seven-layer (7 M) modulated orthorhombic structure with decreasing temperature, accompanied by a significant change in magnetization. It is found that applying hydrostatic pressure can induce the MT to occur in the higher temperature, while the Curie transition almost remains unchanged due to the suppression of ferromagnetic (FM) coupling. In addition, the applied hydrostatic pressure can suppress the EB field and coercivity of the studied alloy due to the reduction of the competition between FM and AFM interactions. This phenomenon can be attributed to the fact that the application of hydrostatic pressure reduces the size of the SPM cluster and its average magnetic moment.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The effects of the fluxing treatment of B2O3 and MnO on the amorphous forming ability (AFA) and magnetic properties of the Fe85B10P5 alloy prepared with raw materials were investigated. Results indicate that the B2O3-MnO fluxing treatment can significantly improve the AFA of the Fe85B10P5 alloy. The Curie temperatures (Tc) first decrease and then increase with increasing MnO content. The variation of Tc consists well with the change of the position of the diffraction peak corresponding to (2 0 0) plane of α-Fe in the annealed ribbons. It has been proved that using MnO instead of CaO during fluxing treatment for the Fe85B10P5 alloy can achieve a better protection for the P element. However, this fluxing agency makes influences on the variation of Fe and Mn elements, which will influence the Bs of Fe-based amorphous alloys.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Nanometric spin structures such as skyrmions are covering a large area of applications related to new technologies. In this paper, we carry out a computational study on magnetic skyrmions behavior in Pt/CoFeB/Ru/CoFeB antiferromagnetic-exchange coupled systems. We aim to explore the possibilities of skyrmions nucleation in such multilayer. We demonstrated that skyrmions could be hosted in such system under specific conditions. We also studied the in-plane and out-of-plane reversal magnetization processes for these magnetic multilayers in order to check the skyrmion behavior under magnetic field loops.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.To explore the diluted magnetic semiconductors for spintronic applications we have studied N doped Y2O3 employing density functional theory. It has been observed that for single N impurity with concentration 2.083 at.%, the non-magnetic pristine Y2O3 attains 1.0 μB magnetic moment for each defect and the induced ferromagnetic coupling range is sufficient to withstand room temperature ferromagnetism as estimated Curie temperature is ~807 K. Moreover, the system holds its stability at room temperature and qualifies the Stoner criteria of ferromagnetism. The partial density of states together with spin density plot reveals that it is the N 2p orbital along with nearest O 2p orbital which mainly contributes to induced magnetism. Additionally, the computed relative formation energy indicates that O substitute defect is synthetically more appreciative and dominant over interstitial defect. The charged defect analysis also predicts that the system remains ferromagnetic even with most probable charge defect state. All these supporting outcomes stipulate that N doped Y2O3 could be customised as a diluted magnetic semiconductor which could be fruitfully applied as a spintronic device.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We study in this article properties of a nanodot embedded in a support by Monte Carlo simulation. The nanodot is a piece of simple cubic lattice where each site is occupied by a mobile Heisenberg spin which can move from one lattice site to another under the effect of the temperature and its interaction with neighbors. We take into account a short-range exchange interaction between spins and a long-range dipolar interaction. We show that the ground-state configuration is a vortex around the dot central axis: the spins on the dot boundary lie in the xy plane but go out of plane with a net perpendicular magnetization at the dot center. Possible applications are discussed. Finite-temperature properties are studied. We show the characteristics of the surface melting and determine the energy, the diffusion coefficient and the layer magnetizations as functions of temperature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ever increasing demand of skyrmion manipulation in nanodevices has brought up interesting research to understand the stabilization of these topologically protected chiral structures. To understand the actual shape and size of skyrmions and antiskyrmions observed experimentally, we have performed micromagnetic simulations to investigate their stabilization in presence of random anisotropy in magnetic thin film system. Previous experimental reports of skyrmion imaging in thin films depicts that the skyrmion shape is not perfectly circular. Here we show via simulations that the shape of a skyrmion and an antiskyrmion can get distorted due to the presence of different local anisotropy energy. The values of uniaxial anisotropy constant (Ku) and random aniostropy constant (Kr) are varied to understand the change in shape and size of a skyrmion and an antiskyrmion stabilized in a square magnetic nanoelement. The skyrmion or antiskyrmion shape gets distorted with the presence of random anisotropy energy in the system.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic, magnetocaloric and transport properties were investigated systematically on Gd20Tm20Er20Co20Al20 high-entropy amorphous ribbons with magnetic fields parallel and perpendicular to ribbon surfaces. It is found that the alloy shows greater magnetic entropy change and refrigeration capacity with maximum values of 9.7 J kg−1 K−1 and 551.3 J kg−1 under the perpendicular field change of 5 T, respectively, than those of 8.4 J kg−1 K−1 and 458.1 J kg−1 under the parallel field, respectively. This large difference cannot be simply understood from the demagnetization effect and indicates a significant role of magnetic anisotropy associated with the anisotropy of atomic packing. Besides, magnetoresistance and magnetic entropy change are found to have a power-law correlation with distinct power exponents in different sample orientations with respect to the field. Present results have implications for the understanding and design of amorphous refrigerants with advanced magnetocaloric performance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In the present study, an attempt has been taken to probe the meta-stable nature of the magnetic ground state in the nanocrystalline La0.45Ca0.55MnO3 compound at the low temperature through magnetic and magneto-transport properties and compared the results from the observation with the bulk polycrystalline form of the La0.45Ca0.55MnO3 compound. The charge-ordered antiferromagnetic ground state in the bulk compound transformed into a ferromagnetic state in the nanocrystalline sample. Additionally, in the nanocrystalline form of the compound, a short-range antiferromagnetic correlation between the blocked spin is noticed at the low temperature region (T ⩽ 50 K). Such weak magnetic interaction between magnetic spins or sublattices is probed through the magneto-transport and magnetocaloric measurements study in the nanocrystalline La0.45Ca0.55MnO3 compound.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The authors missed one item in the acknowledgement section. The acknowledgment should be written as follows: “VIB and AIC acknowledge the financial support by the Russian Ministry of Education and Science, Megagrant project N 075-15-2019-1934 for the theoretical part of this work and Russian Foundation for Basic Research (grants # 18-29-02120 and 19-02-00856) for the analysis of experimental data”. The authors would like to apologise for any inconvenience caused.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Studies on giant magnetostrictive intermetallic compound Tb0.3Dy0.7 Fe1.92 (Terfenol-D) thin films are gaining increasing attention due to the interest in small scale magnetic structures. In this work, polycrystalline Terfenol-D thin films (60 nm) are produced using a Direct Current (DC) magnetron sputtering process and a hybrid thermal annealing approach, i.e. substrate heating and post-annealing. The crystallized Terfenol-D films are micropatterned (3 μm and 20 μm diameters) using a photolithographic method followed by Argon etching. The continuous and micropatterned thin films are characterized with XRD, SQUID and MOKE magnetometers showing properties similar to bulk polycrystalline Terfenol-D. Additional studies are conducted using X-ray absorption spectroscopy and the X-ray magnetic circular dichroism to investigate oxidation. Results show that while the top surface of these Terfenol-D structures are capped with Ta thin films, the side walls of the structures are exposed to ambient atmosphere raising the concern of oxidation issues. This work shows that a passivating oxide layer forms on the side walls of these small-scale Terfenol-D disks which is attributed to both the Ta capping layer as well as residual stresses preventing continued stress corrosion cracking caused by the oxidation process.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Using a many spin micromagnetic simulation tool that directly integrates the Landau-Lifshitz equation, we demonstrate that by applying an r.f. pulse, generally referred to as a Pi pulse, it is possible to near-perfectly reverse the direction of the magnetization in a ferromagnet, provided that the sample is sufficiently small and the angular dependence of the precession frequency is continuously matched using an appropriately “chirped” r.f. pulse of the proper length. Simulations are carried out for “prolate” uniaxially symmetric cylindrical samples in the presence of dipole and exchange interactions. Such reversals can be performed in the presence of a static external magnetic field or, importantly, at zero field under the sample's own internal demagnetization field. However, the ability to perform near-perfect Pi or two-Pi rotations is lost for samples above certain dimensions for which additional internal degrees of freedom are excited, particularly at higher static fields. In such larger samples the magnetization may still be reversed by utilizing damping, provided it can be rotated past a critical angle.© 2021Current work focuses on the magnetization and magnetocaloric properties of Nd0.5Ca0.5MnO3 (NCMO) prepared by the solid-state reaction method. Belov-Arrott plots indicate a glimpse of first-order magnetic transition. Besides the metamagnetic transition at lower temperatures, NCMO exhibits interesting spin memory property at 4 K. Magnetic entropy change (ΔS) during magnetization attains a peak value of ΔSmax = 15.02 JKg-1K−1 at 20 K for a 14 T magnetic field. But for demagnetization under the same conditions ΔSmax value reduces to 7.20 JKg−1K−1 at 35 K. Demagnetization entropy change is almost constant in the working temperature span compared to magnetization entropy change. The normalized value of ΔS for both magnetization and demagnetization deviates from the universal behavior, which confirms the first-order magnetic transition.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Here, we report an investigation of structural, magnetic and electronic properties in Y-doped layered iridate (Sr1-xYx)2IrO4 (x ⩽0.1). The parent Sr2IrO4 is a well-studied spin-orbit coupling (SOC) induced insulator with an antiferromagnetic ground state. The Y-doping here equivalently acts for electron doping without altering the vital parameters such as, SOC and electron correlation. Experimental results show a minute change in structural parameters and an equivalent charge conversion from Ir4+ to Ir3+. Unlike similarly other electron-doped system, the low temperature magnetic and electronic state in present series is minimally influenced. The charge conduction mechanism follows 2-dimensional hopping model in whole series. Magnetoresistance (MR) data show an interesting sign change with both temperature and magnetic field. The positive MR both at low temperature follows weak antilocalization behavior where the sign change in MR is believed to be caused by an interplay between SOC and magnetic moment.© 2021Nanocomposite, 0.5BaFe12O19–0.5Bi2/3Cu3Ti4O12 (BHF–BCT) has been fabricated via chemical method. The phase confirmation and morphology of the synthesized nanocomposite was investigated using different characterization methods including XRD, FTIR, SEM, TEM and AFM analyses, respectively. X-ray diffraction pattern and Le-bail analysis carried out by using the Fullprof software, confirmed the phase formation of BHF–BCT. The formation of Fe–O–Fe (M–O–M) bond, Bi–O and Cu–O (M–O) bonds in the nanocomposite were investigated by Fourier-transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR). The nanocrystalline nature of the BHF–BCT nanocomposite was confirmed by TEM analysis with the particle size of 31 ± 5 nm. Energy dispersive X-ray (EDX) spectroscopy and elemental mapping studies substantiated the purity of BHF–BCT material. FC curve displays maximum and step like transition occurs in the zero fields cooled (ZFC) curve below 170 K temperature of the BHF-BCT nanocomposite; however, M–H magnetization loop indicates the ferromagnetic behaviors of the material. BHF–BCT nanocomposite displayed very high dielectric constant (10.7 × 104) as compared to their constituent material. The electrical studies have indicated that the nanocomposite have semiconducting nature with insulating grain boundaries.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of L10-type tetragonal FePd, L12-type cubic FePd3, CuZr2-type tetragonal FePd2 and Pt5Ga3-type orthorhombic Fe3Pd5 binary alloys with interstitial boron doping are investigated using supercell approach within first principles density functional calculations for various doping concentrations. The magnetic moments around dopant sites are suppressed slightly both on Fe and Pd atoms whereas the per-unit magnetization almost remains unaffected in the supercell. Magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy enhances by a considerable amount and the Curie temperature decreases but remains well above room temperature. Overall, we report the magnetic properties of various Fe-Pd phases with boron doping with slight compromise in magnetization and considerable gain in magnetic anisotropy energy.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, we investigate the effect of a laser field on the multiphoton excitation of a 2-D quantum dot with the Kratzer potential under the influence of an external magnetic field. The energy spectrum of the system is studied in the presence of the Rashba and the Dresselhaus spin orbit couplings. Using numerical methods, we solve the Schrödinger equation and obtain energy eigenvalues as a function of the confinement parameters, the magnetic field and the spin orbit interaction strength. In the presence of the laser field, the dynamics of system is studied in terms of spin flip and multiphoton transitions. Additionally, the probability current density of the system is studied and we show that it strongly depends on the laser parameters and the spin orbit interaction. The results show how one can use the laser parameters as means to control the spin states.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This report, investigates the influence of particle size on the structure, vibration, and magnetic properties of superparamagnetic LiFe5O8 nanoparticles, which is annealed at various temperatures (500, 600, and 700 °C) using a low-cost auto-combustion method. The Li ferrite nanoparticles have been studied using a variety of characterization techniques: powder x-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), and Raman spectroscopy. The magnetization measurement M(H) at room temperature showed that the annealed ferrite nanoparticles exhibit a superparamagnetic arrangement of single-domain particles due to the structural disturbance in the surface shell of the nanoparticles which is far from equilibrium. We present detailed magnetic measurements such as field cooled and zero field cooled measurements, ac susceptibility, and time decay of magnetization relaxation. Their analysis has been performed using various phenomenological models viz. Néel–Arrhenius, Vogel–Fulcher and power-law model strongly suggests the presence of a spin glass-like behavior in nanoparticles of Li0.5Fe2.5O4. The results presented in this study highlight the key findings that spin-glass behavior of LiFe5O8 is strongly size-dependent. Overall, these samples are excellent prototypes for studying the size effect on magnetic materials and can be used in various technological applications such as magnetic resonance imaging, magnetic hyperthermia, and high-frequency microwave devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Multilayer planar nanostructures formed by ferromagnetic and heavy metals can reveal unique properties governed by their composition and geometry. The main role in their formation belongs to the interfacial spin–orbit interaction leading to specific magnetic distributions and behavior at the nanoscale. Here we present a complex analysis of magneto-optical effects in nanolayered films composed of different combinations of cobalt nanolayers with tantalum and platinum ones. Magnetic force microscopy studies confirm inhomogeneous magnetization distribution in Ta,Pt/CoandTa,Pt/Co/Ta,Pt films, which can be described in terms of magnetic ripple domain or chiral structures. Experiments on the Brillouin light scattering directly confirm the appearance of the interface Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction in the studied films, the effect increases with the structural asymmetry. Finally, interface-sensitive second harmonic generation (SHG) reveals odd in magnetic field SHG intensity effect for the longitudinal geometry of the applied dc magnetic field that is absent for homogeneously magnetized structures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A computationally efficient and robust neural network-based model to reproduce the hysteresis phenomenon for soft ferromagnetic alloys is here presented, as well as a dedicated procedure to generate a suitable training set from a minimal set of experimental data. Firstly, an accurate experimental verification has been performed for a commercial NGO electrical steel, measuring a family of hysteresis loops under sinusoidal and non-sinusoidal magnetic induction waveforms. The Preisach model of hysteresis, identified with the sinusoidal loops, has been exploited to generate a wider data set, which consists of a family of first-order reversal curves (FORCs), suitable to train the neural network. Then, a neural network-based hysteresis model, with the capability to reproduce the eventual presence of sub-loops, has been developed. The two simulation approaches have been validated taking into account the other experimental data, which consist of a family of hysteresis loops measured under different types of magnetic induction waveforms. The comparison between the Preisach model and the neural network-based model also covers the simulation of the waveforms found in magnetic systems supplied by pulse-width modulated (PWM) signals. The substantial agreement found indicates that the neural network model can replicate the behaviour of the Preisach model with a considerable advantage in terms of computational cost and memory allocation. In addition, the possibility to be quickly inverted makes the proposed method suitable for matching with FEM solvers.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report measurements of the dielectric permittivity, optical conductivity and magnetic circular dichroism (MCD) of the epitaxial Mn2GaC MAX-phase thin film in an external magnetic field of up to 200 mT, at temperatures of 296 and 140 K and 1.4 to 3.5 eV. The optical conductivity and MCD spectra show absorption peaks which are consistent with the interband electronic transitions for different positions of Mn, Ga, and C ions as confirmed by theoretical calculations of the spin-dependent density of electronic states. The well-known structural phase transition at 214 K is also seen in the changes of optical, magneto-optical and surface magnetic properties of Mn2GaC in our experiment.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the current-induced polarity reversal for a ground-state target skyrmion in a spin-valve nanopillar structure, demonstrating two reversal modes distinguished by current density. In view of the considerable write energy consumption (ΔE) caused by Joule heating effect, we proposed a multivariate optimization method considering the coupling of the current density, the applied area and the effective excitation time. This optimization can significantly improve the system stability and reduce ΔE to about 30% without sacrificing reversal efficiency. Our results explain the physical origin of polarity reversal of target skyrmion and overcome a major difficulty for the practical application of skyrmionic spin structures as high-density elements in memory devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Geometric Berry phase can be induced either by spin–orbit coupling, giving rise to the anomalous Hall effect in ferromagnetic materials, or by chiral spin texture, such as skyrmions, leading to the topological Hall effect. Recent experiments have revealed that both phenomena can occur in topological insulator films with magnetic doping, thus providing us with an intriguing platform to study the interplay between these two phenomena. In this work, we report on a numerical simulation of the anomalous Hall and topological Hall effects in a four-band model that can properly describe the quantum well states in the magnetic topological insulator films by combining Landauer–Büttiker formula and the iterative Green's function method. Our numerical results suggest that spin–orbit coupling in this model plays a different role in the quantum transport in the clean and disordered limits. In the clean limit, spin–orbit coupling mainly influences the longitudinal transport but does not have much effect on topological Hall conductance. In the disordered limit, the longitudinal transport is determined by disorder scattering and spin–orbit coupling is found to affect strongly the topological Hall conductance. This sharp contrast unveils a dramatic interplay between spin–orbit coupling and disorder effect in topological Hall effect in magnetic topological insulator systems.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.W-type barium cobalt hexaferrites substituted with different concentrations of Mn2+, Zn2+ ions in Ba(MnZn)xCo2(1-x) F16O27 (x = 0.0, 0.3, 0.4, 0.5 and 0.7) have been prepared by simple and cost effective solid state process. From XRD analysis, the systematic incorporation of these ions into lattice of ferrite has been confirmed from gradual decrease in lattice parameters of its hexagonal structure. SEM analysis reveals the formation of distorted hexagonal platy morphology of these powders with particles size of 2–15 µm with thickness of 1–2 µm for x = 0.4. With an appropriate substitution of Mn2+, Zn2+ (x = 0.4), ferrite showed the highest saturation magnetization (Ms) and broad magnetic loss tangent (tan δm) > 0.8 over 6–18 GHz with maximum value ~ 1.4 at 15 GHz. To obtain flexible microwave absorber, Ba(MnZn)0.4Co1.2F16O27/NBR composites have been prepared with different loading percentage (50–80 wt%) of ferrite for investigation of microwave absorption properties. Composite with higher content of ferrite (NBR-F80) shows >90% microwave absorption (RL > 10 dB) over 7.5–14 GHz with maximum value of ~ –37 dB at 10.5 GHz at absorber thickness of ~ 2.5 mm. The maximum absorption and bandwidth (RL > 10 dB) of absorber can be tuned with variation of thickness from 2.0 to 3.0 mm within 6–18 GHz. The maximum absorption of the absorber is attributed to the presence of large content of ferrite and its hexagonal plate like morphology of particles, which enhances multiple scattering within material. The fabricated flexible rubber based MW absorbers may be a potential candidates for wide band frequency applications on any target with complex geometry.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A mangle-type magnetic field source with four permanent magnets is capable of generating a magnetic field with an arbitrary magnitude and direction. In this study, the rotation pattern of magnets was optimized to maximize the field uniformity by using a covariance matrix adaptation evolution strategy. Starting with random angles of magnets, angles generating the highest magnitude of the magnetic field were calculated with values similar to those of a Halbach cylinder. Although reproducible results were not obtained for a zero magnetic field, a symmetric pattern about the origin after multiple trials of optimization is likely. As the rotation pattern for continuously varying magnitude and direction of the magnetic field could not be found using the covariance matrix adaptation evolution strategy alone, artificial initial guesses were introduced, and the optimization was successful. It was demonstrated that the application of an optimized pattern requires caution with regard to the degradation of the maximum magnetic field and linearity of change in the magnitude and direction of the magnetic field.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Numerical investigations of propagating vortex states (pVs) for ferrofluidic Couette flow with small aspect ratio and fixed non-rotating end-walls are presented. We study structural modifications and changes in spatial and temporal behavior for pV solutions. The system is subjected to either pure axial or pure transverse magnetic field, with the latter already breaking the basic system symmetries. While under axial magnetic field pVs remain basically the same, they are found to appear in various configurations with different symmetry variation in flow structure and flow dynamics under symmetry breaking transversal magnetic field. pVs appearing in a pitchfork bifurcation are found either symmetric or asymmetric/alternating, regarding the full cycle of vortex generation, propagation and annihilation, in upper and lower system half.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We examine ac driven skyrmions interacting with the interface between two different obstacle array structures. We consider drive amplitudes at which skyrmions in a bulk obstacle lattice undergo only localized motion and show that when an obstacle lattice interface is introduced, directed skyrmion transport can occur along the interface. The skyrmions can be guided by a straight interface and can also turn corners to follow the interface. For a square obstacle lattice embedded in a square pinning array with a different obstacle radius, we find that skyrmions can undergo transport in all four primary symmetry directions under the same fixed ac drive. We map where localized or translating motion occurs as a function of the ac driving parameters. Our results suggest a new method for controlling skyrmion motion based on transport along obstacle lattice interfaces.© 2021 The AuthorsFilms of ZnO have been implanted with fluxes of Co and Eu ions so as to give a layer of Zn0.96Co0.04O or Zn0.96Eu0.04O or Zn0.92Co0.04Eu0.04O that is approximately 15 nm thick. The ZnO films were deposited by pulsed laser deposition and had an O-polar surface. The properties of the as-implanted films were compared with those obtained after annealing in air and vacuum. The amount of radiation damage was measured using Raman scattering. Measurements of the lattice constants and EXAFS demonstrated that after annealing in air the Co2+ were on Zn sites in the lattice and Eu3+ ions were surrounded by oxygen ions. The air-annealed films were ferromagnetic and the magnetic moment of the ZnCoEuO was close to the sum of that from ZnCoO and ZnEuO. This method of producing ferromagnetic ZnCoO and ZnEuO films was competitive with other methods including pulsed laser deposition.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Barium hexaferrite thin films were prepared by ion beam deposition on sapphire (1 0 2) single crystal substrates. The structural properties of the films were analyzed by means of X-ray diffraction, atomic force microscopy, magnetic force microscopy and scanning electron microscopy. The obtained results were interpreted as a presence of layered structure with different types of texture and its formation mechanism is proposed. The significant influence of BaFe12O19 thickness on its microstructure was observed. Films obtained under certain conditions are potentially fit for further growing of oriented hexaferrite with out-of-plane orientation of c-axis.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The effect of annealing on the microstructure and magnetic softness of Fe77.5Si7.5Ga6B9 ribbons has been investigated, and the contribution of Ga addition to the saturation magnetization has been discussed. It was found that as-spun ribbon shown two steps of crystallization processes, which corresponded to the precipitation of α-Fe (Ga, Si) and Fe2B. Critical phase separation was detected in the ribbons that prepared at the wheel speed of 25 m/s, which could be due to the heterogenous distribution of Fe and Ga atoms according to X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy results. In addition, Ga in the nearest neighbour position of Fe could improve the magnetic moment μFe, but the participation of Si could diminish the improvement, owing to the free electrons transference between Fe, Ga and Si, and the phase dependence of exchange interacting strength of Fe atoms. Besides, The first principle has a great potential to study the saturation magnetization evolution of Fe-based nanocrystalline alloys.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Microstructures of Sm(CobalFe0.12Cu0.07Zr0.02)7 high temperature magnets with different final slow cooling aging temperatures were investigated to uncover the underlying mechanism of magnetic property losses after operating at 500 °C. When the final slow cooling aging temperature is 400 °C, lower than the operating temperature, both remanence and coercivity reduce after operating, and cannot be recovered to the initial state. Such losses stem from the secondary diffusion induced microchemistry change in the high temperature environment, which will seriously shorten its service life. While when the final slow cooling aging temperature is 500 °C or higher than the operating temperature, the remanence slightly reduces but the coercivity remains nearly unchanged after operating, and can be recovered to the initial level. Consequently, our comparative investigations suggest that final aging at temperatures equivalent or higher than the operating temperature can not only provide stable and reliable magnetic properties for application, but also extend the service life of the present Sm-Co-based magnets.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This work provides a numerical investigations of propagating vortex flow states (pVs) for ferrofluidic Couette flow with small aspect ratio and fixed non-rotating end-walls. The system is subjected to oblique magnetic fields as superposition of axial and transverse orientated fields. Such field configuration breaks the basic system symmetries and renders all flow structures to be inherently three-dimensional with complexer flow dynamics. Under oblique field configuration pV states are not direct present at onset. Instead oscillating flow states (oVs) bifurcate out of the stationary state. Basically these oVs hold same symmetries as pVs, which eventually evolve in a smooth transformation out of the oVs. pVs under oblique fields appear periodic or quasi-periodic, which render them topological speaking to exist on either two- or one-dimensional invariant manifolds as 2-torus or limit cycle (1-torus) solutions, respectively. In detail, structural modifications and changes in spatial and temporal behavior for pV solutions are studied with changing the magnetic field strength of the applied magnetic field.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Two-dimensional (2D) magnetic van der Waals crystals have received great attentions recently owing to their novel electronic and magnetic properties and rich potentials for low-dimensional and high-density spintronic devices. We investigated the magnetization dynamics of CrI3 and CrBr3 bulk single crystals by utilizing broadband ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) in a frequency range of 1 – 40 GHz and over a wide temperature range of 10 – 300 K. Complex features observed in the FMR spectra are quantitatively described by the multi-domain FMR theory. The minimum resonance frequency fmin in FMR spectra was recognized and analyzed as characteristics of the transition of the domain structure. Micromagnetic simulation on the domain structure and spin dynamics explains that the multi-domain structure exists under strong in-plane magnetic field for CrI3 and CrBr3 and significantly influences the magnetic dynamics properties. Our results also suggest that the linewidths of FMR spectra in CrI3 and CrBr3 are dominated by the magnetic inhomogeneous broadening.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Transverse and longitudinal vector network analyzer ferromagnetic resonance (VNA-FMR) spectroscopy, which can easily distinguish the optical and acoustic modes of FMR, is used to study the dynamic interlayer exchange coupling (IEC) in the oblique sputtered Fe56Co24B20(26.5 nm)/Ru(tRu)/Fe56Co24B20(26.5 nm) trilayers with various Ru thicknesses tRu. Comparing with the static IEC research method, the dynamic method not only analyzes the frequency response characteristics caused by IEC, but also identifies the nature of IEC. In the studied system, an oscillatory interlayer coupling shows up in the VNA-FMR dynamic measurement. An antiferromagnetic (AFM) coupling appears at 0.35 nm < tRu≤0.9 nm, while a strong ferromagnetic coupling dominates at tRu≤0.3 nm and a weak ferromagnetic coupling dominates at tRu≥1 nm. The strongest AFM coupling with coupling coefficient J1 of −0.87 erg/cm2 occurs at the intermediate thickness oftRu ~0.5 nm, while a strong FM coupling with J1 as large as 1.1 erg/cm2 dominates in the relatively thin 0.23 nm Ru spacers. The coupling mechanism is simulated with Layadi's rigid model and the oscillatory behavior of the bilinear IEC coefficient J1 versus tRu is obtained.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the vector extension of the Jiles-Atherton hysteresis model is modified to predict both alternating and rotational field strength variations observed in a nonoriented silicon steel sheet. The model parameters are changed to be functions of the magnitude and direction of flux density, and the anhysteretic magnetic characteristics are identified from several unidirectional alternating B(H)measurements. We demonstrate that the modified vector Jiles-Atherton model can predict both alternating and rotational field strength variations with better accuracy than the “basic” approach.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We study the formation and growth of a skyrmion crystal (SkX) phase in a frustrated antiferromagnetic Heisenberg model on a triangular lattice with Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) in the presence of an external magnetic field. We build phase diagrams in the temperature-field parameter plane, featuring first-order phase transitions and tricritical points, and study their evolution with the increasing DMI strength. It is found that already relatively small DMI intensity can lead to the appearance of the SkX phase at low temperatures in the vicinity of the meeting point of the remaining helical, coplanar up-up-down, and canted V-like ordered phases. By means of a parallel tempering (PT) Monte Carlo algorithm we find that the minimum value of DMI, at which the skyrmion phase emerges, Dt≈0.02, is one order of magnitude smaller than previously reported. We demonstrate the efficiency of PT in reliable and precise location of the phase boundaries between different phases separated by either very large (strong first-order transition) or barely detectable energy barriers, where the standard Monte Carlo approach may easily fail to find a stable solution.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic Abrasive Finishing (MAF) is a technique to enhance the surface quality of products. In MAF, the magnetic abrasive particles (MAPs) play a vital role. In this study, the processing performance of Al2O3/Fe-based composite spherical MAPs prepared by gas atomization is studied. Experimental results indicate that different sizes of MAPs and Al2O3 grains have different finishing performance. The surface quality of 316L stainless steel is significantly improved by using 100–120 mesh MAPs with W7 Al2O3 grains. The effective processing time of MAPs can reach 155 min. It is normal wear in the finishing process, and there is no MAP crushing and Al2O3 grains shedding. The MAPs have good finishing performance and long wear life.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Microstructure and texture play an important role in determining the magneto-mechanical properties of NiMnGa based Heusler alloys. The Ni50Mn28Ga22 melt-spun ribbons were prepared at wheel speeds of 1300 and 1600 RPM. The as-spun ribbons were annealed at different temperatures and for different time periods. X-ray phase analysis of the ribbons showed the presence of modulated structures, which was confirmed from the appearance of the three (2 0 2) peaks in almost all the 1300 RPM melt-spun and annealed ribbons. Phase analysis indicates that these twins (martensites) have both tetragonal and orthorhombic structures. Precipitates were observed along the grain boundaries and in the grain interior after annealing. Auger spectroscopy revealed that the precipitates were manganese-rich. TEM micrographs confirm that the annealed specimens have both 5 M and 7 M modulated structures, according to the satellite spots observed in the electron diffraction patterns. As-spun ribbons produced at 1300 and 1600 RPM had a predominantly 〈0 0 1〉 ‖ND fibre texture. 〈0 0 1〉 ‖ND fibre texture was also observed in the ribbons produced at 1300 RPM annealed at lower temperatures, such as 400 °C. 〈1 1 1〉 ‖ND texture was obtained in the melt-spun ribbons produced at 1300 RPM and annealed at 1000 °C for 5 h.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of Sm0.2Y0.8Fe2 intermetallic compound are investigated using X-ray diffraction and magnetic measurements and compared with the properties of the SmFe2 compound. It is established that the partial substitution of Y for Sm in SmFe2 leads to the decrease in both the Curie temperature TC and the two spin-reorientation transition temperatures TSR1 and TSR2. The complex behavior of the field and temperature dependencies of the longitudinal, transversal, anisotropic and volume magnetostriction in a wide temperature range (including the spin-reorientation region) is discussed in terms of the single-ion anisotropy and magnetostriction theory. The influence of other factors, such as peculiarities of the state of Sm3+ ions and competition between contributions to magnetostriction from the iron and samarium sublattices, is also considered.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The Li0.3Zn0.4Fe2.3O4 ferrite (LiZn) was synthesized by sol-gel method. A uniform mixture of carbon nanotubes and Li0.3Zn0.4Fe2.3O4 nanoparticles (LiZn@CNT) was obtained by a simple mechanical mixing method. The presence of carbon nanotubes in the sample LiZn@CNT was confirmed by the analysis of XRD and TEM. Doping carbon nanotubes in the ferrite increased the permittivity, dielectric loss and attenuation constant, leading to the appearance of relaxation process in the sample LiZn@CNT. For the Li0.3Zn0.4Fe2.3O4 ferrite with the thickness of 5 mm, the minimum reflection loss (RL) and the absorption bandwidth with RL below −10 dB can reach −34 dB and 5.2 GHz, respectively. The sample LiZn@CNT showed high shielding effectiveness (maximum value 92 dB), and more than 99.8% of electromagnetic waves can be shielded in the frequency range of 0.2–20 GHz, indicating that the composite can be used as an electromagnetic shielding material.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The paper contains the discussion of the magnetocaloric and electrocaloric effect in a model dimer (pair cluster). The system of interest is modelled with a Hubbard Hamiltonian including the external electric and magnetic field. The thermodynamics of such pair is described exactly, on the grounds of the grand canonical ensemble, focusing on the half-filling of energy states. The quantities of interest, such as magnetic entropy, magnetic specific heat as well as isothermal entropy change resulting from the variation of either electric or magnetic field and appropriate Grüneisen ratios are calculated and discussed in a wide range of external fields. The importance of singlet to triplet transition for the observed behaviour is emphasized. The ranges of direct and inverse caloric effects are found and the manifestations of the magnetoelectric phenomena are described. In particular, the tunability of the magnetocaloric effect with electric field as well as tunability of the electrocaloric effect with magnetic field are demonstrated.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In non-oriented electrical steels, the initial hot rolled microstructure usually had important effects on the successive microstructure and texture development during cold rolling and annealing and the final magnetic properties. In this paper, we reported that the hot rolled microstructure of a 0.4 wt% Si steel could be controlled by designing Ar1 (γ/α phase transformation temperature), which was susceptive to the content of Al. Three steel slabs with different Al contents (0.41, 0.30 and 0.21 wt%) were produced and then subjected to the same hot rolling, cold rolling and annealing treatment in an industrial production line. Interestingly, it was found that, the heavily elongated deformed grains were reduced or even avoided in the hot rolled sheets by decreasing Ar1 with a slight decline of Al. As a result, after cold rolling and annealing, weak γ-fiber (〈1 1 1〉//ND) texture and bigger grains were obtained. Hence, the magnetic properties were significantly improved, i.e. high magnetic induction (B50) together with low iron loss (P1.5/50). The microstructure and texture evolutions of these three steels throughout the whole processing route were comparatively investigated in detail, and the effects on magnetic properties were discussed in terms of the classical loss separation theory. This work also provides a promising method to optimize the microstructure, texture and magnetic properties for other low silicon non-oriented electrical steels.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Opto-magnetic Fe3O4/ZnS nanocomposite was synthesized by the co-precipitation method. The structural, morphological, optical and magnetic characterizations were performed by XRD, HRTEM, FTIR, PL, UV–Vis and VSM techniques. The existence of both the spinal cubic phase of Fe3O4 and the zinc blende phase of ZnS in the prepared nanocomposite was confirmed by XRD. HRTEM image depicts the formation of the ZnS shell around the Fe3O4 core. FTIR spectra revealed the incorporation of ZnS nanoparticles on the surface of Fe3O4 nanoparticles. UV–Vis spectra illustrate the decreasing band gap of the ZnS nanoparticles with the trend of increasing the size of ZnS nanoparticles due to the quantum size effect. PL spectra manifest the red shift in the nanocomposite due to a higher dielectric environment compared to the ZnS nanoparticle. The VSM study signifies the higher coercivity but lower saturation magnetization of the nanocomposite compared to the nanoparticle. The increasing heating efficiency of Fe3O4/ZnS nanocomposite than Fe3O4 nanoparticles was quantified by their respective SAR values which are found to increase in the ranges from 24–52 (w/g) (Fe3O4) to 31–79 (w/g) (Fe3O4/ZnS.) with respective concentrations. The above results speculate that the prepared nanocomposite is a decent candidate for magnetic hyperthermia applications to destroy the tumor and cancer cells.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Compared with spherical ferromagnetic particles, flaky particles due to the higher permeability present great potentials as high-efficiency electromagnetic absorbing materials, especially in S band (2–4 GHz). FeSi flakes with different diameters were synthesized by ball-milling and subsequent screened processes, and hydrogen annealing and SiO2 coating were then utilized to further optimize the electromagnetic parameters for high-efficiency absorption. FeSi flakes with high diameter possess higher permittivity for the larger specific areas and higher permeability for the increased shape anisotropy. The decreased defects after annealing induce the reducing permittivity. The eddy current effect can be effectively suppressed after the SiO2 is coated on the surface of FeSi flakes. As for the coating containing 70 wt% FeSi@SiO2 flakes, the maximum reflection loss (RLmax) of –73 dB can be observed at 2.5 GHz with the coating thickness of 3 mm. Effective absorption band (ERL5, RL < –5 dB) can reach 13 GHz at a very thin thickness of 1 mm, and ERL5 covers the whole S-C band when the thickness of 2.5 mm is utilized. The coatings containing FeSi and FeSi@SiO2 flakes as fillers present adjustable electromagnetic absorbing (EMA) performances and can be promising candidates for EMA application, especially in S band.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Reactor pressure vessels (RPVs) are the heart of nuclear power plants. RPV steels suffer from neutron irradiation, which would introduce irradiation damages into materials, such as dislocation loops, tetrahedrons, precipitations, etc. Due to shortage of monitoring specimens, nondestructive testing (NDT) has been developed for the degradation evaluation of RPV steels. In this paper, the ageing behavior of hardness and coercivity of Cu-rich RPV model steels are studied at 643 K, 673 K, 743 K and 773 K for magnetic NDT. It is found that the hardness and coercivity both exhibit ageing peaks during thermal ageing and there is a good correlation between them. Furthermore, the apparent activation energy of Cu-rich precipitations (CRPs) is estimated at around 160 kJ∙mol−1.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization of the reference layer (RL) in a normal magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ) has to be fixed below the switching field of the free layer. However, in the fabrication of magnetic random access memory (MRAM) chip consisting of huge number of MTJs, there often exist a few poor MTJ devices which show an abnormal magnetoresistance (RH) behavior. To eliminate chip fails and reduce bit error rate, in this paper magnetic switching behavior of each layer in perpendicular MTJs was studied through detailed RH measurements as a function of maximum applied field (Hmax). Switching behavior of each layer is evaluated through detailed analysis on the magnetostatic interactions of all magnetic layers in MTJs. As a result, three types of abnormal magnetic behaviors of RL and their related physical mechanisms were explored: 1), magnetization of RL tilts in elevated fields due to weak perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) below the switching field of free layer; 2), RL switches at a field below switching field of the free layer due to weak exchange coupling field (Hex) in the synthetic antiferromagnetic (SAF) structure; 3), RL switch takes place due to so-called flip flop behavior in the SAF structure. Relevant methods to overcome these abnormal magnetic switching behaviors are suggested and used in our successful fabrication of MRAM chips.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The present study investigates the effect of 26 keV N ions implantation on Iron oxide (Fe3O4) thin films of 100 nm deposited on Si (1 0 0) substrate by electron beam evaporation method. For this N ions implantation, an optimized ion fluence of 1 × 1016 ions/cm2 was used. The cubic spinel phase of Fe3O4 is confirmed by the Raman Spectroscopy. The magnetic properties and electronic structures of pristine and N ions implanted films were probed by using the Vibrating Sample Magnetometer (VSM), X-Ray Absorption Spectroscopy (XAS), and X-ray Magnetic Circular Dichroism (XMCD) at room temperature. The as-deposited film exhibits a reduced saturation magnetization due to the presence of a high density of defects such as amorphous boundaries and Fe vacancies which lead to the non-stoichiometric Fe3-δO4. The magnetic parameters Hc, Mr and MS determined from the hysteresis show enhancements after N ions implantation. This enhancement in the magnetic properties of N ions implanted Fe3O4 thin film is attributed to the healing of Fe vacancies and stoichiometric Fe3O4. Apart from this, an increment in the carrier concentration and reduction in resistivity is observed in the Hall effect measurements.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This paper discusses the effect of defects and role of charge carriers in setting up the long range magnetic order in Mn doped 3C-SiC. Using complementary experiments like temperature variation of Electron Spin Resonance (ESR) and DC magnetic susceptibility, the nature of magnetic interactions, spin dynamics and anisotropy have been investigated. The variation of ESR parameters such as, gvalue, peak to peak line width(ΔHpp), spin density (Ns) and spin–spin relaxation time (T2) as a function of temperature and dopant concentration confirms the presence of exchange interaction present in the system. The decrease in resonance field Hr as a function of temperature indicates the strengthening of internal field already existing in Mn doped 3C-SiC samples. This result confirms that defect induced magnetism could be enhanced by introducing holes in to the host wide band gap semiconductor.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.An effective-field theory identity (EFTI) for studying first order phase transitions of Ising-like spin models is proposed. Via an analytical study, this identity can be used to obtain the phase transitions between two distinct states that presents the same free energy value. In order to show the results obtained by the application of the EFTI, the phase diagram of the spin-1 Blume-Capel model is constructed for the hexagonal, square and cubic lattices. For the cubic lattice, some magnetizations and quadrupoles curves are also presented.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This work investigated in theoretical and experimental forms the structural and magnetic properties of the double perovskite La2NiMnO6. The nanoparticles were prepared through the method of coordination chemistry using chitosan, and the crystal structure is monoclinic with P21/n space group. The ab initio calculation was applied successfully to investigate this material's structural, electronic, and magnetic effects. The calculation of the geometry optimization gave support to the understanding of the experimental results, which suggest the formation of the crystalline structure with deformation in the octahedral sites of Ni/Mn. The magnetization measures suggest ferromagnetic ordering of the Ni2+-O-Mn4+ phase and anti-site disorder Ni2+-O-Ni2+ or Mn4+-O-Mn4+ to T < 150 K, TC ≈ 150 K and paramagnetic behaviour in ambient conditions. With the calculation of the electronic structure and the state density was possible to observe the semiconductor feature of the material. The spins state reveals a ferromagnetic coupling between the (3d8) Ni2+ and (3d3) Mn4+ ions. Both results indicate this system's complexity, making it of great interest in basic research and practical applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Efficient absorption bandwidth and attenuation capability are two crucial indicators for evaluating the high-performance microwave absorbers. Proper impedance matching is the precondition for obtaining broadband absorption, while it still remains a challenge to fabricate the absorbers with better impedance matching and strong attenuation over a wide frequency range. Here, we successfully prepared Co powders by a simple ethylene glycol reduction process and researched the corresponding structures, morphologies and electromagnetic (EM) parameters. The normalized input impedance |Z| (|Zin/Z0|) values of Co at various reaction times were calculated to investigate the effect of morphology on the impedance matching. It was demonstrated that Co powders were composed of fcc-Co and hcp-Co. Compared with the compact structures, the loose ones can cause the EM wave multiple scattering and reflections and increase the EM energy dissipation, however, the balance between the attenuation and impedance matching is suboptimal. The compact microspheres Co exhibited the optimal microwave absorption performance when the reaction time was 8 h. The distribution area of |Z|~1.0 is relatively broad. When the thickness varies from 1.15 to 5.00 mm, the effective absorption bandwidth (EABW, RL ≤ −10 dB) covers the bands of 3.45–18 GHz. The EABW as large as 8.16 GHz and the minimum reflection loss of −64.67 dB have been reached at a sample thickness of only 1.83 mm. We believe that this research may serve as an effective guideline for the synthesis of other optimal broadband absorbers.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Dual nature of multiferroic composites embellishes it as a promising candidate for the application in electronic industry. In this paper, we report the structural, dielectric, electrical and magnetic properties of 1-x (Ba0.96Ca0.04TiO3)-x (NiFe2O4) (BCT-NF) multiferroic composite material synthesized using the solid-state reaction method. X-ray diffraction showed the simultaneous existence of ferroelectric and ferromagnetic phase with tetragonal and spinel structure respectively. Whereby, Raman spectroscopy confirmed the existence of both phases by indicating the intense peak ranges from 566 cm−1 to 545 cm−1. Transmission electron microscopy micrograph presented the crystalline nature of all the prepared samples. Electrical analysis shows high value of ε’ with low loss factor confirming the compatibility nature of both the phases with low conductivity and minimal creation of oxygen vacancies. However, the composition x = 0.2 shows optimum dielectric and impedance properties due to the size dependency. Curie temperature was found to shift towards higher range with an increase in NF concentration. Magnetic study revealed the increasing nature of Ms and TB with increasing ferromagnetic concentration. The optimum value for TB and Ms was found to be 102 K and 36 emu/g, respectively.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Field-free magnetization switching by in-plane current injection via spin–orbit interactions in heavy-metal/ferromagnet bilayer systems is of great interest for applications of spin–orbit torque (SOT). Here, we demonstrate theoretically how to deterministically switch the magnetization of CoFeB with a tilted perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) by using the SOT effect from the viewpoint of energy landscape. It is found that magnetization switching is dependent both on the polar angle θ and the azimuthal angle φ of the tilted PMA. A tiny remnant magnetization component that deviates away from the film plane during the spin current pulse impulsion period is a key point for the subsequent switching. The underlying mechanism is attributed to the shift of PMA energy barrier with the magnetization angle, which dominates the state of the tiny magnetization component and thereafter the bipolar deterministic switching. Based on the simulation results, a phase diagram of deterministic switching regarding θ and φ is established. Moreover, the positive and negative critical switching current densities are demonstrated to exhibit an astroid-like characteristic as a function of θ. This study provides a fundamental insight into the nature of SOT-induced deterministic switching with the tilted PMA method.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Non-oriented (NO) silicon steel is used in magnetic cores of electrical machines due to its good magnetic and electric properties, such as high electric resistivity, high permeability, low coercive field, and low power losses. However, the noise and vibration, caused by magnetostriction, may lead to early failure of the equipment. Since the stator core is submitted to compressive stresses due to the shrinking fitting, positive values of magnetostriction are not appropriate. Fe-Ti alloys have low negative magnetostriction values making them strong candidates for replacing Fe-Si alloys. In this work, Fe-3wt.%Ti alloy was cold rolled down to 0.3 mm of thickness and annealed for 48 h at 850 °C. Magnetization showed to be 7 kA/m (0.09 T) higher than Fe-Si, and the magnetostriction is lower than 1 ppm up to 1.5 T while for Fe-Si is higher than 1 ppm for <0.25 T. Microstructure and texture were evaluated to explain the magnetic properties. The magnetic properties of Fe-3wt.%Ti are better than commercial non-oriented Fe-Si and could be an alternative to improve the performance of electrical motors.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We discuss theoretically a frustrated Heisenberg antiferromagnet in magnetic field close to the saturation one. It is demonstrated that a small biaxial anisotropy and/or the magnetic dipolar interaction produce a delicate balance between phases with a commensurate canted, incommensurate helical (conical), and fan spin orderings. As a result, different sequences of phase transitions are realized depending on values of these small anisotropic interactions. We derive analytical expressions for critical fields and ground-state energies of the phases which are in a quantitative agreement with our and previous Monte-Carlo simulations.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The BiFeO3 is a multiferroic material of great interest in various research fields. In this research, we studied the effect of La and Pr on the structure and magnetic response of BiFeO3. A pure phase was obtained for the synthesized samples. The overlapping of the diffraction peaks, their shifts and the changes in the Raman modes indicate a structural distortion, inducing a phase transition, especially in the Pr samples. These structural effects result in different magnetic responses between samples doped with Pr and La: the remanent magnetization and the maximum magnetization increase with the Pr percent. The above is explained by the structural analysis: the Pr inclusion decreases significantly the percent of the rhombohedral phase characteristic of BFO, modifying considerably its magnetic response.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the longitudinal spin Seebeck effect in CoFeB/NM bilayers, with Ta, Pd and Ru as non-magnetic NM material. By means of a quantitative approach using an equivalent circuit model, we determine the accurate voltage due inverse spin Hall effect measured in the non-magnetic layer beyond unveiling the role of anomalous Nernst effect and thermoeletric effects provide by metallic ferromagnetic CoFeB layer. From experimental results, we estimate the spin Seebeck coefficient for the bilayers, finding values quite compatible with those for ferromagnetic insulators reported in literature. Moreover, we address the angular dependence of the voltage curves, disclosing the non-magnetic layer affects the effective magnetic anisotropy of the whole bilayer. Hence, our results suggest the effective magnetic anisotropy may be modified to improve the thermoelectric voltage response in ferromagnetic/non-magnetic metal bilayers.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The nonequilibrium behaviour of a core-shell nanoparticle has been studied by Monte-Carlo simulation. The core consists of Ising spins of σ=1/2 and the shell contains Ising spins of S=1. The interactions within the core and in the shell are considered ferromagnetic but the interfacial interaction between core and shell is antiferromagnetic. The nanoparticle system is kept in open boundary conditions and is driven by randomly varying (in time but uniform over the space) magnetic field. Depending on the width of the randomly varying field and the temperature of the system, the core, shell and total magnetization varies in such a manner that the time averages vanish for higher magnitude of the width of random field, exhibiting a dynamical symmetry breaking transitions. The susceptibilities get peaked at two different temperatures indicating nonequilibrium multiple transitions. The phase boundaries of the nonequilibrium multiple transitions are drawn in the plane formed by the axes of temperature and the width of the randomly varying field. Furthermore, the effects of the core and shell thicknesses on the multiple transitions have been discussed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the electronic structures and magnetic performance of SmFeO3 (SFO) powders prepared by standard solid-state reaction route and thin films fabricated by pulsed laser deposition (PLD) on SrTiO3 (STO) (1 0 0) substrates were investigated. The X-ray diffraction (XRD) investigations prove the phase purity of both SmFeO3 powders and thin films. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) was employed to study the chemical composition and the valence states of elements. With the purpose of studying the electronic structure of SFO samples, especially the orbital hybridization in the samples, X-ray absorption Spectroscopy (XAS) were also accomplished. Remarkably, we observed the difference in XAS of O K-edge and Fe L-edge between SmFeO3 powders and thin films. It was observed that the samples exhibited different exchange bias effect (EB) from magnetization investigations, which were probably dependent on the changes of the orbital hybridization and bond length of the samples.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This work presents a simple structure of a fluxgate sensor with superior characteristics, using an excitation-bridge coil without the need of a conventional pick-up coil. The proposed device is characterized by the dual role of the excitation coil, which serves both to magnetize the soft magnetic core periodically and to pick-up the external magnetic fields simultaneously. In fulfilling such roles, the excitation coil is designed in two-rod cores and configured into two branches of an anti-serial circuit. Each branch is combined with an external resistance to forming an excitation-bridge circuit that induces a differential signal proportional to the external magnetic fields. The experimental results demonstrate a significant sensitivity of 629 mV/mT and a noise level of 320pT/√Hz@1Hz. The proposal has many merits without the pick-up coil, including simplified integration, miniature size, and high sensitivity.© 2020The structural, electronic structure and magnetic properties of double pervoskite Tb2CoMnO6 have been investigated. Electronic structure analysis by X-ray Photoemission Spectroscopy Study (XPS) study reveals the presence of mixed oxidation state (Mn4+/Mn3+ and Co2+/Co3+) of B-site ions. Different interesting phenomena such as emergence of Griffith phase, appearance of Hopkinson like peak and also unusual slow relaxation are observed. It has been demonstrated that the presence of inherent anti-site disorder along with mixed valence states of B-site ions and Jahn-Teller active ions are the most important ingredients for the evolution of Griffith phase. Moreover, the presence of Hopkinson like peak has been attributed to the domain wall motion and the large anisotropy field. The further study yielded that the relaxation associated with this peak is unusually slow.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetotransport properties of polycrystalline La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 (LSMO) ultrathin films depend strongly on their thickness and microstructure. In particular, the resistivity and magnetoresistance can be tuned by varying the film thickness and grain size. Here, we have deposited LSMO films with thicknesses ranging from 100 nm down to 10 nm by pulsed laser deposition on thermally oxidized Si substrates, retaining the films’ metallic nature. To avoid reaction of the films with SiO2 at high temperatures, we have introduced a two-step deposition method (half the film thickness grown at 400 °C and the remaining half at 800 °C). X-ray diffraction (XRD) revealed the polycrystalline nature, while atomic force microscopy (AFM) revealed the granular structure of the films from which, surface roughness and grain size are found to decrease with decreasing film thickness. However, low temperature resistivity upturn increases with decreasing film thickness and grain size. The variations of low temperature resistivity minima and magnetoresistance (MR) with film thickness and grain size have been interpreted in the regime of quantum interference effects (viz. weak localization and e-e interaction), intergranular spin polarized transport (SPT) phenomena and their dominance. It is found that SPT was the dominating phenomena. The signature of SPT was also evidenced clearly from low field MR at low temperatures. These kinds of ultrathin films are suitable as ferromagnetic electrode for spintronic device applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The use of non-conventional materials is nowadays of much interest in scientific community. Magneto-rheological elastomers are hybrid materials, which in presence of magnetic fields state a change in their mechanical properties. They are composed by an elastomeric matrix with embedded magnetic particles. One of the most attractive features of these materials is that as soon as the magnetic field is removed from the material, the original mechanical properties are completely recovered, with negligible differences in comparison to the original state. This paper focuses on the study of magnetic characteristics of these smart materials, such as relative permeability and demagnetizing factors, for samples with different volume concentration of ferromagnetic particles.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this study, a novel magnetic field sensor (MFS) based on 2D photonic crystal slab (2D PCS) microcavity is proposed. Magnetic fluid film (MFF) covers the surface of PCS and is coupled to high-Q microcavity by evanescent field. The slight disturbance of the refractive index of MFF can cause a larger response of the microcavity optical local field. The magnetic field calibration is realized by measuring the output power of W1 waveguide. The finite difference time domain (FDTD) method was used to analyze and optimize the sensing characteristics of MFS. The simulation results show that the PCS magnetic sensor has good linearity and sensitivity. When the MFF with a thickness of L = 0.4 μm completely covers the surface of PCS, the normalized sensitivity of W1 type waveguide-single microcavity coupling sensor structure can reach 2.52/T. Compared with the traditional photonic crystal magnetic sensor, the PCS magnetic sensor structure designed in this paper can adopt the existing MEMS processing technology and is easy to fabricate.© 2021 The AuthorsWe have calculated electronic structures of Mn4C using first-principles calculations based on density functional theory (DFT) within the Perdew Burke Ernzerhof-generalized gradient approximation (PBE-GGA). The calculated band structures and density of states (DOS) indicate that stability of cubic perovskite-type crystal structured Mn4C is originated from p-d hybridization between Mnb and C and d-d hybridization between Mna and Mnb sublattices. The mean field approximation (MFA) resulted in the Néel temperature (TN) of 879 K which is in close agreement with experimental TN. The temperature dependence of magnetic moments of Mna and Mnb sublattices were also calculated using the Brillouin function to investigate the origin of unusual linearly increasing magnetization below 400 K. It was found that the increasing magnetization is originated from strong mutual interdependence of more or less linearly decreasing magnetic moment of Mna and stationary magnetic moment of Mnb below 400 K.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic moment of epitaxial Co100−xMnx films grown on MgO(0 0 1) at low Mn concentration region diverging from Slater-Pauling curve is investigated. We grew Co100−xMnx (0 ≤ x ≤ 30) on MgO(0 0 1) substrates by molecular beam epitaxy and measured their structural and magnetic properties. Our results reveal the moment diverging from Slater-Pauling curve of Co100−xMnx films grown on MgO(0 0 1) at low Mn concentration is due to a structure transition. Anomalous Hall effect (AHE) study of Co90Mn10 films with different crystal structure confirmed this relation between magnetism and structure, the intrinsic part of AHE clearly shows the competition between different phases. Our quantitative analysis has made a further understanding of the moment diverging from Slater-Pauling curve found in Co100−xMnx films at low Mn concentration.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.BiFeO3 is the most important room-temperature multiferroic material. However, the magnetoelectric coupling effect of BiFeO3 is weak, and an effective way to improve it is to suppress the spin cycloid structure. In this work, Mn ions were substituted into BiFeO3-based ceramics to enhance the magnetoelectric coupling effect. All samples were refined with the rhombohedral R3c structure. The grain size gradually decreased with increasing Mn substitution content. According to DSC analysis, the endothermic peak and exothermic peak exhibit an obvious thermal hysteresis behavior, indicating that it is the first-order ferroelectric transition. Meanwhile, a dielectric anomaly was also found at that transition temperature. The leakage current increased with increasing Mn content, which can be ascribed to the increased oxygen vacancies. The magnetic properties were enhanced for all samples, and the maximum Mr = 51.9 emu/mol was obtained for x = 0.03. In addition, the magnetoelectric properties were improved, and the value of linear magnetoelectric coefficient exhibits a maximum value αME = 0.38 mV/cm Oe at x = 0.03. Thus, the addition of Mn at Fe sites may destroy the spin cycloid structure and enhance the ME effect of BiFeO3.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The electronic structures and magnetism of 3d transition metals (TM = V, Cr, Mn, and Fe) doped ScN monolayer are investigated using density functional calculations. The results reveal that doping these TM atoms into ScN monolayer can produce magnetic moments, which are mainly distributed in the TM atoms and their adjacent N atoms. And the V-, Cr-, Mn-, and Fe-doped ScN monolayers are all magnetic semiconductors, showing the magnetic moments 2.0, 3.0, 4.0, 3.0 μB, respectively. The ferromagnetic (FM) and antiferromagnetic (AFM) couplings of V-, Cr-, Mn-, and Fe-doped ScN monolayers are also studied. Finally, the band gap of TM-doped ScN monolayer can be tuned by applying biaxial strains. It is interesting to see that the V-doped ScN monolayer turns to be magnetic metal with magnetic moment 1 μB under −6% biaxial compressive strain. For the Fe-doped ScN monolayer, its magnetic moment increases to be 5 μB under −4% and −6% biaxial compressive strains.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work we present a study of the effect of the in-plane component of magnetic stray field on the response of Magneto Optical Indicator Film (MOIF) sensors. To take into account this effect, which was neglected in all MOIF measurements done so far, a small bias field with in-plane orientation is applied and the MOIF response thus obtained is compared with the results of numerical modelling. Thus the complete vectorial value of stray field can be determined. Moreover, we show that in a wide range of magnetic fields, up to approximately half the saturation field, the effect of the in-plane field component can be neglected and thus MOIFs are sensitive only to the normal field component, thus making it possible to measure this component directly.© 2020The periodically ordered Fe nanowires embedded in anodic alumina nanoporous templates have been prepared by electrochemical deposition. The length and diameter of nanowire is 40 μm and 90 nm, respectively. The magnetic anisotropic field is found to be 10,000 Oe. The coercivity (356 Oe) is found much smaller than the theoretical value (10,800 Oe), which is believed due to the ‘nucleation-propagation’ mechanism which has been verified by micromagnetics simulation. The significant reduced remanence manifests the strong magnetic dipolar interaction among plentiful nanowires. The ultra high frequency properties of prepared nanowires array have been measured within 0.5–12 GHz. Both the experiments and micromagnetics simulation reveal the multiple natural resonances in nanowires array, which is believed due to the inhomogeneous localized magnetic anisotropic field. The inhomogeneous alignment of magnetic moments has been verified by Mössbauer spectra.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically explore to manipulate the electron-spin polarization by a δ-potential in 3-layered semiconductor heterostructure modulated by the Rashba spin-orbit-coupling. An obvious electron-spin polarization effect still exists even if the δ-potential is embedded inside. Both size and sign of the electron-spin polarization can be tuned by changing the weight or position of the δ-potential. Therefore, a controllable spin filter can be obtained for spintronics device applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ba3Mn2O8 has a quantum-disordered paramagnet ground state formed by the singlet, and the excitation states with the triplon and quintuplet. We have investigated the magnetization behaviors of the single crystal samples Ba3Mn2−xCrxO8 (x = 0, 0.01, 0.04 and 0.06) with both the static and pulsed high magnetic field from zero up to 60 T. At the temperature TN, the magnetization decreases rapidly with the decrease of temperature, which is the evidence of the dimerization of spin dimers. The field-induced quantum magnetization plateaus (half of the saturation magnetization) and high-field polarization states show the excited triplet and quintuplet states appear with the change of temperature and the applied magnetic field. The high field magnetization and ESR measurement results confirm that the J0/kB value and the zero-field gap Δ/kB value are close to the reported value, which also indicates that Ba3Mn2−xCrxO8 is not a simple isolated dimer system.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Reliable unidirectional switching of magnetic vortex core driven by continuous rotating magnetic field is investigated using a permalloy nanodisk with a nanocavity inserted in the center in combination with micromagnetic simulations. It is reported that once the vortex core is confined in a nanocavity of diameter is comparable to the core size, the modes of the core motion (divergence/convergence modes) are modulated differently by the nanocavity: the threshold field amplitude required for vortex core switching is reduced for convergence mode, but not for divergence mode. We found that the confinement of the nanocavity to the core is mediated by the cavity height as well. Low-power-driven fast unidirectional switching is found to be achievable by carefully choosing the value of the nanocavity height.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this work, voltage distributions of forming operations are analyzed by using an advanced statistical approach based on phase-type distributions (PHD). The experimental data were collected from batches of 128 HfO2-based RRAM devices integrated in 4-kbit arrays. Three different switching oxides, namely, polycrystalline HfO2, amorphous HfO2, and Al-doped HfO2, were tested in the temperature range from −40 to 150 °C. The variability of forming voltages has been usually studied by using the Weibull distribution (WD). However, the performance of the PHD analysis demonstrated its ability to better model this crucial operation. The capacity of the PHD to reproduce the experimental data has been validated by means of the Kolmogorov-Smirnov test, while the WD failed in many of the cases studied. In addition, PHD allows to extract information about intermediate probabilistic states that occur in the forming process and the transition probabilities between them; in this manner, we can deepen on the conductive filament formation physics. In particular, the number of intermediate states can be related to the device variability.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Square plate shaped magnetite nanocrystals have been synthesized by chemical precipitation from solution using arabinogalactan. A high crystal quality was observed in the plate plane while, across the plate, there is some stratification. The magnetic hysteresis in such particles is determined by the bulk magnetocrystalline anisotropy, plate shape anisotropy, and surface magnetic anisotropy. It is shown using the micromagnetic simulation that the ferromagnetic square nanoplates exhibit the extraordinary magnetization switching anisotropy, which should be taken into account for understanding the hysteretic properties of the particles.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic and magneto-transport properties of polycrystalline Pr0.5Ca0.5Mn0.9V0.1O3 have been studied. The incorporation of vanadium attributes to enhancement in the Mn3+/Mn4+ ratio as well as density of conducting eg carriers, which affects the magnetic and electrical behavior of the system. On cooling, a multi-phase separated “paramagnetic (PM) – charge-ordered antiferromagnetic (COAFM) – ferromagnetic (FM) – reentrant spin glass (RSG)” phases are observed with the characteristic charge ordering temperature TCO = 233 K and Neel temperature TN = 143 K. Field-induced first-order magnetic phase transition from a charge-ordered antiferromagnetic state to a ferromagnetic cluster glass state takes place at TC = 44 K. A 7 T magnetic field induces metal–insulator transition at TMI = 163 K. At low temperatures, strong memory-effect and colossal magnetoresistance (CMR) ~ 99.99% are observed in resistivity data. The sample shows a high field coefficient of resistance (FCR) value of about 855% in the low-temperature regime.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.An alternative sensing solution is described to measure local magnetic hysteresis cycles through a laminated magnetic core. Due to the reduced space gap separating two successive laminations, it is impossible to interpose the usual oversize magnetic sensors (wound coil, Hall-effect sensor). In this study, the space issue has been solved by printing the needle probe method for the magnetic state monitoring and by using a micrometric Giant Magneto Resistance (GMR) for the magnetic excitation measurement. An instrumented magnetic lamination including the non-invasive monitoring solution has been built and moved successively to every lamination position of the whole laminated ferromagnetic core. A precise cartography of the hysteresis losses has been reconstructed from all these local measurements and the average values compared to the classic measurement methods obtained with a wound coil. The relative agreement between the experimental results observed opened doors to large improvement in the estimation of magnetic losses and in the design of magnetic circuits.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Increasing the saturation magnetic induction (Bs) while maintaining excellent high-frequency magnetic characteristics of nanocrystalline alloys is still a challenge. Herein, Fe76Si13B8Nb2Cu1 alloy ribbons with completely amorphous precursor were industrially prepared with industrial raw materials. This industrialized nanocrystalline alloy with Bs of 1.39 T has a low core loss of 179 kW/m3 at 0.2 T and 100 kHz, which is slightly higher than that of the commercially applied Fe73.5Si13.5B9Nb3Cu1 alloy with low Bs of ∼ 1.24 T but lower than that of other current alloys. Besides, the real part of complex permeability (μ') of the alloy reaches 24,500 at 100 kHz under an applied filed of 0.06 A/m, which is comparable to that of Fe73.5Si13.5B9Nb3Cu1 alloys. Furthermore, the μ' in the operating temperature of 130 °C increase below 9% at 100 kHz and 2% at 200 kHz with respect to μ' at room temperature. Hence, the industrialized alloy with good castability, high-frequency magnetic performance and operating thermal stability has a good application prospect in high-frequency power electronics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.LaFe11.6Si1.4/Ce2Co7 composites were prepared using strip casting flakes (SC-flakes) and heat treated flakes (HT-flakes) by hot pressing, denoted as SC-HP and HT-HP, respectively. Subsequently, additional heat treatment was performed. The microstructure evolution, phase constitution, magnetocaloric and mechanical properties of these SC-HP and HT-HP samples over a large range of heat treatment temperatures and times were compared. Heat treatment at 1373 K for 12 h resulted in Ce and Co diffusion into La(Fe,Si)13 particles. An increase of Tpeak from 228 to 289 K and a large (–ΔSM)max increase from 1.89 to 5.01 J kg−1 K−1 (ΔH = 2 T) was observed in SC-HP samples. Combining hot pressing and heat treatment considerably reduces processing time. 90% of theoretical density, compressive strength greater than 450 MPa, large (–ΔSM)max of ~4.73–5.01 J kg−1 K−1 and good thermal conductivity (λ) above 5.5 Wm−1K−1 were also achieved, suggesting the practical use of such heat treated composites with attractive magnetocaloric, mechanical and thermal properties.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Tuning of superconducting phase transition temperature (Ts) and interfacial magnetism is of great technological importance for micro and nanoelectronics. To achieve the cherished goal, an ultra-thin layer (4 nm, 6 nm, 8 nm 10 nm) of ferroelectrics PbZr0.48Ti0.52O3 (PZT) on high-temperature superconductor YBa2Cu3O7-δ (YBCO) has deposited to tailor the magnetic and superconducting properties. The existence of Meissner effect confirmed the superconducting nature of YBCO in the heterostructures. However, its Ts significantly shifted to the lower temperature side with an increase in PZT capping layers' thickness. Nearly 10 K reduction in Ts was observed with an increase in the capping layer from 4 to 10 nm. A significant amount of magnetic moment was found in the heterostructures, which increases almost three times compared to the YBCO/LAO magnetic moment above Ts. We believe novel weak magnetic phases above the Ts may be due to the re-arrangement of oxygen anion near the ferroelectric-superconducting interface.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We calculate the magnetic susceptibility in ferromagnetic metals above the Curie temperature TC using the dynamic spin fluctuation theory and make a detailed comparison with experiment. Calculation results for Fe, Co and Ni are found in good agreement with experiment over a wide temperature range. The paramagnetic Curie temperature is found 7–8% larger than the ferromagnetic one in agreement with experiment and various approximations of the Heisenberg model. We calculate the spin-density correlator to show that magnetic short-range order leads to deviation of the susceptibility from the Curie-Weiss law in the temperature interval up to 1.1–1.2 TC.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The room temperature magnetoelectric coupling was elucidated by the analysis of structural, magnetic, and electrical properties of xLi0.1Ni0.2Mn0.6Fe2.1O4 – (1-x)Bi0.8Y0.2FeO3 composites. The X-ray diffraction pattern shows that the ferromagnetic phase forms a cubic spinel structure and the ferroelectric phase forms a rhombohedral perovskite structure. The density of the composites decreases with ferrite content. The average grain size slightly decreases with ferrite content for x = 0.1 and increases for further increasing ferrite content. The real part of initial permeability and saturation magnetization increase with increasing ferrite content. The real part of the dielectric constant decreases rapidly with the increase of frequency showing dielectric dispersion at lower frequencies and then remains almost constant at higher frequencies. The dielectric loss of the samples reduces with the increase of the ferrite phase. The ac conductivity of composites increases with frequency, indicating that the conduction is due to small polaron hopping. The study of impedance spectroscopy suggests that grain contribution is effective for the conduction mechanism in the composite. The maximum magnetoelectric voltage coefficient is observed (~182 × 103Vm−1T−1) for the 0.1LNMFO – 0.9BYFO composite which is useful for fabricating magnetic sensors.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles have been widely applied in the nanomedicine field: therapies based on magnetic drug targeting have shown promising results towards the improvement of the current state of the art of medical treatments. Particles interaction with their carrying flow or the surrounding tissues still needs to be completely understood, as well as the mechanisms underlying interparticle interactions. These interactions can potentially promote particles aggregation in the fluid doman and therefore influence the therapy outcome. This study presents a numerical model to describe particles magnetohydrodynamics in a realistic setup for magnetic drug targeting. The focus is a quantitative analysis of the contribution of the local ferrofluid concentration gradients to the magnetic fluid volume force, as well as an investigation on the dependence of the magnetic fluid volume force on particles diameter and ferrofluid concentration. The results show that the main contribution to the magnetic fluid volume force is the magnetic field gradients term. However, the concentration gradients term ranges in the same order of magnitude and therefore cannot be neglected in the force formulation. In addition, the molar concentration distribution has been found to change with different force formulations and with different values of the molar influx too. The model outlines that the magnetic fluid volume force increases with the particle diameter and the ferrofluid concentration. However, both relationships are not linear, but more complex. The described approach proves to be versatile and further applicable to more complex geometries and scenarios. In addition, the outcome and the achievements of the presented numerical model provide for the first time insights into the role of the local ferrofluid concentration gradients in the determination of the magnetic fluid volume force and represent a starting point for further investigations of the mechanisms underlying the flow-mediated ferrofluid mass transport.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Topological spin textures, such as magnetic skyrmion, have great promises in data storage applications due to their inherent stability. Contrary to the general idea, simulation results here indicate that spontaneous skyrmion equilibrium states can exist generally in certain materials without the assistance of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction, external fields or defects. The spin configurations are closely related to the variations of the magnetocrystalline anisotropy K1, exchange interaction A, and saturation magnetization MS. The system with low anisotropy is conducive to the formation of vortex, while a single domain can be formed in the large range of K1 and A in the system with small MS. Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation is used to investigate the variations of different interaction energies in the formation of topological domains. In the range where skyrmions are formed, the anisotropic energy, exchange energy and demagnetization energy account for 40 ~ 80%, 10 ~ 20%, 10 ~ 40% of the total energy. Meanwhile, a phase diagram of equilibrium magnetic moment distribution under different intrinsic properties is obtained. The K1, A and MS values of skyrmions range from 1.6 ~ 2.5 × 105 J/m3, 1.6 ~ 6.8 × 10-12 J/m, and 7.1 ~ 8.8 × 105 A/m in this simulation. By adjusting the material parameters, various competing interactions in magnetic nanostructures can be controlled to form skyrmion textures, which provide important insights for understanding the formation mechanism of nontrivial topological domains.© 2020 Elsevier LtdWe investigated the effect of growth temperature on the structural and electrical properties of InAlAs layers grown on InP (1 0 0) substrates by metalorganic chemical vapor deposition (MOCVD) method. Flat surface morphology of InAlAs layers with root mean square (RMS) surface roughness values below 0.4 nm were obtained at 500 °C and 660 °C, while RMS surface roughness values of InAlAs layers grown in the region of intermediate temperature increase from 0.7 nm at 540 °C to 3.9 nm at 620 °C with increasing growth temperature. This increase in surface roughness is caused by the phase separation of the InAlAs layer, which is divided into In-rich and Al-rich column regions. The resistivity values of the InAlAs layers grown at 500 °C and 660 °C, in which the phase separation was not observed, were analyzed by the transmission line method (TLM) and those values were ~1 × 104 Ω·cm and 0.06 Ω·cm, respectively. We propose that oxygen atoms being incorporated into InAlAs layers during growth were the cause effect explaining the change in resistivity depending on the growth temperature. In order to evaluate high-resistivity InAlAs layers grown at 500 °C for a buffer layer of devices, we fabricated InGaAs-channel metal oxide field effect transistors (MOSFETs). The on/off current ratio values obtained from ID-VG transfer measurement was a value of 6.10 × 105, indicating a high-performance characteristic.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the magnetic ageing of a bulk forged non-annealed magnetic core, used in claw pole synchronous machine, is investigated. The study is carried out by characterizing the material properties of two groups of samples subjected to a thermal ageing at 180 °C that corresponds to the maximum operating temperature of the claw pole rotor. The investigated characteristics are the electrical conductivity, the magnetic properties, the material microstructure and the Vickers hardness. They were characterized along with the ageing time. The results show that, during the thermal ageing, the hysteresis losses and the Vickers hardness have been affected by the magnetic ageing, whereas the electric conductivity and the normal B-H curve have not been modified. The microstructure analyses showed that carbides precipitates were the main cause behind the magnetic ageing. Moreover, the comparison between the results of two groups of samples revealed the possibility that the magnetic ageing of the material could have started during the manufacturing process of the magnetic core.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In granular thin films consisting of small particles of magnetic metal dispersed in nonmagnetic matrix both magnetization and magnetoresistance phenomena are directly related, and their relationship is very complex. This is due to the distribution of ferromagnetic grains in nonmagnetic metallic matrix and its mutual magnetic interactions. In this paper, we studied influence of CoxAg100-x film composition and thickness on film structure, magnetization and magnetoresistance. It has been found that the size of Co grains correlates with the sample thickness for the films with d = 20 nm, and the superparamagnetic state of Co granules is preserved up to x ≤ 55 at.%. However, thicker samples are superparamagnetic only up to x < 32 at.%. It is found that in granular films the GMR ratio increases with the film thickness. In addition, the dependence of the magnetization versus film thickness indicates that the microstructure of the thin films differs from that of the thicker films. The application of the Levinshtein percolation theory showed the qualitative agreement with the results of our experiment.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The results of the magnetic and structural properties of epitaxially grown NiGe thin films on (0 0 1) oriented MgO substrate by using molecular beam epitaxy (MBE) have been presented. The XRD measurements showed that the NiGe thin films grown on MgO substrate epitaxially with four-fould rotational crystalline symmetry. In addition, the measurements indicate that the NiGe films were grown on (1 1 0)-crystalliographic orientation with respect to (1 0 0) direction of the MgO substrate. It has been revealed that the saturation magnetization (Ms) decreases with increasing Ge concentration up to the critical value and then start to increases again at the rate of x = 0.14 in sample of Ni(1-x)Gex. With increasing of the relative Ge concentration, the structural and the magnetic properties of the films evolved into a new pahase with a critical structural order parameter. Also, ferromagnetic resonance measurements show that all magneto-crystalline anisotropy parameters are consistent with this structural critical order. We compared these results with our previous studies about the structural and magnetic properties of the NiGe thin films grown on native oxide Si (0 0 1) substrate.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a cobalt-iron/biomass porous carbon (CoFe/BPC) composite material is prepared through a facile in situ reduction process using fir wood as the raw material. CoFe2O4 is successfully reduced to CoFe alloy by the BPC after the heat treatment process. The morphology characteristics indicate that the CoFe particles are uniformly distributed in the porous carbon matrix. Besides, compared to BPC and CoFe2O4/BPC samples, the CoFe/BPC composite material has higher dielectric and magnetic losses due to its carbon graphitization, porous structure, strong magnetism, and multicomponent effect. Electromagnetic (EM) wave absorption properties are determined in the frequency range of 8.2–12.4 GHz. The CoFe/BPC composite material has a minimum reflection loss of −53.6 dB at 10.9 GHz with a thickness of 2.2 mm. The results indicate that the CoFe/BPC composite material is expected to be a superior EM wave absorber. These encouraging findings provide insights into the preparation of promising practical applications of biomass-derived microwave absorbers.© 2021 Elsevier LtdNanoelectromechanical (NEM) device has been regarded as one of the future switching devices due to its nearly infinite switching slope and zero off-state leakage current. However, it suffers from high pull-in voltage which causes high operation voltage. In this study, a sub-15 nm-thick Al-doped HfO2-based ferroelectric (FE) layer with a negative capacitance (NC) that can exceed the scalability limitation of the perovskite materials is used for voltage amplification to solve the issue. In detail, the model parameters are extracted from the separately fabricated devices; the capacitor of FE material and the NEM device. Using the parameters, the influences of NC on the NEM device are theoretically examined. In addition, systems with other dopants in HfO2-based FE material are compared. Finally, the design parameters are optimized for a low-power FE-NEM system.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The goal of this research is to investigate the effect of strain rate history on the piezomagnetic behavior of ferromagnetic steels. Cyclic tensile tests were carried out to record the magnetic fields on the surfaces of Q345 and X80 steel specimens. The impacts of different strain rate histories on the magnetic signals were investigated and the evolutions of piezomagnetic fields of Q345 and X80 steels are closely related to the strain rate history. The magnetic fields demonstrate a systematic evolution when the strain rate history increases from 0.03 min−1 to 0.3 min−1. When the strain rate history decreases from 0.3 min−1 to 0.03 min−1, the magnetic fields remain relatively stable. The results were explained by the movement of magnetic domains and the strength of pinning sites induced by the external stress. This study shows that strain rate history should be considered as one of the variables that influence the piezomagnetic field of ferromagnetic steels.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Current research on magnetic particles in magnetorheological elastomers (MRE) mainly focuses on the effect of particle distribution and arrangement on the mechanical properties. However, there are few studies on the chain formation mechanism of magnetic particles in MRE. In order to solve the above problems, we proposed a numerical simulation method to study the movement of magnetic particles in MRE. First, the force of the magnetic particles under the magnetic field was analyzed, and the magnetic particle movement model was established. Further, the change of the movement parameters of the particles during the contact process was obtained, including the changes of magnetic force, viscous force, displacement, and velocity. According to the analysis results, the critical angle of attraction and repulsion was determined, and the simulation results were verified by experiments. Finally, the effect of magnetic field strength, volume fraction and particle size on the chain formation of magnetic particles was simulated, it was found that the strength of the external magnetic field affected the efficiency of particle chain formation, and the volume fraction and particle size affected the morphology of the particle chain formation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Topological magnetic states such as skyrmions have widely been investigated as a suitable candidate for memory bits in next generation data storage device applications including random access memory (RAM) or race-track memory as well as spin-torque nano-oscillators etc. Energy efficient multistate switching of these states based on electric control of magnetization involves the electric field tuning of perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA). By using micromagnetic simulation study, we demonstrate the strain-mediated electric manipulation of various topological magnetic states in nanodisc with [Pt/Co/Ta]n trilayer stacks residing on a piezoelectric substrate. A stability phase diagram is derived for the representation of regions of the lowest energy states against the applied strain as a function of disc dimensions. Utilizing this derived phase diagram, various electric field-induced strain-mediated switching scenarios including non-volatile reversible switching of skyrmion into skyrmionium, 3π state and helical stripe domain state, the creation of skyrmionium from uniform single-domain magnetic state and its annihilation and volatile reversible switching between skyrmionium and vortex are achieved. Moreover, an extended phase diagram based on the estimated critical values of the applied strain for different domain structures within the nanodisc is also built and further implemented in designing a multistate sequential switching between various magnetic states triggered by a continuously varying strain pulse. These findings hold a potential for contributing in the development of low-power high-density multistate magneto-electric or magneto-elastic memory and logic device applications involving simple architectural concept applicable to future microelectronic integrated device strategies.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.By means of Monte Carlo simulation, we have explored the magnetic and thermodynamic behaviors of the diluted ferromagnetic spin-3/2 Ising nano-graphene monolayer under the longitudinal magnetic field. The effects of the number of lattice sites, magnetic atom concentration, crystal field and external longitudinal magnetic field on the magnetic phase transition and hysteresis behaviors of the present system have been discussed. The characteristic curves of magnetization, magnetic susceptibility, internal energy and the specific heat as a function of temperature have been displayed specifically. We have presented the phase diagrams for various physical parameters. It is found that the area, coercivity and remanence of the hysteresis loops are strongly dependent on those selected parameters.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents a novel alternating current field measurement (ACFM) system, which is realized by tunneling magnetoresistive (TMR) sensors and a tradeoff (TO) wavelet denoising algorithm. The TMR sensor is characterized with a high sensitivity of 30 mV/V/Oe and a self-noise of less than 9pT/√Hz at driving frequency f = 3 kHz. TO algorithm is proposed to select the optimum combination of mother wavelet family and decomposition level. The combinations of wavelet Db5 with decomposition level 8 and Sym7 with decomposition level 8 are determined as the most suitable ones for x- and z-axis signal denoising respectively, which have been demonstrated to be better than the traditional low-pass filtering method. Finally, the efficiency of the proposed system is proved by an experiment under more pressing test conditions, for example, with increased lift-off distance of 10 mm. In particular, it leads to increased SNR (signal-to-noise ratio) by 25.5 dB and 16.5 dB for x- and z-axis ACFM signal, respectively.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Establishing an accurate theoretical model of the influence of stress on the magnetic properties of materials is of great significance to the use of magnetic methods to detect internal stress of components. Existing magneto-mechanical effect models often use different modeling methods for variable stress and variable magnetic field load conditions, and there are limitations in the interpretation of the non-monotonic effect of tensile stress on material magnetization under variable magnetic field load condition. The simplified multiscale magneto-mechanical model proposed in this paper uses a unified method to model the magneto-mechanical effects under variable stress and variable magnetic field loads. Since the second order stress term is added to the magnetic domain free energy and the energy loss caused by pinning is considered, the proposed model can not only reflect the hysteresis characteristics of the material magnetization with magnetic field and stress, but also reflect the non-monotonic change of magnetization with tensile stress. The proposed model has the advantages of clear physical meaning, few material parameters and fast calculation. It can be applied to stress non-destructive testing, and it also contributes to better design and use of magnetic material devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Advance in the field of two-dimensional (2D) Van der Waals layered magnetic materials have made the atomic-thickness spintronic devices possible in the near future. The application of the 2D layered magnetic materials inevitably involves the magnetization reversal. Here we study the magnetization reversal of the 2D layered material Fe3GeTe2 by means of magnetic and anomalous Hall resistance measurements. We find the reversal process of Fe3GeTe2 flake is temperature and thickness dependent. For thin flakes and at low temperatures, the hysteresis loops have perfect rectangular shapes with large coercivity, indicating the single domain characteristic during the reversal process. With increasing temperature, a cross-over from single domain to multi-domain structure occurs. For bulk and very thick flakes Fe3GeTe2, the nearly zero magnetic remanence and small coercivity demonstrates that the reversal process is accomplished through the formation of multi-domain structure and its gradual evolution with the magnetic field. The change of magnetization reversal with temperature and flake thickness is explained based on the competition between the long-range magnetic dipolar interaction and the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. The results obtained in this work provide important reference for designing Fe3GeTe2-based spintronic devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In artificial multiferroic heterostructures combining ferromagnetic transition metal films and bismuth ferrite layers the electric field control of the magnetic state is generally achieved through interface exchange coupling. Here we report a reversible and non-volatile magnetoelectric (ME) effect in Ni/ BiFe0.95Mn0.05O3 bilayers originating primarily from a strain-transfer mechanism. The non-volatility of the ME effect is explained by an asymmetric piezoelectric strain response of the ferroelectric BiFe0.95Mn0.05O3 film with respect to the applied electric field, yielding two different states at remanence. We further show that the piezoelectric properties and the ferroelectric domain structure of the BiFe0.95Mn0.05O3 film can be controlled by tuning the screening of the polarization charge at the interface through an interleaved dielectric SrTiO3 spacer. As the dielectric spacer thickness is decreased, the strain-mediated ME response evolves from the typical butterfly-like hysteresis loop towards a rectangular shape, thereby making such artificial multiferroics suitable for non-volatile memory applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the structural, magnetic and energetic properties of ultrathin FeRh films grown in different crystallographic planes, namely (100), (110) and (111), are investigated by using density functional theory calculations. Different thicknesses, atom terminations and magnetic phases (FM and AFM) have been considered. The conclusions differ depending on the direction of growth. In general, values regarding surface energy follow the relationship σ110 < σ001 < σ111 where they grow with increasing thickness, the Rh-terminated surfaces also have higher values with respect to the Fe-terminated ones. Regarding stability, FeRh(001) and FeRh(110) surfaces have similar energy per atom values and are favoured with respect to FeRh(111). In relation to the study of the normal relaxations to surfaces from the thirteen systems, it could be concluded that except for the FeRh(111) surface where contractions between the layers are noticed regardless of termination and magnetic configuration, the other ones show relaxations. The importance of the magnetic order in the films energy stabilization is also analyzed. In summary, it could be said that in most cases Rh-terminated films present unstable and even unpredictable behaviors depending on the number of layers. This suggests that Rh is important in improving some properties, but only when the number of layers is less than that of Fe. That is, the film construction will depend on the specific interest of the particular application to be used in.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We have calculated and plotted the apparent permeability and the demagnetization factor of single magnetic wires. We have also confirmed the accuracy of the analytical formula for the conversion between the apparent permeability and the demagnetization factor. We also show that, as regards wire geometry, the effective permeability calculated from the inductance does not provide a good estimate of the apparent permeability, but that it is close to the amplification factor for induction sensors. We extend the concept of apparent permeability to a wire array. This will allow us to design multiwire magnetic sensors, mainly induction sensors and fluxgates. FEM calculations have been verified on physical models with up to 91 wires. Finally, we show a simplified 2D model for studies of larger wire arrays, and we verify the accuracy of the model.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The structure, magnetic and transport properties of the orthorhombic rare-earth aluminum germanide GdAlGe are systematically studied using X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy (SEM), magnetic and electric measurements. A phase transition from tetragonal to orthorhombic structure occurs at 1204 K. Orthorhombic GdAlGe, which crystallizes in YAlGe-type structure (Cmcm, N 63, oS12) with lattice parameters a = 4.0605 Å, b = 10.5183 Å and c = 5.8001 Å, consists of two kinds of Al-Ge clusters and the slanted Gd3 isosceles triangles Δ and reversal ∇ with inversion symmetry. GdAlGe orders antiferromagnetically with a Néel temperature of 34 K, it might be due to the exchange coupling interaction of slanted magnetic isosceles triangles Gd3 △↑ and reversal Gd3 ∇↓. Magnetic transport is relative to the magnetic scattering between spins of the conduction electrons and magnetic excitations. The positive magnetoresistance MR with a maximum of 23% is obtained, this phenomenon might be due to disorderedly magnetic scattering during the magnetizing process.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Metal-carbon composites (MCC) were produced by the dissolving of the Fe, Co and Ce nitrates in phenol–formaldehyde resin with further pyrolysis (under heating up to 800 °C). Concentrations of the metal compositions in final MCC were 2, 7 and 15 wt%. Phase composition of the final MCC samples was determined using XRD and Mössbauer spectroscopy. It was established phase separation in metallic compounds under pyrolysis process due to chemical interaction with phenol–formaldehyde decomposition products. The main phases for composites were: Fe3O4 (for MCC-Fe); Co (for MCC-Co) and CeO2 (for MCC-Ce). Average crystal size for metal-based fillers was 28, 24–35 and 3.5 nm for Fe-; Co and Ce-based composites respectively. The electrodynamic properties of the MCCs in the Extremely High Frequency range (30–50 GHz) were studied as function of the filler concentration. The frequency dependences of the permittivity and permeability (real and imaginary parts) of the investigated composites were measured. The nature of the MCC electrodynamic properties was discussed in detail in terms of polarization losses.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The understanding of the characteristics of a magnetic layer in a different environment is crucial for any spintronics application. Before practical applications, thorough scrutiny of such devices is compulsory. Here we study such a potential Hall device of MgO-capped Hf/GdFeCo bilayer (FeCo-rich) for magnetization relaxation around nucleation fields at different voltage probe line widths and dc sensing currents. The device is characterized by anomalous Hall measurements in transverse and longitudinal Hall geometries for two different probe widths A (5 µm) and B (1 µm). The coercivities of the Hall loops (ρxy-H and Rxx-H) drop with increasing the sense current for both the probes. For probe B, the sharp and large drop in coercivity (ρxy-H loops) at comparatively lower sensing currents is observed, which is attributed to the negligible current shunting and presence of pinning site at B caused by the patterning process. The average domain wall velocities at various sensing currents for probe B are found to be smaller than probe A, from the transverse and longitudinal Hall geometry magnetization relaxation measurements, which agrees with pinning sites and Joule heating effect at probe B. The notch position in the pattern and the longitudinal Hall resistance curve peak shape suggest the domain wall propagation direction from probe B to probe A in the current channel. This study highlights the domain wall propagation at different nucleation fields, sensing currents, and the Hall probe aspect ratios.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Developing a novel strategy for promoting the disorder–order transition of FePt nanoparticles (NPs) is helpful to improve magnetic and electrocatalytic properties of the FePt NPs. In this research, high magnetic field (HMF) was introduced to wet-chemical synthesis of the L10-FePt NPs. The effects of HMF on the growth and magnetic property of wet-chemical synthesized L10-FePtCu NPs were studied. Cu atoms preferred to occupy the Fe-site in L10-FePt lattice at 6 T HMF, which facilitated this disorder–order transition and increased the ordering degree of L10-FePtCu NPs. When the magnetic dipolar interaction energy was much higher than the thermal energy, the HMF also enhanced the orientation attachment of L10-FePtCu NPs along 〈0 0 1〉 direction, which would lead to the increasing of growing rate and the aligning of NPs. The HMF increased the coercivity of L10-FePtCu NPs by increasing the grain size and the ordering degree. This work provides a promising method for controlling the disorder–order transition, the attachment growth, and the magnetic property of wet-chemical synthesized NPs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The experiments are conducted to investigate the effect of temperature, magnetic field, and nanoparticles on the effective thermophysical properties (thermal conductivity, viscosity and density) of the magnetic nanofluids. The Fe3O4 magnetic nanoparticles are dispersed in the water at various concentrations and the resulted suspensions are assessed in the temperature range 10–70 °C and under the presence of an external magnetic field range from 0 to 750 Gauss. The different parameters have observed the significant effects on the thermal conductivity, viscosity and density of these colloidal suspensions. The experiments have revealed that the thermal conductivity is enhanced with nanoparticle concentration, temperature and magnetic field. The new empirical correlations using Buckingham-Pi theorem and analytical approach have been proposed and discussed comprehensively for the effective thermal conductivity for such magnetic suspensions under the presence of a magnetic field. The viscosity of the colloidal suspension is shown significant enhancement with nanoparticle concentration and decrement with increasing temperature. The empirical correlation for the viscosity is reported and elucidates the temperature dependence of the viscosity. However, the density for these suspensions shows only a trivial enhancement with concentrations.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.SrZn2-x(MnCa)x/2Fe16O27(x = 0–0.6) nanoparticles synthesized by Co-precipitation method and single walled carbon nanotube (SWCNTs) were used to prepared microwave absorption nanocomposite. X-ray diffractometry (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), Fourier-transform infrared (FT-IR) spectroscopy, vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM), and vector network analyzer (VNA) were utilized to characteriziation of samples. The results showed that the particle size of Zn2W hexaferrite varies in the range of 55–75 nm with a good hexagonal shape. Structural changes due to the addition of divalent cations change the magnetization (M) and coercivity (Hc) of samples. The highest magnetization and coercivity are obtained in the sample containing x = 0.4 (M = 70 emu/g) and the nanocomposite sample (Hc = 605 Oe), respectively. Based on reflectivity measurement, the nanocomposite sample contains nanoparticles of hexaferrite with x = 0.4 and SWCNTs showed a maximum reflection loss of −42 dB at the frequency of 10.2 GHz. This sample also covers the entire x bandwidth (4 GHz) less than −10 dB and 1.5 GHz less than −20 dB.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of disordered La2CuMnO6 double perovskite oxide are reported. Temperature variation of dc magnetization in zero field cooled and field cooled protocols manifest the cluster glass feature of the compound. The cooperative glassy magnetic state is explored by the memory effect in thermal variation as well as relaxation dynamics. The frequency dependent shift of the ac susceptibility peak satisfies dynamical scaling law with Tc ~ 26.4 K and dynamic exponent zν ~ 3.26 proposing a cluster-glass like state. The anti-site disorder and competing exchange interactions of two different transition metal have been argued for the observed cluster glass state in this B-site disordered La2CuMnO6 double perovskite.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this work, a continuous and symmetric trans-capacitance compact model for triple-gate junctionless MOSFETs is presented, valid in all regions of operation. Initially, the expressions of the gate, drain and source total charges are analytically derived based on a continuous and symmetric drain current compact model already developed. Then, the intrinsic capacitances are calculated via the differentiation of the terminal charges, verified against TCAD simulation data. The AC symmetry tests of the trans-capacitance compact model are thoroughly investigated.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Room temperature ferromagnetic Cu-doped LiNbO3 thin films with Cu contents of 2–8 at.% were deposited by RF-magnetron sputtering. X-ray absorption spectroscopy together with multiple-scattering ab initio theoretical calculations at Cu K-edge revealed the incorporation of Cu ions into Nb sites in the LiNbO3 host lattice with divalent valence state. The detailed local structural analysis also confirmed that oxygen vacancies are present in the nearest coordination shell of the Cu atoms. The activated ferromagnetism in the Cu-doped LiNbO3 is intrinsic and probably originates from indirect interactions between the oxygen vacancies and dopant ions, which forms bound magnetic polarons and overlapping polaron orbitals, resulting in stable ferromagnetic ordering. These results present a practical method of triggering room temperature ferromagnetism in non-magnetic Cu element doped LiNbO3 systems with oxygen defects, which helps elucidate the origin of ferromagnetism in perovskite ferroelectric oxides.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we propose a stochastic model for the resistive switching of ReRAM devices with 1T1R configuration. We work with the fact that the switching occurs in the narrowest zone of the conductive filament due to changes caused by the electric field. This active region is represented by a net of vertical connections, each one composed of three electrical elements: two of them are always low resistive (LR) while the third one acts as a breaker and can be low or high resistive (HR). The breaker can change its state according to a switching probability (Ps), which depends on the voltage drop in the breaker and the threshold voltage, Vset or Vreset for the set or reset process, respectively. This approach gives the model the stochastic behavior and generates the variability observed in the current–voltage curves of most of ReRAM devices. Further, we add another resistor in series in the circuit to represent the electrical signal of the transistor. By comparing measured and simulated IV curves of HfO2-based ReRAM devices of two different scales, nm2 and µm2, we validated the model. The flexibility and straightforward implementation of this resistive switching model make it a powerful tool for studying ReRAM memories and other stochastic devices.© 2021 The Author(s)Magnetic nanoparticle based hyperthermia emerged as a potential tool for treating malignant tumours. The efficiency of the method relies heavily on the knowledge of magnetic properties of the samples; in particular, knowledge of the frequency dependent complex magnetic susceptibility is vital to optimize the irradiation conditions and to provide feedback for material science developments. We study the frequency-dependent magnetic susceptibility of an aqueous ferrite suspension for the first time using non-resonant and resonant radiofrequency reflectometry. We identify the optimal measurement conditions using a standard solenoid coil, which is capable of providing the complex magnetic susceptibility up to 150 MHz. The result matches those obtained from a radiofrequency resonator for a few discrete frequencies. The agreement between the two different methods validates our approach. Surprisingly, the dynamic magnetic susceptibility cannot be explained by an exponential magnetic relaxation behavior even when we consider a particle size-dependent distribution of the relaxation parameter.© 2020 Elsevier LtdInAs nanowires (NWs) were selectively grown on hole patterned InP (1 1 1)B substrate by Metal-Organic Chemical Vapor Deposition (MOCVD). This study reports the vertical growth behavior of InAs NWs transitioned at a certain height and its difference under various growth conditions. This certain height is referred as “critical height.” This is a boundary where both vertical and lateral growth occur. Under this height, only vertical growth takes place. Vertical growth characteristics were reported through the determination of the critical height of NWs. The critical height was investigated for its three growth conditions; growth temperature, molar flow rates of In and As sources. Increase in growth temperature induced increase in critical height. Increase in growth temperature enhances the mobility of In adatom. This further increases diffusion length on the sidewall surface. However, increased AsH3 molar flow rate decreased the critical height. The surface reaction of In adatoms on the top (1 1 1)B surface of InAs NWs was reduced by the formation of As trimer. As a result, reduced relative vertical growth rate decreased the critical height of InAs NWs. The critical height of InAs NWs, however, was not changed by the variation of the Tri-Methyl Indium (TMIn) molar flow rate. This variation doesn't affect the mobility of In adatom on the sidewall surface or the surface reaction rate on the top (1 1 1)B surface of NWs. Hence, we concluded that variation of the mobility of In adatom on the sidewall surface and relative vertical growth rate affect the critical height of InAs NWs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The electronic structures and magnetic properties of Na-doped, Cr-doped and (Na, Cr) co-doped BaCd2As2 by using first principle calculations. The pure BaCd2As2 shows a non-magnetic semiconductor with a bandgap about 0.5 eV. The Na-doped BaCd2As2 is still non-magnetic semiconductor, and the valence band exist a slight upward shift due to the increase of carries by introducing Na dopant. The doping of Cr atom leads to the magnetic generation of the pure BaCd2As2, which mainly comes from the Cr-3d orbitals, but the anti-ferromagnetic state of most systems plays a leading role. And the (Na, Cr) co-doped system with decoupled charge and spin doping prefers ferromagnetic state to be the ground state, and the origin of magnetism can be explained by p-d hybridization, which is due to the coupling interaction between Cr-3d and As-5p.© 2020 The Author(s)We report the occurrence of ferromagnetic-like anomalous Hall effect (AHE) below 30 mT in bismuth crystals. The signatures of ferromagnetism in transport are not corroborated in magnetization measurements, thus suggesting the induction of non-intrinsic magnetism at surfaces and grain boundaries in bismuth. The suppression of the AHE with the increase of magnetic field and temperature coincides with previous reports of superconductivity in Bi, suggesting an interplay between the two phenomena.© 2020 Elsevier LtdA detailed and didactic analysis of the diffusivity in a 2D inversion layer is carried out, providing its dependence on carrier density and temperature. Then, a comprehensive study of the diffusion and drift current components in a MOSFET is proposed. Their dependence with gate and drain voltages is investigated down to deep cryogenic temperature, revealing that at T = 4 K the diffusion current is nearly constant in strong inversion whatever the mobility law. Finally, based on our diffusivity analysis, a new formulation of the diffusion noise valid from weak to strong inversion down to very low temperature has been developed.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe studied the mechanism of the proton-induced electrical degradation of AlGaN/GaN high electron mobility transistors (HEMTs) through 5-MeV proton irradiation. First, the AlGaN/GaN heterostructure was exposed to protons with a fluence of 1 × 1015p/cm2 to investigate the relationship between the radiation-caused damage in the heterostructure and the electrical characteristics of HEMTs. The HEMTs fabricated on a proton-irradiated AlGaN/GaN heterostructure showed slight degradation in dc characteristics and a positive shift in threshold voltage, compared with the HEMTs fabricated on an unirradiated heterostructure. This indicated that the proton radiation-induced defects in the AlGaN/GaN heterostructure were not dominant factors of characteristic degradation. After additional proton irradiation into both devices, more severe degradation in electrical characteristics was confirmed. The HEMTs fabricated on a proton-irradiated heterostructure showed the largest characteristic degradation in this work. It is expected that the secondary particles, attributed from the collision of proton and metal contacts such as ohmic and schottky, can cause the creation of additional defects, leading to significant degradation of device characteristics. In addition, the pre-existing defects in AlGaN/GaN heterostructures created first proton irradiation can also influence the characteristic degradation of devices.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we demonstrate high-performance lateral AlGaN/GaN Schottky barrier diodes (SBD) on Si substrate with a recessed-anode structure. The optimized rapid etch process provides results in improving etching quality with a 0.26-nm roughness of the anode recessed surface. By using the high work function metal Pt as the Schottky electrode, a low turn-on voltage of 0.71 V is obtained with a high uniformity of ±0.023 V for 40 devices. Supported by the flat anode recess surface and related field plate design, the SBD device with the anode–cathode spacing of 15 μm show the specific on-resistance (Ron,sp) of 1.53 mΩ·cm2 only, the physical breakdown voltage can reach 1678 V with a high power figure-of-merit (P-FOM) of 1840 MW/cm2. For the SBD device with the anode–cathode spacing of 30 μm, the physical breakdown voltage can be as high as 2705 V and the power FOM is 2217 MW/cm2.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report on experimental results of the specific resistivity ρ, Hall resistivity ρH and magnetoresistance MR of rapidly quenched AlxFe100−x binary amorphous alloys. Atomic structure investigation done by transmission electron microscopy at room temperature verifies that samples are in the pure amorphous state with a high coordination number 8<Nc<12. Systematic changes in the resistivity, magnetoresistance and Hall effect were observed with the varying Fe content. At room temperature, samples with Fe content ⩾40% show negative magnetoresistance, are p-type and show the presence of anomalous Hall effect, while samples with Fe content ⩽25% show positive magnetoresistance, are n-type and show no anomalous Hall effect contribution. Our experimental results are discussed in the concept of electronic stabilization Hume-Rothery amorphous alloys triggered by the hybridization effect of the Fe-d and the Al-s,p electrons. Previous literature results have predicted that when the Fe-d states are full, no ferromagnetic properties should be observed in the AlxFe100−x alloys, and this is for concentrations x⩾75, which is in agreement with our results, because the appearance of an anomalous contribution in the Hall effect would be a direct evidence of ferromagnetic order in the AlxFe100−x amorphous alloys.© 2020 Elsevier LtdAn accurate and efficient parasitic parameter extraction method is proposed for gallium nitride (GaN) high electron-mobility transistors (HEMTs). In this letter, a 19-element small signal equivalent circuit model is established to describe the characteristics of the device precisely. The simulation of the high frequency behavior is improved by introducing the series parasitic inductances into the cold pinch-off model. Through matrix transformation and equation derivation, the influence of Cpda and Cpga on parameter extraction is evaluated. It is proved that the error caused by Cpga and Cpda to the parameter extraction is less than 3%. Ignoring these influences can not only simplify parameter calculation, but also ensure its accuracy. The parasitic capacitances and parasitic inductances can be obtained simultaneously, improving the efficiency and the accuracy of parameter extraction. Meanwhile, accurate and ideal initial values are provided for the subsequent parameter optimization. Because of the accuracy of the initial values, parameter optimization eliminates the error caused by previous steps, and does not need multiple iterations, which improves the efficiency of the model parameter extraction. Compared with the traditional extraction method, the method in this letter can fast and accurately obtain the values of parameters. The simulated results show good agreement of scattering parameters up to 40 GHz.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis paper describes device simulation studies of surface and buffer trapping effects on static I-V, output-admittance (Y22), and transient characteristics of AlGaN/GaN HEMTs. The TCAD simulation model considering surface donors at EC − 0.5 eV and buffer traps at EC − 0.47 eV have been used to quantitatively reproduce the measured DC, Y22 frequency dispersion, gate-lag (GL) and drain-lag (DL) transients of AlGaN/GaN HEMT with 0.25 µm gate length. Moreover, simulated GL and DL transient responses of AlGaN/GaN HEMT with a longer gate length (0.5 µm) are validated with the reported experimental results. The impact of barrier trap at EC − 0.45 eV on the HEMT properties is also explored. It is shown that by matching simulation results with experimental data, it is possible to identify the trap (surface or buffer) responsible for a particular trapping induced degradation as well as its concentration and capture cross-section.© 2020 Elsevier LtdLead-free Ag-Bi-I rudorffite materials, such as Ag2BiI5, have gained ever-increasing attention as potential alternatives to lead halide perovskites for solar cell applications. However, nearly all of rudorffite solar cells are built with a mesoporous structure, which contain instable and expensive hole-transport-layers (HTLs) along with noble metal-electrodes. Herein, carbon-based, all-inorganic Ag2BiI5 rudorffite solar cell that is free of HTL and noble metal-electrode is reported for the first time. By improving the quality of Ag2BiI5 film with air blowing recipe, the solar cell with much enhanced efficiency of 0.71% is realized. In particular, it yields an open-circuit voltage (Voc) of 0.770 V, standing the highest value among Ag2BiI5 solar cells reported so far. Hence, our work opens the door for developing rudorffite solar cells with simplified fabrication procedures and low cost.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis work investigates the transient current in the subthreshold region of a low-temperature polycrystalline silicon thin-film transistor (LTPS TFT) on a polyimide (PI) substrate. The measurement of this current shows an instability that is not seen in the device on a glass substrate; the instability appears as a current variation under constant voltage and overshoot or undershoot under external stress voltage transitions. To explain this effect for a TFT on a PI substrate, a transient body effect (TBE) is suggested due to a threshold voltage shift caused by the charge distribution inside the substrate. A SPICE model is proposed based on this concept, and it shows excellent agreement with device measurements. The model offers a simulation guideline for LTPS TFTs on PI substrates.© 2021 Elsevier LtdHerein, we investigated the effect of organic solvent drop-casting and solvent vapour annealing (SVA) on the surface morphology of copper phthalocyanine (CuPc) and its effect on the transistor performance and contact resistance in organic field effect transistors (OFETs). Organic solvents: acetone and isopropyl alcohol (IPA) are used for drop-casting and SVA treatment of CuPc film. The morphology, crystallinity and optical properties of untreated and treated CuPc films are investigated through ultraviolet–visible (UV–Vis) absorption spectroscopy, X-ray diffraction (XRD) and atomic force microscopy (AFM). The results reveal that the crystallinity and grain size increases in CuPc film treated with SVA. Large grain size results less grain boundaries and forms better contact between source/drain (S/D) electrodes and organic layer. As a result, the SVA treated CuPc based OFETs shows one order increased charge carrier mobility and two order decreased contact resistance compared to that in untreated CuPc based OFET.© 2020 Elsevier LtdWe analyzed Incremental Step Pulse Programming (ISPP) slope degradation to improve the program efficiency of 3D NAND Flash memory using both measurement and simulation data. The simulation data are calibrated with the measurement data and they are in good agreement. The ISPP slope indicates program efficiency and its ideal value is 1. In reality, however, ISPP slope degradation (<1) occurs in the charge trap flash (CTF) memory and makes program speed slow. Two parameters affecting the ISPP slope degradation are quantitatively investigated: electron trap density (NT) and trap energy level (ET) of the charge trap nitride (CTN). There are optimal NT and ET fitted with 3D NAND Flash cell providing better program efficiency with lower retention loss. Detailed reasons are physically explained by observing the electron behaviors in various NT and ET values.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThe built-in bipolar junction transistor of H-gate partially depleted SOI NMOS was characterized by measuring the common-emitter output curve and calculating the common-emitter current gain. Unoptimized doping results in a low common-emitter current gain. The bias state of the front gate of the MOS has a significant influence on the characteristics of the built-in BJT. The geometry effect of the device is also studied. It is proved by mathematical analysis that the emitter current crowding effect also exists on the built-in BJT.© 2020 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the experimental investigation on the electrical properties of silicon-on-insulator lateral insulated-gate bipolar transistor (SOI-LIGBT) after total-ionizing-dose (TID) irradiation is presented. We find that the TID irradiation reduces the threshold voltage (Vth), and increases the collector current (ICE) at the same gate voltage (Vg). The raising ICE is mainly attributed to the negative shift of the Vth. However, at the same overdrive voltage (Vov = Vg − Vth), the ICE at small VCE increases and the ICE at high VCE decreases after irradiation. The distinctive response of the out-put characteristics after irradiation is ascribed to the positive trapped charges in the field oxide (FOX) layer and the buried oxide (BOX) layer. The inimitable out-put behavior occurs at whatever the sign of the gate bias voltage during irradiation. The degradation mechanisms of the TID effects on the SOI-LIGBT are further analyzed and confirmed by simulation.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this work we report on the integration of indium oxide (In2O3) nanoparticles (NPs) for Resistive Random Access Memory (RRAM) applications. This low-temperature integration process is fully compatible CMOS Back-End integration given a carefull selection of materials deposited by MOCVD and ALD. A detailed description of the process is provided together with AFM analysis performed on the indium oxide nanoparticles and TEM cross-sections on the whole stack. It is shown that the introduction of In2O3 NPs provides bipolar switching behavior together with promising electrical performances in terms of large OFF/ON resistance ratio (106) and retention time at room temperature.© 2020 Elsevier LtdWe report a comparative study of metamorphic InAs p-i-n photodetectors epitaxially grown on GaAs and Si by molecular beam epitaxy. Linearly graded InAlAs buffers were employed to bridge the high lattice mismatch between InAs and Si. Quantitative measurement for threading dislocation density (TDD) in the InAs layers grown on GaAs and Si has been performed using transmission electron microscopy and electron channeling contrast imaging, both of which revealed that the TDD of InAs/Si sample is ~35% higher than that of GaAs sample. Comparison of fabricated InAs p-i-n photodetectors indicated that reduction of threading dislocation density is crucial for low dark current and high responsivity mid-infrared photodetectors on Si.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates the potential of Barkhausen noise emission for characterisation of soft magnetic composites based on ferromagnetic powders and resin coating. The powder samples are investigated as a function of variable resin fraction, as well as particle size, by the use of Barkhausen noise and EBSD techniques. Magnetic domain wall's thickness and energy are calculated and the first constant of magneto-crystalline anisotropy is determined from magnetisation curves measured via a vibrating magnetometer. Moreover, the domain walls alignment is analysed and correlated with the Barkhausen noise signals and the extracted parameters. It was found that a reduced resin fraction, as well as increasing particle size of the ferromagnetic particles, contributes to the stronger Barkhausen noise emission. In this particular case, the Barkhausen noise emission strongly correlates with the coercive field whereas the correlation with hysteresis loss is weaker.© 2020 The AuthorsWe fabricated nanoparticles of Zn ferrite of the chemical formula ZnFe2O4 using the auto-combustion technique, and investigated their magnetic spin distribution and frequency response to optical excitation. Optical absorption and magnetic characterization of the nanoparticles were carried out in the UV–Vis and IR range, and extended on the low frequency side down to the THz domain. The nanoparticles were also characterized by X-ray diffraction and by magnetic force microscopy. The optical dielectric constant was calculated in both the UV–Vis and the THz domain. The optical bandgap, the dispersion energy and the oscillator strength of the nanoparticles were calculated from the optical data based on the single oscillator model. We measured the optical absorption, transmission and reflection spectra in the wavelength range from 200 to 800 nm, and calculated the refractive index, absorption and extinction coefficient. The optical band gap was found to be 1.14 eV and the oscillating energy of the dipole was determined to be 6.94 eV. The study shows that the coordination number of a metal complex and the symmetrical arrangement play an important role in determining the nanoparticle properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we investigate the longitudinal continuum spin conductivity of the spin-1 Heisenberg model with biquadratic interaction (the θ parameter controls the ratio of the biquadratic and exchange couplings). The calculations were performed for the model on square lattice in the Néel and ferroquadrupolar phases using spin wave theory and Schwinger boson formalism. In the antiferromagnetic phase that corresponds to range: -π<θ<0 or (sinθ<0), we use the Dyson-Maleev representation to calculate the spin conductivity at T=0 finding the AC spin conductivity diverging at DC limit, ω=0. Evidencing so, that the system is an ideal spin conductor in this limit. In the ferroquadrupolar phase (sinθ>0), we find a different behavior for the spin conductivity which changes abruptly from a scalar to a tensor in the Green-Kubo formula: 〈J〉=σ∇h, where σ is the conductivity, and also, in this case, a superconductor behavior for spin current at DC limit.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we applied machine learning (ML) to the materials processing of Sm-Fe-N magnetic powders produced by melt spinning. Neural Networks (NN) were used to generate ML models. Data were collected from relevant papers and patents, amounting to more than 800 data entries. These data were composed of chemical compositions, melt spinning process parameters and heat treatment parameters as the input layers, and magnetic properties as the output layers. ML models were developed by adjusting hyperparameters. Subsequently, agreement between the derived and actual values was found, and tended to reduce as the values moved further from the area with a large amount of data. The ML models were utilized to predict the properties of some test Sm-Fe-Co-N samples with Nb, Ti, or Zr additions. The predicted data were roughly in agreement with the actual data, except for the samples which had extrapolated data.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Different from the extensive progresses on two-dimensional (2D) intrinsic ferromagnets, modulation of magnetism in a 2D antiferromagnet is less explored. In this work, we investigate the impact of strain on magnetism of monolayer and bilayer FePS3 antiferromagnet using first-principles calculations. Our results show that zigzag antiferromagnetic (AFM) state is the ground state of monolayer FePS3 and the AFM order is very robust to strain. The in-plane and out-of-plane magnetic anisotropy energies (MAEs) of monolayer FePS3 are 0.31 and 1.41 meV/cell, and MAE is mainly provided by Fe atoms. Interestingly, compressive strain can enhance monotonically MAE of monolayer FePS3 while the MAE experiences a fall-rise-fall process under tensile strain. In addition, interlayer coupling of bilayer FePS3 is quite sensitive to strain and undergoes an AFM-FM-AFM transition under both tensile and compressive strain. The out-of-plane direction is also energetically favorable for unstrained bilayer FePS3 with in-plane and out-of-plane MAEs of 0.58 and 1.54 meV/cell, respectively. with the decrease of strain from 8% to −8%, the MAE of bilayer FePS3 can be enhanced except a small decrease at the strain of −8%. These findings are essential for applications of FePS3 based low-dimensional antiferromagnetic spintronic devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This study reports an electrically modulated dc and low frequency magnetic sensor with high sensitivity and wide bandwidth. It is based on multiferroic composites consisting of amorphous magnetic alloy Metglas/piezoelectric transformer (i.e., Pb(Zr,Ti)O3/Pb(Zr,Ti)O3)/Metglas layers winded with capacitor connected excitation coils and pickup coils. By electrically exciting the piezoelectric transformer winded with coils, the periodically induced stress and magnetic field modulate the magnetization of Metglas simultaneously and cause the change of magnetic flux within the pickup coils. The output voltage is further enhanced with the resonant converse magnetoelectric (CME) and mutual inductance effects at the mechanical and LC resonance frequency, respectively. Furthermore, the asymmetric wide bandwidth property of hybrid magnetic sensor provides the enhanced low frequency magnetic field sensitivity with negligible extra power consumption compared to the CME effect. When the magnetic sensors are excited with 5 V voltage at the resonance frequency and applied with 10 Hz magnetic field, the hybrid magnetic sensor achieves the maximum magnetic field sensitivity of 2.20 V/Oe and this is about 4.89 times as high as that of CME effect (0.45 V/Oe). The limit of detection for 10 Hz magnetic field is also noticeably improved from 2.97 nT for CME effect to 590pT for the hybrid magnetic sensor.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.La(Fe,Si)13 based magnetocaloric alloys have been implemented as regenerators in room-temperature cooling systems in search for environmental-friendly alternatives to conventional vapour-compression refrigeration. Unfortunately, their corrosion resistance in water related transfer fluids has as yet been insufficient, although various attempts were made, including optimizing elemental compositions, customizing heat transfer fluids, and surface coating. This work presents a simple electroless plating strategy to deposit continuous Ni-P layers on the La0.7Ce0.3Fe11.45Mn0.2Si1.35 hydride thin-plates sintered under a high pressure, affording super corrosion protection and simultaneous improvement of heat transfer ability. Upon deposition of 2–6 µm Ni-P layers possessing robust interfacial coupling with the substrate, a large magnetic entropy change of about 12 J/kg K under 0–2 T was retained at room temperature. More significantly, the charge transfer resistance in 3.5% NaCl solution was increased to 6–17 times and the corrosion current density was reduced to 5–7 times compared to the high-pressure sintered hydride bulk, accompanied by a simultaneous increase of thermal conductivity to about 2 times. The Ni-P layers consisting of columnar microstructure may facilitate relief of the local stress from the field-induced lattice expansion, thus improving cycling stability of the magnetic refrigerants.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we report our observation of an extraordinarily large value of magnetization in an annealed CoFe2O4/ZnFe2O4 bilayer. Sets of bilayers of CoFe2O4/ZnFe2O4 were deposited at ambient temperature, using pulsed laser deposition setup equipped with Nd: YAG laser, and subsequently annealed in air at different temperatures for 2 h. The highest attained value of magnetization was ≈7200 G at 300 K and ≈15000 G at 10 K for a bilayer with a 60 nm thickness tCo of CoFe2O4 and 40 nm thickness tZn of ZnFe2O4, annealed at 650 °C. This measured magnetization value is the highest for any oxide spinel reported thus far in the literature. The observed value is close to that of metallic Ni and cannot be explained by current theories of magnetism in oxides.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetoactive elastomers (MAEs) are field-controllable materials with magnetically switchable properties. The presence of an external magnetic field results in the change in the macroscopic shape of the MAE. The magnetic field also introduces a mechanical anisotropy with an axis of symmetry along the magnetic field. We aim to derive an effective material model which considers the initial shape of the MAE from the free energy of an isotropic MAE in the dipole approximation. Primarily, we consider uniaxial deformations parallel and perpendicular to the applied field direction. The stress–strain behaviour of the MAE yields direction-dependent tensile modulus. It indicates that the MAE behaves as a transversely isotropic material in the presence of an external magnetic field. Finally, we compare our predictions with the conventional transversely isotropic material model and find a good agreement. This comparison allows us to extract the dimensionless scaling parameter of a transversely isotropic MAE which characterizes the influence of the magnitude of a magnetic field as well as the initial shape of an MAE sample.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic interactions in iron nanoparticles embedded in an ytterbium metallic matrix have been systematically studied using several DC magnetic protocols (zero-field cooling ZFC and field-cooling FC). A transition from a superparamagnetic to a magnetically blocked regime was observed at 4.4 K associated with ultrafine (~1.8 nm3) iron particles. These iron nanoparticles have shown an enhanced effective anisotropy, Keff = 8.1(5) × 105 J m−3, however, no spin canting at their surfaces was observed, as suggested by the absence of exchange bias effect measured under FC protocol. Different magnetization experiments (temperature dependence of the thermo-remnant moment difference, ZFC-FC magnetic aging/memory protocols, Arrott plots) and phenomenological models applied to the magnetization data have shown that the iron nanoparticles have a narrow size distribution. Likewise, our results show that the ultra-fine iron nanoparticles are weakly interacting via the metallic ytterbium matrix by a magnetic exchange mechanism. This magnetic interaction leads the ensemble of iron nanoparticles to a cluster-glass-like state for temperatures below 5 K.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.For the first time, the cobalt doped nickel ferrite/carbon nano-fiber based nanocomposites are synthesized for radar and stealth applications. Initially, the CoxNi1−xFe2O4 with x = 0.0–0.4, nanoparticles are synthesized and then dispersed in the epoxy matrix to investigate their microwave absorption properties. Among all the synthesized nanocomposites, the CoxNi1−xFe2O4, x = 0.4 (55 wt% epoxy) nanocomposite exhibits maximum −10 dB absorption bandwidth of 1.4 GHz only for 10.3 mm thick sample. The synthesized nanocomposite is not suitable to be used for aforementioned application due to high thickness and low absorption bandwidth. To overcome this problem, carbon nanofiber (CNF ~ 1, 2 and 3 wt% epoxy) is added to the earlier synthesized ferrite epoxy system. The nanocomposite sample consisting of CoxNi1−xFe2O4, x = 0.4 (55 wt% epoxy) and CNF (2 wt% epoxy) shows enhanced absorption bandwidth of 3.23 GHz at a very low thickness of 1.6 mm. The addition of CNF into the ferrite system thus substantially enhanced the microwave absorption properties of the resultant nanocomposite, suitable for the radar and stealth applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A Fe79Mo10B10Cu1 nanocomposite alloy was prepared by rapid solidification processing and subsequent isothermal annealing of ribbons with 6 nm, α-Fe grains embedded in an amorphous matrix. The nanocrystalline alloy was then nitrided in a gas mixture of ammonia and hydrogen at 650 and 700 °C for varied time between 300 and 7200 s followed by quenching. A majority (~55 vol%) of nitrogen austenite γ-(Fe,N) with a grain size of ~20 nm was produced when nitriding conditions were at a temperature of 700 °C in 12% NH3–88% H2 for 3600 s. The nitrided alloy has a magnetization of 50 ± 20 A·m2/kg at an applied field of 1.19 MA/m. Retained α-Fe, the only ferromagnetic phase in the sample, is responsible for the magnetization. And paramagnetic phases of γ-(Fe,N) and η-Fe3Mo3N account for ~80% of the material by volume. After the high-temperature nitridation, the alloy was soaked in liquid nitrogen and then tempered at 117 °C. Nanostructured iron-nitrogen martensite (α′) was transformed from the nitrogen austenite phase in the nitrided Fe79Mo10B10Cu1 alloy, and was characterized to have an amount of ~20 vol% and a grain size of ~12 nm. This iron-nitrogen martensite nanocomposite has a magnetization of 65 ± 8 A m2/kg at an applied field of 1.19 MA/m and coercivity of 14 ± 6 kA/m.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents the preparation and characterization of Polydimethylsiloxane (PDMS) composites with Carbon encapsulated iron nano particles (CEFeNPs). The mutual interactions between the CEFeNPs and PDMS were studied by Raman Spectroscopy and Scanning electron microscopy. Structural characterization on the flexible composite films and CEFeNPs was carried out using X-ray diffractometer. Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) revealed the structure of CEFeNPs, with an iron core enveloped by 5 nm thick layer of graphitic carbon. The main goal of this work was to investigate the influence of temperature on magnetic properties of composites by applying a magnetic field ranging from −1.5 to 1.5 Tesla at 10 K, 100 K and 300 K. The saturation magnetization, retentivity, coercivity and squareness ratio found to improve with increase in filler loading and by lowering temperature. For 50 wt% composite of 250 μm thickness, the electromagnetic interference shielding effectiveness (EMI SE) is found to be 21.925 dB at 8 GHz. The shielding performance of cured composites enhanced by increasing the thickness of the sample and for 1.5 mm thick film of 50 wt%, an EMI SE of 27.1 dB was obtained at 8 GHz.© 2020The effects of severe plastic deformation (SPD) by means of high pressure torsion (HPT) on the soft magnetic properties of the iron-based metallic glass Fe73.9Cu1Nb3Si15.5B6.6 are investigated. With this procedure, it has been possible for the first time to consolidate and deform this high-strength material with a minimum of cracks. X-ray diffraction, differential mechanical and differential scanning analyses, as well as optical and scanning electron microscopy were carried out for characterization of crystallization phenomena and crack formation. For magnetic properties, minor loop hysteresis measurements were done because of their high sensitivity for magnetic structures. Significant influences of HPT-processing on the coercivity as well as on magnetic anisotropy are found and discussed in detail.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper describes proof-of-concept for antileukemia treatment based on the reactive oxygen species (ROS) induction supplemented with magnetic nanoparticles in the presence of moderate-intensity magnetic fields. The T-lymphoblastic leukemia cell line (Jurkat) was chosen as an in vitro model of acute lymphoblastic leukemia. The elevated ROS levels were generated by iron oxide magnetic nanoparticles. We found an enhanced cytotoxic effect of magnetic nanoparticles in the presence of a magnetic field on cancerous Jurkat cell line due to induced oxidative stress after cultivation in magnetic fields with an average strength of 0.26–0.36 T and the field spatial gradient up to 100 T/m. At the same conditions of nanoparticles intake, the viability of human peripheral blood mononuclear cells (model of healthy cells) was not inhibited. Thus, we demonstrated the feasibility of antileukemia treatment by magnetic nanoparticles controlled by a magnetic field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Amorphous Fe76-xNixCr4(SiB)20 (x = 12 and 25) ribbons were prepared using melt spinning technique. Their structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties were investigated using X-ray diffraction, vibrating sample magnetometer, and Mössbauer spectrometry. The samples were found to be amorphous. Room Mössbauer measurements ensured the amorphous state of Fe76-xNixCr4(SiB)20 ribbons and get further information about the effect of Ni content in the hyperfine parameters. The magnetic transition was analyzed in terms of Landau theory around the transition temperature. The amorphous alloys exhibit a second order transition from ferromagnetic to paramagnetic phase. With increasing Ni concentration, the Curie temperature decreases as well as the maximum entropy change(-ΔSmmax) and relative cooling power (RCP). In addition, a phenomenological model was used to predict reasonably the magnetocaloric parameters.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the current production of iron and steel industry, the testing of mechanical properties of ferromagnetic materials relies on tensile testing, which is time-consuming and destructive, thus greatly increasing the production cost. In order to solve this problem, a method based on pulsed eddy current is proposed to estimate the yield strength of ferromagnetic materials. Eddy current loss and hysteresis loss are the sources of loss in the magnetization process of ferromagnetic materials. Not only the loss but also the yield strength of the material is related to the microstructure of the magnetized material. In this paper, the relationship between loss in the process of magnetization and microstructure of materials is analyzed. The features of eddy current loss and hysteresis loss were found from the pulsed eddy current signals, and the yield strength evaluation model was established by feature fitting. The experimental results show that the model has high evaluation accuracy.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The results of the longitudinal and Hall magnetoresistivity measurements in the Shubnikov - de Haas oscillation regime for the HgCdTe/HgTe/HgCdTe heterostructures with a wide (20.3 nm) HgTe quantum well are presented. An anomalous phase shift of magneto-oscillations is detected in the region of spin-unsplit peaks in contradiction with a conventional situation in 2D systems. It is shown that the observed features are associated with the inverted nature of the spectrum in the size-quantized H1 subband of the investigated HgTe quantum well. The results obtained are compared with the phase shift effects of both the magneto-oscillations and plateaus of the quantum Hall effect in monolayer graphene and in semimagnetic HgMnTe quantum wells.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work we analyze the effects of the application of an external electric field in the formation of a local magnetic moment in silicene. By adding an impurity in a top site in the host lattice and computing the real and imaginary part of the self-energy of the impurity energy level, the polarized density of states is used in order to obtain the occupation number of the up and down spin formation in the impurity considering the mean field approximation. Unequal occupation numbers is the precursor of a formation of a local magnetic moment and this depends critically on the Hubbard parameter, the on-site energy of the impurity, the spin-orbit interaction in silicene and the electric field applied. In particular, it is shown that in the absence of electric field, the boundary between the magnetic and non-magnetic phases increases with the spin-orbit interaction with respect to graphene with a top site impurity and shrinks and narrows it when the electric field is turned on. The electric field effect is studied for negative and positive on-site impurity energies generalizing the results obtained in the literature for graphene.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Chirality and current-driven dynamics of topologically nontrivial 360° domain walls (360DWs) in magnetic heterostructures (MHs) are systematically investigated. For MHs with normal substrates, the static 360DWs are Néel-type with no chirality. While for those with heavy-metal substrates, the interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (iDMI) therein makes 360DWs prefer specific chirality. Under in-plane driving charge currents, as the direct result of “full-circle” topology a certain 360DW does not undergo the “Walker breakdown”-type process like a well-studied 180° domain wall as the current density increases. Alternatively, it keeps a fixed propagating mode (either steady-flow or precessional-flow, depending on the effective damping constant of the MH) until it collapses or changes to other types of solition when the current density becomes too high. For both modes, modifications to the mobility of 360DWs by iDMI and spin–orbit torque are provided.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetite (Fe3O4) nanoparticles coated with organic material are of considerable importance in various areas of engineering, as well as in biomedicine. Several papers show drastic changes in the magnetic properties related to the surface effects and the particle-particle interactions strength. However, there is no consensus about the origin or mechanisms that produce these changes, which could be different depending on the particle size and shape, coating efficiency and particle-particle interaction strength. Aiming to shed light on these issues, oleic acid (OA) coated Fe3O4 nanoparticles with different sizes were synthesized by a thermal decomposition method. Structural and microscopic results revealed Fe3O4 nanoparticles with good crystallinity and almost-spherical or polyhedral shapes depending on the solvent used for the synthesis. Infrared (FTIR) spectroscopy indicated OA molecules attached to the surface of Fe3O4 NPs via bidentate (chelating and/or bridging) bonds; meanwhile, thermogravimetric analysis confirmed the presence of weakly and strongly bonded OA molecules, suggesting a successful coating of Fe3O4 NPs. Magnetization (M) vs. magnetic field (H) curves are consistent with a core/shell structure formed by magnetite/defective magnetite (maghemite) phases, in consistency with FTIR spectroscopy. It was determined lower saturation magnetization values than that expected for bulk magnetite, which was assigned to the likely presence of a fraction of iron ions in low-spin (LS) states in the defective magnetite (maghemite) layer at the particles surface. The magnetic results evidence that depending on the amount of OA coating, it is possible to tune the particle-particle separation distance, avoid particles agglomeration and particle-particle interactions. The temperature dependence of magnetization reveals the presence of non-interacting and interacting NPs. Meanwhile, AC magnetic susceptibility measurements are consistent with those results and provide features related to superparamagnetic (SPM) behavior, assigned to the non-interacting NPs, and interacting SPM behavior, assigned to the interacting NPs, whose interaction strength is not enough to lead to a spin-glass like behavior.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Nickel-iron nanoparticles are magnetic and reactive. Both properties depend on the relative concentration of nickel and iron, which noticeably affects certain catalytic reactions among other applications. Density Functional Theory calculations, in the generalized gradient approximation to exchange and correlation, were conducted for neutral and charged Ni13-xFex nanoalloys with the aim of obtaining, from a first principles perspective, a better understanding of how the atomic structure, chemical order, magnetic properties, and reactivity depend on the composition and charge state. The atomic and electronic structures were determined without symmetry constraints for low-energy isomers with an exhaustive scan of the structural, homotopic, and spin degrees of freedom. The relative stability was analyzed in terms of the excess energy and the second difference in energy; the global reactivity was assessed by means of DFT indicators like the electronegativity and chemical hardness; local reactivity within each nanoalloy was characterized through the condensed Fukui functions. Finally, the first stage of oxidation is explored for the most and less reactive of the investigated nanoalloys.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.To precisely position the main energy dissipation sources in ferrite/piezoelectric ME-coil gyrators, the dynamic magneto-mechanical-electric conversion process was disentangled quantitatively by employing a non-contact optical measurement methodology. For the sample fabrication, successful crystallization as well as desired magnetic properties for sintered spinel ferrites was confirmed by XRD and SQUIDs measurements. Trapped magnetic energies in ferrites will convert into kinetic energies accompanying indispensable dissipations in this dynamic process, and the converted kinetic energies can be measured quantitatively in the form of vibrating velocity by focused laser beam. As a result, only ~71% of mechanical energies can be transferred successfully to next layer due to the influence of adhesive in tri-layer sample while the value is 57% for bi-layer one. Finally, comparative studies of low-frequency/resonance ME interactions and power conversion efficiency in tri-layer and bi-layer samples were measured, and an eventual maximum PE of 80.3% under optimum load of 3.5 kΩ was achieved. We infer from the results that the mechanical loss between layers is still a bottleneck to block the efficient energy transfer. These findings provide a deep analysis to reveal the dynamic energy transfer in ME-coil gyrators as well as a flexible pathway for ME gyrators design.© 2020 The Author(s)In this article, we estimate numerical values of a complex permeability and an electrical resistivity of soft magnetic composite (SMC) material particles. The estimations are carried out against a measured loss curve and a measured effective dynamical permeability curve. The SMC material is imitated using automatically generated geometries with control over the scalings of the geometries as well as the thicknesses of the electrical insulations between individual particles. The estimation procedure is repeated for a wide range of insulation thicknesses and scalings. Consistency with the measured effective dynamical permeability suggests the estimated relative permeability of the particles to be of the order of hundreds. An estimate of 250–500 is found. If the scalings of the geometries are chosen using a microscope image of the SMC material as a reference, the estimated resistivity of the particles is of the order of 10-7 Ωm.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report the results of systematic measurements of first-order reversal curves (FORCs) for magnetite (Fe3O4) mesocrystals during the reaction process, where small nanoparticles, all with the same crystallographic orientation, form a cluster, and as the reaction time increases, grow in size. The FORC distribution exhibits a single peak in the FORC diagram, whose position gradually shifts toward a higher coercivity as the reaction time increases, which is associated with the broadening of the peak along both the coercivity and local interaction field axes. In addition, the FORC distribution peak is slightly displaced toward a negative local interaction field. These observations suggest the magnetic hardening and the presence of a positive (magnetizing) mean field acting on an individual nanoparticle from the surrounding nanoparticles within a mesocrystal. As the reaction time is further increased, nanoparticles constituting a mesocrystal split into porous nanoparticles, which is associated with a further shift of the FORC peak toward a higher coercivity. The present study demonstrates that FORCs can be a powerful tool for monitoring the morphology evolution of magnetic mesocrystals composed of small nanoparticles.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In former papers on magnetostriction, systems with position-independent magnetization have been considered. In such systems there are elastic (magnetostrictive) strains. In the present paper, systems with position-dependent magnetization are discussed. In these systems there are in addition to the elastic strains also local rotations of the structure. The well-established theory of magnetostriction in systems with position-independent magnetizations is thus extended to systems with position-dependent magnetization.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.By gradually substituting Al for In in Gd2In1−xAlx (0.4 ≤ x ≤ 1) system, the hexagonal structure for Gd2In1−xAlx (x ≤ 0.6) is gradually evolved into orthorhombic one for x ≥ 0.7. The phase transition temperature is monotonously decreased. At the critical composition of x = 0.7, the second-order phase transformation in hexagonal Gd2In1−xAlx (x ≤ 0.6) is evolved into the first-order-like metamagnetic one without conventional hysteresis in orthorhombic Gd2In1−xAlx (x ≥ 0.7), leading into the enhanced magnetic entropy change and adiabatic temperature change. A lambda-like anomaly on the Cp-T curves is also caused. Due to being close to the phase borderline separating hexagonal and orthorhombic structure, such enhanced magnetocaloric effect is considered to be from the greatly distorted lattice.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The influence of the soft and hard magnetic layers thickness on reversal magnetization process of the hard/soft magnetic bilayer in an external magnetic field has been studied using Monte Carlo method. It is shown the critical value of the magnetization reversal field Hirr doesn't change with a decrease in the hard magnetic layer thickness up to 20 atomic monolayers. Phase diagrams of the magnetic bilayer have been plotted. The results have been shown to compare with experimental and theoretical data.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Nano aluminum (Al)-coated carbonyl iron particles (CIPs) with high microwave absorption capacity and heat-resistance property were prepared by ball-milling. To test the performance of Al@CIPs, raw CIPs were also processed under the same ball-milling process for comparison. Afterwards, both materials were subjected to the same heat treatment process in order to examine their heat resistance. The morphology, structure, electromagnetic and microwave absorption properties were evaluated by scanning electron microscopy (SEM), energy dispersive spectroscopy (EDS), X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS), X-ray diffraction (XRD), and vector network analysis, respectively. The bond properties of CIPs- or Al@CIPs-based coatings were determined through pull-out test. Morphological and structural analysis results indicated that Al nanoparticles were homogeneously distributed on the surface of CIPs. Compared with raw CIPs, Al@CIPs composites had the better oxidation resistance. The significant improvement in the antioxidation capacity was mainly attributed to the compact and dense alumina layer formed at the higher temperature, which further prevented oxygen in the air from entering the CIPs core. The ball-milling method proposed in the study can uniformly coat Al on the surface of CIPs in a simple and effective way and provide an efficient way to prepare antioxidized CIPs as microwave absorption materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Hofmann-type organometallic frameworks are well known for their porous crystal structure, exhibiting interesting electronic, optical, and magnetic properties, and are therefore considered as promising materials for various technological applications. Here, using density functional theory+U (DFT+U) calculations, we investigate the spin-state transition in a newly synthesized Hofmann clathrate, namely the Fe{OS(CH3)2}2{Ag(CN)2}2 complex, by applying hydrostatic pressure as an external perturbation. Our study reveals that under a relatively low isotropic hydrostatic pressure, the complex exhibits a reversible spin switching, whereas it undergoes a structural phase transition when the pressure is larger and anisotropic. The spin state of the Fe atom in the Hofmann clathrate complex transforms from high spin to intermediate spin state under anisotropic compression of the lattice parameters. The coordination polymer complex remains a magnetic semiconductor after the pressure-driven structural transformation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Here we present the continuation of the approach developed in our previous work [1] taking another lanthanide metal – Dy – as an example. The rich set of the experimental data which includes data on magnetization (field and temperature dependencies), magnetic susceptibility, heat capacity, magnetocaloric effect and, finally, the critical field dependence on temperature (phase diagram) allows performing the thorough comparison of experimental and modeling results within the molecular field method. An effective field used in the calculations takes a six-fold temperature dependent anisotropy energy, first and second neighbor exchange and Zeeman energy into account. Such an approach allows not only to underline the common trends for the whole lanthanide series taking Tb, Ho and Dy (in this paper) as examples but also partly eliminate the limitations of ab initio calculation in case of 4f elements.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Finite element micromagnetics are used to simulate the vortex and onion states on permalloy spherical shells with different curvatures. To distinguish between the effects of size and curvature (covaried in the typical semi-spherical or crescent shaped caps) a family of spherical sectors where the volume is varied at constant curvature is considered. This family is parametrized by intersecting cone angle. Permalloy is chosen as a typical case of an easy-surface magnet in which the demagnetization field bounds the magnetization to follow the curvature of the surface. The thickness of the shell is set to 3 nm, i.e. comparable to the exchange length, so that the local magnetization does not vary along the thickness of the shell. It is found that as the curvature increases the vortex states become favorable down to smaller sizes. This is mainly due to the increased exchange energy cost of the onion states at larger curvatures. Furthermore, it is found that at larger curvatures, stronger in-plane fields are required to destabilize the vortex states and turn them into onion states.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A micro-inductor has been fabricated on silicon substrate using a Micro-Electromechanical Systems (MEMS) process. The micro-inductor has a single layer copper winding sandwiched between two layers of electroplated NiFe core. It has a footprint area of 2.9 mm2, an inductance of 204 nH at 21.7 MHz, a DC resistance of 470 mΩ, and a peak quality factor of 9.23 at 9.2 MHz. The micro-inductor has been applied in a buck converter and achieved a maximum converter efficiency of 81.74% at 20 MHz. The performance of the micro-inductor has also been compared with an air-core inductor embedded in PCB. The air core inductor has a similar inductance of 220 nH, but with a large footprint area of 32 mm2. The maximum buck converter efficiency is 85.47% when the air core inductor is applied.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The commercial Nd-Fe-B (Magnequentch MQU-F42) powder was consolidated by hydrostatic extrusion at room temperature in three stages. The values of thru strain obtained after the stages, were 1.38, 2.27, 3.12. A high degree of deformation leads to local changes occurring in the microstructure of the material that negatively affects its magnetic properties. Mossbauer spectroscopy has shown that a new phase appears in the deformed material, most probably as a result of strong local defecting (amorphization) of the Nd2Fe14B phase. Rietveld analysis of the diffraction phase investigation results indicates that deformation leads to a clear fragmentation of the material grain and to the deformation (change of parameters) of the crystal lattice. The heating of deformed materials leads to a series of irreversible transformations that start at a temperature of about 200 °C. As a result, α-Fe is produced from the defected phase in the form of 3 nm crystallites. The release of free Fe changes the chemical composition of the 'defected phase', making it impossible for it to revert to the structure prior to deformation. It can be concluded that the structural changes occurring in Nd-Fe-B powders during severe deformation are irreversible and involve a permanent reduction in the magnetic properties of the material.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this study, magnetic properties and microstructure of L10 MnGa thin films deposited at different substrate temperatures (Ts) were carried out in order to determine the onset of the hard magnetic MnGa phase onto glass substrate. The thickness of MnGa thin film was kept at 200 nm while the Ts was varied from room temperature (RT) to 600 °C. When the Ts was below 300 °C, only Mn phases with small grain size were observable. However, the further increase in Ts to 325 °C led to the appearance of L10 (1 1 1) peak indicating the presence of the hard magnetic phase in the film on the glass substrate. Also, the continuous rise in Ts enhanced the magnetic properties such as saturation magnetization (Ms) and coercivity (Hc). The crystal size of L10 MnGa phase and surface roughness of the film were also increased with the increase of Ts. The selected area diffraction pattern (SADP) of Transition Electron Microscopy (TEM) effectively identified that the coexistence of pure Mn and A1 MnGa phases were present at Ts < 300 °C and that the L10 MnGa started to appear at Ts = 325 °C while the completion of L10 MnGa phase was seen at Ts > 400 °C. The High-Resolution TEM (HRTEM) images revealed the lattice and amorphous regions present in the MnGa thin film at Ts = 325 °C. Nevertheless, an increase of Ts to 600 °C presented a wide range of L10 (1 1 1) lattice signifying the thin film is still in MnGa phase. The onset of hard magnetic L10 MnGa phase is found out to be at 325 °C.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties, Mössbauer and the critical behavior of the compound Bi0.8Ba0.1Er0.1Fe0.96Cr0.02Co0.02O3 prepared by sol-gel are the subject of this study. The compound has an R3c structure and exhibits a ferromagnetic to paramagnetic phase transition c.a. 574 K. A theoretical adjustment of the hysteresis cycles at room temperature show two magnetic contributions: Ferromagnetic (FM) and Antiferromagnetic (AFM) with a predominance of the first contribution. Mössbauer spectroscopy revealed two Fe3+ cations differently coordinated. Magnetic measurements versus magnetic field reveal that the sample exhibits a second order magnetic phase transition. The Curie temperature ​​and the critical exponents (β, γ and δ) were determined by different techniques. These values are in agreement with the ones predicted by the mean field model.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The communication concentrates on the possibility of developing a composition suitable for high-frequency operation as a magnetic core through an extensive understanding of the cation distribution of cobalt ferrite containing cadmium. The samples having a composition, Co1-xCdxFe2O4, were processed by the sol–gel method using polyvinyl alcohol (PVA) as a chelating agent and characterized by standard techniques. Substantial growth in specific saturation magnetization from 82.2 emu/g to 99 emu/g and DC resistivity from 1.54 × 106 Ω-cm to 1.34 × 1011 Ω-cm, requisite characteristics for high-frequency application were provided with increasing concentration of cadmium. The average crystallite size ranging from 5.7 nm to 17 nm has been estimated by X-ray diffraction patterns using Williamson-Hall analysis. The proposed cation distribution based on saturation magnetization data established the amount of cadmium occupying the tetrahedral sites of spinel lattice, which was well supported by the variation of DC resistivity with cadmium. The unparalleled matching between the experimentally observed lattice constant and that provided by the proposed cation distribution as well as Rietveld refinement confirms the amounts of cadmium entering tetrahedral and octahedral sites of the spinel lattice. All the samples of cadmium substituted cobalt ferrite assure their suitability for high frequency application with the pertinent properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This work reports on room-temperature ferromagnetism of pyrolytic oxidized-graphene nanoplatelets obtained from bamboo pyroligneous acid by varying the density of extended defects. Topographic defects, created during the fabrication process, arise from a natural formation of clusters; such clusters drastically distort the graphitic basal plane, giving rise to abrupt surface curvatures. Topographic defects were found to be sources of the magnetic signal, as evidenced by bulk magnetization and magnetic force microscopy measurements. Increased defect density, tuned by carbonization temperature, results in enhanced magnetization.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A large magnetic field induced strain is indicative of an ideal ferromagnetic shape memory alloy. To achieve high strain values melt-spun ribbons of NiMnGa based Heusler alloy were prepared and annealed at different temperatures over different time periods. Thermal analysis was done to obtain the transformation temperatures of the annealed ribbons. Besides the magnetic measurements, magnetic field induced strains were measured using strain gauges and strain indicator. The dependence of magnetic moment on the angle of alignment of the sample surface with respect to the field direction has been reported. The transformation temperatures were closer to the room temperature in all the ribbons with an incremental dependence on the annealing temperature and annealing time. The martensitic transformation temperatures obtained from the thermomagnetic curves were almost similar to those obtained from thermal analysis. There was an improvement in the saturation magnetization values after annealing whereas the Curie temperature was roughly similar for all the specimens. Presence of precipitates along the grain boundaries had no significant role to play in determining the properties. The annealed ribbons showed higher magnetic field induced strain (MFIS) than the as-spun ribbons; ribbon prepared at 1300 RPM and subsequently annealed at 900 °C for 5 h showed the highest value of MFIS ~0.15%. From the texture analysis, fraction of 〈0 0 1〉 oriented grains decreased and that of 〈1 1 0〉 increased with the progression of angle of alignment from 0° to 90°. Hence, the moment was higher when the angle of alignment was 90° in the annealed specimens.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effects of Al, Sn and Zn nano-powders doping on the magnetic properties and microstructure of sintered NdFeB was investigated. The separate doping of Al and Zn can improve the coercivity (Hcj). Al and Zn powder co-doping at 0.6 wt% resulted in an increase in magnetic remanence (Br) and coercivity in 0.68 kGs and 1.04 kOe, respectively. Al-Zn co-doping can form a low-melting-point phase in the magnet, which enhanced the wettability between the grain boundary phase and the main phase and improved the rare-earth(RE)-rich phase ratio significantly. The structure and distribution of the RE-rich phase changed from clustering at the triangular grain boundary to thin and continuous distribution along with the crystal, which suppressed the demagnetization coupling between the hard magnetic phase and enhanced the coercivity. Although low-melting-point Sn doping can form a low-melting-point phase, the poor wettability between the main phase lead to RE-rich phase agglomerate formation at the triangular grain boundary, a deterioration in continuity of the grain boundary and a decrease in the remanence and coercivity.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Rare-earth based garnet system, Ho3Fe5O12 shows magnetization compensation phenomenon at Tcomp = 138 K and a magnetic transition at 50 K. In the present work, we reveal the physics of these low temperature magnetic transitions by carrying out detailed dc magnetization, ac susceptibility, neutron depolarization, and neutron diffraction studies. Interestingly, our dc magnetization study under low (≲ 50 Oe) magnetic fields has shown a previously unknown sign reversal of magnetization (below the Tcomp) that persists down to 5 K, the lowest measured temperature. Magnetic measurements under moderate fields between 50 Oe and 1 kOe reveal two compensation temperatures (in the range of 105 – 150 K depending upon the applied field value) leading to double magnetization reversals. Interestingly, for magnetic fields ≥ 1 kOe, these two compensation temperatures merge to a single Tcomp (=138 K). A modified Stoner-Wohlfarth model has been used to explain the asymmetrical nature of double peak around the Tcomp in the temperature dependent coercivity data. The ac susceptibility study supports the existence of both the transitions with an evidence of deep minimum at the Tcomp (138 K) and a broad peak at 50 K. Mesoscopic neutron depolarization study has revealed a zero domain-magnetization state at the Tcomp. Temperature dependent neutron diffraction study has revealed that Ho carries an induced moment above the Tcomp due to polarizing effect under the internal magnetic field of the two magnetically ordered Fe sublattices at 567 K, whereas a single umbrella type ordering of Ho sublattice moments appears below the Tcomp, resulting in the distortion of magnetic unit cell from cubic to rhombohedral symmetry. However, below 50 K, Ho3+ sites are divided into two inequivalent magnetic sublattices, having different moments and canting angles, and it leads to double umbrella type magnetic structure. Neutron diffraction study has revealed an asymmetric variation of the tetrahedral, octahedral, and dodecahedral sublattice moments resulting in a magnetization reversal at ~ 138 K which is very well supported by the mean field theory calculations. In the present study, we have resolved the ambiguity of magnetic ordering of the rare-earth (Ho3+) sublattice and its role in multiple magnetic transitions. The utility of such compensated ferrimagnetic materials in spin polarizers/analyzers and fast switching memory devices has been emphasized.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Low dimensional antiferromagnetic systems, such as nanoparticles, are known to exhibit weak ferromagnetic behavior due to the uncompensated surface spins. In this report, we present a detailed magnetic study of LaFeO3/NiO nanocomposite, synthesized by propylene glycol gel method. The X-ray diffraction (XRD) based analyses, in combination with transmission electron microscopy (TEM), confirms 50:50 ratio composite with ~35–40 nm size particles. Owing to the high Néel temperatures (TN) of LaFeO3 and NiO, significant exchange bias (EB) and vertical magnetization shift (VMS) have been observed in the nanocomposite at room temperature. These features are attributed to the exchange interaction at the interface between the core and shell of the nanoparticles that are homogeneously dispersed in the nanocomposite. In our studies, the EB field and the VMS attains a value as high as 2050 Oe & 1.8 × 10-1 emu/g at 5 K and 75 Oe & 1.7 × 10-2 emu/g at 300 K, respectively. The thermoremanent magnetization (TRM) and isothermoremanent magnetization (IRM) analyses are done to identify the two-dimensional (2D) diluted antiferromagnet (DAFF) behavior of the surface shell of nanoparticles. We propose a phenomenological antiferromagnetic-(2D-DAFF)-antiferromagnetic magnetic structure model, to explain all the rich features and the observed magnetic properties of this nanocomposite.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Nanocomposite permanent magnets can achieve excellent magnetic properties due to the hardening of a soft phase by hard phase within the length of exchange coupling. The performance of exchange coupling nanocomposite magnets can be optimized through the design of appropriate microstructure by micromagnetic modeling. In this study, we performed a micromagnetic simulation for isotropic exchange coupling nanocomposite Nd2Fe14B/α-Fe permanent magnet in which grain sizes and volume fractions of magnetically hard Nd2Fe14B phase and soft α-Fe phase vary independently, ranging in grain size from 5 nm to 40 nm and in the volume fraction of α-Fe from 10% to 60%. When the grain size of the hard phase is 5 nm, and that of the soft phase is 10 nm, respectively, with the volume fraction of the soft phase of 30%, the highest (BH)max of 197 kJ/m3 can be reached. Furthermore, considering the effects of the grain sizes of the hard and soft phases, we suggest that the grain size of the hard phase plays a more critical role in enhancing maximum energy product (BH)max. The micromagnetic modeling with the variation of grain size and volume faction has been performed with a grain boundary (GB) phase. It was found that when the thickness of the GB phase is very small (~1nm), there is little difference between the simulated results with the GB phase and without GB phase. On the other hand, the coercivities and (BH)max decrease significantly due to the increase of soft phase when the thickness of GB phase is 5 nm.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Double perovskite Sr2FeMoO6 (SFMO) is proposed from calculations within density functional theory (DFT) using full potential linearized augmented plane wave (FP-LAPW) combined and Monte Carlo Simulation. The ground state structure exhibits significantly high magnitude bulk modulus placing Sr2FeMoO6 in the range of hard materials. In this case, it is best to verify this by calculating the set of elastic constants and its derivatives. The magnetic susceptibility and specific heat vs. temperature of double Sr2FeMoO6 perovskites are obtained for several magnetic field. The transition temperature of the system is deduced. The thermal specific heat change ΔCP for double Sr2FeMoO6 perovskite is given for several magnetic field. The Arrott plots given M2 vs. H/M are plotted. We deduced that our system exhibits a second order magnetic phase transition in the vicinity of transition temperature.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic fields can alter the growth of nanomaterials and, in some cases, ultimately lead to room temperature ferromagnetism (RTF). One promising approach for the growth of nanomaterials is thermal oxidation with both academic and industrial relevance. In this study, we evaluate the growth of copper oxide (CuO) nanowires by thermal oxidation method in a furnace adapted with a static magnetic field (generated by neodymium magnets) upon a pure copper foil in which the direction of a vector perpendicular to the surface of the foil (the direction of nanowires growth) is parallel or antiparallel to the magnetic field direction. Technical analysis including XRD, FESEM and EDAX are performed to provide insight into the CuO nanowire microstructure. To this end, we have made use of statistical surface characteristics such as fractal, autocorrelation and texture aspect ratio analysis demonstrating a correlation between the aforementioned characteristics and the magnetic field orientation. Additionally, VSM studies show the emergence of room temperature ferromagnetism for CuO nanowires grown parallel and antiparallel to the magnetic field. We expect that our approach will open up a new angle on room temperature ferromagnetism for novel fundamental and applied studies.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The analytical theory of density of states (DOS) in three-dimensional quantum magnets with the bond disorder is proposed based on the self-consistent T-matrix approximation (SCTMA). It successfully describes the DOS both for resonant and non-resonant scattering, whose emergence is governed by the ratio of scattering length and the average distance between impurities, which concentration is denoted as c. Corrections to the quasiparticle band gap in these cases are shown to scale as c2/3 and c, respectively. Moreover, the theory yields a semi-circle form of the DOS for the bound states inside the gap, which results in highly nontrivial DOS in the intermediate parameter region between the two limiting cases when the band DOS and the semi-circle overlap. Long-wavelength excitations are discussed. In the resonant regime their damping scales as c2/3, which, according to Ioffe-Regel criterion, corresponds to their localization. Applicability of the theory is illustrated by its quantitative agreement with the recent experimental data on spin-dimer system Ba3−xSrxCr2O8.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Chemical synthesis of crystalline and nanoscale cobalt-iron metal boride powders was studied using hydrous metal chlorides and NaBH4. The effects of precursor concentration and optimized synthesis conditions on the phase formation, microstructure, and magnetic properties were investigated. After applying a reaction of CoCl2·6H2O-FeCl3·6H2O-NaBH4 at 850 °C, (CoFe)B2, (CoFe)B, Co2B, Fe3B, and Fe0.71Co0.29 boride phases were obtained from different synthesis conditions applied under autogenic pressure or Ar flow atmosphere. Oxychloride impurities were the reason for the reduced magnetization values. The highest saturation magnetization of 183 emu/g belongs to obtained nanoparticles containing (CoFe)B2 and (CoFe)B pure phases. High temperature magnetic measurements marked synthesized powders as soft magnetic materials up to 795 K while no Tc was reached for the obtained phases.© 2020We report on experiments in a model blood vessel of miscible ferrofluid regions held in place by permanent magnets of different strengths and subject to pulsatile flow at various Womersely numbers of O(10). Using image analysis, we quantify the dependence of ferrofluid volume loss, or “wash away,” rate due to hydrodynamic processes, identifying two distinct regimes. Complementary PIV allows visualization of the flow fields that correlate with volume loss, suggesting that volume loss may be a complex combination of vortex shedding during the primary pulse and re-combination during quiescent phase.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of N-ion implanted GaN films (150 nm) have been reported. It is found that GaN films grown by the MOCVD technique show strong room temperature ferromagnetic behavior, which can be tuned by implanting N-ions at different fluences (1 × 1015 to 5 × 1016 ions-cm−2). Presence of implanted N at interstitial sites of the GaN host matrix is indicated from the strain observed in GaN by analysis of XRD data. PL spectra show presence of different types of defects in the as deposited film and engineering of defects after N-ion implantation. XPS spectra of Ga 3d-core level and valence band reveal the bonding of implanted N with the host Ga and/or N. The origin of ferromagnetic behavior is ascribed to unpaired electrons created at N sites due to Ga vacancies. First principle-based calculations also confirm ferromagnetism due to Ga vacancies and the reduction of magnetic behavior in Ga deficient GaN with N-ion implantation at interstitial site. The systematic reduction in the saturation magnetic moment value after N-ion implantation is explained on the basis of pairing of the unpaired electrons due to the bond formation of interstitial N with Ga and N present in the host matrix.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Nanowire (NWs) arrays of FeCo and FeCoCr were prepared by AC pulsed electrodeposition embedded into an alumina template. They were then employed as an underlayer to provide the dot array of cobalt ferrite thin films. Highly ordered arrays of NWs with the diameter of 30 nm and length of 10 µm were fabricated and then annealed in various environments. The cobalt ferrite thin films were deposited by the sputtering approach with the almost constant thickness of 70 nm as the hard magnetic phase. The combination of FeCo and cobalt ferrite could provide an exchange spring magnet with the magnetic coupling feature. X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns of the NW arrays indicated the formation of the body centered cubic (bcc) FeCo phase with [1 1 0] texture. Field emission electron microscopy (FESM) equipped by EDS also characterized the morphological features and elemental composition. Magnetization and coercivity of NWs were examined using the vibrating sample magnetometer. The maximum coercivity of NWs array is 2950 Oe which is related to H2 annealing FeCo NWs array. The magnetization reversal process of the as-deposited and annealed FeCo and FeCoCr NWs arrays was performed by angular dependence coercivity and squareness. Further, FORC diagrams indicated an interacting single domain behavior for as-deposited FeCo NWs and a weakly-interacting single domain state for the annealed samples. The morphological and structural features of cobalt ferrite were also studied by XRD, FE-SEM and AFM techniques. It was found that the cobalt ferrite dot array with a uniform chemical composition and structure was formed. The inter-diffusion of atoms between underlayer and thin films was confirmed by EDS. The maximum coercivity of the nanocompsite was 5800 Oe that is obtained for FeCoCr underlayer with argon annealing. The VSM analysis showed that sufficient exchange coupling was formed by using the FeCoCr underlayer in hydrogen annealing, while argon annealing provided a kink in the hysteresis loops. The obtained nanocomposites could be, therefore, considered as the potential candidate for use in the exchange spring magnet.© 2020 The AuthorsWe explore the optimal condition for cylindrical core/shell hard-soft exchange-coupled magnetic nanostructures by obtaining full hysteresis loops for various geometries by obtaining full hysteresis loops for various geometrical variables, including the dimensional scale and soft/hard-magnetic phase volume ratio through micromagnetic simulations. For achieving maximum energy product (BH), it is essential to increase the demagnetizing field by increasing the volume fraction of the soft magnet while maintaining a positive nucleation field and, which can be possible by the scaling-down. To scale up the nanostructure to a bulk magnet having high BH can be achieved by forming an array of needle-shaped exchange-coupled cylinders. These findings could lead to the flexible design and scalable fabrication of exchange-coupled permanent magnets.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Common effects of the geometric frustration and of the metamagnetic phase transitions on the thermodynamic properties of antiferromagnetic systems with the octahedral structure are investigated using an exactly solvable antiferromagnetic model on the octahedral recursive lattice. The residual entropies of all ground states are determined and the existence of two highly macroscopically generated single-point ground states with nonzero residual entropies is shown. The first-order character of the metamagnetic phase transitions of the model is demonstrated by discontinuous behavior of the entropy. The presence of the anomalous Schottky-type behavior of the specific heat capacity, i.e., the appearance of an additional peak in the low-temperature behavior of the specific heat capacity, in the vicinity of the magnetic field values, for which the highly macroscopically degenerated ground states are formed, is demonstrated and discussed. It is shown that the geometric frustration of the model together with the presence of the metamagnetic phase transitions can lead to more complicated behavior of the specific heat capacity, e.g., they have impact on the number of peaks (local maxima) in its behavior. It is also shown that the magnetocaloric effects related to the metamagnetic phase transitions are much more pronounced than those related to the frustration.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this research, polyaniline@Ba0.5Sr0.5Fe12O19@MWCNTs nanocomposite was prepared via co-precipitation and in-situ polymerization methods, respectively. Microstructural, magnetic and electromagnetic wave absorption analysis of the prepared nanocomposite were studied via XRD, FESEM, VSM and VNA. Compared with Ba0.5Sr0.5Fe12O19@MWCNTs, the microwave absorption bandwidth of the coated nanocompoite with polyaniline was significantly enhanced, which increased to approxiamately 4 GHz from 3 GHz. The effective microwave absorption performance of the Ba0.5Sr0.5Fe12O19@MWCNTs nanocomposite was attributed to increase in the interfacial polarization, improvement in impedance matching as well as porous geometric structure. Specially, by tuning the dielectric and magnetic properties of absorber components, the microwave absorption characteristics can be optimized for broad frequency range. As a consequence, it is concluded that the prepared ternary nanocomposite could be used as lightweight, broadband microwave absorber.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Skyrmions provide high potential for low power magnetic computing. However, we are lacking methods for the controlled nucleation of skyrmions in magnetic thin films. We present a procedure for a controlled generation of skyrmionic bubble like structures (SBSs) at well-defined spots by focused ion beam (FIB) irradiation of magnetic multilayers. Series of Pt/Co/Ir and Pt/Co/W multilayers with interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (iDMI) were sputtered and optimized with respect to the domain structure and development under magnetic field. Applying an external magnetic field pulse of specific strength to a sample in both the demagnetized domain state and the uniform ferromagnetic state results in the condensation and nucleation of bubbles, respectively. In multilayer films, SBSs form randomly across the sample. To control the bubble nucleation, we irradiate the multilayer stacks with 50kVGa+ ions to alter the magnetic properties along a hexagonal grid. We observe nucleation and geometric confinement of bubbles within the center of the hexagons. The lowered anisotropy in irradiated regions forms potential barriers which stabilizes the bubbles at room temperature and zero field. FIB tuned magnetic thin films give an exciting platform to investigate the behavior of SBSs in a confined state and to study the possibilities of controlled field- and current-driven motion.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The wave reversal mode is a magnetization reversal mechanism that appears in ferromagnetic nanotubes of certain geometric parameters when an external magnetic field is applied perpendicular to their axes. The distinctive feature of this mode is that leads to well-defined S-shaped hysteresis curves. In order to gain insight into the stability of this latter effect, we have performed micromagnetic simulations for permalloy and nickel nanotubes obtaining a non-monotonic behavior for coercivity as well as for remanence as a function of nanotube diameter for both materials. Motivated on these latter intriguing results, we found that measuring the area that encloses the hysteresis curve is a novel and simple strategy to identify the appearance of the wave reversal mode. An additional contribution of this work is the proposal of a new magnetic phase diagram that allows determining the stability of this reversal mechanism as a function of the geometric and magnetic parameters of the tubes.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In order to investigate the heavy rare earth (HRE) diffusion and the coercivity reinforcement mechanism of Ce based RE2Fe14B magnets, the high Ce content magnet with CeFe2 grain boundary phase was fabricated, and then followed by Tb grain boundary diffusion (GBD) process. The RE2Fe14B magnetic grains were surrounded by CeFe2 phase in the magnet. Being different from the single shell structure of GBD processed Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets, a dual-shell structure with the Tb-rich inner shell of (Tb,Ce)2Fe14B and the Tb-lean outer shell of (Ce,Tb)2Fe14B is formed around the grain core in the high Ce content RE2Fe14B magnet after GBD processed at 940 °C for 10 h. Coercivity of the high Ce content magnets with CeFe2 grain boundary phase can be reinforced by the dual shell core structure effectively. Microstructure and formation mechanism of the dual-shell core structure were investigated and proposed. Relationship between the coercivity and the dual-shell core structure was discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report the sol–gel synthesis of La1-xLnxCr0.5Co0.5O3 (x = 0 and 0.2 & Ln = Pr, Sm and Gd) perovskites. The samples were characterized using powder X-ray diffraction (PXRD), field emission scanning electron microscopy (FE-SEM), energy dispersive X-ray (EDX) and magnetization measurements. It is worth mentioning that all the samples in this study are found to be monophasic as attested from the PXRD patterns in sharp comparison with the previously reported work on LaCr0.5Co0.5O3 [Solanki et al. J. Magn. Magn. Mater. 469 (2019) 95–99.]. This could be related to the slight modifications in synthesis condition like the metal to citric acid ratio, drying as well decomposition temperature of gel, final calcination temperature and time. The parent phase (x = 0) crystallizes in rhombohedral, R-3c, structure whereas the Ln-doped samples are orthorhombic, Pbnm. FE-SEM imaging revealed the irregular shape and large variation in particle size. The particles are highly agglomerated but show faceted surface irrespective of shape and size. The EDX analysis confirms the nominal cationic composition of the samples. The magnetic measurements suggest the onset of antiferromagnetic ordering in all the samples with TN ranging from 130 K to 124 K depending on the size of the Ln-dopant ion. The high temperature effective paramagnetic moments obtained from Curie-Weiss law for all the samples suggest that the most likely spin-state of cobalt is intermediate-spin state. The low temperature magnetic behaviour of the substituted samples could be related to the rare earth-transition metal interaction. The magnetic ground states can be attributed to the Cr3+–O–Co3+, Cr3+–O–Cr3+ and Co3+–O–Co3+ antiferromagnetic superexchange interactions between the randomly distributed Cr3+ and Co3+ ions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the microstructure, soft magnetic properties and bendability of nanocrystalline Fe83Si4B10P2Cu1 ribbons acquired via rapid annealing of the amorphous precursor were investigated in comparison with those of the ribbons prepared through the conventional annealing. It was found that the appropriate rapid annealing with higher temperatures and shorter heating time is beneficial to the higher crystallinity and the formation of the fine α-Fe nanocrystallites with higher size-uniformity in the resultant nanocrystalline alloys, leading to the good magnetic properties and ribbon bendability simultaneously. The Fe83Si4B10P2Cu1 nanocrystalline ribbon with a high saturation magnetization of 1.82 T and low coercivity of 6.2 A/m in combination with improved bendability, which are desirable for the applications in the electronic components with complex geometries, was successfully fabricated by rapidly annealing the amorphous precursor at 520 °C for 30 s.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate a magneto-optical microscopy technique to create two-dimensional images of the pinning behavior of a vortex state as it is translated through a soft ferromagnetic film. The resulting information yields a map of how defects and inhomogeneities in the material serve to trap high-energy-density magnetization configurations such as vortex cores or domain walls. We raster scan a vortex core within a thin permalloy disk using in-plane magnetic fields, and monitor the vortex displacement using the magneto-optical Kerr effect. The differential nature of the measurement yields spatial resolution ≈5 nm, much less than the diffraction limit, and minimum resolvable pinning energy ≈0.4 eV. The technique produces two images, one displaying the pinning-induced vortex displacement relative to the expected free motion, and the other displaying hysteretic vortex displacement between the trace and re-trace. We demonstrate the technique on two samples, extract quantitative statistics about the pinning landscape, and compare to simulated results with a pinning landscape derived from the measured surface topography of the samples.© 2020The differential ac magnetic susceptibility of thin magnetic films was determined using the anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) to measure the response of the magnetization to an applied AC magnetic field. The differential AMR was measured with a small AC magnetic field (1 Oe) at frequencies from 5 Hz to 5000 Hz as a function of the magnitude of an applied DC field that was varied from −60 Oe to +60 Oe. A model relating the magnitude of the differential AMR to the differential AC susceptibility was developed. The ferromagnetic films investigated were permalloy, cobalt, nickel, and nickel with an antiferromagnetic nickel oxide layer on one surface. For all the samples investigated, the differential susceptibility magnitude was a function of the DC field magnitude and was frequency dependent, decreasing with increasing frequency.© 2020We report cryogenic magnetic force microscopy studies of anisotropic-strained (La0.8Pr0.2)2/3Ca1/3MnO3/NdGaO3(0 0 1) thin films. Real-space magnetic imaging reveals a robust charge-ordered insulating (COI) magnetic phase with a strong relaxation feature. Remarkably, in the first melting and reappear-then-melting processes, the ferromagnetic metallic (FMM) domain configurations differ dramatically, showing a droplet-like and a stripe-like pattern, respectively. These observations illustrate that the FMM nuclei are randomly self-organized distributed in the virgin highly COI-dominant phase separation state recorded after zero field cooling. Regardless of how to reach the saturated FMM state, the anisotropic nature of the long-range strain involves in and dominates to form well-ordered FMM stripes eventually. Our results facilitate the control and manipulation of phase separation morphology at the micrometer scale.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have theoretically investigated the elastic, mechanical, optical and magnetic properties of Ru2MnX (X = Nb, Ta, V) Heusler alloys within density functional theory (DFT). The generalized gradient approximation (GGA) was employed to research with Perdew-Burke-Ernzerhof (PBE) exchange-correlation energy. Obtained elastic constants and elastic moduli values manifest that all surveyed alloys are mechanically stable and ductile. The magnitudes of the theoretical Vickers hardness values ​​of these alloys follow the range of V > Ta > Nb. Also, all studied alloys display metallic behavior confirmed by the agreement of mechanical, electronic and optical data. On the other side, all alloys exhibit ferromagnetic magnetism with the total magnetic moment (μB) rank of Nb > Ta > V. Our computed μB results also agree well with the previous theoretical results of Ru2MnX (X = Nb, Ta, V) Heusler alloys.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report the growth of a TmFeO3 single crystal, its magnetic and structural properties upon varying temperature, magnetic field, and hydrostatic pressure. The abrupt change related to the spin reorientation (SR) process vanishes under a 30 kOe magnetic field in both thermomagnetic and strain curves, indicating strong magneto-structural coupling in such orthoferrite. Interestingly, the thermomagnetic curve under hydrostatic pressure reveals that the SR shifts towards higher temperatures and its temperature interval widens upon the application of external hydrostatic pressure. Combining the strain data obtained under similar conditions, the onset temperature shift of SR is concluded to originate from changes in structural parameters and widening of the SR transition is attributed to the presence of an intermediate phase. These findings may shed light on the envisage of potential uses in magneto-mechanical and transducer devices, based on the interaction between structure and magnetism.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report on the magnetic properties of isostructural oxides R6AO12 (R = a rare-earth element, A = Mo or W) with high concentrations of rare-earth elements. We measured the magnetization and specific heat. Tm6MoO12 is a van Vleck paramagnet with a nonmagnetic singlet ground state (GS). Ho6WO12 exhibits an antiferromagnetic long-range order (AFM LRO) lower than TN=2.1 K and its GS is a magnetic quasi-doublet. Dy6WO12 shows an AFM LRO lesser than TN=2.7 K and its GS is a magnetic Kramers doublet. Er6MoO12 and Er6WO12 are Curie-Weiss paramagnets at temperatures above 2 K and both have a magnetic Kramers doublet GS. We evaluated the magnetic entropy change. The temperature of the maximum magnetic entropy change for a magnetic-field change of 5 T is high (15 K) in Tm6MoO12 in spite of an oxide containing only rare-earth ions as the magnetic ions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates magnetic field and stress-induced magnetic domain reorientation and its correlation with Magnetic Barkhausen Noise (MBN). The magnetic domain dynamics and MBN of grain-oriented transverse and longitudinal electrical steels are studied by using time-resolved magneto-optical imaging. Time and frequency-domain characteristics of MBN signal are investigated for evaluation of stress state and magnetocrystalline anisotropy. Transitions between magnetic domain states with differing tensile stress and magnetic anisotropy directly influence the MBN signal. Its shown that 180° domain wall (DW) reorganization and DW-type conversion generate peaks in the MBN measurement for longitudinal and transverse electrical steel, respectively. The magnetic domain imaging reveals complicated domain arrangement processes in transverse electrical steel. The results provide a physical insight into bulk micromagnetic phenomena.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties and Gilbert damping constant α of NiFe films grown on different substrates at different sputtering temperatures were investigated. NiFe films with low Gilbert damping constant α of 0.0046 (TiN) and 0.0055 (MgO) at 500°C were obtained. It is found that the crystal structure and lattice mismatch strongly affected the Gilbert damping constant α. With increasing the sputtering temperature, the NiFe gradually changed from amorphous to crystalline, thus the chemical ordering increased, which would cause the decrease of the density of states at Fermi level (D(EF)) and the Gilbert damping constant α. Moreover, the damping constant exhibited a slight decrease with increasing the mismatch strain, which would be further proven by the spin resolved density of states for the NiFe films. This study may offer a fabrication method of the NiFe films with small damping constant α in the applications of the STT-MRAM device's area.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In order to investigate the antiferromagnetic coupling of Co and Mn atoms in Cu2−xCoxMn1+yAl1−y, a Heusler alloy, under Mn rich condition, our basic research objects are Cu2MnAl with only one kind of magnetic atoms and Co2MnAl which remain ferromagnetic in Mn rich conditions. After a large number of calculations, we found that because the Co atom is higher than the d-band center of Cu atom, then the anti-bonding state of Mn atom is pushed above Fermi level, thus changing the d-orbital electron arrangement of Mn atom, making the original antiferromagnetic Mn atom become ferromagnetic. Based on this theory, a method of applying stress to the alloy to adjust the lattice size to change the magnetic moment of Mn atom is proposed to achieve the same effect as doping special atoms. In addition, it was also inferred that the ferromagnetism of the parent phase and the ferromagnetism of the martensite phase are closely related to the d-band center caused by the change of lattice size.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric properties of the Ising binary alloys composed of arbitrary spin values have been determined by using effective field theory. For determining the efficiency of the magnetocaloric effect in the binary alloy, the quantities of interest such as isothermal magnetic entropy change and refrigerant capacity have been calculated for various values of spin and concentration. It is shown that by changing the concentration we can tune the magnetocaloric performance. Also, it has been shown that greater refrigerant capacity can be obtained for intermediate concentration values in comparison with the limiting concentration values.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetostriction and thermal expansion of the TbCo2Mnx compounds (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.6) have been investigated. The compounds crystallize in the cubic MgCu2-type lattice in spite of the Tb to 3d-metal (Co + Mn) ratio deviates from the stoichiometry. The spontaneous and forced volume magnetostriction as well as anisotropic magnetostriction were determined for various temperatures. The intra- and intersublattice Tb-Tb, Tb-3d and 3d-3d exchange interactions were estimated within the molecular field model for a two-sublattice ferrimagnet. It was found that the compounds have a large volume and anisotropic magnetostriction in a wide temperature range. At room temperature, TbCo2Mn0.4 compound possesses high linear magnetostriction of 400 ppm in magnetic field of 5 kOe, which makes it possible to consider the nonstoichiometric compounds as promising materials for magnetostrictive applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The paper reports on the effect of prolonged exposure to light of a water-based ferrofluid, with magnetite particles, double stabilized with oleic acid, on its low frequency complex magnetic permeability. The investigated ferrofluid was divided into three samples and placed in identical transparent glass vials. The reference sample, denoted by SR was kept in dark (in the laboratory), other sample, denoted by SL, was exposed to the light of a table lamp, with LED bulb (in the laboratory) and the third sample, denoted by SG, was exposed to natural sunlight, in a garden (subjected to the succession of days and nights as well as to the weather conditions). The duration of exposure to light was 80 days, during the summer. Complex magnetic permeability measurements over the frequency range 1 kHz–2 MHz show that after exposure to light both SL and SG samples exhibit Brownian maxima, unlike the reference sample, which has no maximum. Dynamic light scattering measurements show that in all three ferrofluid samples, the magnetic nanoparticles are mainly organized in condensed phase droplets and after exposure to light, the diameter of agglomerations increases. The change in the magnetic permeability spectrum of the investigated samples is explained based on the change in the local structure of ferrofluids, due to the electron-hole pairs resulted by photoelectric effect in magnetite, which affect the electrochemical balance of the colloidal system.© 2020 The Author(s)Temperature dependence of the antiferromagnetic resonance spectrum in a thulium orthoferrite (TmFeO3) poly-crystalline sample was studied by transmission spectroscopy in the frequency range of 0.1–0.75 THz and temperature range of 300–670 K, up to its Néel temperature. We observed quasi-ferromagnetic resonance and the quasi-antiferromagnetic resonance modes. The temperature dependence of the resonance frequencies, linewidths, and amplitudes were extracted. The resonance spectrum of TmFeO3 near its Néel temperature was directly observed and a drastic drop in resonance frequency for both modes was observed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We examine the existence of nonlinear modes and their temporal dynamics, in arrays of split-ring resonators, using a fractional extension of the Laplacian in the evolution equation. We find a closed-form expression for the dispersion relation as a function of the fractional exponent as well as an exact expression for the critical coupling between rings, beyond which no fractional magnetoinductive waves can exist. We also find the low-lying families of bulk and surface nonlinear modes and their bifurcation diagrams. Here the phenomenology is similar for all exponents and resembles what has been observed in other discrete evolution equations, such as the DNLS equation. The propagation of an initially localized magnetic excitation is always ballistic, with a ‘speed’ that is computed in exact form as a function of the fractional exponent. For a given exponent, it increases with an increase in coupling up to a critical coupling value, beyond which the ballistic speed could diverge inside the fractional interval [0,1]. Examination of the modulational instability shows that it tends to increase with an increase in the fractional exponent, where the decay proceeds via the formation of filamentary structures that merge eventually and form pure radiation. The dynamical selftrapping around an initially localized excitation increases with the fractional exponent, but it also shows a degree of trapping in the linear limit. This trapping increases with a decrease in the exponent and can be explained by near-degeneracy arguments.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic and 57Fe Mössbauer investigations of indium (In) doped cobalt ferrite are reported. Polycrystalline CoFe2−xInxO4, x = 0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8 samples are prepared by sol–gel method. In contrast to most of the literature, in the present work phase pure samples are obtained, except for x = 0.2. The presence of ferrimagnetic ordering in all the samples is confirmed from in-field 57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopy measurements. The cation distribution is obtained unambiguously from the combined analysis of Raman and in-field 57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopy measurements. The variation of magnetic moment values calculated from the obtained cation distribution are found to match qualitatively with the experimental values, supporting the analysis of in-field 57Fe Mössbauer and Raman spectroscopy measurements.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report on the enhancement of the spin Hall conductivity in tungsten by alloying with copper, measured by using the spin-torque ferromagnetic resonance technique. The alloying leads to an increase in spin-dependent scattering events and results in an enhancement of the contributing extrinsic spin Hall effects. The measured damping property shows a slight increase with higher tungsten concentration, due to spin current losses from the ferromagnetic layer into the tungsten-copper alloy. At a tungsten concentration of 60%, the spin Hall conductivity reaches a maximum of 3.68±0.68×105Ω-1m-1, corresponding to an enhancement of 120% compared to the pure tungsten sample. At the same concentration, the ratio of the spin Hall angle to the damping of the ferromagnetic layer, which offers a quick estimation for the critical switching current density, is found to be four times smaller as compared to pure tungsten.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents a theoretical analysis of magnetization waves in a diluted magnetic semiconductor. Using the continuous medium approximation, we derived a dynamical equation system that describes the magnetization evolution of the paramagnetic matrix and magnetic admixture ions. Two possible solutions were considered. The first involved a travelling wave of finite amplitude, which was stable in the system with a ferromagnetic coupling with admixture ions. The second solution involved a solitary wave. Here, the soliton amplitude and velocity were determined by the interaction between the admixture ions themselves and between them and the base matrix. The dipolar coupling of the matrix and admixture had significant influence on the wave stability.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The CoCrFeMnNi high-entropy alloy (HEA) is a magnetically concentrated crystalline system with all lattice sites magnetic, containing randomness (five different types of spins are randomly positioned on the lattice) and frustration (a consequence of mixed ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic interactions). The sample material was prepared as a non-equiatomic, fully random solid solution of the five magnetic elements and we have studied experimentally the nature of the magnetic state. Upon cooling, no long-range magnetic ordering takes place, but the spin system undergoes a kinetic freezing transition to a spin glass phase, where below the spin freezing temperature Tf≈ 20 K, ergodicity of the system is broken. The observed broken-ergodicity phenomena include zero-field-cooled – field-cooled magnetization splitting in low magnetic fields, a frequency-dependent cusp in the ac susceptibility, an ultraslow time-decay of the thermoremanent magnetization and the memory effect, where the state of the spin system reached upon isothermal aging at a certain temperature can be retrieved after a reverse temperature cycle. All these phenomena are associated with the out-of-equilibrium dynamics of a nonergodic, frustrated system of coupled spins that approach thermal equilibrium, but can never reach it on a finite experimental time scale, so that we are observing only transient effects of partial equilibration within localized spin domains.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effective field theory with correlations has been employed to study the hysteresis behavior of a ferromagnetic and ferrimagnetic three-walled mixed-spin Ising nanotube with an inner hexagonal vacancy. The effects of different exchange couplings, single-ion anisotropies, and temperature on the hysteresis loops of the sublattices and the overall system are attentively discussed. Multiple hysteresis loops have been observed in the system under certain physical hamiltonian parameters. It is found that the remanences and the coercivity of the sublattices and the system are strongly affected by the temperature, the exchange couplings, and the anisotropy. A satisfactory agreement can be qualitatively achieved by comparing our results with experiments and theoretical studies. Amazing behaviors are revealed thanks to the geometry, the different spins, and the multiple interactions involved in the system.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A novel dual-stimuli-responsive inhibitor nanovehicle Fe3O4@ZnAlCe-MoO4-LDHs was synthesized via a facile double-drop co-precipitation method. The obtained Fe3O4@ZnAlCe-MoO4-LDHs presents well-defined hierarchical core–shell structure with MoO42− corrosion inhibitor intercalated lamellar ZnAlCe-LDHs nanocrystals of ~30 nm assembling closely to Fe3O4 microspheres surface, possessing moderate inhibitor loading of 9.72% and strong superparamagnetism. The release results reveal that in the same NaCl solution, the releq (equilibrium release amount, 49.1%) and t0.5 (the time for release fraction of 50%, 4.5 h) were delayed much by magnetic field relative to non-magnetic field case (51.6%, 2.5 h). And the releq decreased with magnetic field strength, accompanied by the prolongation of t0.5, up to 6 h under a 1350 Gs magnet. Similarly, with keeping the magnetic field unvaried, the decline of NaCl solution concentration led to lower releq and longer t0.5. The kinetic fittings displayed that for all cases, the release process is inclusive of interlayer diffusion between LDHs layers (path I), interparticle diffusion among stacked LDHs crystals (path II) and diffusion between magnetic nanoparticles (path III). Compared to non-magnetic field, diffusion difficulties of path III was greatly enhanced under magnetic field. While for low-Cl− concentration system, the path I were limited effectively. Thus these two stimulus response factors can be used to regulate release behavior. Meanwhile, the protection efficiency of the nanovehicle for Q235 steel is higher than 88% because of the formation of inhibition film (ferrous or iron molybdate and hydroxide of zinc and cerium) on Q235 surface and the reduction of Cl− concentration in the solution via ion exchange. Moreover, the nanovehicle, presenting outstanding structural and magnetic stabilities, can be regenerated by a series of experiments, owning appreciable recycling performance and good anticorrosion activity in six recycles.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The primary aim of our study is to formulate the meloxicam loaded chitosan-magnetite nanoconjugates (MC-MNCs) for the magnetically targeted rheumatoid arthritis therapy with an anticipation to improve the drug efficacy through enhancing its regional bioavailability, reducing dose frequency and related toxicity. The chitosan-magnetite nanoconjugates was prepared by in-situ co-precipitation of FeSO4 and FeCl3 solution in basic medium subsequently cross-linked with chitosan in the presence of sodium tripolyphosphate. Meloxicam dispersion was co-loaded onto the chitosan-magnetite nanoconjugates yielding MC-MNCs. These nanoconjugates were characterized by diverse techniques for their morphological, physicochemical, magnetic, pharmaceutical and pharmacological properties. MC-MNCs were roughly spherical. DLS measurements confirm its mean hydrodynamic size (258 nm), polydispersity index (0.233) and zeta potential (25.6 mV). FT-IR spectroscopic investigations showed the functional integrity of meloxicam, while XRD measurements showed the crystalline nature of magnetite and meloxicam in MC-MNCs, respectively. The chitosan-coated magnetite nanoparticles (C-MNP) and MC-MNCs showed a magnetic susceptibility of 168 × 10-5 and 110 × 10-5 SI units, respectively. The encapsulation efficiency and loading capacity of meloxicam entrapped into MC-MNCs was found to be 82% and 13% respectively. The in-vitro meloxicam release in phosphate buffer saline (pH 7.4) showed an initial burst release effect and followed by a slow drug release pattern. Meloxicam release from the MC-MNCs followed the Michaelis-Menten kinetics, adopting a super case II transport mechanism. MC-MNCs was found sufficiently stable with no major visual changes. Murine models of inflammation and arthritis was used to test the pharmacological efficacy of MC-MNCs. Magnetically targeted drug delivery of MC-MNCs enhanced the anti-inflammatory effect and anti-arthritic activity on the carrageenan-induced paw oedema in adjuvant-induced arthritis models in rats when compared with other treatments without applied magnetic field. Considering the overall research analysis, it is concluded that the MC-MNCs could be used as a viable alternative to the conventional formulations of meloxicam to ease rheumatoid arthritis.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, an ultra-thin grain-oriented silicon steel (UTGO steel) strip was prepared via rolling a commercial glassless grain-oriented silicon steel plate to 0.075 mm and then annealing it at 850 °C for less than 30 min in a protective atmosphere. The resultant UTGO steel strip has magnetic induction B800 higher than 1.80 T and iron loss P1.5/400 lower than 12.0 W/kg. These superior magnetic properties are due to predominant {0kl} 〈1 0 0〉 texture and appropriate microstructure. The study shows that preferential {0kl} 〈1 0 0〉 nucleation occurs either inside shear bands or at in-grain deformation-induced boundaries. The nucleation behavior varies at different nucleation sites. Nuclei inside shear bands are denser and show preferential transitional orientation along {0kl} 〈1 0 0〉, while new grains dispersed at in-grain split boundaries have shown orientations which are suggested to inherit corresponding initial grain orientation prior to rolling. Nucleation behavior is also highly dependent on the orientation of the roll-deformed matrix. Our study finds that shear banding nucleation of {0kl} 〈1 0 0〉 (including Goss and {0 2 1} 〈1 0 0〉) is reduced when the orientation of the deformed matrix deviates from {1 1 1} 〈1 1 2〉. With the extension of annealing time, the growth of {0kl} 〈1 0 0〉 nuclei in cluster is restricted because of orientation pinning effect, whereas the growth of grains with orientations other than {0kl} 〈1 0 0〉 is promoted. This phenomenon weakens the dominance of {0kl} 〈1 0 0〉 texture, causing deterioration in magnetic properties of the final silicon steel.© 2020The magnetic orientations and switching fields of a CoCrPt-Ru-CoCrPt synthetic ferrimagnet with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy have been studied in the temperature range from 2 K to 300 K. It was found that two sets of magnetic transitions occur in the CoCrPt-Ru-CoCrPt ferrimagnet across this temperature range. The first set exhibits three magnetic transitions in the 50 K–370 K range, whereas the second involves only two transitions in the 2 K and 50 K range. The observed magnetic hysteresis curves of the synthetic ferrimagnet are explained using the energy diagram technique framework pioneered by Koplak et al. [1] which accurately describes the competition between interlayer exchange coupling energy, Zeeman energy, and anisotropy energy in the system. In this work we expand the framework to include synthetic ferrimagnets (SFMs) comprising higher perpendicular magnetic anisotropy materials and large (4X) interlayer exchange coupling energies which are promising for the development of ultrafast (ps) magnetic switching free layers in MTJ structures. Furthermore, we apply the analysis to predict SFM magnetic hysteresis curves in a temperature regime that includes temperature extrema that a synthetic ferrimagnet would be expected to reliably operate at, were it to be utilized as a free layer in a memory or sensor spintronic device.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Simple and precise hysteresis models with a small number of parameters allowing fast calculation are required for the magnetic analysis, as the field is calculated in a very large number of points. This paper presents a new simple method for modeling the hysteresis loops of soft magnetic materials using combined rational and power functions. Three approaches are used to model the hysteresis loops analytically. In the first approach, the upper and lower curves of the hysteresis loops are estimated and are calculated separately, using combined rational and power functions. In the second approach, the hysteresis loops are calculated using the DC magnetization curve and combined rational and power functions, applying a phase shift in the magnetic field strength variations relative to the magnetic flux density. The third approach presents a novel method for modeling hysteresis loops: first, the model is fitted to the “mean curve”, which is in the middle of the measured hysteresis curve, and as a second step the phase shift is calculated as in the second approach. A solid iron sample with a rectangular cross section is used for the measurements and the hysteresis modeling. The proposed method is also applied to model the hysteresis loops of a magnetic material with high magnetic permeability and grain-oriented steel, to show the generality of the proposed methods.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The electronic and magnetic properties of SrO contained with cation vacancies have been studied with first-principles methods within density functional theory. We investigate three charge states (0, −1, −2) of Sr vacancies and the calculated results demonstrate that both the neutral Sr vacancy (VSr×) and singly charged Sr vacancy (V′Sr) can lead to half-metallicity at the Fermi level and introduce magnetic moment to SrO crystal. The neutral Sr vacancy VSr× has a magnetic moment of 1.85μB and the singly charged V′Sr has a magnetic moment of 0.97μB. Different with the open-shell structure(VSr×,V′Sr), the close shell V″Sr defect does not carry a magnetic moment and the total magnetic moment is equal to zero. Furthermore, results also demonstrate that the magnetic moment is mainly originating from the spin polarization of the partially occupied O 2p states nearest surrounding Sr vacancies.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The microstructures and magnetic properties of Dy-free hydrogenation-disproportionation-desorption-recombination (HDDR) processed Nd-Fe-B powders after grain boundary diffusion (GBD) engineering with low melting point metal Zn have been investigated. The coercivity and remanence of diffusion treated powders were increased by 42% and 12%, respectively. The surprising result was that the increase in coercivity of the HDDR Nd-Fe-B powders was not at the expense of remanence. Microstructure analysis revealed that the modified microstructure characteristics with continuous, thickening, evenly distributed grain boundary phase were achieved by diffusing Zn. Besides, a nonmagnetic phase FeZn10.98 was also observed in the same process in grain boundary. The modificative grain boundary and formational new phase FeZn10.98 reduced the magnetic interactions among grains, leading to enhancement of coercivity.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effect of core size on the magnetic behavior of nanoparticle assemblies of γ-Fe2O3 core/SiO2 shell morphology is investigated. Long-range magnetostatic interactions are probed in two highly monodispersed experimental test systems of spherical nanoparticles with core diameters of 10 nm and 12.5 nm, and a shell thickness varying from 0 nm (bare particles) to ~50 nm. Zero-Field-Cooled magnetization curves are calculated by employing the Monte Carlo simulation technique in a mesoscopic-scale model for the assembly, assuming spin collinearity and coherent spin-reversal mechanisms. Simulation results reproduce the trend in the behavior of the Zero-Field-Cooled magnetization versus T curves in good qualitative agreement with the experimental findings. They also demonstrate that the increase of the magnetic core size results in a shift of the maximum magnetization peak, Tmax, to higher temperatures due to enhanced dipolar coupling. The results shed light on how interparticle distance and magnetic core size influence the value of Tmax through collective behavior and its transition to a single-particle superparamagnetic blocking temperature, TB, as the assembly becomes magnetically diluted with increasing shell thickness.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We propose a new concept of magnetic focusing for targeting and accumulation of functionalized superparamagnetic nanoparticles in living organs through composite configurations of different permanent magnets. The proposed setups fulfill two fundamental requirements for in vivo experiments: 1) reduced size of the magnets to best focusing on small areas representing the targeted organs of mice and rats and 2) maximization of the magnetic driving force acting on the magnetic nanoparticles dispersed in blood. To this aim, several configurations of permanent magnets organized with different degrees of symmetry have been tested. The product B·gradB proportional to the magnetic force has been experimentally measured, over a wide area (20 × 20 mm2), at a distance corresponding to the hypothetical distance of the mouse organ from the magnets. A non-symmetric configuration of mixed shape permanent magnets resulted in particularly promising to achieve the best performances for further in vivo experiments.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The commented paper contains many errors in the crystallographic analysis of the diffraction data received by the Authors. The main error is that the data do not correspond to the title crystal.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Soft magnetic thin films with in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy are of significant importance for a broad range of technological applications, including high-frequency power conversion. In-plane uniaxial anisotropy in amorphous films is of particular interest for ultra-low materials loss and MHz frequency operations. The present work is focused on one of the fundamental mechanisms, i.e., residual stress, that can negate the uniaxial anisotropy in amorphous films by engendering perpendicular magnetisation and hence, undermining the soft magnetic performance. It is quantified how the nature of residual stress, compressive or tensile, transforms the magnetisation from an in-plane to an out-of-plane configuration, also well-known as spin-reorientation transition (SRT). A correlation between engineered residual stress in multilayer stacks, induced by the uneven expansion of metallic/dielectric layers following a thermal-shock scheme, and SRT mechanism demonstrates tensile stress inside the films undermines the soft magnetic performance. We suggest the magnetic softness can be retained by eluding sources of tensile stress during fabrication or post-processing of the amorphous films.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We analyze coexistence of antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic phases in bulk iron-rhodium and its alloys with palladium, Fe50,4Rh49,6, Fe49,7Rh47,4Pd2,9 and Fe48,3Rh46,8Pd4,9, using neutron diffraction, magnetization and scanning Hall probe imaging. Temperature dependencies of the lattice parameters, AFM and FM phase weight fractions, and Fe magnetic moment values were obtained on cooling and heating across the AFM-FM transition. Substantial thermomagnetic hysteresis for the phases’ weight fractions and a relatively narrow one for the unit cell volume has been observed on cooling-heating. A clear dependence of hysteretic behavior on Pd concentration has been traced. Additional direct magnetic measurements of the spatial distribution of the phase transition are acquired using scanning Hall probe microscopy, which reveals the length scale of the phase coexistence and the spatial progression of the transition in the presence of external magnetic field. Also, the magnetic phase diagram has been constructed for a series of Pd-doped FeRh alloys.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A recent study has demonstrated the cutting-edge techniques in applying large strains to the transition metal perovskite oxides up to 8%. In order to explore the unknown magnetic phase diagrams and physical properties of the perovskite SrIrO3, we employ first principles density-functional theory calculations to study the magnetic, electronic and dynamical properties of tetragonal SrIrO3 under epitaxial strains. There are four abrupt changes in the magnetic moment of Ir atom with in-plane epitaxial strain changing from −10% to +7% (positive/negative value corresponds to the tensile/compressive strain) relative to the cubic phase. In particular, under an in-plane compressive strain of ~1.5% or tensile strain of ~1%, a weak ferromagnetic to strong ferromagnetic transition is induced, whereas for a compressive strain lager than 7.7% or a tensile strain larger than 4.7%, the magnetic moment of Ir drops gradually with the increase of the strain. These magnetic transitions can be qualitatively explained by the Stoner model. In addition, the phonon instabilities of tetragonal SrIrO3 under both compressive and tensile strains are revealed by lattice dynamics calculations. These phonon instabilities of tetragonal SrIrO3 show potential polar metal behaviors which are similar to those found in tetragonal SrRuO3. This may stimulate further investigation in the properties of SrIrO3-based complex oxide interfaces.© 2020The authors regret that there was a misprint in the expression on the last page of the paper for the complex function, describing superposition of three spirals modelling the skyrmion lattice in a chiral magnet. The corrected expression reads: [Formula presented]. Note that in this version the second term is proportional to [Formula presented] instead of [Formula presented] like the other two terms. This expression now correctly reproduces the kagome-type in-plane magnetization components distribution, shown in Fig. 2b of the original article, and was the one originally used to compute it. There was also another misprint in the expression (3), where “[Formula presented]” should read as the closed contour integration [Formula presented].© 2020 The Author(s)We use density functional theory calculations to compute the lateral strain dependence of the magnetocrystalline anisotropy (MCA) energy of thin FeCo films. We investigate the effect of lateral strain on the MCA energy especially in the context of magnetostriction, which needs to be minimized for some applications like GMR sensors. The magneto-elastic coupling responsible for magnetostriction is a strain-derivative of the MCA energy, thus we concentrate to find extrema in the MCA energy vs. strain curves, which we find for both ordered Fe50Co50 films, as well as for disordered Fe10Co90 films modeled by special quasirandom structures. We show that using lateral strain we can switch the easy axis of magnetization from out-of-plane to in-plane in many cases. We can furthermore use lateral strain in combination with the film-thickness to minimize magnetostriction and change the MCA energy at the same time.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report magneto-crystalline anisotropy of pure and Fe/Si substituted SmCo5. The calculations were performed using the advanced density functional theory (DFT) including onsite electron-electron correlation and spin-orbit coupling. Si substitution substantially reduces both the uniaxial magnetic anisotropy and the magnetic moment. Fe substitution with the selective site, on the other hand, enhances the magnetic moment with a limited chemical stability. The magnetic hardness of the SmCo5 is governed by the Sm 4f localized orbital contribution. The 4f density of states (DOS) becomes flat and split with the substitution of Co (2c) with Si/Fe atoms, except with the Fe substitution at 3 g sites. It is also confirmed that Si substitution favors the thermodynamic stability on contrary to the diminished magnetic and anisotropic effects in SmCo5 at either sites.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetite has fascinated researchers for decades, due to its wide range of applications from spintronics to biomedicine. Despite a large body of works aimed at its magnetic properties, no consensus has been reached on the physical origin of the low temperature magnetic anomalies observed in magnetite. Although, a lot of work has been done in studying magnetite nanoparticles, but studies on the low temperature anomalies in those nanoparticles still remains unresearched. We report on the observation of the low temperature magnetic anomalies in highly crystalline, stoichiometric Fe3O4 nanorods and relate them to the coupled electron hopping relaxation process and domain wall motion. Both DC and AC susceptibility show the presence of a hump around 35 K, which is associated with the relaxation of Fe+2 extra electrons. Radio-frequency transverse susceptibility (TS) measurements indicated a noticeable increase in anisotropy field below ~ 25 K, which is attributed to the rearrangement of Fe+2 electrons in the octahedral sites. TS experiments also revealed the domain wall freezing below ~ 35 K. Our combined DC, AC and TS susceptibility studies shed light on the complex nature of the low-temperature magnetic behavior in nanostructured magnetite.© 2020 Elsevier LtdThis study presents a novel method to evaluate oscillation condition by technology computer-aided design (TCAD) simulation and is based on a signal flow graph model and a scattering parameter (S-parameter) computed using the TCAD simulation result. The parasitic oscillation of Silicon carbide (SiC) metal–oxide–semiconductor field-effect transistors (MOSFETs) when a short circuit occurs has been investigated with the proposed method. The oscillation conditions of a circuit were computed with this technique and compared with those computed by TCAD transient simulation. The gate resistance to suppress oscillation is similar between these methods. Moreover, the method was also applied to estimate the stability of a circuit consisting of parallelly connected SiC MOSFETs. Two oscillation modes were taken into account. We demonstrated that the circuit parameters required to suppress parasitic oscillation can be computed using a simple calculation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We perform computer simulations to study the relaxation in a one-dimensional chain of dipolar interacting magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs). Using the two-level approximation of the energy barrier, we perform kinetic Monte Carlo simulations to probe the relaxation mechanism as a function of dipolar interaction strength and temperature. The anisotropy axes of the MNPs are assumed to have random orientations. At high temperatures, the magnetization decay curve is exponential for weak dipolar interactions. It is found that dipolar interactions slow down the magnetic relaxation and increase the effective Néel relaxation time τN, which is affected by thermal fluctuations. In the weak dipolar limit, there is a perfect agreement between simulated and analytically evaluated values of τN for a wide range of temperatures. Microscopic analyses such as magnetic moments correlations and dynamic domain formation also suggest an increase in ferromagnetic coupling with an increase in dipolar interaction strength or decrease in thermal fluctuations. We believe that the concepts presented in this work are relevant in the context of applications such as data storage, digital data processing, and magnetic hyperthermia, in which the linear chain of MNPs are pervasive.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The dynamic magnetization of magnetic materials is of fundamental interest and is essential for various applications in magnetic storage, spin wave and wireless communication areas. Traditionally, rare-earth-doped ferromagnets show an enhancement of the Gilbert damping parameter due to the slow relaxation of the 4f-electron spins of rare-earth atoms. The exchange coupling between a ferromagnetic garnet thin film and a nanometer rare-earth thin film has been rarely explored. In this work, we fabricated and systematically studied microstructural, static and dynamic magnetic properties of yttrium iron garnet (YIG)/dysprosium (Dy) heterojunctions. Large modulations of the out-of-plane magnetic anisotropy field, Gilbert damping parameter and magneto-optic Kerr rotation angle have been realized in single-crystalline YIG thin films capped by rare-earth Dy nano-films. Both the effective Gilbert damping parameter, αeff, and the Kerr rotation angle, increase by 300% for the YIG/Dy(60 nm) heterostruture compared to the bare YIG ferromagnet. The enhanced αeff strongly depends on the out-of-plane magnetic anisotropy field, which arises from the interfacial exchange coupling between YIG and Dy nano-films. Our findings provide a robust route to control both magnetization dynamics and magneto-optic properties using rare-earth nano-films.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Nd-Fe-B thin films have been successfully developed by Pulsed Laser Deposition (PLD) onto silicon substrates. In order to explore the crucial role of target composition during PLD, five single alloy targets, representing specific atomic compositions (Nd/Fe atomic ratio varied in the range 0.18–0.47) have been tested and studied. In a determined deposition temperature range of 550 °C-630 °C, thin films made from a target with Nd/Fe = 0.45 present the best hard magnetic properties, a quasi-single magnetic phase, both coercivity and remanence above 1 T and a square loop shape. FIB-ESB analyses associated with XRD, SEM and SQUID-VSM magnetic measurements indicate that the high values of both remanent magnetization and coercivity are ascribed to film texturation and to partial decoupling of the hard magnetic Nd2Fe14B grains by a secondary Nd-rich phase. PLD performed with other target compositions and non-optimized deposition temperatures leads to poorer magnetic properties, owing to the presence of soft magnetic phase and non-textured or oxidized thin films.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents the constitutive modeling of the piezoeffect- (piezoelectric and piezomagnetic effects) and flexoeffect- (flexoelectric and flexomagnetic effects) induced magnetoelectric (ME) coupling in multiferroic nanocomposites. The governing equations and associated boundary conditions involving in both piezoeffect and flexoeffect are solved to evaluate ME response of a nano-structure under extensional-bending coupling vibration. The enhanced ME coupling via flexoeffect has been noted for thin structures with nanoscale thickness. In addition, an obvious ME coupling due to flexoeffect is observed even though the piezoelectric and piezomagnetic effects vanish simultaneously. Particularly, ME coupling in magnetoelectric-like nano-structures is expected to reach 78% of that in a typical ME structure CoFe2O4-PZT for μ3113=3×10-7C/m. The output power density of ME energy can be improved by decreasing the thickness, increasing flexoeffect constant, and using a proper load impedance. The most important is that an appreciable output power density of 18.3 W/m3 is available for magnetic energy harvester composed of dielectric layer without piezoelectricity and magnetic layer without piezomagnetism. Given the significance of the new coupling mechanism based on flexo-coupling, the theory proposed in this paper may be utilized in developing high-performance ME nano-structures without using any conventional piezoelectric and piezomagnetic materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic Particle Imaging (MPI) was developed to visualize the three-dimensional distribution of a superparamagnetic tracer in the imaging volume. However, utilizing multi-spectral reconstruction techniques enables MPI to differentiate tracer types or particle properties such as temperature, anisotropy, binding-state or viscosity of the medium. Here, we apply MPI to observe the dynamic gelation process of perimag® particles in a gelatine-water matrix. Phantom measurements are recorded as a function of time to visualize the effect of gelation. The gelatine matrix forms progressively over several minutes, putting the gelation kinetics into a time frame easily observed in MPI. As a reference, perimag® is measured in H2O and a fully aged gelatine matrix. For this study, Cartesian MPI is used, where calibration efforts are greatly reduced by under-sampling calibration data and taking advantage of interpolation post-processing.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effects of iron particle volume fraction (PVF) on the dynamic compression mode properties of isotropic and anisotropic magnetorheological elastomers (MREs) are experimentally investigated considering wide ranges of excitation frequency (1 Hz to 30 Hz), strain amplitude (2.5% to 20%) and magnetic flux density (0 to 750 mT). MRE samples with three different PVFs (15%, 30% and 45%) were fabricated in the laboratory and a test rig was designed to measure their magneto-mechanical characteristics. The effect of PVF on the loss modulus, denoted as PVF-dampening was substantially higher compared to that on the elastic modulus, denoted as PVF-stiffening. Moreover, PVF effects on compression mode properties of the isotropic MRE were greater compared to the anisotropic MRE, and showed coupled dependence on the excitation and magnetic field conditions. Results revealed that strain-rate stiffening of isotropic MRE increased with increasing PVF while slightly decreased for anisotropic MRE. Besides, strain-softening of both MREs increased with increasing PVF. Results were also suggesting of strong dependence of MR effect on the loading conditions, apart from the PVF. MR effect in view of elastic and loss moduli for isotropic MRE increased with increasing PVF from 15% to 45% at 1 Hz, but at higher frequency they become maximum around 30% PVF, regardless of strain amplitude. Both MR effects for anisotropic MRE, however, become minimum around 30% PVF, irrespective of frequency and strain amplitude. Owing to the observed coupled effects of the loading factors with the PVF, a simple phenomenological model was formulated considering independent functions in PVF, excitation frequency, strain amplitude and magnetic flux density for predicting compression elastic and loss moduli of both MREs. The proposed model required identifications of only six unknown constants, showed reasonably good agreements with the measured data.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The corrosion and cross-sectional loss of steel wires inside cable structures seriously threaten the operational safety of bridges. In the present study, a probability evaluation method for the cable corrosion degree was proposed in association with the Bayesian model. Firstly, the evaluation index ‘X’ was expressed based on the magnetic dipole model of self-magnetic flux leakage (SMFL), and corrosion detection experiments were carried out on both steel strands and wires. Then, the distributions of the measured SMFL signals were analyzed. The statistical law between ‘X’ and the cross-sectional loss ratio ‘α’ was depicted and revealed based on the experimental data. Finally, the positive correlation between ‘X’ and ‘α’ was quantified by four different levels, in turn, the evaluation criteria for the corrosion degree of cable structures were obtained. Via the comparative analysis with the different prior probability distribution of corrosion degree, the reliability of the evaluation criteria was verified.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.One of the most promising applications for high temperature superconducting (HTS) material is magnet. HTS magnet is considered to be used in a wide range of applications including MRI, particle accelerator, electrical machine, and etc. HTS rotating machines are mainly utilized for cryo-electrification, i.e. application of superconductivity for modern electrification. One of the main aspects of cryo-electrification is electric aircraft application which is recently enabled by continuous progress in design development of superconducting magnets and HTS machines. This paper discusses the challenges facing a newly developed magnet type, i.e. HTS ring magnet, that being considered in superconducting rotating machine in future electric aircrafts. HTS ring magnet is compact, easy to develop, fault tolerant, and light in weight, and it recently reached to a high level of magnetic field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Despite the efforts of many research teams, to optimize the process of thermal heating of magnetic nanoparticles interacting with an alternating magnetic field for self-controlled magnetic hyperthermia remains a challenge. Macroscopic models that quantify the process of heat generation could not combine the biocompatibility requirements of magnetic nanoparticles in human medicine on one hand with high values of specific absorption rate (SAR) on the other. For the first time, we propose a microscopic model using Kubo formalism, a modified Heisenberg Hamiltonian and the method of Green's functions for calculating the absorbed power (thermal energy absorbed by a magnetic nanoparticle per unit time in an alternating magnetic field). From the observed transverse magnetic susceptibility, elementary excitation energy, and damping is investigated the SAR as a function of the microscopic parameters of the systems: exchange interaction constants and single-ion magnetic anisotropy. The calculations are made for a magnetic complex heterogeneous nanoparticle consisting of core, shell, intermediate layer between them, and surface (the so called core/shell model). The proposed nanoparticle model allows for each region to define different exchange interaction and magnetic anisotropy constants as well as different magnetic configurations and thickness. The dependence of SAR on the microscopic parameters of the system is analyzed and qualitatively explained by the behavior of the elementary excitations (spin energy and damping). The results are in good qualitative agreement with the experimental data and show that using complex magnetic nanoparticles the heating properties for hyperthermia could be maximized.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Polylactic acid-based nanoparticles are promising materials due to their tunable properties that are connected to surface modification. We have prepared polylactic acid nanospheres (PLA) with a non-magnetic phase (PLA loaded with various bovine serum albumin (BSA) concentrations) and magnetic phase (PLA loaded with magnetite nanoparticles coated with different amount of BSA (MFBSA)). The morphology, physico-chemical, magnetic and anti-amyloid properties were characterized by several biophysical methods. The amount of BSA used for PLA nanospheres or MFBSA modification played an important role in controlling the hydrodynamic size and zeta potential. In addition, magnetite loaded PLA nanospheres and MFBSA were all superparamagnetic. The potential of modified PLA nanospheres compared to MFBSA and 'naked' PLA to inhibit insulin amyloid fibrillation and destroy mature insulin fibrils was studied in vitro for samples with BSA/Fe3O4 weight ratio of 0.5. Destroying potential of samples was size–dependent, with the smallest MFBSA0.5 having the most significant effect. The strongest inhibitory effect on insulin fibrillation showed PLA-MFBSA0.5, slightly smaller than BSA modified PLA nanospheres.© 2020 The AuthorsElectrodynamic (ED) analysis of the TEn0p (TEθφr) modes in a shielded single-crystal-5-mm-diameter yttrium iron garnet (YIG) sphere has been performed and compared with the results of previous experiments. Measurements and ED analysis of the HE111± mode resonances in a polycrystalline Al-doped rod-shaped YIG sample have been performed for comparison. It has been shown that electromagnetic resonances in large shielded YIG spheres behave in a similar way as typical resonances occurring in dielectric resonators under conditions when the effective permeability is positive, and as so-called magnon resonances when the effective permeability is negative. Nevertheless, both types of resonances are solutions to the same transcendental equation. Computations reported herein suggest that the physical nature of resonance systems containing dispersive gyrotropic media can be described within a common framework of electromagnetic resonance systems with unequal stored magnetic and electric energies, which offers an alternative to the more widely used quantum and harmonic oscillator models.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In ball-milled iron particles for soft magnetic composites (SMCs), milling aids with lubricity can induce a (0 0 1) fiber texture with superior magnetic properties. Effects of lubricants on the recrystallization behavior of ball-milled iron particles with fiber texture and their magnetic properties of SMCs using the iron particles were investigated. During ball milling, lubricant oil and boron nitride (a solid lubrication particle) were used as lubricants. Both as-milled iron particles have a (0 0 1) fiber texture. However, when these iron particles are recrystallized using heat treatment, the iron particles milled using the lubricant oil almost disappeared while the fiber texture in the particles milled using the boron nitride was strongly retained. Therefore, it is concluded that ball milling for iron particles using boron nitride lubricant can retain (0 0 1) fiber texture in heat-treated iron particles, and SMC using these iron particles have higher permeability and lower coercive force.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The strain engineering technique allows us to alter the electronic properties of graphene in various ways. Within the continuum approximation, the influences of strain result in the appearance of a pseudo-gauge field and modulated Fermi velocity. In this study, we investigate theoretically the effect of linear uniaxial tensile strain and/or stress, which makes the Fermi velocity anisotropic, on a magnetized graphene sheet in the presence of an applied electrostatic voltage. More specifically, we analyze the consequences of the anisotropic nature of the Fermi velocity on the structure Landau levels and de Haas-van Alphen (dHvA) quantum oscillation in the magnetized graphene sheet. The effect of the direction of the applied strain has also been discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles are promising materials for biomedical applications such as hyperthermia treatment. In this study, the synthesis of Mg1-xCaxFe2O4, x = 0.0–0.9 nanoparticles, and coating with Pluronic F127 was carried out and evaluated as possible candidates for magnetic hyperthermia applications. The nanoparticles were synthesized by the thermal decomposition method using metallic salts of Fe, Mg, and Ca in the form of acetylacetonates. The crystalline structure and the magnetic properties of the samples due to the substitution of Mg2+ by Ca2+ in the synthesized samples were evaluated. The samples possess an inverse spinel structure, and the lattice parameter increased as the substitution of Ca2+ ions took place. Vibration sample magnetometry (VSM) was used to evaluate the magnetic properties and to quantify the saturation magnetization (Ms), the remnant magnetization (Mr), and the coercive field (Hc) of the samples. The morphology was quasi-spherical, and their average size was less than 10 nm as determined by transmission electron microscopy (TEM). The heating ability of selected Pluronic F127 coated ferrites indicate that the nanoparticles can increase the medium temperature up to 42 °C in a time of 7 min. Hemolysis values were less than 2.5% for all evaluated samples, indicating no cytotoxic effect on the red blood cells. The presented results allow indicating that the nanoparticles of Mg0.9Ca0.1Fe2O4 are candidates for their potential use as thermoseeds for magnetic hyperthermia treatment.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We performed combined experimental and theoretical studies of the effect of Cr substitution for Fe on the structural, magnetic, transport, electronic, and mechanical properties of Fe3-xCrxGe (0⩽x⩽1) intermetallic alloys. Single phase microstructures are observed for x⩽0.70. Higher Cr concentrations x>0.70 are multi-phased. A hexagonal D019 structure is found for all Cr concentrations, with the lattice parameters increasing systematically with an increasing Cr content. All the alloys in the series are found to be ferromagnets with large magnetization values of about 6 μB/f.u. and high Curie temperature above room temperature. The low-temperature saturation magnetic moments agree fairly well with our theoretical results and also obey the Slater-Pauling rule. The density functional theory calculation reveals that Cr substitution energetically favours one of the Fe sites in Fe3Ge. The electrical resistivity measured over the temperature range from 5 K to 400 K shows metallic behavior, with a residual resistivity ratio that decreases with Cr content. Vicker's hardness values are observed to increase with increasing Cr content to approximately 5 GPa.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Ni-Co-Mn-Sn Heusler alloys possess attractive multifunctional properties, owing to the unique metamagnetic shape memory effect. However, the intrinsic high brittleness limits their applications. In this work, we studied the effects of Fe doping and heat treatment on the microstructures, mechanical properties, martensitic transformation and magnetic behaviours of Ni-Co-Mn-Sn-Fe Heusler alloys. A eutectic dual-phase was successfully introduced in Ni48Co4Mn39-xSn9Fex (x = 3, 4, 5, 6, 7 and 8) alloys by doping Fe for Mn. The engineering strength and ductility increased almost by twofold in a eutectic dual-phase alloy compared to the single-phase alloy. Such microstructure also shows a large quasilinear pseudoelasticity of 4.3% with a very small stress hysteresis and good cyclic stability. After the heat treatment, the γ phase lamellae was much coarsened which resulted in decrease of strength and ductility by ~20%. The magnitude of pseudoelasticity decreased to 2.6% and worse cyclic stability occurred because of the grain coarsening. The metamagnetic transformation was obtained when Fe content is between 2.5 at% and 6.5 at%, with Fe3 alloy showing a A(ferro) ⇔ M(para) type and Fe4-Fe6 alloys showing a A(ferro) ⇔ M(ferro) one.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Patterned magnetic nanostructures are potential candidates for future energy efficient, on-chip communication devices. Here, we have studied experimentally and numerically the role of nanochannels to manipulate spin waves in Ni80Fe20 connected nanodot arrays of varying filling fraction. Rich spin-wave spectra are observed in these sample, where the number of spin-wave modes decreases with increasing filling fraction due to the reduction in the demagnetization field. The nanochannels affect the spin-wave modes of the connected dots by modified magnetic coupling as well as selective channelling of spin-wave modes. For all modes, the vertical nanochannels couple the nanodots, except for the highest frequency mode where all nanochannels act as coupler. This feature is further explored in the simulation, which reveals that only the highest frequency mode can propagate through all the nanochannels, which may be further exploited to construct an electronic demultiplexer. This study will be useful to understand the role of nanochannels in patterned magnetic nanostructures and their applications in spin-wave based communication devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report on the effect of thickness on the magnetic properties and domain wall motion in as deposited Fe2CoSi thin films. Reflections present in selected area electron diffraction (SAED) micrograph infer that they are allowed reflections and are related to the Fe2CoSi. The coercivity is found to increase with the film thickness and the same is explained on the basis of Néel domain wall model. Longitudinal magneto-optical Kerr effect (L – MOKE) infers that the formation of ripple kind of domains that depend on the orientation of the field. L – MOKE data also infers nearly perfect 4-fold anisotropy for the film with thickness 5 nm and a weaker 4-fold anisotropy at higher thicknesses. Up on varying the angle between magnetic field and the film edge to 0° or 90°, indeed there is a transformation of the film magnetization from easy direction to hard direction. Fast Fourier transform of magnetic force microscopy (MFM) and polar plots infer a uniaxial anisotropy and a four-fold anisotropy in the films. Micromagnetic simulations infer that the coercivity value depends on the void size and enhances up to certain radius, above which it decreases. Present results would indeed be helpful for the future spintronic applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The phase structures and magnetic properties of isotropic nanocomposite permanent magnetic materials with the nominal composition of (Sm1-xRx)Co5 (x = 0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1; R = La, Ce) + 25 wt% α-Fe prepared by high-energy ball milling and subsequent annealing have been investigated systematically. It is found that the phase structure of La-doped nanocomposite magnets is quite different from that of the Ce- doped. The hard phase of Ce-doped nanocomposite magnet is 2:7 phase and unchangeable with increasing the Ce content and annealing temperatures (≤650 °C), while that of La-doped nanocomposite magnets undergoes a phase transition from 2:7 phase to 1:7 and 2:17 hard phases with increasing the La content and annealing temperatures. Both magnetic performance of La and Ce doped nanocomposite magnets shows a tendency to decrease as La or Ce content increases. The analysis of hysteresis loop reveals that both La and Ce doped nanocomposite magnets exhibit the strong ferromagnetic exchange coupling between hard and soft magnetic phases. Surprisingly, the magnetic performance of La-doped SmCo5/a-Fe is much superior to that of the Ce-doped although the Ce-doped Sm-Co hard phase has a relatively higher intrinsic magnetic property. The mechanism behind is found to be related to the change of Fe soft phase after adding La. Our results demonstrate that the substitution of Sm by La instead of Ce can produce the high-performance and low-cost SmCo5/a-Fe nanocomposite magnets. Our study is of significance to balance the utilization of the rare-earth resource.© 2020 The Author(s)Using Molecular Dynamics computer simulations, we study how an applied magnetic field influences the shape, integrity and internal structure of clusters formed by Stockmayer supracolloidal magnetic polymers (SMPs). We consider SMPs of four different topologies: chain-, Y-, X- and ring-like ones. We find that the highest macroscopic deformation and the strongest monomer rearrangements from a liquid to a local hexatic order is observed for clusters formed by chain-like SMPs. The highest magnetic susceptibility, however, is exhibited by the clusters composed of Y- and X-like SMPs. Clusters formed by ring-like SMPs are basically not affected by the field strengths considered here. It is worth mentioning that those fields are sufficient to cause the dissociation of the clusters formed by other topologies of SMPs.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The transfer of substances via the blood-placenta barrier is tightly regulated and critical for the fetus and the expecting mother. In case of necessary medical interventions during pregnancy a comprehensive knowledge about the interaction of the drugs with this barrier is indispensable. Therefore well-engineered test systems are needed and valuable transport systems are helpful. We developed an in vitro microfluidic blood-placenta barrier system consisting of the human trophoblast cell line BeWo and human primary placental pericytes. The integrity and stability of the model was verified by a permeability assay and immunocytochemistry. As potential drug carriers magnetic nanoparticles with various coatings were applied and their ability to pass the barrier was quantified by magnetic particle spectroscopy. We could demonstrate that up to 4% of negatively charged nanoparticles pass the barrier in a time-dependent manner.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In-plane anisotropy of linear and nonlinear magnetoelectric (ME) effects in a heterostructure composed of mechanically coupled layers of amorphous iron-based ferromagnet and piezoelectric lead zirconate-titanate ceramics has been investigated. The measurements were performed on a disk-shaped sample subjected to a low-frequency excitation magnetic field h oriented either parallel or perpendicular to a bias magnetic field H0. The first harmonic of the voltage response was recorded in the case of the linear ME effect, which was excited at frequencies of acoustic resonances of the sample, and the second harmonic in the case of the nonlinear ME effect excited in the non-resonance regime. Strong uniaxial or biaxial anisotropy for different directions of the bias field within the sample plane was observed. The uniaxial anisotropy of the ME effect occurs due to the uniaxial magnetic and magnetostrictive anisotropy of the amorphous ferromagnetic layer that is a result of its fabrication by the ultrafast cooling method. The biaxial anisotropy at resonant frequencies is the manifestation of the spatial structure of the excited acoustic modes. The anisotropy of ME effects should be taken into account when developing magnetoelectric devices based on composite heterostructures.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effects of grain size on magnetic and mechanical properties of Dy-free Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets were studied. The grain size of the sintered magnets was varied by using different sized Dy-free Nd-Fe-B alloy feedstock powders which were ball milled to different extents. Increasing the ball milling time from 7 to 11 h caused the average particle size of the powders to decrease from 3.6 to 2.1 µm, while the average grain size of the corresponding sintered magnets decreased from 5.0 to 4.0 µm. The intrinsic coercivity Hcj and maximum energy product (BH)max of these magnets increased from 11.6 to 13.7 kOe and 41.6 to 43.6 MGOe, respectively. The finer grain magnets exhibited better thermal stability, as indicated by a smaller temperature coefficient of Hcj (−0.71%/°C). With extending ball milling time to 15 h, the magnetic properties of the magnets deteriorate, while the flexural strengths first decrease and then increase. The flexural strength improvement is attributed to the increased Oxygen content in the magnets due to finer grains. The coercivity enhancement by reduction of grain size is a promising approach to develop Dy-free Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets with better thermal stability. It is important to control the Oxygen contents in the magnets to compromise both magnetic and mechanical properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Characterizing the iron distribution in tissue sections is important for several pathologies. Iron content in excised tissue is typically analyzed via histochemical stains, which are dependent on sample preparation and staining protocols. In our recent studies, we examined how magnetic properties of iron can also be exploited to characterize iron distribution in tissue sections in a label free manner. To enable a histomagnetic characterization of iron in a wide variety of available tissues, it is important to extend it to samples routinely prepared for histochemical staining, which often involve use of chemical fixatives. In this study, we took a systematic approach to determine differences between unfixed and formalin-fixed murine spleen tissues in histomagnetic characterization of iron. Superconducting quantum interference device (SQUID) magnetometry and magnetic force microscopy (MFM) were used for macro- and micro-scale histomagnetic characterization. Perl's stain was used for histochemical characterization of ferric (Fe3+) iron on adjacent sections as that used for MFM analysis. While histochemical analysis revealed a substantial difference in the dispersion of the stain between fixed versus unfixed samples, histomagnetic characterization was not dependent on chemical fixation of tissue. The results from this study reveal that histomagnetic characterization of iron is free from staining artifacts which can be present in histochemical analysis.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A hexagonal Ni2In-type single phase is obtained in the (Mn0.7Cu0.3)66Ga34 sample. The superspin glass (SSG) behavior and exchange bias effect are investigated in depth. The DC thermomagnetic M(T) measurements show a remarkable bifurcation between the zero-field cooling and field-cooling patterns below 100 K, suggesting a SSG behavior, which is verified by the simulation of de Almeida–Thouless relation from M(T) curves under different fields. Furthermore, the SSG behavior is justified by the AC susceptibility, temporal magnetic relaxation, and memory effect measurements. The asymmetric response of memory effect clearly indicates that it supports the hierarchical model. More importantly, the fitted parameters including Mydosh parameter Φ = 0.0255, dynamical critical exponent zv = 10.02, and τ0 ~ 5.5 × 10−9 s give the convincing evidences for the SSG behavior at low temperatures for (Mn0.7Cu0.3)66Ga34. Above all, a giant exchange bias field of μ0HEB = 308.4 mT is obtained at T = 2 K under the cooling field μ0HCF = 0.5 T and maximum applied magnetic field |μ0Hmax| = | +μ0H | = | −μ0H | = 8 T. The origin for giant exchange bias effect is discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Pulsed eddy current (PEC) testing was originally reported to sort out heat-treated bearing rings noncontactly and nondestructively in terms of hardness, which is expected to solve the difficulty of online classification and small parts inspection. The signals gathered from PEC system were processed by fast Fourier transform and principal component analysis (PCA) respectively. Then, random forest algorithm was used for smart classification. The results obtained with these processes were presented in this paper and the classification results were discussed. It was observed that the use of PCA produces more robust and better prediction performance on bearing rings classification.© 2020 The Author(s)When thin films are patterned to realize nanoscale device geometries, maintaining their structural integrity is key to the quality of their functional properties. The introduction of new surfaces and interfaces by lateral modifications may alter material properties as well as the expected device functionality. In this study, two different techniques for nanoscale patterning of epitaxial thin films of La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 are used to investigate the effects on their ferromagnetic properties and film crystalline structure. Nanomagnets are realized as free-standing structures and embedded ferromagnets in a paramagnetic matrix, respectively. We find that the magnetic dichroism signal in x-ray spectomicroscopy is stronger along the edges of the embedded magnets close to TC. X-ray-diffraction measurements reveal a reduction of their in-plane lattice parameters. We discuss how in-plane stress from the nanomagnet surroundings can affect the magnetic properties in these structures.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Usually, the zero temperature quantum critical point (QCP) induces a QC regime at low temperature due to the competition between quantum and thermal fluctuations, which is characterized by power-law temperature dependence of thermodynamics. Herein, focusing on the quantum phase transition (QPT) of transeverse-field Ising chain with Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya (DM) interaction, the quantum correlation exhibits temperature scaling. In the absence of magnetic field, the competition between DM interaction and Ising spin coupling manifested by θ angle, gives rise to different ground states such as Ising-type ferromagnetic (xFM), antiferromagnetic (xAFM) and Tomonaga-Luttinger liquid (TLL). As temperature emerges, the TLL phase is crossover into QC regimes with a crossover temperature connecting to a universal linear line T*~|θ-θc1,2| that ends at θc1,2 upon cooling down to 0 K, providing a new clue to capture QCP. Around QCP, the thermal QC scaling is demonstrated by analyzing quantum correlations and specific heat to extract the critical exponents (δ, β, γ and α) that fulfill the Widom and Essam-Fisher scaling laws, which is further verified by scaling hypothesis equations. As a magnetic field is turned on, an additional field-induced transverse ferromagnetic (zFM) phase with gapped low-lying excitation is unveiled. In particular, the Ising-like quantum criticality turns out to be gapless, which is different from the TLL-like one.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, ZnFe2O4-coated FeSiCr (FeSiCr@ZnFe2O4) nanocomposites were fabricated by plasma arc discharging and hydrothermal methods. The polarization strength of composite materials is weakened and the complex permittivity and conductivity are reduced by ZnFe2O4 coating on the FeSiCr surface. The impedance matching of the microwave absorbing materials is optimized. The reflection loss of FeSiCr@ZnFe2O4 nanocomposites is calculated to be −44.2 dB at 15.9 GHz (d = 1.5 mm), and the effective bandwidth (<−10 dB) is between 12.2 and 18 GHz. Economical and abundant raw materials, simple synthesis method, thin coating thickness and strong microwave absorption ability make the FeSiCr@ZnFe2O4 nanocomposite attractive candidate as microwave absorbing materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We experimentally demonstrate a circularly polarized antenna that utilizes unidirectional surface waves that propagate on the boundary of a small ferrite disk. The ferrite disk is metalized on top and is mounted on a grounded dielectric substrate. The disk is normally biased by a magnetic field that is provided by two permanent magnets below and above the structure. A two-section feeding network is used to feed the antenna. The operation frequency of the antenna can be adjusted by changing the magnitude of the applied magnetic bias. The sense of polarization can be reversed by reversing the direction of the applied bias.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Novel computational paradigms may provide the blueprint to help solving the time and energy limitations that we face with our modern computers, and provide solutions to complex problems more efficiently (with reduced time, power consumption and/or less device footprint) than is currently possible with standard approaches. Spintronics offers a promising basis for the development of efficient devices and unconventional operations for at least three main reasons: (i) the low-power requirements of spin-based devices, i.e., requiring no standby power for operation and the possibility to write information with small dynamic energy dissipation, (ii) the strong nonlinearity, time nonlocality, and/or stochasticity that spintronic devices can exhibit, and (iii) their compatibility with CMOS logic manufacturing processes. At the same time, the high endurance and speed of spintronic devices means that they can be rewritten or reconfigured frequently over the lifetime of a circuit, a feature that is essential in many emerging computing concepts. In this perspective, we will discuss how spintronics may aid in the realization of efficient devices, primarily focusing on magnetic tunnel junctions. We then provide a perspective on how these devices can impact the development of three unconventional computing paradigms, namely, reservoir computing, probabilistic computing and memcomputing. These paradigms may be used to address some limitations of modern computers, providing a realistic path to intelligent hybrid CMOS-spintronic systems.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In two dimensional (2D) black phosphorene (BP), most of impurity atoms can introduce the highly local states near the Fermi level, but not necessarily bring spin polarization. The scientific community believes that one of the reasons may be that these impurity states are not partially filled by electrons. In this work, by first principle calculation, the coupling effects of the impurity atoms and the transverse electric field have been considered, our results indicate that the electric field can induce the spin polarization of the impurity states and convert the system from a semiconductor to a magnetic metal in the boron-doped armchair black phosphorene nanoribbons. Furthermore, the effect of electron doping has also been calculated, and we find that adding an extra electron to the system can also cause the spin splitting of the impurity subband and bring the transformation of the system from a semiconductor to a half metal and then to a magnetic semiconductor.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report magnetic and electrical transport properties of polycrystalline as-cast compound Cr2CoAl having inverse Heusler like XA structure with B2 disorder. Temperature-dependent magnetization (M-T) under zero-field cooled (ZFC) and field cooled (FC) condition and field-dependent magnetization (M-H) studies suggest that this compound is a soft magnetic material below Tc ~ 20.5 K having a very low magnetic moment as it is found that magnetization at 5 K under 50 kOe applied magnetic field is ~0.11μB/f.u. Also, M-T data taken ZFC-FC condition under different applied magnetic fields and M-H data taken at 100 K and 300 K indicate that this compound may have magnetic clusters in paramagnetic matrix. Further analysis and temperature-dependent heat capacity measurement reveal paramagnetic to a short-range ordered ferromagnetic transition near Tc ≈ 20.5 K and also reveal the presence of magnetic clusters within the compound. These magnetic clusters may arise because of B2 disorder in the compound. Temperature-dependent resistivity measurement confirms that the compound Cr2CoAl is metallic as it is found increasing with temperature. Nonlinearity in temperature dependency resistivity data, observed in low- temperature region, follows T2 dependency that generally comes because of electron–electron scattering. Magneto-resistance (MR) is also found to be positive throughout the temperature region from 8 K to 390 K.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Effects of magnetic dipole interactions on specific loss power (SLP) for Zn0.3Fe2.7O4/SiO2 core/shell nanoparticles (NPs) with identical magnetic core size and varying non-magnetic shell thicknesses were systematically investigated. In the case of thin silica shell, NPs form chain-like structures due to strong dipole interactions between NPs. The chain formation induces additional shape anisotropy. With increasing thickness of the silica shell, the dipole interaction and therefore the anisotropy induced by the dipole interactions decrease. Meanwhile, the hydrodynamic size of the NPs shows a counterintuitive reduction with increasing shell thickness, also due to the decrease in interactions. The magnetic anisotropy and hydrodynamic size affect the SLP through changes in the Néel and Brownian relaxation rates, leading to different field-dependent SLP values for NPs with thin and thick shells.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic, dielectric, and magnetoelectric (ME) properties of particulate composites containing lead-free piezoelectric 0.97[0.67BiFeO3-0.33BaTiO3]-0.03Bi(Zn0.5Ti0.5) O3 (BF33BT-3BZT) and magnetostrictive CoFe2O4 (CFO); (100-x)[BF33BT-3BZT]-xCFO, x = 13, 25, 37, 47 mol%; have been investigated. The pure ferroelectric BF33BT-3BZT shows a non-dispersive and sharp phase transition, while the composites exhibit relaxor behavior which is described by Vogel - Fulcher law. The ME voltage coefficient is studied as a complex quantity and its dependence on magnetic field is discussed within the framework of dynamic magnetostriction. The composite with x = 37 shows the highest ME voltage coefficient of 5.7 mV/cm.Oe. The results show that, compared to cobalt ferrite, the composite of BF33BT-3BZT with nickel ferrite produces larger ME voltage at a lower magnetic field, confirming that the magnetic field dependence of magnetostriction has a crucial role on the ME properties of the studied multiferroic composites.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This work is dedicated to the synthesis and characterization of antibody labeled magnetic nanoparticles as promising tool for biomedical applications. Single core magnetic nanoparticles were synthesized by thermal decomposition technique, followed by surface modification with ligand based on polyethylene glycol derivative. Fluorochrome-labeled species-specific antibodies were covalently conjugated to MNPs through a polyethylene glycol linker. The immunofluorescent analysis showed the successful binding of anti-α-tubulin or anti-β-catenin antibodies conjugated MNPs to α-tubulin and β-catenin in 4T1 cells of mouse breast cancer.© 2020It is well known that in double perovskites, the degree of cation ordering plays a very important role in determining the intrinsic magnetic properties. Therefore, in order to distinguish between the intrinsic properties and the disordered cation driven magnetic properties, we have grown ordered and disordered epitaxial thin films of Lu2MnNiO6 (LMNO) using two different cubic substrates (0 0 1)-LaAlO3 and (0 0 1)-SrTiO3 (LAO and STO respectively) by pulsed laser deposition (PLD) method. It is found that both LMNO films grow in monoclinic crystal symmetry and possess two out-of-plane domains (1 1 0) and (0 0 1). Moreover, various in-plane rotations of these domains give rise to a total of six in-plane twin variants. The films show dominant ferromagnetic nature. Due to good lattice matching with LAO, LMNO/LAO films are well-ordered and exhibit a sharp ferromagnetic to paramagnetic transition at TC = 38 K, whereas, the large lattice mismatch with STO resulted in disordered LMNO/STO films and TC is lowered to 34 K. The value of maximum magnetization (MS, at 70 kOe) in disordered LMNO/STO (MS = 2.4 μB/f.u.) is almost half of that in the ordered LMNO/LAO (MS = 4.0 μB/f.u.). Interestingly, the well-ordered LMNO/LAO films show memory effect and relaxation of magnetization in the entire temperature range below TC. This is in conformance to the intrinsic glassy magnetic nature of LMNO.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic skyrmions are topological chiral spin textures, which have potential application in storage-memory and other spintronic devices. Zero-field skyrmion and high-density skyrmion are the two most important aspects for the future skyrmion-based device applications. Here, we experimentally study the room temperature zero-field skyrmion and the evolution of high density skyrmion in [Pd/Co/Pd]N multilayer films from structure symmetry to asymmetry. The results show that the density of zero-field skyrmion can be adjusted by the number of cycles at the constant thickness of Co 0.4 nm. The maximum density ηSk, determined by Lorentz TEM observation, reaches 60 μm−2 in [Pd(3)/Co(1)/Pd(2)]15 multilayer film. We also found that the maximum density ηSk mainly occur in the reversible region of magnetization reversal by the first-order reversal curve (FORC) analysis. Interestingly, the polarity of zero-field skyrmion can be tuned by different MFM tips. The simulated results well confirm the experimental result. Our findings provide a pathway for designing the zero-field and high density skyrmion in magnetic multilayer films, which may apply for the development of skyrmion-based spintronic devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic susceptibility of structurally intact bone may play a role in low frequency (below 10 kHz), low field (below 10 mT amplitude) pulsed electromagnetic field (LF PEMF) treatment of fracture non-unions and an adjunct to cervical fusion surgery, approved by the U.S Food and Drug Administration (FDA). The aim of this study was to determine if a difference in PEMF treatment results in measurable differences in the bone magnetic susceptibility using a model of structurally intact rat vertebrae. We measured bone volume magnetic susceptibility by a custom built mechanical resonator comprising a diametrically-polarized NdFeB permanent dipole magnet cylinder (25.4 × 25.4 mm, height by diameter) rotated about its axis by a stepper motor at even intervals from 53 to 63 RPM, acting as a source of a local, oscillating magnetic field (mean field of 95 mT, gradient of 12 T/m) on an intact laboratory rat lumbar vertebrae (n = 21, from tissue repository from past studies on LF PEMF treatment in vivo) suspended 26.0 mm from magnet axis on a thin line of 80 mm nominal length forming a pendulum of nominal eigenfrequency of 100 Hz. The vertebra motion was captured by a video camera and the geometrical center of its 2D image motion was analyzed by ImagePro® and MATLAB® routines. The amplitude of bone oscillations (at twice the angular frequency of the rotating magnet) showed a characteristic pattern of resonance with the magnet rotational frequency. The amplitude maximum agreed with that calculated from a model of forced, damped harmonic oscillator and the diamagnetic tension force acting on bone. The calculated mean volume magnetic susceptibility (SI) of -was on the order of magnitude of literature value (|χ|≈10-5). The results point to the bone site-specific aspect of LF PEMF therapy and provide experimental and theoretical basis for a novel, rational method of designing next generation of effective LF PEMF therapies.© 2020Environmentally friendly magnetic coal-based activated carbon (MCAC) with high adsorption performance has been synthesized by using a facile one-step method. The samples were prepared with ratios of ferrocene to Ningxia coking coal to be 0:1, 1:2, 1:1, 2:1 and 3:1 (denoted as CAC, MCAC-1:2, MCAC-1:1, MCAC-2:1 and MCAC-3:1, respectively). Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) observation indicated that there were a large number of pores with diameters below 500 nm on surface of the MCAC. Magnetic properties of the samples were characterized by vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM), with saturation magnetizations of 9.55–22.48 emu/g. Due to the activation of KOH and the introduction of magnetic particles, the MCAC had a maximum specific surface area of 1188.00 m2/g and a maximum total porosity of 0.50 cm3/g. As a result, the MCAC exhibited excellent adsorption properties to remove methylene blue (MB), with an adsorption capacity of 238.56 mg/g, while the adsorption rate was still 88% after 5 cycles. Therefore, this strategy can be used as a reference for the clean and efficient use of coal.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles of different shapes and sizes combined with 5-(4-carboxyphenyl)-10,15,20-triphenylporphinatozinc(II) (SPION-ZnCTPP) were prepared and investigated as a novel and potent magnetically responsive photocatalyst. Nanospheres and nanocubes of SPIONs in the sizes of 10 and 20 nm were synthesized using thermal decomposition method before coating with ZnCTPP. Morphologies of SPIONs were observed using a transmission electron microscope (TEM). Herein the attachment of ZnCTPP on particles was studied using various techniques including infrared spectroscopy (IR) and UV–visible spectroscopy and Inductively Coupled Plasma Optical Emission Spectroscopy (ICP-OES). Moreover, the obtained particles showed superparamagnetic character with saturation magnetization in a range of 10 to 76 emu/g, depending on the size and shape of the SPIONs. The SPION-ZnCTPP showed high photocatalytic activity (52% yield) for amide synthesis between potassium ethanethioate and 4-methoxyaniline under irradiation with a 19 W LED lamp, and this heterogeneous catalyst could be well separated from a solution under the induction of an external magnetic field.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the present study we report a successful synthesis of the new intermetallic compound Nd2PtGe3 by an arc-melting method. The powder X-ray diffraction analysis indicates that this compound crystallizes in an disordered variant of the AlB2-type structure (space group P6/mmm, no. 191) with lattice parameters a = 4.2455 Å and c = 4. 1933 Å. The compound exhibits a cluster-glass transition below Tf = 2.9 K, characterized through ac and dc magnetic susceptibility and heat capacity measurements.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We predict that spin-waves in an ordered square quantum antiferromagnet in a magnetic field (h) perpendicular to antiferromagnetic plane may demonstrate three modes of spin excitations. Starting from the self-consistent rotation-invariant Green's function method, a new mean-field theory is constructed for h≠0. The method preserves the translational and the axial symmetries, and provides exact fulfillment of the single-site constraint for each of the three modes. We examine the dynamical structure factors Sαα(k,ω),α(β) = x, y, z. It is shown, that the introduction of h leads to the hybridization of two degenerate spin modes due to the appearance of a nondiagonal on α,β spin-spin Green's functions. The comparison of the theory with the exact diagonalization study and with results on inelastic neutron scattering experiments is discussed at T = 0. We discuss also the correspondence of the present theory to the existing theories, which allow only two spin excitations modes for the total S(k,ω).© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The nontrivial magnetoopitcal effects are predicted to arise at the visible frequency range for monolayer transition metal dichalcogenides upon the application of magnetic exchange interactions. However, their magnetoopitcal rotation angles at the terahertz frequency range are always low, which hinders their practical applications in the terahertz magnetoopitcal devices. In this letter, we theoretically demonstrate that the magnetoopitcal effects of monolayer transition metal dichalcogenides at the terahertz frequency range can be enhanced and controlled via introducing the Rashba spin orbit coupling, whose rotation angles are comparable with those of conventional bulky magnetic materials. Such an effect originates from the change of spin-up and spin-down bands in the band structures of monolayer transition metal dichalcogenides when the Rashba spin orbit coupling and magnetic exchange interaction coexist, which enables the spin-flip intraband optical transitions and thus generates the terahertz magnetoopitcal responses. Our results open up possibilities for the use of Rashba spin orbit coupling to generate as well as control the magnetoopitcal effects in two-dimensional layered materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties and domain structure of a Fe78Si9B13 amorphous alloy with a stress gradient from upper to the lower surface were investigated. We found that the magnetic properties of the samples vary significantly upon stress variation. Specifically, the magnetic anisotropy increases linearly with the maximum stress, whereas the coercivity, although higher than the one without stress, remains reasonably small. The phase contrast in magnetic force microscopy image and the fingerprint-like domains in magneto-optical Kerr microscopy images for ribbon surface with compressive stress demonstrate the presence of perpendicular anisotropy due to the magneto-elastic coupling. As a result, the compressive stress hinders the reversible magnetization vector rotation and makes the magnetization hard to be saturated. However, the stress causes no irreversible effects, neither on the domain wall movement nor on the magnetization rotation. Thus it is irrelevant to the coercivity. These results are different from the situation of the inhomogeneously distributed quenched-in stress enlarging the coercivity in Fe-based amorphous alloys.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic-thermal-structural performances (MTSP) in an electromagnetic rail launcher have a significant influence on the successful launch capability. However, it is difficult to explore the MTSP directly through the experimental measurement due to the approximately adiabatic processes in the in-bore environment of the launcher, which further limits us to understand the multi-field properties in the electromagnetic launch process. Considering the interaction between the magnetic field and the thermal field, a transient multi-field coupling model is proposed to investigate the MTSP for the electromagnetic launch based on the finite element method in this paper. The model validation is presented through a comparison of the model prediction with the experimental data of the magnetic flux density and the temperature. The MTSP for an electromagnetic railgun are then analyzed in detail with the effect of the pulse power supply parameter and rail sizes. The results show the pulse power supply parameter has a significant effect on the MTSP near the electromagnetic railgun breech and the rail damage can be decreased with a larger rail size. Moreover, we found the rail was most easily to damage at the rail edge position of the inner sidewall, which is consistent with the groove-shaped damage position in the rail after an experimental test. The results of these investigations will help improve the design of an electromagnetic launcher.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Spinel ferrite is a class of magnetic materials which derives this name due to its similarity with the naturally occurring MgAl2O4 mineral. Also known by the name of ‘cubic ferrites’, these ferrites have been the center of attraction for material scientists ever since their discovery. Among these spinel ferrites, nickel ferrites have become one of the best options for usage in different applications such as medical treatment, electronic devices, electromagnetic wave absorption materials and water purification. The popularity of these ferrites is due to their favourable properties such as high permeability, high resistivity and high saturation magnetization. The purpose of writing this review paper is to summarize the major researches in the field of nickel ferrites on one platform. The major research findings are tabulated and briefly summarized. The review paper is divided into four major sections. The first section, “Introduction to spinel ferrites”, presents different types of magnetic behaviors, the classification of ferrites, and a brief introduction to spinel ferrites and their structures. The second section, “Nickel spinel ferrites”, briefly describes nickel spinel ferrites, their possible applications, and different methods of their synthesis. The third section, named as “Different dopings in nickel spinel ferrites”, outlines the major research attempts in the field of nickel ferrites and their derivatives. The final and fourth section, “Different properties of nickel ferrites”, summarizes the major properties of nickel ferrites, which have been commonly studied.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We analyze the ground state phase diagrams of the Kondo alloy model (KAM) as a function of Kondo coupling (JK), electronic band filling (nc) and magnetic impurity concentration (x). We use DMFT/CPA method to treat the disorder and the inter-site electronic exchange correlations along with mean-field (MF) approximations to decouple the Kondo interaction. Here, we generalize “Doniach-like” phase diagrams of the periodic Kondo lattice (x=1) to Kondo alloys. We consider the competition between the paramagnetic Kondo phase (K) and purely ferromagnetic (F) or staggered antiferromagnetic (AF) ordered phases. Our phase diagrams are consistent with various experimentally obtained phase diagrams for alloys like CexLa1-xPt2Si2, CexLa1-xNi2Ge2, CexLa1-xRu2Si2, CexLa1-xPd2Si2, or CexLa1-xCu2Ge2.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a detail study on the effectiveness of high substrate temperature (TS) during deposition versus in situ annealing of the films at high temperature (TA) after sputtering at room-temperature is compared with an objective to obtain Heusler alloy thin films of Co2FeAl (CFA) having optimally low αint (with an upper bound of 1.75 × 10-3) and 12–17% smaller MS by employing ion beam sputtering technique and Si(100) as substrates for current induced magnetization switching application. In each of the two series of CFA films, prepared with different choice of TS and TA (lying in 300–773 K range) were explored for optimally tailoring their structural, static and dynamic magnetization properties. Structural study revealed that although all the CFA films were polycrystalline but the post-deposition annealed films were structurally optimal with higher density (6.36 ± 0.09 g/cm3) and lower interface roughness (0.48 ± 0.03 nm) compared to the CFA films grown at high TS (6.23 ± 0.06 g/cm3, 0.61 ± 0.01 nm). In plane field-angle dependent longitudinal magneto optical Kerr effect (L-MOKE) study revealed the existence of a coupling between the weak uniaxial and biaxial magnetic anisotropies present in these films, attributed to the employed deposition geometry. Ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) spectroscopy measurements, performed in both the geometries - in-plane as well as out of plane, revealed a lowest value of 1.19 (±0.08) × 10-3 of αint in the film post-annealed at 773 K. In addition, the observed non-linear relation between the αint and the dynamical ‘g’-factor suggests that the contribution of spin orbit interaction to the damping is far less compared to the damping contribution from the DOS present near the Fermi level. It is remarkable to note that the as-grown CFA films sputtered at room temperature exhibited a record lowest value of 1.73 (±0.09) × 10-3 of αint. Attainment of such small value of Gilbert damping and having moderate magnetization in high spin polarized Co2FeAl Heusler films sputtered on the Si (100) substrate opens up their great application potential in future spintronics devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A comprehensive investigation of stress-induced anisotropy in 300 nm Fe81Ga19 (FeGa) thin films with stripe domain structures has been performed by comparing static and dynamic measurements. The formation and rotation of stripe domains under a compressive stress have been imaged by magnetic force microscopy and understood by micromagnetic simulations. A double magnetic anisotropy system, combing the stress-induced uniaxial magnetic anisotropy and the rotatable magnetic anisotropy caused by the stripe domain structure was achieved in FeGa thin films. The ferromagnetic resonance frequency of 300 nm FeGa thin films with stripe domains can be enhanced from 2.7 to 3.0 GHz without sacrificing the initial permeability. This found provides us a new approach via utilizing the double magnetic anisotropies in magnetic films with stripe domains to enhance the resonance frequency beyond the Snoek's limit and extends the application for FeGa films to flexible microwave devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The ordering transformation of solid solution and the insufficient 1:5H boundary phase in the final magnets challenge the realization of high performance in Sm2Co17 magnets with high iron content. The investigation correlates the ordering degree of solid solutions to the cellular structure of the final magnets with the composition of Sm(CobalFexCu0.06Zr0.02)7.8 in which x ranges from 0.30 to 0.36. The ordering tendency of solid solution increases with increasing iron content. Rietveld structure refinement demonstrates that increasing iron content reduces the occupancy of Sm at Co-Co dumbbell sites in 2:17R, as well as Zr solubility on Sm 6c sites, leading to higher ordering degree and less Z planar phase formation separately. Antiphase boundaries (APBs) arising from the different 2:17R variants with the same or different directions were frequently observed in solid solutions, which facilitate the nucleation and formation of 1:5H phase during aging treatment. With increasing Fe content, the width of nanotwins increases and thus the APB density decreases in the solid solution. Furthermore, overlapping zones appear in solid solutions with higher Fe content, which will retain and enlarge as the twins grow during aging treatment, inhibiting the formation of 1:5H boundary phase. In addition, the density of Z phase declines and more defective platelet phases occur in x = 0.36 magnets, which depress the element diffusion and re-distribution during slow cooling. The above correlation between solid solution and cellular structure well explain the structure origin for the deterioration of magnetic performance with higher Fe content, which may provide guidance for further performance improvement in Sm2Co17 type magnets with higher iron content.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The angular dependence of FMR resonance field (HR) in infinite arrays formed by ellipsoid chains was analytically calculated. Revolution ellipsoids with transversal semi-axis, a = 15 nm and longitudinal semi-axis, c = εa, are constituted by nickel. The calculation of magnetic total energy was performed for chains composed by ellipsoids with different aspect ratio: ε = 1, 2, 4, 8, 16 and 32. Ellipsoid chains are parallel and arranged in a two-dimensional hexagonal ordering. The ellipsoids constituting each chain are in direct contact without exchange interactions, such that the center to center ellipsoids distance into the chain is r = 2c. Only dipolar and Zeeman energetic contributions were included in magnetic energy, and the direct calculation for inter-ellipsoids contribution was performed. The inter-chains dipolar interaction was obtained based on experimental results for nanowires arrays with the same spatial distribution. Three different values of the packing factor were used corresponding to inter-chain distances d = 55, 60 and 65 nm. The effect of ellipsoid́s aspect ratio and packing factor were manifested in HR values as well as anisotropy field, HA.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The application of advanced textile materials functionalized with magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) has become increasingly important in tumor therapy. In this regard, the incorporation of MNP into polymeric filaments, so-called hybrid filaments, enables the development of magnetic heatable stents that, once implanted, are used to deliver therapeutic heat to the tumor site under the influence of an external alternating magnetic field (AMF). In this study, we investigate the hyperthermia performance of different hybrid filaments functionalized with MNP and discuss the relevant parameters influencing the heating efficiency such as MNP immobilization, agglomeration and magnetization as well as AMF settings. For this, three different MNP types (self-synthesized single domain MNP and two commercially available multi-domain MNP, BAYFERROX® and BNF-Starch) were incorporated in polypropylene filaments by melt spinning. Their heating efficiency was assessed in dependence of the AMF amplitude. Because of the blocking of Brownian rotation and bigger effective anisotropy constant caused by MNP agglomeration inside the filaments, the heating efficiency of all hybrid filaments was smaller than that of the corresponding MNP dispersed in water. Nevertheless, in all cases the heating efficiency increased with magnetic field amplitude. The highest specific loss power (SLP) values were reached for the self-synthesized particles at lower magnetic field amplitudes (<25 kA/m) and for BNF-Starch particles at high magnetic field amplitudes (>25 kA/m). This is caused by the higher anisotropy constant of the BNF-Starch particles and their collective magnetic response at higher magnetic field amplitudes.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Anisotropy constants are obtained from an analysis of single crystal magnetization curves measured up to high fields. The anisotropy of the 3d transition metal sublattice is considered, as well as molecular exchange field coupling between the rare-earth (R) and transition metal sublattices (M). This procedure allows for non colinear R and M magnetic moments, meaning that their angles with respect to the easy axis are independent variables. With this approach we obtain anisotropy constants that are larger than those reported in the literature, which reflects the anisotropy of the isolated R sublattice. Results for Co and/or Ce doped Nd2Fe14B single crystals are presented, showing the influence of such substitutions on the magnetocrystalline anisotropy. These results indicate that the enhanced performance of NdFeB-based magnets co-doped with Ce and Co can be ascribed to an improvement in intrinsic properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The structural, electronic and magnetic properties of electron doped Sr2-xAxMnVO6 (A = Sn, Bi) for x = 0.5, 1.0, 1.5, 2.0 were investigated using density functional theory (DFT) within generalized gradient approximation (GGA). Rocksalt and layered type orderings of B(Bʹ) cationic sites in Sn/Bi doped Sr2MnVO6 (SMVO) double perovskites were considered and it was found that the most stable ordering is a rocksalt type ordering in both Sn and Bi doped systems for all x concentrations. A structural phase transition from tetragonal to monoclinic and triclinic structures was observed for different doped compounds. Calculations demonstrated a half metal–insulator transition for Sr2-xAxMnVO6 with x < 2.0 and x > 0.5 upon Sn and Bi doping, respectively. Like the parent compound, ferromagnetic coupling between Mn and V was found to be the ground state for all doping concentrations of Sn and Bi. The magnetic moment of SMVO enhanced significantly due to doping. Calculated distortion parameters and bond angles indicated that the end members of each series, Sn2MnVO6 and Bi2MnVO6, undergo a significant octahedral tilting and distortion, which may result in a large value of electric polarization and hence, may be suggested as potential multiferroic materials.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effect of Cu addition in the range of 0 – 1.0 wt% on the magnetic induction and iron loss of 6.5 wt% Si electrical steel is investigated. The microstructure and texture of the steels are also analysed to reveal the mechanisms by which their magnetic properties after annealing are affected by Cu addition. Cu addition up to 0.7 wt% is found to increase magnetic induction B50 although the increase is very small due to the formation of η-fiber texture. The iron loss of 6.5 wt% Si electrical steel decreases with increasing Cu addition to up to 0.5 wt%, but increases with further Cu addition. When Cu addition is increased to 0.7 wt%, the iron loss for this steel becomes higher than for that without Cu addition. Microstructural analysis suggests that Cu addition of up to 0.5 wt% can promote the recrystallization during annealing and increase the recrystallized grain size, leading to a decrease in iron loss. With further increase in Cu addition, especially beyond 0.7 wt%, large numbers of fine ε-Cu precipitates form in the microstructure during warm-rolling, which inhibit grain growth during annealing. This is the main reason for the observed increase in iron loss when Cu addition is over 0.5 wt% Cu. The Cu addition range for achieving the optimum magnetic properties for 6.5 wt% Si electrical steel is 0.3 – 0.5 wt%.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline samples of the intercalation compound Fe0.25TiS2 (FeTi4S8) with an ordered monoclinic crystal structure of the M5S8 type have been synthesized and studied by X-ray diffraction, magnetization and magnetoresistance measurements. It has been shown that application of a magnetic field in the magnetically ordered state (below ~52 K) is accompanied by significant changes in the electrical resistivity (|Δρ/ρ| up to 35%), which is attributed to the phase transition from the virgin antiferromagnetic (AFM) state to the forced ferromagnetic (FM) state. The AFM-FM transition in Fe0.25TiS2 is found to be irreversible, which is supported by the presence of a large remnant magnetoresistance (~–33%). At low temperatures, the magnetization reversal in the forced metastable FM state is accompanied by a large magnetic hysteresis (Hc up to 45 kOe) associated with the presence of an unquenched orbital moment on Fe ions and crystal-field effects. The Hc value is found to decay exponentially with increasing temperature. The Ising character of Fe ions together with magnetoelastic interaction are suggested to result in the existence of a high-coercive metastable FM state in Fe0.25TiS2.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The objective of this work is to study the magneto-Seebeck and transverse Nernst-Ettingshausen effects in semiconductors with spherical hollow pores of varying diameter from micrometers down to nanometers. The change in the magneto-Seebeck and Nernst coefficients due to the porosity is examined using a model based on the Gamma distribution of the pore sizes. Sound analytical expressions are found for the coefficients under both isothermal and adiabatic conditions in the presence of weak and strong non-quantizing magnetic fields. It is shown that the porosity leads to the decrease in the magneto-Seebeck coefficient in absolute value as compared with bulk material in both weak and strong fields. In contrast to that, the Nernst coefficient increases linearly with increasing porosity in strong fields while decreases by hyperbolic law in weak fields. The change in the coefficients is the greater the less is the average pore diameter.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The soft magnetic performances of the Fe-6.5 wt.%Si (FeSi) soft magnetic composites (SMCs) insulated with different materials, including organic, inorganic, and soft magnetic materials with high resistivity, and composite coating of inorganic-magnetic layer, under the same fabrication condition have been compared and analyzed by synchronously considering their coating preparation parameters. The core–shell structure of the coated powder was characterized by using a combination of SEM-EDS, FTIR, and XRD. Loss separation fitting model was established to evaluate the source of each part loss for the corresponding FeSi SMCs above. Due to the fact that the SMCs insulated with inorganic or/and magnetic ferrite materials exhibit high bulk resistivity more than 1.4 Ω·m, their eddy current losses account for lower contribution of only 20.2 ~ 22.1% of total core loss compared with that of 61.9% for the SMCs coated alone with organic resin. As compared to the other insulation materials, the SMCs coated using inorganic material (SiO2 or TiO2) exhibit a better DC-bias over 75.5%, higher retain real-part permeability exceed 44.6 at an applied field of 7960 A/m, a relatively low total core loss of 1040.6 kW/m3 at 100 kHz, 0.1 T, and can be fabricated at room temperature with a total preparation time of 70 min, which is favorable for being widely used in industry. The results of this work offered a referable ideal to design insulating layer for other SMCs.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The roles of cobalt and boron in an FeCoBSi soft magnetic composite (SMC) containing magnetic flakes with in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy were investigated. When cobalt was added to the magnetic flakes in the SMC, in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy was effectively induced, and coercivity in the easy axis direction remarkably decreased after annealing under a magnetic field in comparison with the case without addition of cobalt. In particular, the addition of cobalt was essential to decrease coercivity in the SMC, in marked contrast to simple amorphous ribbons in which coercivity decreased even without addition of cobalt but in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy was not induced. Boron prevented crystallization of the magnetic amorphous phase, with boron content of more than approximately 18 at% relative to FeCo necessary to produce an amorphous phase without crystallization, resulting in low coercivity and in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy. High saturation magnetization of 1.12 T and low coercivity of 0.32 Oe with in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy were obtained with a composition of Fe55.5Co23.7B14.2Si6.6 (Co/(Fe + Co) = 30 at% and B/(Fe + Co) = 18 at%) in the fabricated SMC.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Vascular stent implantation needs a rapid endothelialization to reduce morbidity and improve patient outcomes. A promising strategy to enhance the artery wall healing is to use the site-specific drug targeting technique to deliver the required medication at the site of injury. This work presents a new concept of using permanent magnet systems to guide and target the functionalized magnetoresponsive nanocomposite clusters around the ferromagnetic stent. In our experiment, the PEG-coated magnetic clusters capture and deposition are based on the competition between the drag force and the magnetic force exerted by both the magnetic field gradient generated by the permanent external magnet and the ferromagnetic stent. Also, the ferromagnetic stent was tested for biological toxicity, and the result shown the excellent device biocompatibility. Stent magnetic particle targeting process generates an almost uniform strut coverage with PEG-coated MNP's within the different stent segments (proximal, central, and distal segment), but visibly different between stent segments. The magnetic clusters deposition stability in time demonstrates that stent struts coverage remains quasi constant after 1 min of exposure to the flow shear stress.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The spin-1/2 chain with antiferromagnetic exchange J1 and J2=αJ1 between first and second neighbors, respectively, has both gapless and gapped (Δα>0) quantum phases at frustration 0⩽α⩽3/4. The ground state instability of regular (δ=0) chains to dimerization (δ>0) drives a spin-Peierls transition at TSP(α) that varies with α in these strongly correlated systems. The thermodynamic limit of correlated states is obtained by exact treatment of short chains followed by density matrix renormalization group calculations of progressively longer chains. The doubly degenerate ground states of the gapped regular phase are bond order waves (BOWs) with long-range bond-bond correlations and electronic dimerization δe(α). The T dependence of δe(T,α) is found using four-spin correlation functions and contrasted to structural dimerization δ(T,α) at T⩽TSP(α). The relation between TSP(α) and the T=0 gap Δ(δ(0),α) varies with frustration in both gapless and gapped phases. The magnetic susceptibility χ(T,α) at T>TSP can be used to identify physical realizations of spin-Peierls systems. The α=1/2 chain illustrates the characteristic BOW features of a regular chain with a large singlet-triplet gap and electronic dimerization.© 2020This study presents the electronic and mechanical characteristics of ternary silver-based Ag3CrX4 (X = S, Se, and Te) chalcogenides having simple cubic crystalline structure (SC), conforming P4-3m (space group: 215) that are studied under the spin-polarized Generalized Gradient Approach (GGA) within the framework of the Density Functional Theory (DFT). The stable magnetic phase has been determined as the ferromagnetic (FM) phase for all studied systems. Then, phase stability, mechanical, thermal and electronic characteristics of Ag3CrX4 chalcogenides have been reported. In the calculated spin polarized electronic band structures for Ag3CrX4 chalcogenides, as an indicator of half-metallic behavior, metallicity has been observed in the majority spin channel, while indirect band gaps (1.04 eV for Ag3CrS4, 1.10 eV for Ag3CrSe4, and 1.25 eV for Ag3CrTe4) have been determined in the minority spin channel. Moreover, Ag3CrX4 chalcogenides have been found as thermodynamically stable and structurally synthesizable considering the calculated negative formation enthalpies. Elastic constants of studied chalcogenides satisfying Born-Huang criteria's pointed out the mechanical stability of materials. The predicted mechanical properties determined with elastic constants revealed that Ag3CrX4 chalcogenides belong to soft and ductile material family.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work we perform HDDR treatment on Nd-Fe-B strip cast alloys and investigate the structure, morphology and particle size of ball-milled original and HDDR powders. After HDDR treatment, the columnar Nd2Fe14B grains are refined into equiaxed polyhedral grains with average size of 2.04 µm and the Nd-rich phase redistributes at triple junctions or along the grain boundaries. During ball milling process, the columnar grains are broken into monocrystalline powders by transgranular fracture while the HDDR equiaxed grains are cracked into single crystalline powders along the grain boundaries, thus the HDDR powders show equiaxed polyhedral morphology with higher sphericity and present more Nd-rich phase crystal planes than original powders. The HDDR powders exhibit smaller particle size and narrower size distribution (d50 = 1.92 µm, relative span = 1.463) than original powders (d50 = 2.51 µm, relative span = 1.705). Moreover, the HDDR powders with smaller particle size present higher magnetization (131.4 emu/g) than original powders (128.2 emu/g), which illustrates the reduction of surface damage due to intergranular fracture. Therefore, we believe that this HDDR powders are conducive to the preparation of high coercivity sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets.© 2020Asymmetric Ir/Co/Pt and Pt/Co/Ir trilayers with a wedged Co layer (Co thickness d = 0 ÷ 3.6 nm) were deposited by magnetron sputtering on naturally oxidized Si substrates with a Ta/Au buffer. Their magnetic properties have been investigated using magneto-optical polar Kerr effect and Brillouin light scattering (BLS) technique in the Damon-Eshbach geometry. The BLS measurements shows a frequency asymmetry between Stokes and anti-Stokes peaks position, exploited to determine interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction energy density DS. DS was nearly two times larger for the Ir/Co/Pt trilayer than for the Pt/Co/Ir with opposite chirality. The effective uniaxial magnetic anisotropy and Ds depend non-monotonically on d with a maximum at d ≈ 1.2 nm. The asymmetry in linewidth for Stokes and anti-Stokes peaks is observed for both Ir/Co/Pt and Pt/Co/Ir trilayers for d < 1.6 nm, and it is increasing with decrease of Co thickness.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The crystal structure and magnetic properties of Co3-XNiXO4 (CNO) (0 ≤ X ≤ 1.28) powder samples produced from uniformly precipitated Co1-YNiY(OH)2 (X = 3Y) precursors were investigated herein. The X-ray diffraction analysis of the samples showed that they had a cubic spinel structure when 0 ≤ X ≤ 1.28. With increasing nickel content (X), the saturation magnetization per formula unit MS at 5 K increased from 0 μB at X = 0 to 0.97 μB at X = 0.74, and subsequently decreased to 0.78 μB at X = 1.28. When X ≥ 0.23, the magnetic transition temperature increased from 35 K at X = 0.23 to 290 K at X = 1.28. The distribution of the cations in the crystal was estimated from the lattice parameters and saturation magnetization data, MS-Exp, measured at 5 K. The estimated compositional dependence of the saturation magnetization MS-Fit was consistent with the observed trend in the MS-Exp.© 2020 The Author(s)High-resolution tunneling electron spin transport properties (longitudinal spin current (LSC) and spin transfer torque (STT) maps) of topologically distinct real-space magnetic skyrmionic textures are reported by employing a 3D-WKB combined scalar charge and vector spin transport theory in the framework of spin-polarized scanning tunneling microscopy (SP-STM). For our theoretical investigation metastable skyrmionic spin structures with various topological charges (Q=-3,-2,-1,0,1,2) in the (Pt0.95Ir0.05)/Fe/Pd(111) ultrathin magnetic film are considered. Using an out-of-plane magnetized SP-STM tip it is found that the maps of the LSC vectors acting on the spins of the magnetic textures and all STT vector components exhibit the same topology as the skyrmionic objects. In contrast, an in-plane magnetized tip generally does not result in spin transport vector maps that are topologically equivalent to the underlying spin structure, except for the LSC vectors acting on the spins of the skyrmionic textures at a specific relation between the spin polarizations of the sample and the tip. The magnitudes of the spin transport vector quantities exhibit close relations to charge current SP-STM images irrespectively of the skyrmionic topologies. Moreover, we find that the STT efficiency (torque/current ratio) acting on the spins of the skyrmions can reach large values up to ~25 meV/μA (~0.97 h/e) above the rim of the magnetic objects, but it considerably varies between large and small values depending on the lateral position of the SP-STM tip above the topological spin textures. A simple expression for the STT efficiency is introduced to explain its variation. Our calculated spin transport vectors can be used for the investigation of spin-polarized tunneling-current-induced spin dynamics of topologically distinct surface magnetic skyrmionic textures.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We present an analytical study of domain-wall internal structure and orientation in a ferromagnetic film with out-of-plane anisotropy and the anisotropic interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (iDMI). The term “anisotropic” means that the iDMI constant is different for different in-plane directions. The interplay between the magnetostatic interaction and the iDMI in a domain wall defines both its structure and orientation. In the case of the isotropic iDMI there is no preferable orientation of the DW in the film plane leading to formation of labyrinth domain structure with random shapes of the domains. In the case of the anisotropic iDMI an oriented domain stripe structure and zigzag domains appear. Depending on system parameters, either the Bloch domain walls, or the Néel ones or the hybrid canted walls realize in the magnetic film. The spatial orientation of the DW and the orientation of the magnetization rotation plane in the DW are intimately related by a simple linear ratio. The analytical results are corroborated by micromagnetic simulations.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we investigate the effective magnetic anisotropy constant Keff of single-core magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) as a function of temperature applying two approaches, which both are based on the Stoner-Wohlfarth model: First, the coercive field is used to determine the anisotropy field and second the descending branch of the magnetic moment-vs.-magnetic field (m-H) curve measured on immobilized MNPs is fitted with an empirical model. In particular, we compare the analysis with and without considering the distribution of core size, which is estimated from fitting the m-H curve measured on MNP suspensions. Good agreement between the Keff(T) curves estimated with both methods is found if the size distribution is included while significant deviations are observed especially at high temperatures if the size distribution is ignored. Additionally, the blocking temperature was obtained from the maximum of the temperature derivation of the difference between the field-cooled (FC) and zero-field-cooled (ZFC) magnetization curve. The Keff value determined from the blocking temperature showed reasonable agreement with those obtained from coercive field and m-H curve. We also found that the magnetic moment of both studied single-core MNP systems exhibits a significant paramagnetic-like contribution even at 7 T.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetophoresis of micrometer sized superparamagnetic beads on sputtered Ir/Co(1.2 nm)/Ir multilayers with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy has been investigated. We show that domain walls motion in these layer systems is controlling the motion of the beads in an aqueous environment, where the domain wall motion is induced by varying perpendicular external magnetic fields of several kA/m. The magnetic fields of the Néel type walls, and forces calculated based on micromagnetic simulations of their structure, are consistent with viscous forces observed in the experiment. We show that the cylindrical domains can be used to efficiently gather originally scattered beads in a small area.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We systematically investigate the magnetization precession processes of post-prepared and after-annealing Pt buffered [Co/Ni]n multilayers with adjustable perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) by time-resolved magneto-optical Kerr effect. The PMA of the [Co/Ni]n multilayers could be modulated by changing the number of Co/Ni periods n, Pt thickness tPt and annealing temperature Ta, respectively. With a fixed tPt, both uniaxial magnetic anisotropy Ku and intrinsic damping constant α0 could be modulated by the variation of n. We observed that α0 is linearly proportional to Ku, since both of them originate from the spin–orbit coupling (SOC). For a fixed n, with the increase of tPt, Ku exhibits a non-monotonic change behavior, but α0 increases monotonously. It is found that α0 shows a nonlinear positve correlation to Ku. It suggests that the SOC is not the only factor affecting the damping process. Finally, for the specific sample, both α0 and Ku also display the different variation behaviors with increasing Ta. In this case, the changes in film microstructure caused by the annealing have different contributions to Ku and α0, resulting in a negative correlation between Ku and α0. The findings could be helpful to design the potential application of [Co/Ni]n multilayers system in STT-MRAM with high density, low power and high thermal stability.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the magnetic properties and magnetocaloric effect of ball milled CoMn0.95V0.05Ge alloy by means of temperature and field dependence of magnetisation measurements. CoMn0.95V0.05Ge nano-powders with different particle size distribution were prepared by varying the milling time for 4, 6 and 8 h. The atomic force microscopy (AFM) images showed that the average size of the particles decreases with increased milling time as expected. The nature of the magnetic phase transition has been determined by using Arrott plots, rescaled magnetic entropy change and power exponents of ΔSM. We found that the nature of the magnetic transition for nano powders has a second order nature, although their bulk counterpart with same composition exhibits a first order magnetostructural phase transition. The observed maximum magnetic entropy change for nano powders is, therefore, slightly lower than that of their bulk counterparts. However a 50 % increasing of relative cooling power for nano-powders is achieved. These results suggest that CoMn0.95V0.05Ge nano-powders could be a suitable candidate as working substance for magnetic cooling technology around room temperature.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Self-regulating magnetic hyperthermia, in which heating of magnetic particles is limited by the magnetic transition temperature, could be a valuable form of magnetic hyperthermia for cancer treatment, as it can ensure uniform heating across tumor tissue. Gadolinium silicide has been suggested as a candidate material for self-regulating magnetic hyperthermia because of its high magnetization, Curie temperature near the desired treatment temperature, and tunability. Previous measurements of polydisperse micro- and nano-particles prepared from ball-milled Gd5Si4 yielded a decreased Curie temperature TC with a broad transition, suggesting that particle size may be used to tune TC. Other studies of size-selected particles of ball-milled Gd5Si4 showed decreased TC and magnetization with decreased particle size, but increased coercivity with decreased size, and the combined effects on the specific loss power were unknown. This work presents measurements of the particle size-dependence of the specific loss power of ball-milled Gd5Si4, showing that the largest particles (approx. 780 nm) behave similarly to the previously measured polydisperse samples, while the smaller particles all have decreased specific loss power. Dynamic hysteresis loop measurements show that the coercivity of the particles is increased under the conditions used for magnetic hyperthermia (particles dispersed in water, under an alternating magnetic field) relative to quasistatic measurements of powder samples, though a particle size-dependence of the coercivity was not observed under hyperthermia conditions. This work highlights one of the challenges of implementing self-regulating magnetic hyperthermia: in general, materials tend to have low coercivity near the magnetic transition temperature. Given this challenge, rare-earth compounds with high magnetization may provide the best opportunity to obtain significant heating for self-regulating hyperthermia.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents a transient study of hysteresis motor based on the proposed hybrid method of finite element method- boundary element method (FEM-BEM) in which the Jiles-Atherton (J-A) vector hysteresis model of the hard-magnetic material of the rotor is incorporated. The air–gap region is modeled by BEM in order to avoid the discontinuity in the FEM equations due to J-A hysteresis model and the rotor movement and, therefore, the eddy current effect is taken into account in the rotor part, for the first time. To the best of the author's knowledge, the prior time-dependent numerical models have ignored the torque component caused by eddy currents in the rotor of hysteresis motor, due to difficulty in rotating the mesh in the rotor region and the related convergence problems. The proposed model is employed to study the phenomenon of short period over-excitation in hysteresis motors. A comparison is done between the proposed time-domain model and the frequency-domain finite element model of the hysteresis motor.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Replicating the properties of a bulk oxide in its film counterpart is critical for device applications. In this work, the effects of oxygen pressure and buffer layer on double perovskite Y2NiMnO6 (YNMO) thin films have been studied carefully. The increase in oxygen pressure is found to contribute to the lattice relaxation, reduction of Mn3+ ions, and enhancement of magnetization of YNMO films. The out-of-plane lattice constant of the YNMO film at high oxygen pressure can be tuned to nearly match that of the bulk. Moreover, the insertion of a CaTiO3 buffer layer is beneficial for the oxidization of Mn4+ ions. It affects the spin state of YNMO films significantly, while it has little influence on the lattice structure. With co-action of oxygen pressure and the CaTiO3 buffer layer, the lattice structure, element composition, and magnetization of the obtained YNMO films are almost comparable to those of the bulk.© 2020There is a permanent demand worldwide for the advanced low-losses soft magnetic materials intended for application in power electronics, including power electronic converters used to process various forms of the electrical energy into such that is best suited for the specific user loads or applications. This paper shows result of investigation of magnetic properties of amorphous multi-gap cores which were used to manufacture a prototype 27-multi-gaps core for the three-phase harmonic filter with a common yoke, with a rated power of 7.5 kW, operating voltage of 400 V and electric power frequency of 50 Hz. The main attention was focused on studying the effect of the chemical composition and core structure on the level of power losses in the core and temperature increase during operation for amorphous material in relation to the polycrystalline Fe-Si steel with 3 wt% Si core despite the low operating frequency of 50 Hz.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of molybdenum doped methylammonium lead halides (MAPbX3, X = Cl, Br, I) system has been studied using density functional theory for the very first time. Spin-polarized magnetic calculations indicate that the doping of Mo-atoms at Pb-site generates a significant magnetic moment in all the three MAPbX3 systems, where the d-orbital electrons of the dopant primarily generate the induced magnetism in the system. The Spin density distribution and Bader charge analysis also support that the magnetic moment is concentrated around the dopant. The unpaired spins of the Mo-dopants prefer parallel alignment, which makes a stable ferromagnetic spin ordered system. The defect formation energy of the Mo-doping at Pb-site is also small, which makes it a potential candidate for spintronics application.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Thermoelectric devices have tendency to generate electric power by renovating waste heat. Semiconducting materials are the hunt for thermoelectric technology. We have traced the structural and mechanical stabilities, explored the electronic profile and thereafter unearthed the transport character of Cs2NaMCl6 (M = Cr, Fe) double perovskites. The electronic band structures and density of states from GGA and GGA + mBJ convey the semiconducting nature in both spin channels for these materials. The origin of semiconducting nature is explained with the help of crystal field splitting of d-orbitals. The optimization and asymmetric DOS across reference level suggest the ferromagnetic nature of double perovskites. The Boltztrap code with fixed relaxation time is used to determine the transport properties of Cs2NaMCl6 (M = Cr, Fe) double perovskites. The decreasing characteristic of Seebeck coefficient and resistance as a function of temperature suggests semiconductor character in these materials. The low thermal conductivity boosts the efficiency of materials to recover waste heat. The room temperature figure of merit (zT) is 0.71 and 0.79 for Cr and Fe-based double perovskites and with temperature, it increases. Thereby making these double perovskites suitable for waste heat harvesting. The results obtained while carrying out the investigation are in cohesion with available results in literature.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A sample of GdPO4 nanorods (NRs) with average diameter about 20 nm and length 150 nm has been prepared by a hydrothermal method. The analyses of the XRD pattern and transmission electron microscopy images have proved that the NRs are single crystals with a hexagonal structure. The variations of the magnetization versus temperature and magnetic field have confirmed magnetic ordering at low temperatures. The assessment of the magnetocaloric effect from the magnetization isotherms, M(H), in the temperature range T = 2 – 25 K has revealed a strong increase of the magnetic entropy change (|ΔSm|) below T = 15 K with increasing H. The magnetic entropy change reaches maximum (|ΔSmmax|) at temperatures T = 2 – 2.7 K, around a ferromagnetic–paramagnetic transition. It has been found that the relative cooling power (RCP) and refrigerant cooling (RC) increase with increasing H by the broadened linewidth of the |ΔSm(T)| curve. At H = 60 kOe, the values of ΔSmmax and RCP (or RC) are about 56.2 J/kg⋅K and 415.9 (296.5) J/kg, respectively. Our analyses also have inferred that the GdPO4 NRs exhibit a short-range magnetic order with coexisting ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic interactions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The structural stability and magnetic properties of Pr doped BiFeO3 (Bi0.8Pr0.2FeO3) multiferroic ceramics depends on the sintering time. As the sintering time is varied, the structural and magnetic phase transformations has been observed in the multiferroic ceramic. For the present investigation, the samples have been synthesized by conventional solid state reaction method and sintered for 1 h, 2 h and 3 h. The crystal structure of samples has been verified by the Rietveld refinement of XRD patterns. The sample sintered for 1 h is found to possess rhombohedral R3c as major phase. The dominating structural phase changes to orthorhombic Pbam for 3 h sintering. The remanent magnetization in the samples shows a significant increase with the sintering time as observed from M – H loops obtained by VSM. The enhancement in magnetization is suggested to be caused by the increase in canting angle while crossing over from polar rhombohedral R3c phase to antipolar orthorhombic Pbam symmetry.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Soft magnetic amorphous materials with ultra-low power loss are highly desirable for high-frequency drive applications. The present work demonstrates the high-frequency power loss performance and underlying loss mechanisms in ultra-thin amorphous alloys. This is achieved by rapid-quenching amorphous alloys of Co-, CoFe- and Fe-rich systems, investigating their amorphous atomic structure, quantifying the saturation magnetostriction constants (λs), imaging magnetic domains at remanent magnetization, analyzing magnetization reversal from various magnetization levels, and finally, investigating the material loss performance over a broad frequency range (f = 50 kHz–2 MHz) at various excitation levels (Bm = 25–100 mT). The ultra-high performance of ultra-thin Co-rich amorphous ribbons, as compared to CoFe- and Fe-rich alloys, was attributed to the significantly low eddy current loss, due to the reduced thickness, and a minimal amount of excess loss, owning to minimal magnetoelastic contributions and magnetization reversal by rotation. The underlying loss mechanisms were analyzed by decomposing material loss into primary components and identifying the magnetization reversal mechanisms using minor hysteresis loops. In the Co-rich amorphous alloys, we suggest that magnetization reversal by rotation dominates, at least at low excitations, while in CoFe- and Fe-rich alloys domain wall displacement prevails and contributes significantly to the excess loss up to the MHz frequency range. Magnetization reversal by rotation in Co-rich alloys could be attributed to the zero/near-zero λs, and eventually low residual stress, leading to a homogeneous magnetic domain structure, as compared to the inhomogeneous “fingerprint-like” complex domains in highly magnetostrictive CoFe-rich alloys.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A finite element modelling approach is developed to consider the effect of ferrite grain size on low magnetic field relative permeability. The model predictions agree well with measured relative permeability values in a single-phase microstructure (ferrite) with grain sizes of 2.5–52 µm. The model has also been used, combined with a previously developed phase balance model, to predict relative permeability in a multi-phase (ferrite-pearlite) microstructure with ferrite grain sizes of 13–63 µm and excellent agreement with the experimental result have been obtained. Hence, the capability to predict the relative permeability for steel microstructures taking into account grain size, and phase balance, has been demonstrated.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Four Eu-Sr manganites, La0.7-xEuxSr0.3MnO3; x = 0.4, 0.5, 0.6, 0.7, and one Nd-Sr manganite Nd0.4La0.3Sr0.3MnO3, were studied by EPR (electron paramagnetic resonance) at 9.6 GHz at temperatures in the range 175 – 400 K. These studies were further supplemented by magnetization measurements. The positions and widths of the EPR lines of all the Eu-Sr manganite samples, containing Eu3+ ions, changed with temperature in a similar manner. The EPR data showed that these Eu-Sr manganites are ferromagnetic, whose magnetic transition temperature from the ferromagnetic to the paramagnetic state (TC) decreased gradually as the Eu content (x) increased, specifically from TC ~ 111 K (x = 0.5) to TC ~ 57 K (x = 0.7). Furthermore, in these samples the FMR (ferromagnetic resonance) lines appeared significantly above the respective TC, specifically, at 290 K (x = 0.4), 280 K (x = 0.5), 250 K (x = 0.6), together with the EPR lines. As for the sample with x = 0.7 no FMR lines were observed in the temperature range investigated here. The temperature dependence of the EPR linewidth is found to be linear in the various La0.7-xEuxSr0.3MnO3 samples, caused by the presence of conductivity due to small-polaron hopping The peak-to-peak first-derivative EPR linewidths, ΔBpp, of these Eu-doped samples fitted well above the temperature, at which the minimum of ΔBpp occurs, to the expression: ΔBpp (T) = ΔBpp,min + [Formula presented]exp(-Ea/kBT), with the values of the activation energies being Ea = 0.20 eV, 0.17 eV, 0.11 eV, 0.09 eV for x = 0.4, 0.5, 0.6, 0.7, respectively. On the other hand, for the Nd-doped sample, the ΔBpp in Nd0.4La0.3Sr0.3MnO3 decreased monotonically with temperature above TC in accordance with the Curie-Weiss law as ΔBpp (T) = ΔBpp,0 + C/(T-TC). The magnetization measurements were exploited to determine TC for the various samples. The results agreed with those determined by the EPR measurements presented here. In addition, the magnetization data was analyzed to obtain the values of the critical exponents in the phase transition from the paramagnetic to the ferromagnetic state. The critical exponents, as determined for the La0.7-xEuxSr0.3MnO3 sample with x = 0.5, are β = 0.24 ± 0.02, γ = 1.10 ± 0.5, δ = 5.58.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Interest in vibration energy harvesting techniques in wireless sensors networks and small devices has been increased in the last decade. Among various types of energy harvesters, those that employ magnetoelectric transducers have attracted researchers in recent years. When these harvesters vibrate with large amplitudes, the frequency bandwidth is broadened because of nonlinear effects and the performance of harvesters is increased. Therefore, design, modeling and parametric study of the mentioned harvesters in large amplitude vibration are necessary. In this paper, the nonlinear finite element model of the magnetoelectric harvester with considering nonlinear magnetic force is developed. Obtained results in this paper are verified by comparing with available theoretical and experimental results in the literature. Furthermore, a magnetoelectric harvester that is effective in large deflections is designed. The proposed harvester includes one cantilever beam, four permanent magnets, two magnetic yokes, one added mass, and one magnetoelectric transducer. One of the specific features of the designed harvester is frequency-doubling which helps the harvester to generate more power. Finally, the effect of various parameters including the amplitude of excitation, load resistance, the thickness of the beam and added mass on frequency bandwidth, and output power of the harvester are evaluated.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report on resistivity, magnetoresistance, and Hall effect experiments in bilayer thin films of cobalt/ruthenium (Co/Ru) and cobalt/palladium (Co/Pd) prepared by magnetron sputtering. The resistivity and magneto-transport properties of single layers of the same materials were also measured. For analyzing the results in the bilayers, we propose an approach based on a two-current model that assumes a current mixing effect coming from the large contact area between films. The method is devised for identifying the effects related to the interface between the metallic films. The outcome of the analysis indicates that significant interface effects occur in both studied bilayers. The role of the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction and the related spin arrangements formed at the interface are pointed out. Particularly for the Co/Pd system, from the magnetoresistance and Hall resistivity results possible evidence is obtained for the occurrence of non-trivial chiral spin textures in the field range corresponding to the initial process of magnetization.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic particle imaging (MPI) is a tomographic imaging method to determine the spatial distribution of magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) within a defined volume. To evaluate the spatio-temporal resolution of existing MPI scanners, enabling the consistent comparison of the performance of different scanner setups, we developed dynamic MPI measurement phantoms based on segmented flow. These segmented flow phantoms comprise a defined bolus of ferrofluid tracer material, which can be pumped through a tube system with defined velocities. Using a hydrophobic organic carrier oil, cylindrically shaped boluses of different diameter, length, and flow velocity can be emulated. Moving boluses were imaged by different MPI scanner types and the correlation of spatial resolution und velocity of the bolus was investigated. For all bolus dimension and flow velocity combinations investigated, we observed a decreasing spatial resolution and increasing blurring for increasing bolus velocity and decreasing bolus volume.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report electrical resistivity, magnetic susceptibility, and specific heat measurements of high-quality URu2Si2 single crystals at ambient pressure, in the hidden-order (HO) region of the phase diagram. An amazing power-law behavior is observed, for both DC susceptibility and specific heat, establishing the Griffiths model for the HO phase. The Griffiths phase is characterized by residual short-range correlations on the collapse of the long-range large-moment antiferromagnetic (LMAFM) phase due to the dilution effects. The existence of cluster-like spins is intrinsic, as evidenced by the frequency dispersion of AC susceptibility and the relaxation of magnetoresistance. On account of the freezing of magnetic clusters, an unidirectional anisotropy of the resistivity in rotating magnetic fields is detected, which naturally explains any possible broken symmetries in tiny and clean crystals. In this manner, the HO phase of URu2Si2 is intimately related to the LMAFM phase. The proposal of Griffiths phase as an alternative of the HO phase is very promising, which may open a new route into the understanding of exotic electronic states in correlated matter.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Several magnetic, electronic and elastic behaviors of HoFe4P12 filled-skutterudite remain unknown, therefore, this study is complementary to the experimental works carried out on this compound. Experimental results have shown that HoFe4P12 shows a ferromagnetic transition at around 5 K, therefore, the ground state properties studied in this work have been performed in this magnetic phase. The found value of the lattice constant is very close to that found experimentally. The elastic constants estimated in this work have shown that the studied compound is mechanically stable in the ground state. The study of elastic isotropy by the universal elastic anisotropy index, Zener anisotropy factor as well as the analysis of the directional dependence surface of Young's modulus have shown that HoFe4P12 is elastically isotropic. The magnetic and electronic properties have been studied taking into account the strong correlation between 4f||3d electrons of Ho||Fe atoms and their spin–orbit effect (GGA + U + SOC). The electronic results have revealed a metallic behavior of HoFe4P12. The magnetic results have shown that Ho-atoms and Fe-atoms have magnetic moments of different signs, which exhibits the presence of a ferrimagnetic behavior close to that of ferromagnetic because of the very small magnetic moment value of Fe compared to that of Ho. Bonding analysis has indicated a metallicity of 10.15% with a predominant covalent character. NCI analysis has indicated the absence of weak attractive van-der-Waals interactions with a very strong contribution of repulsive interactions (steric effects) between Ho and Fe atoms.© 2020The success of Magnetic Particle Imaging (MPI) as a clinical imaging modality is inextricably linked to the availability of purpose-build magnetic nanoparticles (MNP). Attempts to develop MNP with tailored properties and predictable MPI-performance are underway and still of great debate. However, it is well-known that the MPI performance is hampered by the size distribution present in MNP systems. The hyphenation of asymmetric flow field-flow fractionation (AF4) with on-line detectors has proven to provide reliable multidimensional information of MNP size distributions in a quasi-closed system without additional preparation steps. We recently introduced a novel combination of AF4 with a magnetic detector. This detector is based on the same physical principle as MPI, called Magnetic Particle Spectroscopy (MPS), which has already proven a straightforward technique for MNP specific quantification and characterization. In this study we demonstrate that the AF4 multidetector approach, including our MPS detector, is feasible to assist the targeted development of MNP with optimized imaging capabilities in MPI by directly measuring the MNP size as well as the indispensable magnetic functionality. Furthermore, the new platform provides important insights into the physics of MNP and can be used for quality control of MNP in biomedical applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.19F MRI has been paid great attention because of its higher signal-to-noise ratio and larger chemical shift than 1H MRI. However, the low 19F content and sensitivity of environment limit its development in clinic. Herein, considering the large surface area and abundant metal active sites of metal organic framework (MOF) nanoparticles, we fabricated Zr-based MOF nanoparticles (UiO-66-F NPs) with an organic ligand of tetrafluoro-terephthalic acid (F4PTA) as a pH-sensitive 19F MRI contrast agent, which remained stable in a neutral condition, but could release free F4PTA in an acidic condition to enhance 19F MRI signal. As a proof of concept, UiO-66-F NPs-based contrast agent could turn on the 19F MRI signal in an acidic tumor micro-environment. The results provide an alternative strategy for the design of tumor micro-environment responsive 19F MRI contrast agents.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Two series of FeCoNiPdx and CrxFeCoNiPd high entropy alloys were investigated using SEM-EDX, XRD technique and Mössbauer spectroscopy. Increasing of Pd content in the FeCoNiPdx samples only slightly influenced the Mössbauer spectra. They were analysed assuming simultaneous presence of hyperfine field and quadrupole splitting distributions, however random direction of observation relative to Bhf and EFG caused the average QS value to be close to zero. Increasing of Cr content in the CrxFeCoNiPd samples resulted in strong decrease of the hyperfine field, its distribution becomes wide and influence of Bhf,ISBhf and EFG on the Mössbauer spectra can not be separated unambiguously. The decomposing of the HEAs compositions into binary artificial Fe-dopant systems, namely [FeCoNi]-Pd and [FeCoNiPd]-Cr, allowed to interpret the magnetic structure of the two investigated series.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A directional local magnetic measurement technique as example of measuring the angular dependence of the magnetic Barkhausen noise in electrical and construction steels at typical quasi-static frequency by the magnetic needle probe (MNP) method is presented. The directional measurement configuration of the MNP method is typical of a half-turn search coil sensor coupled to high gain analogue amplification and high order filtration stages, owing to its very weak induced electromotive force. The method exploits the MBNenergy(H) hysteresis cycle (time integration of the square of the MBN voltage signal as a function of the tangent excitation field H) and brings forth stable indicators possibly related to the Magnetocrystalline Anisotropy Energy (MAE). Experimental tests performed on grain-oriented Fe-Si and low carbon steel specimens, and comparison with the conventional search coil measurement results were worth the validation of the MNP method. These results put to the front the good directional selectivity of the MNP method over the conventional MBN sensors adversely affected by the transverse fields at the material surface. Eventually, the printed magnetic needle probe (PMNP) sensor was relatedly described to provide non-invasive directional measurements for continuous structural health monitoring.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The current magnetic hyperthermia with nanoparticles is a method of destroying cancer cells, increasingly studied theoretically and experimentally. The colloidal magnetic nanoparticle systems used in this method have a pronounced agglomeration tendency that leads to the blocking of blood vessels in the case of intravenous administration of the nanoparticles. For nanoparticle dispersion stability and biocompatibility, the particles are covered with an organic layer. The influence of nanoparticle coating on the generation of heat by magnetic hyperthermia is very little studied. In this paper, we theoretically study, by numerical simulation, the way in which the nanoparticle coating affects the agglomeration tendency of the nanoparticles, as well as the specific loss power which characterises the nanoparticle performance in the generation of heat by magnetic hyperthermia. For this purpose, we propose a theoretical model. The self-organisation of colloidal nanoparticles will be simulated using a Langevin dynamics stochastic method based on an effective Verlet-type algorithm, then the magnetic relaxation time used in the specific loss power (SLP) relation, obtained based on the theory of magnetic fluid losses from Rosensweig.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The global burden of atherothrombotic diseases continues to grow. Worldwide, 17.9 million deaths per year are caused by cardiovascular diseases (CVD). According to WHO estimates, this number is expected to grow to more than 23.6 million by 2030. To achieve a more effective primary prevention of cardiovascular morbidity and mortality, the development of new diagnostic and therapeutic strategies is required. Nanomedicine offers a unique platform for novel approaches to the diagnosis and therapy of CVD. In particular iron oxide-based magnetic nanoparticles, a class of nanosized agents with superparamagnetic properties, are considered a promising tool in management of cardiovascular patients. Their possible applications range from plaque imaging and thrombus detection to the targeted drug-delivery, stent endothelialisation and blood vessel regeneration. This paper summarizes recent advances in the implementation of magnetic nanoparticles to diagnosis and treatment of cardiovascular disorders.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Most of the two-dimensional layered materials discovered so far are intrinsically nonmagnetic. Introducing ferromagnetism into these materials will expand their application greatly in the field of spintronics. Here we study the introduction of ferromagnetism into the PtTe2 monolayer via doping the 3d transition metal atoms and the group VA and VIIB atoms by means of the first-principles calculations. Results show that the magnetic order can be introduced in the V-, Mn-, Fe-, Cu- and Zn-doped PtTe2 monolayers, among which the V-, Cu- and Zn-doped monolayers have ferromagnetic ground state, and the Mn- and Fe-doped monolayers have antiferromagnetic ordering in ground state. Among the group VA atom doped systems, N-, P- and As-doped monolayers exhibit ferromagnetic, and Sb doped monolayer is a nonmagnetic metal. All the VIIB atom doped PtTe2 monolayers are nonmagnetic, while the doping makes the PtTe2 monolayer transit from an indirect bandgap semiconductor to metal. The findings obtained in this work may initiate new experimental exploration and expand the application of the layered transition-metal ditellurides in spintronics.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report a micromagnetic studies of the magnetic reversal and domain pattern formation in antidot arrays with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. The effect of the lattice symmetry (triangular, square, quasicrystalline and random), antidot shapes (triangles, squares and crosses) as well as their angular orientation has been investigated. Simulations are performed by solving the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation and finding the system's energy minimum for model with intrinsic and extrinsic defects, which allows to emulate the behaviour of real systems. The significant differences in coercivity values and domain sizes were noticed during rotation of the antidots around their centres. This parameter has a special impact on the magnetic behaviour of systems with square and cross-shaped antidots. The results are discussed in terms of the local shape anisotropy and equilibrium positions of domain walls.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, first-principle calculations combining special quasi-random structure (SQS) method were utilized for detecting the mechanism of diversity in magnetic behaviors of rapid-solidified FeCoNiSi0.2M0.2 (M=Cr, Mn) high entropy alloys (HEAs). According to the results, the crystal structure and magnetic properties calculated from the SQS structure fit well with those of the HEAs. It is found that, the addition of Mn leads to significant enhancement in saturated magnetization (BS) and Curie temperature (TC) of the FeCoNiSi0.2M0.2 HEA compared to Cr, which is caused by the changes of electron-spin that lead to ferromagnetism of Mn, and such phenomenon may have close correlation with the ferromagnetic coupling between Mn and FeCoNi matrix. This work provides a novel insight for the compositional design of ferromagnetic HEAs with excellent magnetic properties.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Detail investigation on the influence of Gd-doping both in the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of (Sm1-yGdy)0.55Sr0.45MnO3 (y = 0.5 and 0.7) compounds has been carried out. With the Gd-content, the studied compounds exhibit quite distinct physical properties in the presence of an external magnetic field. In addition to the field-induced meta-magnetic transition and quantitatively large magnetocaloric effect, both the compounds reveal significant relative cooling power and refrigerant capacity. However, in the low temperature region, different nature in magnetocaloric effect was addressed by considering the field induced modification of short-range ordering.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The (Nd0.8Pr0.2)2.2Fe12Co2B ribbons were prepared by melt-spinning at a wheel speed of 15 m/s. The effect of magnetic field annealing treatment with 1 T in the temperature range of 573–723 K for 15 min on the magnetic properties including parameters of the coercivity, the remanence, and the maximum energy product ((BH)max) of (Nd0.8Pr0.2)2.2Fe12Co2B ribbons was investigated. The largest value of (BH)max among sample studied is obtained at 673 K for 15 min with 1 T. XRD result shows that samples are crystalline state and single Nd2Fe14B (2:14:1) phase is observed in both melt-spun ribbon and magnetic annealing sample at 673 K. The refined microstructure with an average grain size of 25 ± 3 nm is obtained in crystalline (Nd0.8Pr0.2)2.2Fe12Co2B melt-spun ribbons. The magnetic field annealing treatment with 1 T can further reduce the average grain size to 20 ± 1 nm. The mechanism of grain refinement is discussed from two aspects including the length-to-width ratio of a grain and the stress. The interaction domain structure is observed in both melt-spun ribbon and the sample annealed at 673 K with 1 T by Lorentz magnetic microscopy suggesting the presence of the exchange coupling between 2:14:1 grains. The grain-refined microstructure of magnetic annealing sample at 673 K strengthens the exchange coupling interaction leading to an enhancement of the remanence and the (BH)max, with a rise of 4% and 6%, respectively. The values of (BH)max of melt-spun (Nd0.8Pr0.2)2.2Fe12Co2B ribbon (141 kJ/m3) and annealed ribbon with 1 T magnetic field (150 kJ/m3) are both larger than that of some Dy-containing Nd-Fe-B permanent alloys with an improving range of 7%-74%.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Novel method for rapid magnetic modification of diamagnetic powder and high aspect ratio materials has been developed. This procedure is based on thorough mixing of diamagnetic materials with suspensions of magnetite nano- and microparticles in highly volatile organic solvents (namely n-pentane or petroleum ether) followed by a drying step. Due to the low boiling point of the solvents used during magnetic modification, the whole process can be performed in a very short time. The prepared magnetically modified materials are stable in water for a long time, without the release of magnetic particles from the modified surface. Magnetic response of the resulting composites allows their simple separation using a permanent magnet. In addition, they have a character of composite nanozymes exhibiting peroxidase-like activity mainly due to the presence of iron oxide particles. The described method is a very efficient alternative to the previously developed magnetic modification procedures.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties and electronic structure of REAgSb2 compounds (RE = La-Nd, Sm and Gd-Er) were investigated by experimental measurements on their polycrystalline samples combining with first-principles calculation. X-ray powder diffraction analysis shows that all compounds crystallize in a tetragonal HfCuSi2-type structure (Space group P4/nmm, No. 129, tP8). The results of magnetic measurements reveal that LaAgSb2 is non-magnetic, CeAgSb2 is ferromagnetic, and other compounds are antiferromagnetic. The magnetic ordering temperatures were obtained by dM/dT plots, which are distributed between 3.2 and 14.2 K. According to Curie-Weiss law, it was found that the effective magnetic moments of these compounds are close to rare earth trivalent ions in REAgSb2. The metamagnetic transitions are observed for REAgSb2 (RE = Pr, Gd-Ho) according to M−H curves at 2 K. The Arrott plots reveal that the magnetic phase transition type belongs to second-order phase transition for REAgSb2 (RE = Ce, Pr). The maximum magnetic entropy changes of CeAgSb2 and PrAgSb2 are measured to be 5.1 and 7.9 J.kg−1.K−1, respectively. The electronic structures of REAgSb2 compounds have been studied based on density functional theory. The electronic structures data of REAgSb2 suggest that the DOS dispersions are close to the RE 4f electrons and there is a strong correlation between RE and Sb atoms. The hybridization between RE 4f and Sb 5p electrons gradually increases as a function of atomic number for REAgSb2 (RE = Ce-Sm, Gd), while gradually decreases for the other compounds.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We studied the frequency-dependent (f = 1 GHz to 5 GHz) microwave absorption in the double perovskite La2NiMnO6 at room temperature using two cavity-less methods: An indirect impedance method that uses a radio frequency impedance analyzer and a folded copper strip coil for the frequency range f = 1–2.2 GHz and a lock-in based broadband setup using a coplanar waveguide for microwave excitation in the frequency range f = 2–5 GHz. The high-frequency resistance of the strip coil exhibits a sharp peak and the reactance curve crosses zero at a critical value of dc magnetic field as a consequence of the paramagnetic resonance in the sample. The resonance fields (Hr) obtained from both the techniques increase linearly with frequency. Line shape analysis and analytical fitting were performed to characterize the material in terms of its initial susceptibility and damping parameters. From the fit, we obtain a large spectroscopic g-factor, equal to 2.1284, which supports the presence of Ni2+ cation with strong spin-orbit coupling.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A model is presented to explain the temperature-independent saturating paramagnetic response of some transparent oxides with no unpaired d-electrons. It is based on an array of N surface defect-related electrons with bound states in the gap that can form a coherent mesoscopic many-electron state in response to fluctuations of the zero-point electromagnetic field. Individual electronic orbits expand by 0.083 pm, as in the theory of the Lamb shift, and these expansions add to produce a global volume change. This modifies the energy density in the zero-point electromagnetic field, thereby lowering the energy per electron sufficiently to stabilize a coherent multi-electron state of the two-dimensional system at room temperature. A net magnetic moment can be induced by an applied magnetic field, which mixes coherent ground and excited states, producing a paramagnetic orbital magnetization of magnitude [Formula presented], where x is proportional to the applied field. Orbital saturation moments per coherent surface electron range from 10-3 to 10-1 Bohr magnetons.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The study was aimed at investigating the heating efficiency of magnetically guided nanoparticles. The effect of graphene oxide (GO), magnetite (Fe3O4) and hybrid material (GO/Fe3O4) have been studied. The samples have been inductively heated at 42 °C in the presence of rotating magnetic field (RMF). The experiments have been conducted as a function of temperature different and samples concentrations in phosphate-buffered saline (PBS) medium. These measurements have been realized by means of the dynamic description of the obtained temperature changes. The field-dependent specific absorption rate (SAR) values of the applied systems with the nanoparticles were discussed. The results reveal that RMF may be successfully applied as a reinforcing factor in order to enhance the heating efficiency of the tested materials. The obtained results reveal the concentration dependent response to RMF and clear added value to study the hybrid materials in this fascinating field of interest.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Strong spin–orbit coupling (SOC) in Sr2FeHfO6 (SFHO) alloy has been predicted by means of full-potential linear augmented plane wave method in order to study the effect on electronic structure. The tetragonal (I4/mmm) SFHO with SOC has an up-spin energy of ~1.2 eV and a total magnetic moment of ~2.03 μB mainly coming from the Fe (1.63 μB), and the SOC effect was prominent in SFHO due to the magnetic moment of 3d-Fe orbitals. The XAFS spectroscopy technique was used in order to analyze the electronic structure and optical properties of SFHO. The absorption spectra with Fe as a source atom shows a peak appearing around 7118 eV. SFHO with SOC falls within the half metallic state in the up-spin direction resulting significant increase of the total magnetic moment. This half-metallicity strong SOC in SFHO demonstrate much spin polarized electrons around the Fermi level, hence, this material is very potential in future memory devices and spintronic applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A low-power open-loop self-oscillating fluxgate current sensor based on Mn-Zn soft ferrites is proposed in the paper. Differential realization of compensation amplifier, in class-D full-bridge configuration, provides full theoretical reduction of power consumption, which is impossible in the case of standard half-bridge realization. Together with data provided from the ferrite manufacturers, offered set of simple equations can qualitatively estimate quiescent and operating power consumption, and help in avoidance of design solutions that lead to unnecessary power losses. If a commercial or custom transformer core, made of conventional industrial Mn-Zn ferrite materials is used, all important parameters for sensor design, and follow-on exploitation, can be predicted in advance. Experimental examinations show that power consumption can be reduced to the level of open-loop Hall-effect based sensor, while many comparable advantages of flux-gate technology are maintained. We design sensor and tuned circuit parameters to measure currents in the range of [–20 A, 20 A] with an overcurrent capability of 50%. In temperature range of [–20 °C, 50 °C], maximum relative linearity error of 0.25% and offset drift of 0.05% is achieved.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic resonance force microscopy (MRFM) in combination with magneto-optical Kerr effect spectroscopy and magnetic force microscopy is used to study ferromagnetic resonance in multilayer thin-film structures [Co(0.5 nm)/Pt(1 nm)]5 with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. Both the uniformly magnetized state and nonhomogeneous domain structures with different spatial scales are studied. It is shown that labyrinth domain structure manifests itself in the MRFM spectra as specific resonances that are split in an external magnetic field. In zero magnetic field the resonant frequencies depend on the size of oppositely magnetized domains due to internal demagnetizing fields and magnetostatic interaction through overlapping strain fields. For composite sample [Co(0.5 nm)/Pt(1 nm)]5Co(1.3 nm) the decrease in the spatial scale of domain structure and decrease in resonance frequencies are observed, which are due to the effect of interface exchange field. The obtained results demonstrate the ability of MRFM to study the resonance properties of highly inhomogeneous magnetic states of ferromagnetic structures, especially in zero magnetic fields.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.To enhance performances and approach the detection limits of a magnetometer, it is necessary to investigate its intrinsic noise. The intrinsic noise of magnetic film/planar coil sensors has been analyzed, where the sensors consist of magnetic films and planar coils. Two architectures of magnetic film/planar coil sensors are investigated: self-inductive and mutual inductive. The pickup coil is in an open circuit during the detection, there is no resistive noise source in a mutual inductive magnetic film/planar coil sensor, and its noise is lower than that of a self-inductive one. Irrespective of any architectures, the noise of magnetic film/planar coil sensors is closely related to their electric excitations. The excitation signal generates an ac field Hac inside the magnetic films. When the magnitude of the ac field Hacm is less than that of the anisotropic field HK in the magnetic film, the noise of a mutual inductive sensor can be reduced by increasing amplitude of excitation current. Until Hacm=HK, mutual inductive sensor obtains a minimum noise value. When Hacm>HK, the noise of mutual inductive sensor can be reduced by reducing the amplitude of excitation current. It is observed that the noise is strongly dependent on the excitation frequency. Under the excitation current of 1.5 mA at 100 kHz, the voltage noise spectral density of a mutual inductive magnetic film/planar coil sensor has a minimum value of 47.55 nV/√Hz @ 1 Hz, and the equivalent magnetic noise is 66 nT/√Hz @ 1 Hz. The voltage noise spectral density of a self-inductive magnetic film/planar coil sensor has a minimum value of 86.26 nV/√Hz @ 1 Hz, and the equivalent magnetic noise is 452.4 nT/√Hz @ 1 Hz.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We study the effects of both hydrostatic and anisotropic contractions on the molecular condensation of oxygen molecules (O2) physisorbed to nanosized pores, termed “O2 nanorods”, through the magnetization measurements. Multisteps of O2 solidification accompany the reduction in structural symmetry with decreasing temperature, such that the structural change by external stress varies the stability of O2 solidification. For initial pore diameters of D = 8.5, 14.5, and 24.0 nm, anisotropic compression for nanorods (preferential compression along radial direction of the pores) occurred, and molecule solidification is suppressed at the lower temperature side compared with that under hydrostatic compression. For the smallest D = 6.5 nm, a hydrostatic contraction almost occurred, and the high adsorption capability enabled the detection of both the melting transition and change in crystal structure within the β phase, in addition to α–β and β–γ transitions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents a GPU-parallelized 3D micromagnetic code for the efficient calculation of the magnetization dynamics, equilibrium configuration and static hysteresis loops of magnetic nanostructures, by solving the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert (LLG) equation. The time-integration of the LLG equation is carried out by using a technique based on the Cayley transform, which allows us to fulfil the constraint on the magnetization amplitude. The computational domain is reconstructed with a structured hexahedral mesh. The spatial-integration of the magnetostatic field is performed via a Fast Fourier Transform (FFT) algorithm, and the exchange field is computed with a 26-node-based finite difference technique. A careful validation of the developed solver was carried out, also by comparison to OOMMF and MuMax3. Then, we analysed the computational efficiency of the geometrical time-integrator and of its time-adaptive variant, investigating the role of the numerical damping introduced by the Cayley transform-based time-discretization.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Fabricating anisotropic bulk TbCu7-type RCo7 nanocrystalline magnets is of great significance for their development as high-performance high temperature magnets. In this paper, anisotropic bulk TbCu7-type (Sm0.6Pr0.4)Co7 nanocrystalline magnets have been prepared using high-pressure thermal compression (HPTC). The (Sm0.6Pr0.4)Co7 magnet had a strong (0 0 2) crystallographic texture and a small grain size of ~20 nm, yielding a maximum energy product of (BH)max = 19.5 MGOe. The magnets showed a coercivity temperature coefficient of β = −0.21%/°C from room temperature (RT) to 300 °C, better than that −0.23%/°C of the SmCo7 magnets prepared in the same conditions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We study a one-dimensional spin-1/2 XXZ Heisenberg model with alternating Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction, using the numerical Lanczos method. Recently, the ground state (GS) phase diagram of this model has been established using the bosonization approach and extensive density matrix renormalization group computations. Four quantum phases – saturated ferromagnetic (FM), Luttinger liquid (LL), and two (C1 and C2) gapped phases with composite structure of GS order, characterized by the coexistence of long-range alternating dimer, chirality and antiferromagnetic order have been identified. Here we reexamine the same problem using the exact diagonalization Lanczos method for chains up to N=26 sites and explicitly detect positions of quantum critical points (QCP) by investigating the quantum correlations as the entanglement and the quantum discord (QD). It is shown that the entanglement quantified by concurrence and the first derivative of the QD are able to reveal besides the standard FM QCP also the Berezinskii-Kosterlitz-Thouless (BKT) phase transition point between the LL and the gapped C1 phase and the Ising type critical point separating the C1 and C2 phases.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Motivated by recent experiments on quantum magnet NiCl2-4SC(NH2)2 (DTN) and its Br-doped counterpart DTNX we propose a theoretical description of optical magnon branch in the antiferromagnet with large single-ion anisotropy in the magnetically ordered phase. In the framework of the 1/S expansion we derive analytical expressions for optical magnon with k=0 energy magnetic field dependence Δ(h). It is shown that in the linear spin wave approximation Δ(h) is monotonic without extrema whereas first order in 1/S corrections makes it drastically different function with a minimum near the center of magnetically ordered phase. The latter behaviour was observed in ESR experiments. Moreover, we show that Δ(h) has nontrivial dependence on the system parameters. It solves the discrepancy between inelastic neutron scattering data where the growth of interaction constants in DTNX with small Br concentration was observed and ESR experiments showing almost unchanged Δ(h) in comparison with pure DTN.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The current research paper analyzed the structure and magnetic properties of bulk Sm2.40Fe17 and Strip-Cast (SC) Sm2.08Fe17 alloys. Strip Cast alloy was found to have low volume fraction of the secondary phases (SmFe3 and α-Fe phase) with finer grain size (2–3 times lower) in comparison with bulk alloy. Owing to such microstructural features, the Strip Cast alloy has the advantages of low nitrogenation temperature, reduced time duration for nitrogenation and effective nitrogenation of even coarser particles which tend to result in better magnetic properties compared to bulk alloy. The additional ball milling of the SC Sm2.08Fe17N3 powder in toluene, after adding 0.5% Zn stearate, resulted in achieving a coercivity of 9.3 kOe. The angular dependence of coercivity measurements indicates that the dominant coercivity mechanism is the nucleation of reverse domains at defects for coarser particles and non-uniform rotation of magnetic moments for the sub-micron level single-domain particles.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of Fe30Ni70 nanoalloys dispersed in a silica matrix are reported. X-ray diffraction patterns and TEM images are consistent with a fcc crystalline structure (space group Fm3m). Thermogravimetric data and its derivative reveal important features about the kinetics formation of the nanoalloy. Magnetization data as a function of an applied magnetic field and temperature indicate that nanoalloys are superparamagnetic with blocking effects appearing around T = 10 K. However, the unusual magnetic-field-dependence of the blocking temperature suggests that interaction effects must be taken into account. In this sense, as the power law usually employed to describe noninteracting particles system do not fit our experimental data, we have used a simple modification of the random anisotropy model (RAM). Finally, once the size distribution of nanoparticles should also play a crucial role in determining the magnetic behavior of the sample, we have analyzed the T-dependence of coercive field using a generalized model, which takes into account this parameter.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the quest for hard-soft composite magnets, we present here the interesting case of mixing iron nitride and Sr-hexaferrite, where the uniaxial anisotropy of the ‘soft’ phase is larger than that of the hard phase. We have synthesized bulk hard-soft composite magnets from Al-doped Sr-hexaferrite SrAl2Fe10O19 sub-micron- and iron nitride α″-Fe16N2 nano-particles. Both powders have been mixed via ball milling, followed by compaction at low temperatures. The resultant microstructure and magnetic properties are investigated. Higher iron nitride fraction results in increased saturation magnetization, but lower coercivity. Remanence can be slightly enhanced, from 22.4 A·m2/kg in the initial ferrite powder to 26.4 A·m2/kg for 15 wt% α″-Fe16N2. However, the squareness is deteriorated significantly. Microstructural investigations reveal low density, high porosity and partial oxidation of the α″-Fe16N2 phase which are the reasons for the poor coupling. Micromagnetic modelling is used to unravel the decisive role of different microstructural features on the coercivity and energy product of the composites.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic hyperthermia ablates malignant cells by the heat dissipating from magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) when subjects to an applied magnetic field. The treatment effect during hyperthermia is significantly related to many factors, but is primarily decided by bio-tissue intrinsic characteristics as well as the nanofluid concentration distribution inside tumor region. In addition, the transient bio-tissue temperature can also impact the treatment effect through the power dissipation of MNPs and bio-heat transfer model during therapy. This paper investigates the thermal ablation behavior for two typical malignant cells based on different nanofluid concentration distribution, in which the transient bio-tissue temperature is considered as the influence factor for the power dissipation of MNPs as well as the bio-heat transfer model during therapy. The simulation results demonstrate that a Gaussian distribution with lower variance for nanofluid concentration should have a worse treatment temperature profile than the case with a higher variance, which will then result in a poor ablation situation for the proposed malignant cells during therapy. Meanwhile, results also show that the power dissipation of MNPs should be increased properly in order to compensate the negative effect due to the transient bio-tissue temperature in practical application.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.RFe11Ti (R = Y, Pr) intermetallic compounds were successfully synthesized by arc-melting method. The correlation between their structural and magnetic properties has been investigated by means of X-ray diffraction analysis (XRD), Mössbauer spectrometry and magnetic measurements. The combination of these methods allowed to determine unambiguously the preferred inequivalent crystallographic site of titanium atoms. PrFe11Ti presents a weighted average hyperfine field higher than YFe11Ti compound. For both compounds, the hyperfine field follows this sequence: HHF{8i}>HHF{8j}>HHF{8f}. First principles calculations of RFe11Ti were performed utilizing the density functional theory (DFT) based on the full potential linearized augmented plane wave (FLAPW). These calculated data were found to be in good agreement with the experimental magnetic results.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles placed in a high frequency alternating magnetic field release heat. This phenomenon can be used to heat and kill cancerous cells, the so-called magnetic hyperthermia treatment. Our study focuses on the influence of the medium viscosity on the heating power of magnetic nanobeads (MNBs) containing superparamagnetic nanoparticles. The specific absorption rate (SAR) of two types of MNBs differing by their size was determined by measuring the area of their high-frequency hysteresis loops. Three different behaviors are observed as viscosity rises: (i) SAR first drops to a minimum value for both MNB sizes; (ii) interestingly, and only for smaller MNBs, after going through a minimum, SAR increases again towards a steady value; (iii) for larger MNBs, SAR remains constant after reaching its minimum value. The physical origin of these different behaviors is interpreted, the key ingredient to explain them being the magnetic interactions, the possibility of the bead to form chains, and their possibility to physically rotate under the influence of the magnetic field. Finally these results lead to questioning the representativeness of SAR measurements in water for nanoparticles intended for biological applications, in which the medium viscosity is very different from the one of water.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Radial vortices are exotic magnetic configurations that have several potential applications in Spintronics. In this paper, using micromagnetic simulation, we have proved that magnetic radial vortices can also be found in elliptic nanostructures, and have obtained the frequencies of their spin wave modes as a function of the sizes and ellipticity of the structures (here, we have defined the ellipticity as the ratio of the major axis to the minor axis D=Dx/Dy). Our results show that the size of the core of the magnetic radial vortex is not dependent on D. We have also obtained the spatial distribution of Fourier transform power spectra of the spin wave modes. Our results show that the variation in the values of D leads to the emergence of new spin wave modes, and that in general, the increase in the values of D leads to a decrease in the values of the frequencies of the spin wave modes.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Chemical synthesis of Nd2Fe14B hard magnetic powders are still hindered due to the complicated methods. Herein, we put forward a modified sol–gel strategy to prepare Nd2Fe14B magnetic powders with excellent magnetic properties. In this synthesis procedure, acetone and boric acid are simultaneously used as the coordination reagents. The formation mechanisms of the oxide precursors as well as the effect of the reduction-diffusion temperature on the composition and magnetic properties of the products have been investigated. Magnetic properties measurement shows that the sample prepared at 950 °C possess the highest coercivity value of ~4.8 kOe. The Henkel plots and recoil loops suggest that the existence of α-Fe is responsible for the stronger exchange-coupling behavior and better magnetic performance.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the effect of P and Zr on the magnetic properties and microstructure of the as-spun ribbon Pr2Fe14B/α-Fe achieved at a wheel speed of 30 m/s. X-ray diffraction and TEM results reveal that P-addition can decrease the grain size of 2:14:1 hard phase whereas further Zr-addition decreases the soft α-Fe phase. The combination of doping P and Zr reduces overall grain size and refines the microstructure considerably, and results in enhanced coercivity significantly. The strong exchange coupling interaction in our ribbons were confirmed by Henkel plots, which leads to higher coercivity of 964 kA/m. The initial magnetization curves reveal the coercivity in P-added alloy is controlled by the nucleation of reversal domain and that in further Zr-added alloy is the domain wall pinning.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization studies have been carried out on single-phase, polycrystalline GdFeO3, synthesized using solid-state reaction method. An anti-ferromagnetic transition associated with Gd3+ spin was observed at TN(Gd3+) ~ 2.8 K. The Density Functional Theory (DFT) calculations on the non-collinear spin arrangement in GdFeO3 show a magnetic moment of 0.026 µB per Fe3+ ion, consistent with experimentally observed moment of 0.023 µB. Further, our results predict that (Gx, Ay, Fz) and Gx spin structures are energetically the most favorable states for Fe3+ and Gd3+ sub-lattices respectively.© 2020 The Author(s)The heat dissipated by magnetic nanoparticles may be used as a heat source for hyperthermic treatment of cancer and it can be estimated based on the magnetic susceptibility when an alternating current (AC) magnetic field is applied. Here, the frequency dependence of the magnetization of magnetic nanoparticles is measured for different AC fields. This is used to examine the AC susceptibility of linear and nonlinear magnetization responses. Two methods were used to evaluate the AC susceptibility based on measured magnetization properties. The first used the static susceptibility and phase delay associated with magnetic relaxation, and the second used the area under the AC magnetization curve to derive the imaginary part of the susceptibility. When the field intensity was low, the estimated AC susceptibilities were comparable. However, when the field intensity was high, the first method predicted a lower value because it did not consider the nonlinearity of the magnetization response. To optimize the material and the applied field conditions for hyperthermia it is important to understand the difference between the two methods. The intrinsic loss power and specific loss power of the magnetic nanoparticles were also evaluated. A liquid sample and a solid sample with an oriented easy axis provided high heat dissipation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Sintered R2Fe14B (R: rare earth element) magnets with a 50% Y- and Ce-substitution for Nd were studied with the goal of reducing the Nd content. Nd was substituted with Y to attain greater magnetization and with Ce for higher coercivity. In the composition with a Y:Ce = 1:1 substitution, a maximum energy density of 355 kJ/m3 (44.6 MGOe) was achieved with a residual flux density of 1.38 T and a coercivity of 533 kA/m. To improve the coercivity, the effect of adding Ga was investigated to introduce a R6Fe13Ga grain-boundary phase and thus achieve magnetic separation between the grains. As a result of adding 1.0–3.0 at% Ga, although R6Fe13Ga formed at the grain boundaries, the coercivity decreased due to the large magnetization of 0.3–0.5 T. The magnetization of the RFe2 grain boundary phase decreased with an increase in the Ce concentration, and fell to 0.05 T for Ce 100%. By introducing the RFe2 grain-boundary phase with an appropriate amount of Ce, a coercivity of 1063 kA/m (13.4 kOe) with a residual flux density of 1.22 T was achieved with a Ce content of 40% of the rare earth elements in a R2Fe14B sintered magnet.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We correlate the structural, electrical, and magnetotransport properties of co-sputtered Mn2-xCo1+xAl full Heusler alloy thin films (0≤x≤1.75) in terms of Co/Mn concentration variation concerning the spin gapless semiconducting (SGS) behavior. The alloy thin films are found to stabilize in B2 order for near stoichiometric films, i.e. (x = 0 and x = 1), with the gradual change in the ordering and lattice parameter through Mn concentration variation. Magnetization measurements in Mn2-xCo1+xAl thin films reveal the ferromagnetic and ferrimagnetic character for x = 1.75, 1.5, 1.25 & 1, and x = 0, 0.5 & 0.75, respectively. The longitudinal resistivity measurement revealed that the films exhibit semiconducting behavior with a change in sign of the temperature coefficient of resistance with temperature. The anomalous Hall conductivity values for the Mn2-xCo1+xAl thin films are extracted from the Anomalous Hall effect (AHE) measurements. The non-saturating positive MR (linear in H) is being reported for the first time in the Mn2CoAl thin films. The value of the AHE coefficient and positive MR together serve as a piece of experimental evidence for the SGS character in the thin film. The SGS behavior becomes predominant at higher Mn concentration. Highly resistive thin films with ferromagnetic (ferrimagnetic) character in Co2MnAl (Mn2CoAl) could be beneficial for semiconductor spintronics, where we need a good resistive element to match up with Silicon base substrate.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The Raman spectroscopy and AC and DC magnetization of Dy2−xEuxTi2O7 pyrochlore materials have been investigated. A systematic shift in all phonon modes with higher Eu content in Dy2−xEuxTi2O7 observed in Raman spectra confirms the successful substitution of Dy3+ ion by Eu3+ ions. High concentration of Eu induces the exchange interactions between atoms and alters the crystal-field interactions in Dy2−xEuxTi2O7. Rich Eu content samples (x = 1.5, 1.8 and 1.9) show the existence of wasp-waisted hysteresis loop which is explained on the basis of dipolar field, anisotropy exchange interaction and spin frustration present in the samples. Interestingly, AC susceptibility shows two single ion spin freezing transitions corresponding to Dy3+ and Eu3+ ions respectively in Eu rich samples only.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically and numerically study spin-dependent Seebeck and Nernst effects in 2D ferromagnetic materials with the topological spin texture (skyrmion and vortex) ideal gas. From the numerical solution of the matrix Boltzmann equation for a nonequilibrium distribution function and the Lippmann–Schwinger equation for a T-matrix we find the strong nonlinear behaviors in the thermoelectric coefficients depending on skyrmion/vortex diameters and electron concentrations. In particular, the dramatic dependences in the Seebeck and Nernst coefficients take place at larger magnetic texture sizes where the abrupt sign flip in the vortex Seebeck and Nernst coefficients occurs in the narrow region of electron concentrations. In this case the normalized Nernst coefficient changes from +5 to -7. The spin-dependent thermoelectric coefficients are proportional to T at low temperatures for all skyrmion/vortex sizes.© 2020 The AuthorsThe Mielke-Tasaki type of ferromagnetism in poly(p-phenylenevinylene) (PPV) and its derivatives by the action of the external B magnetic field in the highly p-doped ground state is demonstrated. The system contains no magnetic atoms and the action of the B on the spins is not considered. Exact dispersion equation and bare band structures of PPV derivatives in the presence of an external homogenous magnetic field are presented. Conditions for totally flat band structure are given. On the other hand, the lack of the completely flat band structure for the most important PPV derivatives is also demonstrated. Calculations on the lowest and on other bands and on the periodicity of the bare band structure in dependence of magnitude of B are computed in an approximate manner. The magnetic field role of the vinylene chain is presented. The ground state wave function is deduced for the half-filled lowest band concentrating case by the Method of the Positive Semidefinite Operators. It is pointed out that solutions exist solely in discrete values of B. The saturated ferromagnetic property of the ground state is shown. Our results are generalizable to the case of longer chain containig polymers in which the neighbouring carbon rings are connected with each other with more double bonds.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates the influence of magnetic nanoparticle (MNP) concentration on biomolecule detection with magnetic particle spectroscopy (MPS). Streptavidin-coated MNPs, dominated by Brownian relaxation, are used to detect biotinylated Immunoglobulin G (IgG). The conjugation of the biotinylated IgG onto the surface of the functionalized MNPs enlarges their hydrodynamic sizes, thus increasing the Brownian relaxation time and changing the MPS signal. Experimental samples are prepared with Brownian relaxation-dominated MNP samples with different mole concentrations from 6.67 to 0.67 nM and IgG samples with different mole concentrations from 0 to 8.33 nM. Experimental results of ac susceptibility spectra indicate that the Brownian relaxation time increases from 0.85 to 1.20 ms with decreasing the MNP concentration from 6.67 to 0.67 nM at a given IgG concentration of 5 nM. Experimental results of MPS show that the ratio of the 3rd to 1st harmonics decreases more significantly with increasing IgG concentration at a lower MNP concentration. The absolute variation in the ratio of 3rd to 1st harmonics of the MNPs is used to characterize the measurement sensitivity of IgG. It shows that the measurement sensitivity increases from 1.68 × 10−3 to 12.25 × 10−3 nM−1 at an excitation frequency of 180 Hz. This study demonstrates that a lower MNP concentration can improve the measurement sensitivity of biomolecules with MPS in the frequency range from 180 to 1418 Hz. We emphasize that our findings are of great importance to reach a highly sensitive approach for biomolecule detection.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Two-dimensional graphene is considered potent candidate for the development of spintronics technology. Present work reports study of graphene-based spin-Field Effect Transistors. (s-FET) of two types namely, Top-Gated s-FET and Back-Gated s-FET. The Ohmic contact behavior was analyzed as Co-Graphene nanosheets (CGNs) used as ferromagnetic electrode for both types of s-FETs. The magnetoresistance (MR) study is conducted for both devices as a function of temperature and gate voltage. Study shows that MR monotonically reduces as temperature increases. For greater insight into about the functioning of device, spin-polarization values were estimated at different temperatures. Switching action in both the devices was analyzed and finally it is found that Top-Gated Type s-FET shows appropriate switching action.© 2020Nickel-Copper-Zinc ferrites are state-of-the-art dielectric materials with enhanced electromagnetic properties. Herein, we report, physicochemical and magnetic properties of Co2+ substituted NiCuZn ferrites of the series Ni0.25-xCoxCu0.30Zn0.45Fe2O4 (x = 0.00, 0.05, 0.01, 0.15, 0.20 and 0.25). The adopted synthesis method is the facile sol–gel auto combustion route with glycine as a reducing agent. X-ray diffraction (XRD) signatures revealed the cubic spinel structure, with a decrease in the lattice constant (a) due to a smaller ionic radius of Co2+ (0.72 Å) replacing Ni2+ (0.74 Å) ions. The optical properties of the ferrites are discussed in detail, viz. refractive index (η), reflectivity (R), the velocity of IR waves (v), and jump rates (J1, J2, and J). EDAX analysis indicated the elemental composition of ferrite samples as per the chosen stoichiometry. The microstructural analysis (SEM and TEM) depicts the dense microstructure with the average grain size of 38–95 nm. The samples exhibit a typical magnetic hysteresis loop at room temperature with low coercivity values confirming the soft magnetic nature. The maximum MS = 56 emu/gm was observed for the ferrite sample with x = 0.20. Temperature-dependent initial permeability at a constant frequency (1 MHz) showed the drop in the permeability values with increasing Co2+ content, whereas the values of Tc remain fairly unchanged.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The influence of the applied potentials difference on the structural, magnetic, and conductive properties, as well as the phase composition of Co nanowires obtained by electrochemical synthesis is considered. The dependences of the change in structural parameters for Co nanowires, as well as phase transformations on the difference of the applied potentials are established. It was shown that using an applied potential difference of 1.25–1.5 V allows one to obtain nanowires with a hexagonal type of crystal lattice, and increasing the potential difference to 2.5–2.75 V allows one to obtain structures with domination by a cubic face-centered phase with a distinguished texture direction. A change in the degree of texturing from nanowires leads to a change in magnetic characteristics, as well as a change in the graphs of the current – voltage curves. The prospects of applying the method of electrochemical synthesis to obtain Co nanowires to different phase composition by showing the difference in the applied potentials are shown.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic Barkhausen noise (MBN) control is popular for materials characterization and as a magnetic Non-Destructive Testing & Evaluation (NDT & E) method. MBN comes from the erratic and unpredictable magnetic domains motion during the magnetization process. Its correlation to the micro-structural properties is evident. MBN is usually studied through time independent indicators, like the MBNenergy, which is obtained by integrating the square of the MBN voltage signal with respect to the time axis. By plotting the MBN energy as a function of the tangent excitation field H, a hysteresis cycle can be observed. After renormalization, the comparison with the classic induction vs excitation B(H) hysteresis loop provides interesting observations. Similar shapes can be observed if the domain wall contribution is preponderant in the magnetization process. On the contrary, strong differences appear if the magnetization rotation mechanism is stronger. There is no available standard for the exploitation of MBN control devices. Usual procedures rely on rejection thresholds based on empirical relations. In this domain, simulation tools able to refine these thresholds and improve the understanding of the physical behavior are highly desired. In this study, a simulation method combining a multiscale model for the anhysteretic behavior and the Jiles-Atherton theory is proposed to simulate precisely the MBNenergy hysteresis cycles. The use of the multiscale model allows separating the contributions of domain wall motion and magnetization rotation mechanisms. The satisfying simulation results validate the approach and constitute a major step toward a comprehensive simulation tool dedicated to MBN.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Composite materials where magnetic micrometer-sized particles are embedded into a compliant polymer matrix are known as magnetorheological (or magnetoactive) elastomers (MAEs). They are distinguished by huge variations in their physical properties, when in a magnetic field, which is commonly attributed to the restructuring of the filler. The process of the magnetic-field-induced restructuring in a magnetorheological elastomer is interpreted as progression towards percolation. Such a physical model was previously used to explain the dependence of the magnetic permeability and dielectric permittivity of MAEs on the magnetic field strength. Based on this hypothesis, the magnetorheological effect in MAEs is considered theoretically. The theoretical approach is built upon a self-consistent effective-medium theory for the elastic properties, extended to the variable (field dependent) percolation threshold. The proposed model allows one to describe the large variations (over several orders of magnitude) of the effective elastic moduli of these composite materials, known as the giant magnetorheological (MR) and field-stiffening effects. The existence of a giant magnetic Poisson effect is predicted. The relation of the proposed model to the existing theories of the MR effect in MAEs is discussed. The results can be useful for applications of MAEs in magnetic-field-controlled vibration dampers and isolators.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.La-Co-Ti substituted Sr-hexaferrite, Sr0.906La0.094Fe11-2xCoxTixO19 (x = 0.8, 1.0, 1.2, 1.4) powder-epoxy (10 wt%) composites were fabricated for electromagnetic wave (EM) absorption application. Single M-type hexaferrite phase was confirmed by X-ray diffraction analysis for all the samples. Both saturation magnetization and coercivity of the composites decrease with increase of Co-Ti substitution x. Reflection loss (RL) of the hexaferrite powder–epoxy composites were calculated using their complex permittivity and permeability data. The EM absorbing frequency range is controlled by the substitution x because the ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) frequency of the samples is systematically varied following Snoek's limit law. The hexaferrite sample with x = 1.2 is suitable for use as an X-band (8–12 GHz) radar absorber since RL < -10 dB is satisfied in the full X-band. Also, high EM absorbing performances in millimeter range, RL < -20 dB at 24 GHz (3 mm), and RL < -20 dB at 26.5 GHz (0.9 mm), could be achieved in the FMR-controlled La-Co-Ti substituted M-type hexaferrite-epoxy composite.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the wide field of contactless energy transfer over a large distance, e.g. for charging electric vehicles or for supplying energy to implanted medical devices in the human body, different types of coils are used. For being able to determine the properties of the path of energy transfer, the spatial distribution of the generated magnetic field is very important. An analytic expression has several advantages for determining the spatial distribution of the magnetic field in an efficient way. In this paper, an analytic approximation for the vector potential and the magnetic flux density of a filamentary circular current loop is proposed. The derivation of the fundamental equations and the concept of the approximation is presented and the range of parameters, in which an analytic solution with sufficient precision is obtained, is determined and evaluated dependent on the parameters of the design and the approximation. The results of the analytic approximation for the magnetic flux density are presented based on an exemplary filamentary circular current loop. Finally, the results are verified by a FEM simulation. The analytic approximation shows a sufficient accuracy at large distances as well as in the close vicinity of the current loop and turns out to be a fast and efficient option to evaluate the magnetic field of one or more circular coils.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.As one of desirable spin-gapless semiconductors, Heusler alloy CoFeCrGa is a potential candidate for semiconductor spintronic applications. However, the absence of explicit investigation on transport properties opens a great way for our theoretical research. In this study, we report on the spin-Seebeck coefficient of quaternary Heusler alloy CoFeCrGa and CoFeCrAl from ab initio density functional theory and Boltzmann transport calculations. Interestingly, CoFeCrGa is a spin-gapless semiconductor while CoFeCrAl acts as a half-metallic ferrimagnet. These two effects produce different spin-Seebeck coefficients of 6.76 μV/K and −0.57 μV/K at room temperature, respectively. By modulating chemical potential and temperature, the spin-Seebeck coefficient can be boosted to −11.7 μV/K under µ = −0.15 eV for CoFeCrGa, and −16.2 μV/K with µ = 0.13 eV for CoFeCrAl, both at 400 K. We demonstrate that the mechanism of the variation of the Seebeck coefficient depending upon the chemical potential and temperature is related to bond lengths, electronic structures, magnetic properties, and transmission. These characteristics of CoFeCrGa and CoFeCrAl offer perspectives for their spin-transport devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.So far, none of conventional magnetic shielding models can model a field long pipeline consisting of many welded short sections with different permeabilities. This paper demonstrates the magnetic shielding model of long pipelines via simulation analyses based on the finite element method (FEM) and experimental verifications of the magnetic shielding of short pipes, torus pipes, and field long pipelines. The radial and axial shielding factors of a finite pipe can be accurately calculated by the FEM. As the pipe length increases, the axial factor rapidly converges to a value less than 1, and the convergence value is independent of the pipe length because of the magnetic charges at the two ends. For a long pipeline consisting of many short sections, the averaged shielding factors over a couple of adjacent sections are equal to that of an ideal infinite pipeline, and the axial factor is always equal to 1. An “average” strategy for field pipeline orientations that employs the averaged magnetic fields and shielding factors over several sections is then proposed and demonstrated. As the geomagnetic field is taken as the absolute reference, this orientation measurement method has no risk of divergence over a long time and distance. Index Terms—cylindrical magnetic shield, magnetic fields, pipeline orientation.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We reported a new atomic site preference occupation for Vanadium-based X2YZ full Heusler alloys. It tells that alloys with less 24 valence electrons form the L21-type structure, while others form the XA-type structure. This fact means that the site preference rule for Vanadium-based alloys depends on the total number of valence electrons instead of the electropositive between X and Y atoms. The magnetic moments of XA-type alloys follow the Slater-Pauling rules, with two forms, Mt = NV − 24 and Mt = NV − 18 corresponding to different origins of the band gaps. XA-type V2YZ (Y = Cr, Mn and Fe; Z = Ga, Ge and As), V2CoGa, V2CoGe and V2NiGa alloys have half-metallic property. L21-type V2YZ (Y = Cu and Zn; Z = Ga, Ge and As) alloys show no spin polarization and no half-metallic property due to the structural symmetry and the non-magnetism of copper and zinc atoms.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline ceramic Bi0.80Ba0.10Nd0.10Fe1-xCoxO3synthesized via conventional solid state reaction method and their structural properties were investigated by Rietveld analysis of X-ray diffraction data. From the Rietveld refinement, it is confirmed that for x = 0.00, 0.01samples exhibit rhombohedral symmetry with R3c space group and for x = 0.03,0.05 and 0.07 structural phase modification takes place: samples exhibit mixed phase i.e. rhombohedral(R3c) and triclinic (P1) phase. Raman active phonon modes are consistent with changes in Bi-O and Fe-O bond lengths. Field emission scanning electron microscopy was used to study the microstructure and grain size of all the prepared samples. The elemental analysis of all the prepared samples was measured by using energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy. Dielectric constant and tanδ shows dispersion behaviour at low frequencies and become nearly constant at higher frequencies for all the prepared samples which can be explained with the help of M−W model. Impedance spectroscopy reveals the contribution of both grain and grain boundaries in resistivity. A remarkable enhancement in magnetization was observed with Co doping. The maximum remnant magnetization Mr = 0.3868 emu/g and corresponding value of coercive field Hc = 0.6968 kOe was observed for x = 0.05 and slightly reduces for x = 0.07.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.With large entropy changes and flexible preparation processes, (Mn, Fe)2(P, Si) alloys have attracted wide interest from researchers for magnetic refrigeration. Cu doping can compensate for the mechanical properties, but will increase thermal hysteresis (ΔThys) and decrease the Curie temperature (TC) of (Mn, Fe)2(P, Si) alloys. To tune the TC to room temperature while maintaining low thermal hysteresis and good mechanical properties, Cu-B co-doping is applied to (Mn, Fe)2(P, Si) alloys. The results demonstrated that as the amount of B increases in Mn1.05Fe0.9P0.5-xSi0.5Cu0.10Bx alloys, the TC continuously increases from 261 K to 344 K, and the ΔThys decreases by 76%. Contour plots of XRD patterns show the shifts in Bragg angles near the Curie temperature, which are ascribed to the increase in the lattice parameters during phase transitions, leading to high internal stress. After long-term annealing, Cu tends to segregate at the grain boundaries to act as a buffer between the Fe2P-type main phase. Therefore, stress from lattice deformation during first-order phase transitions can be absorbed. This study presents a new technical route to obtain magnetic refrigeration materials with high magnetocaloric effects and good mechanical properties by co-doping Cu and B, which is instructive for engineering applications.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Hydrogel nanocomposites incorporated with magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) were widely researched as promising candidate for environment-responsive drug delivery, due to their unique magnetic properties and quick response to an external magnetic field. In this study, dextran-coated iron oxide nanoparticles (Fe3O4) with various particle size were prepared and embedded physically into dextran microgels formed via Schiff base reactions between aldehyded dextran and diamine in W/O inverse microemulsion, leading to a series of magnetic microgels with MNPs content of 3, 6, 9% by weight percentage. Similar superparamagnetic properties of as prepared microgels with Fe3O4 nanoparticles were proved, and their saturation magnetization increased with the increasing particle size or content of the MNPs. Antitumor drug doxorubicin (DOX) was encapsulated into the magnetic dextran microgels, and pH/magnetic field dual-responsive release profiles of DOX were demonstrated. Moreover, the release rate of DOX decreased obviously with the increasing MNPs content, probably due to the diffusion barrier for drug movement resulted from the reduced pore size of hydrogel matrix in respond to external magnetic field. These results indicate that the magnetic dextran microgels can serve as stimuli-sensitive drug delivery systems.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a 2D magneto-plasmonic grating structure combining materials with ferromagnetic and plasmonic properties is demonstrated. NiFe composite ferromagnetic material, as an active medium with tunable physical properties, and Au metal, as a plasmonic excitation layer, were the materials of choice. Here, we have experimentally investigated the active control of the plasmonic characteristics in Au/NiFe bilayer by the action of an external magnetic field, as well as the switching effect of the system. The active plasmonic control, can be achieved by the magnetization switching of the ferromagnetic material, opening a new path in the development of active plasmonic devices. To our best knowledge, this is the first demonstration of such a magneto-optical plasmonic switch based on the coupling of plasmons with magneto-optical active materials, in which the response time was estimated to be in the range of microseconds.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The interface magnetoelectric (ME) effect is promising for novel technological applications as it allows the control of interface magnetization at heterointerfaces by the external electric field. Here in this article, we explore the interface ME effect and its sensitivity on interface atomic structure and bonding in ferromagnetic-ferroelectric oxide hetrostructures within the framework of density functional theory. In particular, we consider Fe/AgNbO3 and SrRuO3/AgNbO3 superlattices with different possible defect-free interfaces. Our results suggest that interface magnetization and thereby interface ME effect can critically depend on interface structure. The interface magnetization is found to depend on atomic bondings which are sensitive to atomic displacements at the interface. This leads to ME coupling due to induced change in the interface magnetization as the electric polarization is reversed in the ferroelectric film. In addition, the contribution to interface ME coupling also comes from the change in exchange-splitting between spin-polarized electrons and consequently change in the interface magnetic moments due to ferroelectric polarization reversal. The change in exchange splitting, in turn, is caused by spin-dependent screening of the bound polarization charges at the interface. In Fe/AgNbO3 system, the interface ME coefficient is found to exhibit opposing trend for Fe|AgO and Fe|NbO2 interfaces. In addition to interface ME effect, the formation of ferroelectric interface domain wall (IDW) in these systems is also explored. The IDW is found to form only in SrRuO3/AgNbO3 system with SrO|NbO2 interface due to oppositely oriented strong dipole moments at the two interfaces. The strong dependence of interface ME effect on interface atomic structure may have implication for its experimental observation in oxide heterostructures. In particular, the interface defects may render the conclusive observation of this phenomenon challenging due to resulting fluctuations in the observed data.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In the present article a magnetic solid exhibiting the phase transition from the high-temperature ferromagnetic (FM) to the low-temperature antiferromagnetic (AFM) phase is considered. The Landau theory of phase transitions is used for the analysis of inverse magnetocaloric effect (MCE) observed below the phase transition temperature. The magnetic-field-induced shift of the phase transition temperature has been calculated and the dependence of the phase transition field on the temperature of solid has been computed; the quantitative agreement between the theoretical results and the experimental data obtained in the recent experiments with Fe49Rh51 alloy has been achieved. The magnetic-field-induced entropy change and refrigerant capacity of Fe49Rh51 alloy have been calculated. Reasonable agreement between theoretical results and experimental data has been demonstrated. The dependence of characteristics of MCE on the spin-exchange parameter has been shown. The MCE in the artificial AFM structures has been discussed.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the ground state of monolayer 1T-XCl2 (X: Fe, Co, and Ni) using the generalized Bloch theorem, which can generate ferromagnetic, spiral, and antiferromagnetic states. Each state was represented by a unique spiral vector that arranges the magnetic moment of magnetic atom in the primitive unit cell. We found the ferromagnetic ground state for the FeCl2 and NiCl2 while the spiral ground state appears for the CoCl2. We also showed that the ground state depends sensitively on the lattice constant. When the hole–electron doping was taken into account, we found the phase transition, which involves the ferromagnetic, spiral, and antiferromagnetic states, for all the systems. Since the spin–spin interaction in the monolayer metal dichlorides is influenced by the competition between the direct exchange and the superexchange, we justify that the carrier concentration determines which interaction should dominate.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.High purity MnBi magnetic low temperature phase (LTP) were prepared via induction melting, annealing and low energy ball milling. The effects of synthetic parameters and chemical compositions on phase purity and magnetic properties were systematically investigated. A homogenization heat treatment process was employed to increase the fraction of LTP MnBi, which showed notably high saturation magnetization (Ms) of up to 74.8 Am2/kg with the purity of 97 wt% LTP MnBi. The purity of MnBi is strongly related to the amount of Mn and residual Bi in the annealed ingot. By controlling the residue, the highest phase fraction was obtained with the atomic ratio of Mn56Bi44. The maximum energy product (BH)max was recorded 11.7 MGOe under an applied magnetic field of 1.5 T at room temperature, making MnBi a promising rare-earth-free permanent magnet.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we present study of the magnetic structure of multiferroic series Bi1-yLayFeO3 (y = 0, 0.015, 0.03, 0.05 and 0.10) using nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) at 4.2 K and Mössbauer spectroscopy at room temperature on 57Fe nuclei. We observed the presence of cycloid type spatial spin-modulated structure (SSMS) in the whole range of compositions. The study of the concentration dependence of the anharmonicity parameter m revealed that at the temperature of liquid helium in the composition region y = 0 – 0.10 as well as at room temperature for y = 0.03 the magnetic state of multiferroics is described by cycloid type SSMS with a positive effective uniaxial constant of magnetic anisotropy Κu > 0 (“easy axis” model). The study at room temperature in turn revealed that magnetic state of the multiferroics with y = 0 – 0.03 is described by cycloid type SSMS with a positive effective uniaxial constant of magnetic anisotropy Κu > 0 (“easy axis” model). In contrast, the magnetic state of multiferroics with y = 0.05 and 0.10 is described by a negative effective uniaxial constant of magnetic anisotropy Κu < 0 (“easy plane” model). Anharmonicity parameter m at room temperature for y = 0.03 – 0.05 is close to zero, which means that SSMS in this range of compositions is close to harmonic.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Strain-induced α′-martensite and austenite reversion in a cold rolled UNS S32304 lean duplex steel were tracked by means of magnetic measurements, with emphasis on both Ms (saturation magnetization) and Hc (coercive field) parameters. Grain-averaged quality metrics derived from EBSD (electron backscatter diffraction) analysis were also used to distinguish the phases during austenite reversion. The material was cold rolled to a true strain (ε) of 1.61 and subjected to isothermal and continuous annealing, the latter conducted in the presence of an external magnetic field. The evolution of the α′-martensite fraction upon straining and after isothermal annealing was monitored by coupling the Ms values and thermodynamic simulations, as well as from EBSD analysis. For the isothermally annealed material (ε = 1.61), the overall behavior of Ms and hardness displayed similar trends with a strong decrease for temperatures higher than 500 °C, suggesting austenite reversion. Results confirmed the occurrence of austenite reversion for the temperature interval investigated here. At 800 °C, austenite reversion is complete, and the steel is fully recrystallized. Besides, from the EBSD analysis, evidence of ferrite transformation into austenite was rather noticeable, in accordance with thermodynamic simulations and magnetic probing. Complementary electron channeling contrast imaging (ECCI) revealed that precipitation reactions mainly occur in the recrystallized austenite at 700 and 800 °C. The Hc behavior of both, the strained and annealed conditions was inferred to be mostly driven by microstructural changes in ferrite.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Enhancing electric field controlled magnetism of micron-scale-thickness ferromagnetic film is of great significance to improve the performance of magnetoelectric (ME) sensors, ME tunable inductors and other ME devices. In order to achieve above purpose, multilayer preparation method was proposed and validated by experiment studies on multilayer (Cu(10 nm)/(FeGaB(100 nm)/Cu(5 nm))10) and monolayer (Cu(10 nm)/FeGaB (1000 nm)/Cu(5 nm)) samples, respectively. The results show the electric field controlled magnetism could be enhanced obviously by the multilayer preparation method. Meanwhile, the finite element simulation model was established to analyze possible causes for the improvement of electric field controlled magnetism in multilayer sample. The model revealed that multilayer preparation can reduce the in-plane demagnetizing factor and increase the internal magnetic field of the magnetic materials, thus enhancing electric field controlled magnetism. This work is conducive to the development of micron-scale-thickness films in electric field control of magnetism, which contributes to the application of ferroelectric/ferromagnetic heterostructures in ME devices.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Manganese (Mn) based full-Heusler alloys have been shown to be the most promising materials due to their excellent magnetic behaviors for applications in magneto resistance, magnetic tunnel devices, spin valve and spin injection devices. Here, we report the study of crystal structure, electronic structure and magnetic properties of Mn2NiSb full-Heusler alloy. XRD investigation of Mn2NiSb followed by Rietveld refinement reveals the material to be successfully crystallized in a well-ordered Cu2MnAl prototype structure manifested by the existence of super-lattice diffraction peaks of (1 1 1) and (2 2 0). The experimental lattice parameter is estimated to be 6.01 Å which is larger than the available reports. Magnetic measurement (M-H) performed by applying external magnetic field up to 1.8 Tesla reveals the saturated magnetic moment (MS) of 4.07μB/formula unit and 2.50μB/formula unit at temperature 5 K and 300 K respectively which is the highest value reported so far at 5 K for Mn2NiSb stabilized in Cu2MnAl type structure. Further, magnetization versus temperature (M-T) curve with zero-field cooled (ZFC) and field-cooled (FC) up to 300 K indicates that Mn2NiSb crystallized in a single phase. However, the square of magnetization and temperature curve was best fitted with linear fitting supporting to Stoner like ferromagnetism. In order to have a better understanding of magnetic behavior, the First principal calculation has also been performed. Interestingly, our experimental observations were found to be well corroborated with the theoretically estimated magnetic behavior.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The evolutions of crystallographic orientations and textures of a cold-rolled ultra-thin grain-oriented silicon steel are studied via experimental investigation, texture simulation and orientation evolution calculation. The experimental results show that all components of η-fiber ({0kl} 〈1 0 0〉 ) orientations in raw material demonstrate multi-directional crystal rotation routes during rolling and these initial orientations are retained as small regions distributed within the deformed matrix (mainly {1 1 1} 〈1 1 2〉 ), and the calculated typical transformation of orientations under the cold rolling condition is in good agreement with the experimental results. The crystal orientation of a grain would rotate to {1 1 1} 〈1 1 2〉 after rolling as long as its initial orientation is close to or slightly deviates from exact Goss ({0 1 1} 〈1 0 0〉 ). When the initial orientations deviates towards {0 2 1} 〈1 0 0〉, the final deformed microstructures mainly turn into deviated γ-fiber or display {1 1 3} 〈3 6 1〉 orientations, meanwhile the orientation transition along η-fiber (rotating about 〈1 0 0〉 axis) during rolling is enhanced. Regarding the effect of surface shear on rolling plane towards rolling direction (RD) in ultra-thin steel production, it is suggested to strengthen {1 1 1} 〈1 1 2〉 deformation texture. While for different {0kl} 〈1 0 0〉 components, the same surface shear exerts varied effect on the crystal rotation route, resulting in multiple orientation transition routes in deviated Goss and {0 2 1} 〈1 0 0〉 grains under cold-rolling process.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Nanostructures of the naturally-existing most stable iron oxide, hematite (α-Fe2O3), gain significant research interest in various recent applications. In this study, we put the main focus on magneto-optical (MO) properties of hematite nanoparticles synthesized by a solvothermal approach, and the effects of size, morphology, and particle aggregation on the magnetic circular dichroism (MCD) and conventional absorption spectra are investigated. Simultaneous deconvolution of UV–vis absorption and MCD spectra allows us to discuss the nature of electronic transitions of various hematite nanoarchitectures on the basis of possible transitions in the 3d5 system, giving enhanced spectral resolution and detailed assignments. Consequently, we find (i) characteristic size- and shape-dependent MCD responses at 450–470 nm; and (ii) the presence of both spin-allowed pair excitation and Laporte-forbidden d–d transition with opposite MCD signs in close energy at around 550 nm.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report the effects of implantation-induced-sputtering in determining the true magnetisation of iron nitrides formed by nitrogen implantation into iron films and the changes subsequently observed in their magnetic anisotropy. Iron thin films (40 nm) capped with gold layers were synthesized by ion beam sputtering. Nitrogen was implanted onto the thin film to a dose of 7 × 1016 cm−2. Dynamic ion–solid interaction simulations calculate the average nitrogen concentration within the iron thin films to be 13 at.%. Ion beam analysis was used to evaluate the composition and depth profile of the thin films before and after implantation. Cross-sectional transmission electron microscopy helped in identifying the implantation induced effects at the surface and interface of the thin film structure. Magnetisation measurements show that nitrogen implantation enhances the magnetisation of thin films and reduces their in-plane magnetic anisotropy. High resolution TEM and magnetisation results suggest formation of α’/α”-Fe16N2 with large magnetic moments and perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. The enhancement in magnetisation of the thin film with and without considering the sputtering losses is determined to be 15% and 5%, respectively. Our review of literature shows that underestimating the sputtering losses from implantation leads to reporting of inconsistent and reduced magnetic moments for Fe16N2.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The effects of Ta substitution on the phase transition have been studied in Hf1-xTaxFe1.98 (x = 0.125, 0.13, 0.135) alloys with kagome-type lattice. Increased Ta substitution leads into the reduced metamagnetic transition temperature (Tt). The nature of such phase transition is also changed from second-order type to the weak first-order one, suggested by the gradually observed hysteresis. The magnetic entropy change (ΔS) is meanwhile enhanced from 3.04 J kg−1 K−1 to 3.4 J kg−1 K−1. Such enhanced magnetocaloric effects are strongly correlated with the enhanced magneto-elastic effect, which is further confirmed by the maximized saturation magnetostriction (λs//) of ~1700 ppm near the Tt of Hf0.865Ta0.135Fe1.98 alloy. The concurrence of maximized ΔSmax and λs// suggests the strong magneto-elastic coupling during phase transition and the high linear co-efficiency of negative thermal expansion can be triggered in Fe-deficient Hf0.865Ta0.135Fe1.98 alloy.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.A phenomenon of Y3Fe5O12 (YIG)-ferromagnetic-resonance (FMR) linewidth broadening in magnetically coupled YIG-Co films is reported. The broadened linewidth cannot be attributed to previous effects which only depend on the crystalline quality of YIG. Through micromagnetic simulation, the origin of this broadened linewidth was found to be a new type of inhomogeneity effect induced by the inhomogeneous dipolar field of Co layer. Furthermore, it shows that the extent of the linewidth broadening depends on the magnetization state of Co. The broadening is remarkable when the Co domains are random. The influence of Co on YIG-FMR linewidth still exists when the spacer between YIG and Co is 315 nm, indicating it is a long-range effect due to the dipolar origin.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the effects of biaxial compressive and tensile strain on the magnetic and structural properties of BaFeO3-δ (BFO), BaFe0.9Ti0.1O3-δ (BFTO) and BaFe0.9Ru0.1O3-δ (BFRO) thin films fabricated on SrTiO3 (0 0 1) (STO) and MgO (0 0 1). The magnetization measurements show a long range ferromagnetic ordering in compressive strained BFO thin film while an antiferromagnetic ordering with weak ferromagnetism appears in tensile strained BFO thin film. This behavior is ascribed to the difference in oxygen stoichiometry under the two strain states in the BFO thin films. Ti4+ (3d0) and Ru4+ (4d5) ion substitutions at B-site cause an increase in unit cell volume irrespective of the strain type resulting in relaxation of tensile strain and enhancement of compressive strain. This B-site disorder leads to collapse of long range ferromagnetic ordering in BFTO and BFRO thin films grown on STO but an increased ferromagnetic ordering comes along in BFTO and BFTRO thin films on MgO. The contrasting results portray that tensile strain suppresses the effect of cation disorder evident under compressive strain, on the magnetic and structural properties of BFO, BFTO and BFRO thin films.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Nd-Fe-B based magnets exhibit excellent magnetic properties and are being widely used in high-technology, information, energy and medical fields, etc. Nowadays, with the rapid development of the electric vehicle industries, Nd-Fe-B magnets have also stepped into a period of rapid development. However, it brings a higher requirement for the magnetic properties at the same time, especially higher coercivity. It is found that the magnetic properties of Nd-Fe-B magnets are related to the components and microstructures of their intergranular phases. Adding some materials by the traditional smelting process can modify intergranular or matrix phases to increase the coercivity of the magnets. The additives evenly distributed in the matrix Nd2Fe14B phases may cause the original composition and structure of Nd2Fe14B phases to be partially destroyed. It also causes not only the remanence of the magnets to be decreased but also a large amount rare earth resources to be wasted. More excitingly, in 2005, a new technology is proposed, named as “Grain Boundary Diffusion”, which effectively increases the coercivity of Nd-Fe-B magnets with a small amount of rare earth additives. And the remanence is usually only slightly reduced. This technology is attributed to modify the composition and structure of grain boundary phases or Nd2Fe14B grains by different material diffusion. In this paper, the research achievements of grain boundary diffusion technologies so far will be introduced. It mainly focuses on the influence of additives on the interface between grain boundary phases and matrix Nd2Fe14B phases, as well as on the intrinsic connection between the microstructures and the magnetic properties. The corresponding diffusion mechanism is also summarized, which serves as data support for the further development of grain boundary diffusion technology.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.The grain boundary diffusion process (GBDP) is now widely used to increase coercivity in Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets with a more efficient use of heavy rare earth elements (Dy, Tb). This process leads to a typical core-shell structure for the grains consisting of (Nd,Dy)2Fe14B shells at the outer grain regions and Nd2Fe14B cores. The thickness of the (Nd,Dy)2Fe14B shells decreases from the diffusion surface to the magnet core. This inhomogeneous distribution in Dy content gives rise to a coercivity gradient within the magnet and leads therefore to a reduced squareness of the demagnetization curve. The purpose of this work is to provide a quantitative understanding of the influence of composition profiles after GBDP on the shape of the demagnetization curve of Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets diffused with the Dy63Co37 (at. %) intermetallic compound. SEM/X-EDS analyses along the Fisher diffusion model allow the estimation of the Dy concentration in grains and at different depths. Then, after ascribing to the grains some critical values for the switching field that are related to the local Dy content, a macroscopic finite element model is implemented to provide a better understanding of the grain reversal sequence in the graded magnets tested in closed-circuit. Grain reversal patterns show that demagnetization starts from the less coercive grains in the magnet core, remains constricted in this zone thanks to a shielding effect from the external surface, and then propagates towards outer layers via magnetostatic interactions. When the coercivity gradient is large, the coercivity of the whole magnet measured in closed-circuit could be 100–200 kA/m lower than the value expected without considering magnetostatic interactions, suggesting that the shielding effect from the diffusion affected layers could be limited and counterbalanced by magnetostatic interactions.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We studied electric field modification of magnetic properties in a Pt/Co/AlOx trilayer via magneto-optical Kerr microscopy. We observed the spontaneous formation of labyrinthine magnetic domain structure due to thermally activated domain nucleation and propagation under zero applied magnetic field. A variation of the period of the labyrinthine structure under electric field is observed as well as saturation magnetization and magnetic anisotropy variations. Using an analytical formula of the stripe equilibrium width we estimate the variation of the interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction under electric field as function of the exchange stiffness constant.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.MFM probes with high switching fields have been synthesized by depositing Cr/SmCo5/Cr trilayers onto commercial Si AFM probes. The maximum switching field values of the probes (between 4 T and 5 T for probes annealed at 550 °C for 5 min) is lower than the coercivity measured on similar trilayers (6.8 T) deposited on a Si substrate. Reducing the annealing time of the probes results in a lower switching field while increasing the annealing time leads to a drop in the magnetization of the probes. Such ultra-high switching field MFM probes are of interest for characterizing a range of materials including hard magnetic materials in the remanent state or under an external applied magnetic field and magnetic transducers under excitation.© 2020We review our work on continuous Ni films coupled via strain to ferroelectric substrates of BaTiO3 (BTO) and 0.68Pb(Mg1/3Nb2/3)O3–0.32PbTiO3 (PMN-PT). We show that magnetic force microscopy (MFM) and photoemission electron microscopy (PEEM) of the Ni films (during or after electrical treatment) permit to reveal nanoscale converse magnetoelectric effects (CMEs) that are novel and elude macroscopic measurements. As examples, we discuss magnetization reversal without applied field in multilayer capacitors (MLCs), shear-strain-mediated CMEs in thin Ni films on PMN-PT and reversible switching of perpendicular magnetization from out-of-plane to in-plane in Ni films on BTO. In this latter case, we show that PEEM can be used to measure both magnetic and ferroelectric domains, thus providing key mechanistic insight in the magnetoelectric coupling mechanism.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.We report on the induction, through X-ray irradiation, of local anisotropy modifications in amorphous Fe80B20 stripes prepared by laser lithography from 15 nm thick films deposited by pulsed laser ablation. Those anisotropy modifications, taking place in a zone having a dimension of 15 μm around the X-ray beam (2 µm width) incidence area center point, lead to an effective transverse-to-the-stripe long axis local magnetic easy axis that can be exploited to stably localize a 180° domain wall, in remanence after saturation with a transverse-to the stripe easy axis dc field. Upon stabilizing that wall it is possible to excite spatially inhomogeneous ferromagnetic resonances nearby the irradiated region (IR). The time dependencies of the magnetization precession at both sides of the IR exhibit a uniform phase shift of 180° over distances of the order of 20 μm from the stabilized domain wall.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Hard-Soft Exchange coupled nanocomposite magnets rely on a precise control of both crystal structure and microstructure for the constituent phases. In Nd2Fe14B + 10 wt%α-Fe magnetic nanocomposites obtained through mechanical milling, the nanostructure refinement is achieved by annealing for a short duration. This work builds upon previous results in two ways: (i) increasing rapid annealing temperature and rate, (ii) taking advantage of the Fe α/γ transformation in order to limit the growth of the soft phase crystallites. Annealing was performed at temperatures between 800 °C and 950 °C under purified inert He gas for durations between 38 s and 65 s. The structure and microstructure of the nanocomposites were studied through XRD and SEM, while their magnetic properties and the effectiveness of the interphase exchange coupling were studied using demagnetization curves (±10 T) and dM/dH plots.© 2020 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of two oxidised Co thin films prepared by different sputtering techniques are analysed. Exchange bias (EB) blocking temperatures (TB) of the samples were found to be 50 K different due to difference in grain sizes of antiferromagnetic CoO. In proximity to TB the EB changes its sign from negative to positive. This positive EB behaviour is strikingly similar for the two samples with the exception of its position on the temperature scale. A computational model, taking into account temperature dependence of the antiferromagnet's magnetocrystalline anisotropy and its sublattices’ magnetisation, reproduces positive EB in proximity to TB. This happens when a significant fraction of antiferromagnetic entities becomes involved in magnetisation reversal, and there is antiferromagnetic exchange coupling between those entities. The coercivity enhancement, accompanying positive EB, is due to anisotropy energies of the reversible antiferromagnetic entities contributing to the ferromagnetic layer's energy barrier. The model suggests that in order for the two samples to have identical positive EB behaviour, the reversible antiferromagnetic entities should represent individual spins.